Washington, session 2025-2026, SB5167.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1. (1) A budget is hereby adopted and, subject to the provisions set forth in the following sections, the several amounts specified in parts I through IX of this act, or so much thereof as shall be sufficient to accomplish the purposes designated, are hereby appropriated and authorized to be incurred for salaries, wages, and other expenses of the agencies and offices of the state and for other specified purposes for the fiscal biennium beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2027, except as otherwise provided, out of the several funds of the state hereinafter named.(2) Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section apply throughout this act.(a) "Fiscal year 2026" or "FY 2026" means the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026.(b) "Fiscal year 2027" or "FY 2027" means the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027.(c) "FTE" means full time equivalent.(d) "Lapse" or "revert" means the amount shall return to an unappropriated status.(e) "Provided solely" means the specified amount may be spent only for the specified purpose. Unless otherwise specifically authorized in this act, any portion of an amount provided solely for a specified purpose which is not expended subject to the specified conditions and limitations to fulfill the specified purpose shall lapse.PART IGENERAL GOVERNMENTNEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 101. FOR THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVESGeneral FundâState Appropriation (FY 2026). . . .$61,985,000General FundâState Appropriation (FY 2027). . . .$65,250,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$127,235,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 102. FOR THE SENATEGeneral FundâState Appropriation (FY 2026). . . .$45,521,000General FundâState Appropriation (FY 2027). . . .$50,984,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$96,505,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 103. FOR THE JOINT LEGISLATIVE AUDIT AND REVIEW COMMITTEEPerformance Audits of Government AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$13,910,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$13,910,000The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) Notwithstanding the provisions of this section, the joint legislative audit and review committee may adjust the due dates for projects included on the committee's 2025-2027 work plan as necessary to efficiently manage workload.(2)(a) $400,000 of the performance audits of government accountâstate appropriation is for the joint legislative audit and review committee to review the department of children, youth, and families juvenile rehabilitation programs as listed on the committee's approved work plan, including:(i) Review the department of children, youth, and families juvenile rehabilitation program's existing processes and staffing methodology used for determining adequate staffing ratios to meet the confinement and rehabilitative needs of the juveniles and ensure public safety;(ii) Review procedures and protocols for professional development, hiring and recruitment, and training for staff serving youth in juvenile rehabilitation institutions, with a focus on how staff are trained to implement rehabilitative practices;(iii) Review youth access to programming, treatment, and services including, but not limited to, educational programming, treatment and services for youth experiencing substance use disorder, behavioral health treatment, available reentry services such as housing, job training, and other supports, access to technology services, family and community connections, and other programming and services offered by the department to provide youth with rehabilitation and restorative interventions;(iv) Review existing security and safety measures, including the use of disciplinary procedures for total isolation and room confinement, adopted by the department and their effectiveness in meeting the unique needs of the juvenile population in the custody of the department;(v) Review how often and how many youth face new juvenile or adult criminal offense charges, convictions, or both while residing at juvenile rehabilitation institutions and potential future consequences that may occur as a result such as sentence extension, likelihood of recidivism, health impacts, and effects regarding criminal records;(vi) Assess gender equity regarding education, employment, and career options for female youth;(vii) Review how staffing impacts youth-on-youth conflict and safety;(viii) Review best practices from other states regarding security and safety measures, programming opportunities, reentry supports, staff training and professional development, and staffing ratios, and identify options that may be feasible to adopt in Washington state to increase public safety and the security, programming options, treatment services, and rehabilitation mission of the department's juvenile rehabilitation institutions;(ix) Review the department's existing processes for responding to critical incidents, including communication and cooperation with local law enforcement, and identify areas for improvement; and(x) Review the impacts of changes in average daily population, longer lengths of stay, longer sentences, increases in maximum age of release, increases in more serious offense types and adult sentences, and related effects of chapter 322, Laws of 2019.(b) The joint legislative audit and review committee shall report its findings and recommendations to the governor and the appropriate committees of the legislature by June 30, 2026. The report shall include recommendations on supporting the juvenile rehabilitation program's efforts to gradually move young people from carceral settings to least restrictive environments to improve positive reentry outcomes.(3) $400,000 of the performance audits of government accountâstate appropriation is for the joint legislative audit and review committee to evaluate the ignition interlock device revolving account including the compliance and monitoring results associated with the device requirements, as listed on the committee's approved work plan. The evaluation must include but is not limited to the following:(a) An assessment of the compliance rates for individuals with a legal requirement to have an ignition interlock device installed on their vehicle;(b) A review of impediments of barriers to individual compliance with ignition interlock device installation and use requirements;(c) An examination of state and local agency performance in monitoring and enforcing ignition interlock device requirements; and(d) Prioritized recommendations of potential procedural, policy, or statutory changes, including additional fiscal resources to state or local agencies which will improve ignition interlock device compliance rates. The joint legislative and audit review committee must prioritize the evaluation of compliance and results associated with the state's ignition interlock device requirements in its work plan for the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium.(4) $150,000 of the performance audits of government accountâstate appropriation is for the joint legislative audit and review committee to review the department of natural resources long-term forest health planning and sustainable harvest approach as listed on the committee's approved work plan.(5) Within the amount appropriated in this section, the joint legislative audit and review committee shall conduct the audit required under Second Substitute House Bill No. 1715 (energy standard/comply cost).NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 104. FOR THE LEGISLATIVE EVALUATION AND ACCOUNTABILITY PROGRAM COMMITTEEPerformance Audits of Government AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$5,607,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$5,607,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 105. FOR THE JOINT LEGISLATIVE SYSTEMS COMMITTEEGeneral FundâState Appropriation (FY 2026). . . .$23,263,000General FundâState Appropriation (FY 2027). . . .$22,084,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$45,347,000The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) Within the amounts provided in this section, the joint legislative systems committee shall provide information technology support, including but not limited to internet service, for the district offices of members of the house of representatives and the senate.(2) $1,003,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 is provided solely for purchasing IT equipment for the Pritchard building.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 106. FOR THE OFFICE OF STATE LEGISLATIVE LABOR RELATIONSGeneral FundâState Appropriation (FY 2026). . . .$919,000General FundâState Appropriation (FY 2027). . . .$933,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$1,852,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 107. FOR THE OFFICE OF THE STATE ACTUARYGeneral FundâState Appropriation (FY 2026). . . .$404,000General FundâState Appropriation (FY 2027). . . .$422,000State Health Care Authority Administrative AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$318,000Department of Retirement Systems Expense AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$7,684,000School Employees' Insurance Administrative AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$265,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$9,093,000The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The select committee on pension policy shall study and report on the tax, legal, actuarial, pension policy, and administrative implications of merging the legacy pension systems as contemplated in Substitute Senate Bill No. 5085 (closed retirement plans) and terminating plan 1 of the law enforcement officers' and firefighters' retirement system as contemplated in Substitute House Bill No. 2034 (LEOFF 1 restatement). The department of retirement systems, the attorney general's office, the office of the state treasurer, the Washington state investment board, and the office of the state actuary shall provide the select committee on pension policy with assistance as requested. The select committee on pension policy shall submit a report to include key findings to the fiscal committees of the legislature by January 9, 2026.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 108. FOR THE STATUTE LAW COMMITTEEGeneral FundâState Appropriation (FY 2026). . . .$6,429,000General FundâState Appropriation (FY 2027). . . .$6,245,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$12,674,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 109. FOR THE OFFICE OF LEGISLATIVE SUPPORT SERVICESGeneral FundâState Appropriation (FY 2026). . . .$6,568,000General FundâState Appropriation (FY 2027). . . .$6,926,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$13,494,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 110. LEGISLATIVE AGENCIESIn order to achieve operating efficiencies within the financial resources available to the legislative branch, the executive rules committee of the house of representatives and the facilities and operations committee of the senate by joint action may transfer funds among the house of representatives, senate, joint legislative audit and review committee, legislative evaluation and accountability program committee, joint transportation committee, office of the state actuary, joint legislative systems committee, statute law committee, office of state legislative labor relations, and office of legislative support services.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 111. FOR THE SUPREME COURTGeneral FundâState Appropriation (FY 2026). . . .$15,979,000General FundâState Appropriation (FY 2027). . . .$16,247,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$32,226,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 112. FOR THE COMMISSION ON JUDICIAL CONDUCTGeneral FundâState Appropriation (FY 2026). . . .$2,935,000General FundâState Appropriation (FY 2027). . . .$2,863,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$5,798,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 113. FOR THE COURT OF APPEALSGeneral FundâState Appropriation (FY 2026). . . .$27,987,000General FundâState Appropriation (FY 2027). . . .$28,640,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$56,627,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 114. FOR THE ADMINISTRATOR FOR THE COURTSGeneral FundâState Appropriation (FY 2026). . . .$108,147,000General FundâState Appropriation (FY 2027). . . .$109,947,000General FundâFederal Appropriation. . . .$2,209,000General FundâPrivate/Local Appropriation. . . .$681,000Judicial Stabilization Trust AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$36,639,000Judicial Information Systems AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$79,530,000Opioid Abatement Settlement AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$940,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$338,093,000The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) The distributions made under this section and distributions from the county criminal justice assistance account made pursuant to section 801 of this act constitute appropriate reimbursement for costs for any new programs or increased level of service for purposes of RCW 43.135.060.(2)(a) $2,000,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $2,000,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for distribution to county juvenile court administrators for the costs associated with processing and case management of truancy, children in need of services, and at-risk youth referrals. The administrator for the courts, in conjunction with the juvenile court administrators, shall develop an equitable funding distribution formula. The formula must neither reward counties with higher than average per-petition/referral processing costs nor shall it penalize counties with lower than average per-petition/referral processing costs.(b) Each fiscal year during the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium, each county shall report the number of petitions processed and the total actual costs of processing truancy, children in need of services, and at-risk youth petitions. Counties shall submit the reports to the administrator for the courts no later than 45 days after the end of the fiscal year. The administrator for the courts shall electronically transmit this information to the chairs and ranking minority members of the house of representatives and senate fiscal committees no later than 60 days after a fiscal year ends. These reports are informational in nature and are not for the purpose of distributing funds.(3) $6,000,000 of the judicial stabilization trust accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for distribution to local courts for costs associated with the court-appointed attorney and visitor requirements set forth in the uniform guardianship act, chapter 11.130 RCW. If the amount provided in this subsection is insufficient to fully fund the local court costs, distributions must be reduced on a proportional basis to ensure that expenditures remain within the available funds provided in this subsection.(4) $500,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $500,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for the administrative office of the courts to use as matching funds to distribute to small municipal and county courts, located in a rural county as defined in RCW 43.160.020, for the purpose of increasing security for court facilities. Grants must be used solely for security equipment and services for municipal, district, and superior courts and may not be used for staffing or administrative costs.(5) $5,937,000 of the judicial stabilization trust accountâstate appropriation is provided solely to establish a direct refund process to individuals to refund legal financial obligations, collection costs, and document-verified costs paid to third parties previously paid by defendants whose convictions have been vacated by court order due to the State v. Blake ruling. Superior court clerks, district court administrators, and municipal court administrators must certify and send to the office the amount of any refund ordered by the court. The court order must either contain the amount of the refund or provide language for the clerk or court administrator to certify to the office the amount to be refunded to the individual.(6) $870,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $870,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for activities of the office relating to the resentencing or vacating convictions of individuals and refund of legal financial obligations and costs associated with the State v. Blake ruling. In addition to contracting with cities and counties for the disbursement of funds appropriated for resentencing costs, the office must:(a) Collaborate with superior court clerks, district court administrators, and municipal court administrators to prepare comprehensive reports, based on available court records, of all cause numbers impacted by State v. Blake going back to 1971. Such reports must include the refund amount related to each cause number;(b) In collaboration with the office of public defense and the office of civil legal aid, establish a process that can be used by individuals seeking a refund, provide individuals information regarding the application process necessary to claim a refund, and issue payments from the refund bureau to individuals certified in subsection (5) of this section; and(c) Collaborate with counties and municipalities to adopt standard coding for application to State v. Blake convictions and to develop a standardized practice regarding vacated convictions.(7) $7,563,000 of the judicial stabilization trust accountâstate appropriation is provided solely to assist counties and cities with costs of complying with the State v. Blake decision that arise from their role in operating the state's criminal justice system, including resentencing, vacating prior convictions for simple drug possession, to include cannabis and possession of paraphernalia, and certifying refunds of legal financial obligations and collections costs. The office shall contract with counties and cities for judicial, clerk, defense, and prosecution expenses for these purposes if requested by a county or city. A county or city may designate the office to use available funding to administer a vacate process, or a portion of the vacate process, on behalf of the county or city. The office must collaborate with counties and cities to adopt standard coding for application to Blake convictions and to develop a standardized practice regarding vacated convictions.(8) $4,188,000 of the judicial stabilization trust accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for decision-making assistance pursuant to chapter 267, Laws of 2024 (2SSB 5825). During the fiscal biennium, in conformity with RCW 2.72.030, the administrative office of the courts shall collect uniform and consistent data on decision making assistance to include, but not limited to: The number of requests for decision making assistance received from hospitals, the number of guardianships and less restrictive alternatives to guardianships provided, the support and housing provided, and any other data related to case monitoring and management.(9) $242,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 1163 (firearms purchase). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2025, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.(10) $520,000 of the judicial stabilization trust accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for pilot self-help centers in two courthouses, one on each side of the state.(11) $79,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $75,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for implementation of Engrossed House Bill No. 1219 (interbranch advisory comm.). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2025, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.(12) $249,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $133,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute House Bill No. 1391 (court alternatives/youth). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2025, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.(13) $1,094,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 is provided solely for the statewide fiscal impact on Thurston county courts. It is the intent of the legislature that this policy will be continued in subsequent fiscal biennia.(14) $500,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $500,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely to address data quality issues across Washington state court management systems.(15) $12,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 is provided solely for the administrative office of the courts for data management and research related to conducting statewide research on the proportionality of court charges in Washington state based on race and ethnicity.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 115. FOR THE OFFICE OF PUBLIC DEFENSEGeneral FundâState Appropriation (FY 2026). . . .$83,336,000General FundâState Appropriation (FY 2027). . . .$84,113,000Judicial Stabilization Trust AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$19,056,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$186,505,000The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) $900,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $900,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for the purpose of improving the quality of trial court public defense services as authorized by chapter 10.101 RCW. The office of public defense must allocate these amounts so that $450,000 per fiscal year is distributed to counties, and $450,000 per fiscal year is distributed to cities, for grants under chapter 10.101 RCW.(2) $2,632,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $2,812,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for the office of public defense to administer contracts for appellate attorneys to cover a backlog of case assignments and increasing workload associated with indigent appeals. The office shall provide training for contracted attorneys.(3)(a) $8,615,000 of the judicial stabilization trust accountâstate appropriation is provided solely to:(i) Assist counties and cities with public defense services related to vacating the convictions of defendants and/or resentencing for defendants whose convictions or sentences are affected by the State v. Blake decision. The office of public defense will:(A) Provide statewide attorney training, technical assistance, data analysis and reporting, and quality oversight, to administer financial assistance for public defense costs related to State v. Blake impacts;(B) Maintain a triage team to provide statewide support to the management and flow of hearings for individuals impacted by the State v. Blake decision; and(C) Assist counties and cities in providing counsel for defendants seeking to vacate a conviction and/or be resentenced under State v. Blake. Assistance shall be allocated to counties and cities based upon a formula established by the office of public defense. Counties may receive assistance by applying for grant funding and/or designating the office of public defense to contract directly with counsel. The office of public defense shall contract directly with counsel to assist cities under this subsection; and(ii) Administer statutory duties under RCW 2.70.200 through the simple possession advocacy and representation program.(b) Of the amounts provided in this subsection, the office of public defense may utilize up to $5,000 for fiscal year 2026 and $5,000 for fiscal year 2027 to address emergency needs for clients served by the simple possession advocacy and representation program. Temporary, limited assistance may be made available to address short term urgent needs that, if unaddressed, could cause clients to miss court dates or fail to engage in court-ordered services. The office of public defense shall establish eligibility criteria and an expedited process for reviewing financial assistance requests submitted by SPAR program contractors.(4) $40,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $40,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for the office of public defense to address emergency safety assistance and other urgent needs for clients served by the parents representation program. Temporary, limited assistance may be made available for short-term housing, utilities, transportation, food assistance, and other urgent needs that, if unaddressed, could adversely impact dependency case outcomes and impede successful family reunification. The office of public defense shall utilize eligibility criteria and an expedited process for reviewing financial assistance requests submitted by parents representation program contractors.(5) $500,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $500,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for the parents for parents program, as established by RCW 2.70.060 through 2.70.090. Funds must be used to maintain and improve the parents for parents service model, including host organizations and county coordinators.(6) $300,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 is provided solely for the office of public defense to contract with a nonprofit organization in eastern Washington providing peer-led reentry services such as peer coaching, basic needs, housing resources, behavioral health treatment, family support, civic engagement, and voting education. The organization must have a history of collaboration with the department of corrections to provide trainings on trauma to individuals reentering the community after incarceration. The organization shall provide comprehensive trainings, resources and referrals to individuals with a history of reentry from incarceration.(7) $13,600,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $13,600,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for the office of public defense to administer funds to counties and cities pursuant to formulas established in RCW 10.101.050 through 10.101.080.(8) $1,808,000 of the judicial stabilization trust accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of chapter 293, Laws of 2024 (2SSB 5780).(9) $102,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $102,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5149 (early childhood court prg.). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2025, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 116. FOR THE OFFICE OF CIVIL LEGAL AIDGeneral FundâState Appropriation (FY 2026). . . .$66,083,000General FundâState Appropriation (FY 2027). . . .$64,483,000Judicial Stabilization Trust AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$1,464,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$132,030,000The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) $8,611,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $8,611,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for the appointed counsel program for children and youth in dependency cases under RCW 13.34.212(3) in accordance with revised practice, caseload, and training standards adopted by the supreme court commission on children in foster care. The amounts provided in this subsection incudes funding for implementation of Senate Bill No. 5761 (dependency/attorney appt.).(2) $2,579,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $2,579,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for the provision of civil legal information, advice, and representation for tenants at risk of eviction but not yet eligible for appointed counsel services under RCW 59.18.640.(3) $19,612,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $16,898,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for the appointed counsel program for tenants in unlawful detainer cases established in RCW 59.18.640. The office of civil legal aid shall assign priority to providing legal representation to indigent tenants in those counties in which the most evictions occur and to indigent tenants who are disproportionately at risk of eviction, as provided in RCW 59.18.640.(4) An amount not to exceed $40,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and an amount not to exceed $40,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 may be used to provide telephonic legal advice and assistance to otherwise eligible persons who are 60 years of age or older on matters authorized by RCW 2.53.030(2) (a) through (k) regardless of household income or asset level.(5) $604,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $607,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely to the office of civil legal aid to maintain a kinship care legal advice phone line and support program. The program provides guidance and legal advice to kinship caregivers on topics including kinship care, guardianship, the child welfare system, and issues related to child custody.(6) $2,000,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $2,000,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for the office of civil legal aid to continue civil legal aid services for survivors of domestic violence, including legal services for protection order proceedings, family law cases, immigration assistance, and other civil legal issues arising from or related to the domestic violence they experienced.(7) $1,007,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $1,022,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for the office of civil legal aid to continue the statewide reentry legal aid project as established in section 115(12), chapter 357, Laws of 2020.(8) $204,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $204,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 is provided solely for implementation of chapter 328, Laws of 2024 (E2SSB 6109).(9) $783,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $783,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for the office of civil legal aid to establish a program for the provision of civil legal services to medicaid-eligible long-term care residents being discharged from a provider-owned setting.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 117. FOR THE OFFICE OF THE GOVERNORGeneral FundâState Appropriation (FY 2026). . . .$23,479,000General FundâState Appropriation (FY 2027). . . .$23,590,000Economic Development Strategic Reserve AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$2,215,000GOV Central Service AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$20,473,000Performance Audits of Government AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$854,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$70,611,000The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) $1,146,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $1,146,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for the office of the education ombuds.(2) $20,473,000 of the GOV central service accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the office of equity.(3) $1,187,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $1,187,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for implementation of Substitute House Bill No. 1272 (children in crisis program). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2025, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse. Within amounts provided in this subsection:(a) $1,136,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $1,137,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for flexible funding to support children in crisis. Uses of the flexible funding include, but are not limited to:(i) Residential, housing, or wraparound supports that facilitate the safe discharge of children in crisis from hospitals;(ii) Support for families and caregivers to mitigate the risk of a child going into or returning to a state of crisis;(iii) Respite and relief services for families and caregivers that would assist in the safe discharge of a child in crisis from a hospital, or prevent or mitigate a child's future hospitalization due to crisis; or(iv) Any support or service that would expedite a safe discharge of a child in crisis from an acute care hospital or that would prevent or mitigate a child's future hospitalization due to crisis.(b) Flexible funding expenditures may not be used for administrative expenses.(c) The project director in Substitute House Bill No. 1272 (children in crisis program) must approve any expenditures of flexible funding.(4) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, the Washington state office of equity must cofacilitate the Washington digital equity forum with the statewide broadband office.(5) $328,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $318,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for implementation of Senate Bill No. 5032 (juvenile rehab ombuds). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2025, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.(6) $7,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $7,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for implementation of Senate Bill No. 5199 (DCYF oversight board comp.). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2025, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.(7)(a) $240,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $100,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for the governor to invite federally recognized tribes, local governments, agricultural producers, commercial and recreational fisher organizations, business organizations, salmon recovery organizations, forestry and agricultural organizations, and environmental organizations to participate in a process facilitated by an independent entity to develop recommendations on proposed changes in policy and spending priorities to improve riparian habitat to ensure salmon and steelhead recovery.(i) The independent entity must develop recommendations on furthering riparian funding and policy including, but not limited to, strategies that can attract private investment in improving riparian habitat and developing a regulatory or compensation strategy if voluntary programs do not achieve concrete targets.(ii) Preliminary recommendations shall be submitted to the legislature and governor by June 1, 2026, with a final report by November 15, 2026.(b) The amounts provided in fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for the task force to develop proposals to implement the recommendations submitted in (a) of this subsection. The independent entity must convene a group of interested members of the legislature to provide the task force with background information regarding the recommendations submitted to the legislature, and to support the development of the implementation proposals. A report outlining the implementation proposals is due to the governor and the appropriate committees of the legislature by November 15, 2026.(c) The office of the governor may contract for an independent facilitator. The contract is exempt from the competitive procurement requirements in chapter 39.26 RCW.(8) The appropriations in this section include sufficient funding to implement Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 1131 (clemency and pardons board).NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 118. FOR THE LIEUTENANT GOVERNORGeneral FundâState Appropriation (FY 2026). . . .$1,356,000General FundâState Appropriation (FY 2027). . . .$1,416,000General FundâPrivate/Local Appropriation. . . .$90,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$2,862,000The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: Within the amounts appropriated in this section, the office of the lieutenant governor shall conduct a review of retail or commercial properties with substantial potential for redevelopment as residential or mixed-use properties providing market rate and affordable housing supply, and identify state or local legislative actions that would reduce costs and accelerate delivery of new housing supply. The office shall solicit letters of interest from the owners or developers of such properties to be received no later than September 1, 2025. By December 1, 2025, the office must review the letters of interest and submit a report to the appropriate committees of the legislature identifying state or local legislative actions including, but not limited to, regulatory and tax incentives, permit streamlining, infrastructure assistance, support for local development agreements, or other actions that would accelerate delivery and reduce costs of new housing supply.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 119. FOR THE PUBLIC DISCLOSURE COMMISSIONGeneral FundâState Appropriation (FY 2026). . . .$4,501,000General FundâState Appropriation (FY 2027). . . .$5,851,000Public Disclosure Transparency AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$3,208,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$13,560,000The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) No moneys may be expended from the appropriations in this section to establish an electronic directory, archive, or other compilation of political advertising unless explicitly authorized by the legislature.(2) $2,170,000 of the public disclosure transparency accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the public disclosure commission for the purpose of improving the ability of the public to access information about political campaigns, lobbying, and elected officials, and facilitating accurate and timely reporting by the regulated community. The commission must report to the office of financial management and fiscal committees of the legislature by October 31st of each year detailing information on the public disclosure transparency account. The report shall include, but is not limited to:(a) An investment plan of how funds would be used to improve the ability of the public to access information about political campaigns, lobbying, and elected officials, and facilitate accurate and timely reporting by the regulated community;(b) A list of active projects as of July 1st of the fiscal year. This must include a breakdown of expenditures by project and expense type for all current and ongoing projects;(c) A list of projects that are planned in the current and following fiscal year and projects the commission would recommend for future funding. The commission must identify priorities, and develop accountability measures to ensure the projects meet intended purposes; and(d) Any other metric or measure the commission deems appropriate to track the outcome of the use of the funds.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 120. FOR THE SECRETARY OF STATEGeneral FundâState Appropriation (FY 2026). . . .$33,025,000General FundâState Appropriation (FY 2027). . . .$40,763,000General FundâFederal Appropriation. . . .$8,822,000Public Records Efficiency, Preservation, and AccessAccountâState Appropriation. . . .$12,854,000Charitable Organization Education AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$1,305,000Washington State Library Operations AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$14,891,000Local Government Archives AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$11,783,000Election AccountâFederal Appropriation. . . .$4,499,000Personnel Service AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$1,685,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$129,627,000The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) $16,998,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $21,450,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely to reimburse counties for the state's share of primary and general election costs and the costs of conducting mandatory recounts on state measures. Counties shall be reimbursed only for those costs that the secretary of state validates as eligible for reimbursement.(2) Any reductions to funding for the Washington talking book and Braille library may not exceed in proportion any reductions taken to the funding for the library as a whole.(3) $75,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $75,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for humanities Washington speaker's bureau community conversations.(4) $114,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $114,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for election reconciliation reporting. Funding provides for one staff to compile county reconciliation reports, analyze the data, and to complete an annual statewide election reconciliation report for every state primary and general election. The report must be submitted annually on July 31, to legislative policy and fiscal committees. The annual report must include statewide analysis and by county analysis on the reasons for ballot rejection and an analysis of the ways ballots are received, counted, rejected and cure data that can be used by policymakers to better understand election administration.(5) $870,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $870,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for staff dedicated to the maintenance and operations of the voter registration and election management system. These staff will manage database upgrades, database maintenance, system training and support to counties, and triage and customer service to system users.(6) $8,000,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $8,000,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for:(a) Funding the security operations center, including identified needs for expanded operations, systems, technology tools, training resources;(b) Additional staff dedicated to the cyber and physical security of election operations at the office and county election offices;(c) Expanding security assessments, threat monitoring, enhanced security training; and(d) Providing grants to county partners to address identified threats and expand existing grants and contracts with other public and private organizations such as the Washington military department, national guard, private companies providing cyber security, and county election offices.(7) $580,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $580,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for the office's migration of its applications and systems to Azure cloud environments, and is subject to the conditions, limitations, and review requirements of section 701 of this act.(8) $154,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $154,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for the Washington state library branch at Green Hill school.(9) $81,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $81,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for intrusion detection systems that prevent election security breaches.(10) $57,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 is provided solely for artifact preservation at Lakeland Village.(11) $237,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 is provided solely for implementation of Senate Bill No. 5077 (agency voter registration). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2025, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.(12) $2,226,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 is provided solely for implementation of Senate Joint Resolution No. 8201 (investments/LTSS accounts). If the resolution is not enacted by June 30, 2025, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 121. FOR THE GOVERNOR'S OFFICE OF INDIAN AFFAIRSGeneral FundâState Appropriation (FY 2026). . . .$852,000General FundâState Appropriation (FY 2027). . . .$833,000Climate Commitment AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$506,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$2,191,000The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) The office shall assist the department of enterprise services on providing the government-to-government training sessions for federal, state, local, and tribal government employees. The training sessions shall cover tribal historical perspectives, legal issues, tribal sovereignty, and tribal governments. Costs of the training sessions shall be recouped through a fee charged to the participants of each session. The department of enterprise services shall be responsible for all of the administrative aspects of the training, including the billing and collection of the fees for the training.(2) The office must report to and coordinate with the department of ecology to track expenditures from climate commitment act accounts, as defined and described in RCW 70A.65.300 and chapter 173-446B WAC.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 122. FOR THE COMMISSION ON ASIAN PACIFIC AMERICAN AFFAIRSGeneral FundâState Appropriation (FY 2026). . . .$628,000General FundâState Appropriation (FY 2027). . . .$619,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$1,247,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 123. FOR THE STATE TREASURERState Treasurer's Service AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$24,224,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$24,224,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 124. FOR THE STATE AUDITORGeneral FundâState Appropriation (FY 2026). . . .$723,000General FundâState Appropriation (FY 2027). . . .$737,000Auditing Services Revolving AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$18,024,000Performance Audits of Government AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$81,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$19,565,000The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) $1,870,000 of the performance audit of government accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for staff and related costs to verify the accuracy of reported school district data submitted for state funding purposes; conduct school district program audits of state-funded public school programs; establish the specific amount of state funding adjustments whenever audit exceptions occur and the amount is not firmly established in the course of regular public school audits; and to assist the state special education safety net committee when requested.(2) $730,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $730,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for law enforcement audits pursuant to RCW 43.101.460 and 43.101.465.(3) $825,000 of the auditing services revolving accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for accountability and risk based audits.(4) It is the intent of the legislature that savings assumed in this section from an underspend in audit services be one-time in the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 125. FOR THE CITIZENS' COMMISSION ON SALARIES FOR ELECTED OFFICIALSGeneral FundâState Appropriation (FY 2026). . . .$278,000General FundâState Appropriation (FY 2027). . . .$318,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$596,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 126. FOR THE ATTORNEY GENERALGeneral FundâState Appropriation (FY 2026). . . .$40,286,000General FundâState Appropriation (FY 2027). . . .$34,616,000General FundâFederal Appropriation. . . .$29,506,000General FundâPrivate/Local Appropriation. . . .$104,000Public Service Revolving AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$6,568,000New Motor Vehicle Arbitration AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$1,934,000Medicaid Fraud Penalty AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$8,735,000Child Rescue FundâState Appropriation. . . .$200,000Legal Services Revolving AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$435,096,000Local Government Archives AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$1,161,000Tobacco Prevention and Control AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$275,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$558,481,000The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) The attorney general shall report each fiscal year on actual legal services expenditures and actual attorney staffing levels for each agency receiving legal services. The report shall be submitted to the office of financial management and the fiscal committees of the senate and house of representatives no later than ninety days after the end of each fiscal year. As part of its by agency report to the legislative fiscal committees and the office of financial management, the office of the attorney general shall include information detailing the agency's expenditures for its agency-wide overhead and a breakdown by division of division administration expenses.(2) Prior to entering into any negotiated settlement of a claim against the state that exceeds five million dollars, the attorney general shall notify the director of the office of financial management and the chairs and ranking members of the senate committee on ways and means and the house of representatives committee on appropriations.(3) The attorney general shall annually report to the fiscal committees of the legislature all new cy pres awards and settlements and all new accounts, disclosing their intended uses, balances, the nature of the claim or account, proposals, and intended timeframes for the expenditure of each amount. The report shall be distributed electronically and posted on the attorney general's web site. The report shall not be printed on paper or distributed physically.(4) $1,981,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $1,981,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for multi-year arbitrations of the state's diligent enforcement of its obligations to receive amounts withheld from tobacco master settlement agreement payments.(5) $958,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $958,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for implementation of a program for receiving and responding to tips from the public regarding risks or potential risks to the safety or well-being of youth, called the YES tip line program. Risks to safety or well-being may include, but are not limited to, harm or threats of harm to self or others, sexual abuse, assault, rape, bullying or cyberbullying, substance use, and criminal acts. Any person contacting the YES tip line, whether for themselves or for another person, must receive timely assistance and not be turned away. The program must operate within the guidelines of this subsection.(a) During the development and implementation of the YES tip line program the attorney general shall convene an advisory committee consisting of representatives from the Washington state patrol, the department of health, the health care authority, the office of the superintendent of public instruction, the Washington student achievement council, the Washington association of educational service districts, and other participants the attorney general appoints.(b) The attorney general shall develop and implement policies and processes for:(i) Assessing tips based on the level of severity, urgency, and assistance needed using best triage practices including the YES tip line;(ii) Risk assessment for referral of persons contacting the YES tip line to service providers;(iii) Threat assessment that identifies circumstances requiring the YES tip line to alert law enforcement, mental health services, or other first responders immediately when immediate emergency response to a tip is warranted;(iv) Referral and follow-up on tips to schools or postsecondary institution teams, local crisis services, law enforcement, and other entities;(v) YES tip line information data retention and reporting requirements;(vi) Ensuring the confidentiality of persons submitting a tip and to allow for disclosure when necessary to respond to a specific emergency threat to life; and(vii) Systematic review, analysis, and reporting by the YES tip line program of YES tip line data including, but not limited to, reporting program utilization and evaluating whether the YES tip line is being implemented equitably across the state.(c) The YES tip line shall be operated by a vendor selected by the attorney general through a competitive contracting process. The attorney general shall ensure that the YES tip line program vendor and its personnel are properly trained and resourced. The contract must require the vendor to be bound by confidentiality policies developed by the office. The contract must also provide that the state of Washington owns the data and information produced from the YES tip line and that vendor must comply with the state's data retention, use, and security requirements.(d) The YES tip line program must develop and maintain a reference and best practices tool kit for law enforcement and mental health officials that identifies statewide and community mental health resources, services, and contacts, and provides best practices and strategies for investigators to use in investigating cases and assisting youths and their parents and guardians.(e) The YES tip line program must promote and market the program and YES tip line to youth, families, community members, schools, and others statewide to build awareness of the program's resources and the YES tip line. Youth perspectives must be included and consulted in tip line development and implementation including creating marketing campaigns and materials required for the YES tip line program. The insights of youth representing marginalized and minority communities must be prioritized for their invaluable insight. Youths are eligible for stipends and reasonable allowances for reimbursement, lodging, and travel expenses as provided in RCW 43.03.220.(6) $7,000,000 of the legal services revolving fundâstate appropriation is provided solely for additional legal services to address additional legal services necessary for dependency actions where the state and federal Indian child welfare act apply. The office must report to the fiscal committees of the legislature within 90 days of the close of the fiscal year the following information for new cases initiated in the previous fiscal year to measure quantity and use of this funding:(a) The number and proportion of cases where the state and federal Indian child welfare act (ICWA) applies as compared to non-ICWA new cases;(b) The amount of time spent advising on, preparing for court, and litigating issues and elements related to ICWA's requirements as compared to the amount of time advising on, preparing for court, and litigating issues and elements that are not related to ICWA's requirements;(c) The length of state and federal Indian child welfare act cases as compared to non-ICWA cases measured by time or number of court hearings; and(d) Any other information or metric the office determines is appropriate to measure the quantity and use of the funding in this subsection.(7) $689,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $689,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for legal services related to the defense of the state and its agencies in a federal environmental cleanup action involving the Quendall terminals superfund site.(8) $216,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $216,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for personnel and associated costs to implement and maintain functional operations such as support, records management and disclosure, victim liaisons, and information technology for the clemency and pardons board.(9) $905,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $906,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for implementation of chapter 299, Laws of 2024 (hate crimes & bias incidents).(10)(a) $253,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 is provided solely for the office of the attorney general, jointly with the department of health, to operate a task force to provide recommendations to establish a comprehensive public health and community-based framework to combat extremism and mass violence.(b) The office of the attorney general must, in consultation with the department of health, appoint a minimum of 10 members to the task force representing different stakeholder groups including, but not limited to:(i) Community organizations working to address the impacts of or to assist those who are affected by extremism and mass violence;(ii) Law enforcement organizations that gather data about or work to combat extremism and mass violence; and(iii) Public health and nonprofit organizations that work to address the impacts of extremism and mass violence.(c) The office of the attorney general and the department of health may each have no more than one voting member on the task force.(d) The office of the attorney general must provide staff support for the task force.(e) Any reimbursement for nonlegislative members of the task force is subject to chapter 43.03 RCW.(f) The task force must submit a final report to the governor and appropriate committees of the legislature by December 1, 2026. The final report must include legislative and policy recommendations for establishing the comprehensive framework.(g) No aspect of this subsection should be construed as a directive to alter any aspect of criminal law, create new criminal penalties, or increase criminal law enforcement.(11) $107,000 of the legal services revolving fundâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5291 (long-term services trust). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2025, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.(12) $22,000 of the legal services revolving fundâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5149 (early childhood court prg.). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2025, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.(13) $480,000 of the legal services revolving fundâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Senate Bill No. 5463 (industrial insurance/duties). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2025, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.(14) $34,000 of the legal services revolving fundâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5501 (employee driving requirement). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2025, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.(15) $250,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $250,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for the Washington state office of the attorney general to support the continuation of the Washington state missing and murdered indigenous women and people task force and truth and healing tribal advisory committee.(16) $553,000 of the legal services revolving accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5217 (pregnancy accommodations). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2025, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.(17) $45,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 is provided solely for the office to support the underground economy task force created in section 906, chapter 376, Laws of 2024.(18) $44,000 of the legal services revolving accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute House Bill No. 1409 (clean fuels program). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2025, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.(19) $49,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026, $49,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027, and $58,000 of the legal services revolving accountâstate appropriation are provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute House Bill No. 1359 (criminal insanity). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2025, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.(20) $45,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $94,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Substitute House Bill No. 1483 (digital electronics/repair). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2025, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.(21) $545,000 of the legal services revolving accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 1163 (firearms purchase). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2025, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.(22) $33,000 of the legal services revolving accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute House Bill No. 1524 (isolated employees). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2025, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.(23) $294,000 of the public service revolving accountâstate appropriation and $40,000 of the legal services revolving accountâstate appropriation are provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute House Bill No. 1514 (low carbon thermal energy). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2025, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.(24) $29,000 of the legal services revolving accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 1213 (paid family & medical leave). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2025, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.(25) $94,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $94,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute House Bill No. 1217 (residential tenants). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2025, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.(26) $394,000 of the public service revolving accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Substitute House Bill No. 1522 (utility wildfire mitigation). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2025, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.(27) $40,000 of the legal services revolving accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Substitute House Bill No. 1644 (working minors). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2025, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.(28) $25,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $25,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for the office of the attorney general to coordinate the receipt of agency reporting requirements pursuant to sections 201, 210, 219, 221, 230, 233, and 601 of this act.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 127. FOR THE CASELOAD FORECAST COUNCILGeneral FundâState Appropriation (FY 2026). . . .$2,395,000General FundâState Appropriation (FY 2027). . . .$2,369,000Workforce Education Investment AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$367,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$5,131,000The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) $367,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely to forecast the caseload for the Washington college grant program.(2) Within existing resources, the caseload forecast council shall produce an unofficial forecast of the long-term caseload for juvenile rehabilitation as a courtesy.(3) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, the council must forecast the number of people eligible for the apple health expansion for Washington residents with incomes at or below 138 percent of the federal poverty level, regardless of immigration status.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 128. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCEThe appropriations in sections 129 through 134 of this act are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) Repayments of outstanding mortgage and rental assistance program loans administered by the department under RCW 43.63A.640 shall be remitted to the department, including any current revolving account balances. The department shall collect payments on outstanding loans, and deposit them into the state general fund. Repayments of funds owed under the program shall be remitted to the department according to the terms included in the original loan agreements.(2) The department is authorized to suspend issuing any nonstatutorily required grants or contracts of an amount less than $1,000,000 per year.(3)(a) The appropriations to the department of commerce in this act must be expended for the programs and in the amounts specified in this act. However, after May 1, 2026, unless prohibited by this act, the department may transfer general fundâstate appropriations for fiscal year 2026 among programs after approval by the director of the office of financial management. However, the department may not transfer state appropriations that are provided solely for a specified purpose, except that provisoed amounts may be transferred among programs if they are transferred in their entirety.(b) Within 30 days after the close of fiscal year 2026, the department must provide the office of financial management and the fiscal committees of the legislature with an accounting of any transfers under this subsection. The accounting shall include a narrative explanation and justification of the changes, along with expenditures and allotments by budget unit and appropriation, both before and after any allotment modifications or transfers. The department must also provide recommendations for revisions to appropriations to better align funding with the new budget structure for the department in this act and to eliminate the need for transfer authority in future budgets.(4) The department must report to and coordinate with the department of ecology to track expenditures from climate commitment act accounts, as defined and described in RCW 70A.65.300 and chapter 173-446B WAC.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 129. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCEâCOMMUNITY SERVICESGeneral FundâState Appropriation (FY 2026). . . .$72,053,000General FundâState Appropriation (FY 2027). . . .$55,043,000General FundâFederal Appropriation. . . .$143,496,000General FundâPrivate/Local Appropriation. . . .$5,396,000Climate Commitment AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$25,005,000Community Reinvestment AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$60,000,000Domestic Violence Co-Responder AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$8,326,000Financial Fraud and Identity Theft CrimesInvestigation and Prosecution AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$2,680,000Lead Paint AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$1,690,000Opioid Abatement Settlement AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$200,000Prostitution Prevention and Intervention AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$26,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$373,915,000The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) $9,975,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $9,975,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for a grant to resolution Washington to build statewide capacity for alternative dispute resolution centers and dispute resolution programs that guarantee that citizens have access to low-cost resolution as an alternative to litigation.(2) Within existing resources, the department shall provide administrative and other indirect support to the developmental disabilities council.(3) $2,000,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $2,000,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for the Washington new Americans program. The department may require a cash match or in-kind contributions to be eligible for state funding.(4) $797,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $797,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for the department to contract with a private, nonprofit organization to provide developmental disability ombuds services.(5) $557,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $557,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for the department to design and administer the achieving a better life experience program.(6) $9,000,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $9,000,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for the department to contract with organizations and attorneys to provide either legal representation or referral services for legal representation, or both, to indigent persons who are in need of legal services for matters related to their immigration status. Persons eligible for assistance under any contract entered into pursuant to this subsection must be determined to be indigent under standards developed under chapter 10.101 RCW.(7) $1,332,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $1,332,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for the operations of the long-term care ombudsman program.(8) $100,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $100,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for the department to contract with a nonprofit entity located in Seattle that focuses on poverty reduction and racial equity to convene and staff a poverty reduction workgroup steering committee comprised of individuals that have lived experience with poverty. Funding provided in this section may be used to reimburse steering committee members for travel, child care, and other costs associated with participation in the steering committee.(9) $8,618,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $8,618,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for the department to continue the Washington state office of firearm safety and violence prevention, including the creation of a state and federal grant funding plan to direct resources to cities that are most impacted by community violence. Of the amounts provided in this subsection:(a) $5,318,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $5,318,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for grants to support existing programs and capacity building for new programs providing evidence-based violence prevention and intervention services to youth who are at high risk to perpetrate or be victims of firearm violence and who reside in areas with high rates of firearm violence as provided in RCW 43.330A.050.(i) Priority shall be given to programs that partner with the University of Washington, school of medicine, department of psychiatry and behavioral sciences for training and support to deliver culturally relevant family integrated transition services through use of credible messenger advocates.(ii) The office may enter into agreement with the University of Washington or another independent entity with expertise in evaluating community-based grant-funded programs to evaluate the grant program's effectiveness.(iii) The office shall enter into agreement to provide funding to the University of Washington, school of medicine, department of psychiatry and behavioral sciences to directly deliver trainings and support to programs providing culturally relevant family integrated transition services through use of credible messenger and to train a third-party organization to similarly support those programs.(iv) Of the amounts provided under (a) of this subsection, $250,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $250,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for a certified credible messenger program that does work in at least three regions of Washington state to train and certify credible messengers to implement a culturally responsive, evidence-based credible messenger violence prevention and intervention services program.(b) $500,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $500,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided to support safe storage programs and suicide prevention outreach and education efforts across the state.(10) $1,250,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $1,250,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for the department to administer grants to diaper banks for the purchase of diapers, wipes, and other essential baby products, for distribution to families in need. The department must give priority to providers serving or located in marginalized, low-income communities or communities of color; and providers that help support racial equity. Of the amounts provided in this subsection, $150,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 is provided solely for a grant to a Federal Way-based nonprofit diaper bank.(11)(a) $25,000,000 of the climate commitment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the department to administer grant funding through the existing network of federal low-income home energy assistance program grantees to provide low-income households with energy utility bill assistance.(b) To qualify for assistance, a household must be below 80 percent of the area median income and living in a community that experiences high environmental health disparities.(c) Under the grant program, each household accessing energy bill assistance must be offered an energy assessment that includes determining the household's need for clean cooling and heating system upgrades that improve safety and efficiency while meeting Washington's climate goals. If beneficial, households may be offered grant funding to cover the replacement of inefficient, outdated, or unsafe home heating and cooling systems with more energy efficient electric heating and cooling technologies, such as heat pumps.(d) Of the amounts provided in this subsection, no more than 60 percent of the funding may be utilized by the department to target services to multifamily residential buildings across the state that experience high energy use, where a majority of the residents within the building are below 80 percent of the area median income and the community experiences high environmental health disparities.(e) In serving low-income households who rent or lease a residence, the department must establish processes to ensure that the rent for the residence is not increased and the tenant is not evicted as a result of receiving assistance under the grant program.(f) The department must incorporate data collected while implementing this program into future energy assistance reports as required under RCW 19.405.120. The department may publish information on its website on the number of furnace or heating and cooling system replacements, including replacements within multifamily housing units.(g) The department may utilize a portion of the funding provided within this subsection to create an electronic application system.(12) $140,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $140,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for the developmental disabilities council.(13) $20,000,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 is provided solely for grants to crime victims service providers. The department must distribute the funding in a manner that is consistent with the office of crime victims advocacy's state plan.(14) The department may submit the report required under section 1115(50)(b) of this act by October 1, 2025.(15) The department may submit the report required under section 1115(124)(d) of this act by October 1, 2025.(16) $125,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $125,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for a grant to a nonprofit organization located in the city of Issaquah to provide cultural programs and navigational support for individuals and families who may face language or other cultural barriers when engaging with schools, public safety, health and human services, and local government agencies.(17) $100,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $100,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for the department to provide grants to nonprofit organizations including, but not limited to, religious nonprofits, "by and for" organizations, or cultural community centers, to fund the physical security or repair of such institutions. Grant recipients must substantiate that their site or sites have been subject to or at risk of physical attacks, threats, vandalism, or damages based on their mission, ideology, or beliefs and demonstrate a need for investments in physical security enhancements, construction or renovation, target hardening, preparedness planning, training, or exercises.(18) $300,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 is provided solely for the office of crime victims advocacy to contract with a research university to continue conducting a randomized control trial comparing the strength at home program to standard domestic violence intervention treatment methods used in Washington state. The research university must have completed a randomized control trial of domestic violence intervention treatment at joint base Lewis-McChord. The target population of the randomized control trial must be individuals in Washington state who have been referred to domestic violence intervention treatment via the criminal or civil legal systems. The research university must also continue research on the efficacy of the internal family systems intervention for perpetrators of domestic violence.(19) $200,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $100,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for a grant to a nonprofit organization operating a teen center in the city of Issaquah to provide case management and counseling services and connections to housing supports for youth ages 12 to 19.(20) $125,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $125,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for a grant to a nonprofit community-based organization to provide youth mental and behavioral health education and support services. Services may include, but are not limited to, employment, mental health, counseling, tutoring, and mentoring. The grant recipient must be a community-based organization located in Granger operating a Spanish language public radio station with the mission of addressing the social, educational, and health needs of Spanish-speaking residents of central and eastern Washington.(21) $125,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $125,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for a grant to a nonprofit organization within the city of Tacoma that provides social services and educational programming to assist Latino and indigenous communities in honoring heritage and culture through the arts, and in overcoming barriers to social, political, economic, and cultural community development. Grant funding may be used for activities including, but not limited to, providing family support services for bilingual, bicultural clients.(22) $150,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $150,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for a grant to a nonprofit organization to provide legal aid in subjects including, but not limited to, criminal law and civil rights cases for underserved populations focusing on Black gender-diverse communities. The grant recipient must be a nonprofit organization with offices in Seattle and Tacoma and with a mission to provide intersectional legal and social services for Black intersex and gender-diverse communities in Washington.(23) $60,000,000 of the community reinvestment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the department to distribute grants for economic development, civil and criminal legal assistance, community-based violence intervention and prevention services, and reentry services programs. In making distributions under this subsection, the department must award funds among these program areas in similar proportions to awards made during the 2023-2025 fiscal biennium for these purposes.(24) $125,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $125,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for a grant to a nonprofit organization to support the development of and outreach for community-led mental health support groups and classes serving individuals and families throughout Washington state, with special focus on Latino communities, rural areas, and tribes. The grant recipient must be a nonprofit organization that serves as the Washington state office of a national grassroots mental health organization dedicated to building better lives for individuals affected by mental health conditions.(25) $150,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $150,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for the department, in consultation with the state commission on African American affairs, to contract with a qualified research entity to conduct the Charles Mitchell and George Washington Bush study on reparative action for Washington state's descendants of victims of United States chattel slavery.(a) The department shall verify and contract, in consultation with the commission on African American affairs, that the contracted research entity or research team possesses expertise in reparations, historical analysis, public policy development, and must have the following:(i) A researcher who possesses a Ph.D. or equivalent advanced degree in history, African American studies, sociology, American studies, ethnic studies, law, economics, public policy, or a related field with a direct focus on reparations or United States chattel slavery;(ii) Verifiable expertise in writing peer-reviewed academic studies, publications, or policy reports related to reparations, historical analysis, public policy development, or economic valuation for direct descendants of United States chattel slavery victims;(iii) Expertise in calculating the present value of uncompensated slave labor for direct victims of United States chattel slavery;(iv) Substantial knowledge of the history and doctrine of United States chattel slavery reparations and the ability to develop a process requiring Washington residents seeking reparations to demonstrate direct descent from individuals enslaved in the United States between 1776 and 1865;(v) Demonstrated commitment to reviewing and recommending reparations public policy;(vi) Professional expertise in the field of reparative justice;(vii) A composition that, to the greatest extent possible, reflects the diversity of individuals with direct lived experience related to the subject matter of the study; and(viii) An experienced genealogist on their research team.(b) The department, in consultation with the state commission on African American affairs shall commission and oversee the Charles Mitchell and George Washington Bush study on reparative action for Washington state's descendants of victims of United States chattel slavery, which shall examine the historical injustices of United States chattel slavery and their enduring impact on direct descendants, particularly as they relate to Washington state laws and policies. The study must include, but is not limited to the following:(i) Identification, compilation, and synthesization of historical records concerning the institution of United States chattel slavery (1619â1865), including its vestiges within the laws and economic and social practices of Oregon and Washington territories (1848â1889) against freed persons and their direct descendants;(ii) An assessment of Washington territory and the state of Washington's historical and present role in perpetuating discriminatory practices through laws, policies, and economic structures against direct descendants of the victims of United States chattel slavery, particularly in economic opportunity, education, and criminal justice;(iii) Appropriate reparative remedies based on study findings, including, but not limited to:(A) Identified highlights for contributions to federal discussions on reparations, including proposed frameworks for calculating and awarding reparations at the national level;(B) The identification of existing Washington state laws and policies that continue to disproportionately harm direct descendants of United States enslaved persons and recommendations for their reform or repeal;(C) Proposed methods for calculating, structuring, and awarding compensation, including both direct cash payments and alternative measures such as enacting appropriate recommended state-level investments in educational access, economic opportunity, and criminal justice reforms; and(D) A cost-benefit analysis for Washington state on the impact of enacting appropriate, recommended reparative investments in education, economic opportunity, and criminal justice for the direct descendants of United States chattel slavery victims; and(iv) Utilization of the social determinants of health framework, as outlined by the healthy people 2030 initiative under the United States department of health and human services, to assess economic, educational, and social disparities with the goal of informing Washington state-level policy recommendations.(c) The department, in consultation with the state commission on African American affairs, shall transmit the selected research entity or research team's following reports:(i) A preliminary report to the legislature by June 30, 2026, detailing researcher qualifications, study scope, methodology, and an outline plan for continued community engagement plan throughout the study;(ii) An interim report by December 31, 2026, providing updates on the study's progress and any initial findings; and(iii) A final report by June 30, 2027, presenting findings and recommendations to the legislature, the governor, and Washington state's federal delegation.(d) The department may receive and utilize gifts, grants, or endowments from public, private, or philanthropic sources for the sole purpose of the study.(26) $1,169,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $1,169,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for implementation of chapter 462, Laws of 2023 (domestic violence).(27) $54,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $54,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for implementation of the existing structure tax incentive program.(28) $200,000 of the opioid abatement settlement accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for a grant to a statewide association representing the full system of Washington public health, including public health professionals, public health students, and community-based health, to coordinate work related to opioid use prevention, harm reduction, and treatment statewideâat the state level, the local level, and within schools.(29) $1,426,000 of the lead paint accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5494 (lead-based paint). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2025, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.(30) $40,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $40,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for a grant to a women-led, community-driven organization that supports extremely vulnerable and low-income Afghan women and girls in Washington to provide neighborhood-based learning with instant translation in three languages.(31) $150,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 is provided solely for a grant to a Burien-based nonprofit to develop a program to provide telehealth services to Washington state farm workers. The partnering telehealth company must be based in Washington.(32) $150,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $150,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for a grant to a Seattle-based nonprofit that seeks to improve the status of girls in Washington state. Funding may be used to continue providing civic engagement programming as well as to develop an online train-the-trainer program for adults working with youth to learn how to facilitate healthy relationship skill building girl groups.(33) $150,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 is provided solely for a grant to a King county-based nonprofit that exclusively serves foreign-trained physicians to help foreign-trained physicians prepare for work in a United States clinical setting. Funds may be used to operate an educational outreach program to help medical providers and institutions understand the medical doctor: clinical experience program and for stipends for foreign-trained physicians to take medical exams and for other professional development.(34) $125,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $125,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for a grant to a Seattle-based community-based organization that supports Spanish speakers by providing individuals with access to HIV treatment and testing and community support groups for people living with HIV. Funding may be used to assist with expansion to Snohomish county.(35) $100,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $100,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for a grant to a Seattle-based nonprofit to expand a program that provides skating lessons to preschoolers from diverse and low-income families.(36) $200,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 is provided solely for a Redmond-based nonprofit serving Latino low-income, vulnerable, immigrant, and Spanish-speaking communities in King and Snohomish counties with bilingual, free community health services, programs, and outreach. Funds may be used to expand free programs including but not limited to health outreach, financial coaching, small business assistance, youth tech space, internships, and home buying support.(37) $150,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 is provided solely for a grant to a Seattle-based community organization that works to advance health justice, culturally appropriate care, and integrative medicine. Funds may be used for a study to assess the effectiveness of the organization's health delivery model to refine and improve its service delivery approach.(38) $8,326,000 of the domestic violence co-responder accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Substitute House Bill No. 1498 (domestic viol. co-responders). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2025, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 130. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCEâHOUSINGGeneral FundâState Appropriation (FY 2026). . . .$309,054,000General FundâState Appropriation (FY 2027). . . .$304,114,000General FundâFederal Appropriation. . . .$65,412,000Home Security Fund AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$248,615,000Affordable Housing for All AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$91,728,000Community and Economic Development Fee AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$3,448,000Apple Health and Homes AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$6,496,000Covenant Homeownership AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$200,000,000Washington Housing Trust AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$11,295,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$1,240,162,000The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) $1,000,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026, $1,000,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027, and $2,000,000 of the Washington housing trust accountâstate appropriation are provided solely for services to homeless families and youth through the Washington youth and families fund.(2) $1,000,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026, $1,000,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027, and $2,000,000 of the home security fundâstate appropriation are provided solely for the administration of the grant program required in chapter 43.185C RCW, linking homeless students and their families with stable housing.(3) $11,252,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $11,252,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for housing assistance, including long-term rental subsidies, permanent supportive housing, and low- and no-barrier housing beds, for unhoused individuals. Priority must be given to individuals with a mental health disorder, substance use disorder, or other complex conditions; individuals with a criminal history; and individuals transitioning from behavioral health treatment facilities or local jails.(4)(a) $12,500,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026, $12,500,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027, and $37,000,000 of the affordable housing for all accountâstate appropriation are provided solely for grants to support the building operation, maintenance, and service costs of permanent supportive housing projects or units within housing projects that have or will receive funding from the housing trust fundâstate account or other public capital funding that:(i) Is dedicated as permanent supportive housing units;(ii) Is occupied by low-income households with incomes at or below 30 percent of the area median income; and(iii) Requires a supplement to rent income to cover ongoing property operating, maintenance, and service expenses.(b) Permanent supportive housing projects receiving federal operating subsidies that do not fully cover the operation, maintenance, and service costs of the projects are eligible to receive grants as described in this subsection.(c) The department may use a reasonable amount of funding provided in this subsection to administer the grants.(d) Within amounts provided in this subsection, the department must provide staff support for the permanent supportive housing operations, maintenance, and services forecast. The department must develop a model to estimate demand for operating, maintenance, and services costs for permanent supportive housing units that qualify for grant funding under (a) of this subsection. The model shall incorporate factors including the number of qualifying units currently in operation; the number of new qualifying units assumed to come online since the previous forecast and the timing of when those units will become operational; the impacts of enacted or proposed investments in the capital budget on the number of new potentially qualifying units; the number of units supported through a grant awarded under (a) of this subsection; the historical actual per unit average grant awards under (a) of this subsection; reported data from housing providers on actual costs for operations, maintenance, and services; and other factors identified as appropriate for estimating the demand for maintenance, operations, and services for qualifying permanent supportive housing units. The forecast methodology, updates, and methodology changes must be conducted in coordination with staff from the department, the office of financial management, and the appropriate fiscal committees of the legislature. The forecast must be updated each February and November during the fiscal biennium and the department must submit a report to the legislature summarizing the updated forecast based on actual awards made under (a) of this subsection and the completed construction of new qualifying units.(5) $7,000,000 of the home security fundâstate appropriation is provided solely for the office of homeless youth prevention and protection programs to:(a) Expand outreach, services, and housing for homeless youth and young adults including but not limited to secure crisis residential centers, crisis residential centers, and HOPE beds, so that resources are equitably distributed across the state;(b) Contract with other public agency partners to test innovative program models that prevent youth from exiting public systems into homelessness; and(c) Support the development of an integrated services model, increase performance outcomes, and enable providers to have the necessary skills and expertise to effectively operate youth programs.(6) $3,800,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $3,800,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for the office of homeless youth to build infrastructure and services to support a continuum of interventions, including but not limited to prevention, crisis response, and long-term housing, to reduce youth homelessness in communities identified as part of the anchor community initiative.(7) $1,913,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $1,912,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for the office of homeless youth to contract with one or more nonprofit organizations to provide youth services and young adult housing on a multi-acre youth campus located in the city of Tacoma. Youth services include, but are not limited to, HOPE beds and crisis residential centers to provide temporary shelter and permanency planning for youth under the age of 18. Young adult housing includes, but is not limited to, rental assistance and case management for young adults ages 18 to 24. The department shall submit an annual report to the legislature on the use of the funds. The report is due annually on June 30th. The report shall include but is not limited to:(a) A breakdown of expenditures by program and expense type, including the cost per bed;(b) The number of youth and young adults helped by each program;(c) The number of youth and young adults on the waiting list for programs, if any; and(d) Any other metric or measure the department deems appropriate to evaluate the effectiveness of the use of the funds.(8)(a) $68,550,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $68,550,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for the essential needs and housing support program and related services.(b) The department may use a portion of the funds provided in this subsection to continue the pilot program established in section 127(106), chapter 357, Laws of 2020 (addressing the immediate housing needs of low or extremely low-income elderly or disabled adults in certain counties who receive social security disability or retirement income).(c) The department must ensure the timely redistribution of the funding provided in this subsection among entities or counties to reflect actual caseload changes as required under RCW 43.185C.220(5)(c).(d) The department may use a portion of the funds provided in this subsection to provide housing supports for individuals enrolled in the foundational community supports initiative who are transitioning off of benefits under RCW 74.04.805 due to increased income or other changes in eligibility.(9) $1,000,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026, $1,000,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027, and $4,500,000 of the home security fundâstate appropriation are provided solely for the consolidated homeless grant program. Of the amounts provided in this subsection:(a) $4,500,000 of the home security fundâstate appropriation is provided solely for permanent supportive housing targeted at those families who are chronically homeless and where at least one member of the family has a disability. The department will also connect these families to medicaid supportive services.(b) $500,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $500,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for diversion services for those families and individuals who are at substantial risk of losing stable housing or who have recently become homeless and are determined to have a high probability of returning to stable housing.(10) $1,007,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $1,007,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for the department to administer a transitional housing program for nondependent homeless youth.(11)(a) $2,000,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $2,000,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for the office of homeless youth prevention and protection programs to administer flexible funding to serve eligible youth and young adults. The flexible funding administered under this subsection may be used for the immediate needs of eligible youth or young adults. An eligible youth or young adult may receive support under this subsection more than once.(b) Flexible funding provided under this subsection may be used for purposes including but not limited to:(i) Car repair or other transportation assistance;(ii) Rental application fees, a security deposit, or short-term rental assistance;(iii) Offsetting costs for first and last month's rent and security deposits;(iv) Transportation costs to go to work;(v) Assistance in obtaining photo identification or birth certificates; and(vi) Other uses that will support the eligible youth or young adult's housing stability, education, or employment, or meet immediate basic needs.(c) The flexible funding provided under this subsection may be provided to:(i) Eligible youth and young adults. For the purposes of this subsection, an eligible youth or young adult is a person under age 25 who is experiencing or at risk of experiencing homelessness, including but not limited to those who are unsheltered, doubled up or in unsafe living situations, exiting inpatient programs, or in school;(ii) Community-based providers assisting eligible youth or young adults in attaining safe and stable housing; and(iii) Individuals or entities, including landlords, providing safe housing or other support designed to lead to housing for eligible youth or young adults.(12) $607,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $607,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for the department to assist homeowners at risk of foreclosure pursuant to chapter 61.24 RCW. Funding provided in this section may be used for activities to prevent mortgage or tax lien foreclosure, housing counselors, a foreclosure prevention hotline, legal services for low-income individuals, mediation, and other activities that promote homeownership. The department may contract with other foreclosure fairness program state partners to carry out this work.(13) $1,400,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $1,400,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for the office of homeless youth to administer a competitive grant process to award funding to licensed youth shelters, HOPE centers, and crisis residential centers to provide behavioral health support services for youth in crisis, and to increase funding for current grantees.(14) $55,500,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $55,500,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for the department to continue grant funding for emergency housing and shelter capacity and associated supports such as street outreach, diversion services, short-term rental assistance, hotel and motel vouchers, housing search and placement, and housing stability case management. Entities eligible for grant funding include local governments and nonprofit entities. The department may use existing programs, such as the consolidated homelessness grant program, to award funding under this subsection. Grants provided under this subsection must be used to maintain or increase current emergency housing capacity, funded by the shelter program grant and other programs, as practicable due to increased costs of goods, services, and wages. Emergency housing includes transitional housing, congregate or noncongregate shelter, sanctioned encampments, or short-term hotel or motel stays.(15)(a) $45,050,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $45,050,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for a targeted grant program to transition persons residing in encampments to safer housing opportunities, with an emphasis on ensuring individuals living unsheltered reach permanent housing solutions. Eligible grant recipients include local governments and nonprofit organizations operating to provide housing or services. The department may provide funding to state agencies to ensure individuals accessing housing services are also able to access other wrap-around services that enable them to obtain housing such as food, personal identification, and other related services. Local government and nonprofit grant recipients may use grant funding to provide outreach, housing, case management, transportation, site monitoring, and other services needed to assist individuals residing in encampments and on public rights-of-way with moving into housing.(b) When awarding grants under (a) of this subsection, the department must prioritize applicants that focus on ensuring an expeditious path to or remaining in sustainable permanent housing solutions, and that demonstrate an understanding of working with individuals to identify their optimal housing type and level of ongoing services through the effective use of outreach, engagement, and temporary lodging and permanent housing placement.(c) Grant recipients under (a) of this subsection must enter into a memorandum of understanding with the department, and other state agencies if applicable, as a condition of receiving funds. Memoranda of understanding must specify the responsibilities of the grant recipients and the state agencies and must include specific measurable outcomes for each entity signing the memorandum. The department must publish all signed memoranda on the department's website and must publish updates on outcomes for each memorandum at least every 90 days, while taking steps to protect the privacy of individuals served by the program. At a minimum, outcomes must include:(i) The number of people actually living in any encampment identified for intervention by the department or grantees;(ii) The demographics of those living in any encampment identified for intervention by the department or grantees;(iii) The duration of engagement with individuals living within encampments;(iv) The types of housing options that were offered;(v) The number of individuals who accepted offered housing;(vi) Any reasons given for why individuals declined offered housing;(vii) The types of assistance provided to move individuals into offered housing;(viii) Any services and benefits in which an individual was successfully enrolled; and(ix) The housing outcomes of individuals who were placed into housing every six months after placement.(d) Grant recipients under (a) of this subsection may not transition individuals from encampments or close encampments unless they have provided extensive outreach and offered each individual temporary lodging or permanent housing that matches the actual situation and needs of each person, is noncongregate whenever possible, and takes into consideration individuals' immediate and long-term needs and abilities to achieve and maintain housing stability. Grant recipients who initially match an individual to temporary lodging must make efforts to transition the person to a permanent housing placement within six months except under unusual circumstances. The department must establish criteria regarding the safety, accessibility, and habitability of housing options to be offered by grant recipients to ensure that such options are private, sanitary, healthy, and dignified, and that grant recipients provide options that are well-matched to an individual's assessed needs.(e) Funding granted to eligible recipients under (a) of this subsection may not be used to supplant or replace existing funding provided for housing or homeless services.(16) $200,000,000 of the covenant homeownership accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of the covenant homeownership program.(17) Before awarding or entering into grants or contracts for the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium for homeless housing and service programs that are funded from the home security fund account or the affordable housing for all account, the department must first consult with local governments and eligible grantees to ensure that funding from these accounts is used to maintain the quantity and types of homeless housing and services funded in local communities as of February 28, 2025. The department may take into consideration local document recording fee balances and individual county fluctuations in recording fee collections when allocating state funds. The department must redeploy funds to other nonprofit and county grantees if originally granted amounts are not expended or committed within a reasonable timeline. The department may then provide funding to eligible entities to undertake the activities described in RCW 36.22.250(4)(b), such as funding for project-based vouchers and other assistance necessary to support permanent supportive housing as defined in RCW 36.70A.030 or as administered by the office of apple health and homes created in RCW 43.330.181.(18) $425,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $425,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for the continuation of existing contracts with a nonprofit organization to increase housing supply and equitable housing outcomes by advancing affordable housing options, including affordable homeownership or affordable rental housing, supportive housing, transitional housing, shelter, or housing funded through the apple health and homes program, that are co-located with community services such as education centers, health clinics, nonprofit organizations, social services, or community spaces or facilities, available to residents or the public, on underutilized or tax-exempt land. Contract funding may be used for costs including, but not limited to, identifying properties and implementing strategies to accelerate the development of affordable housing, conducting affordable housing site predevelopment activities, providing technical assistance on topics related to affordable housing development, facilitating collaboration and codevelopment between affordable housing and community partners, and conducting community engagement activities.(19) $58,802,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $58,802,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for grants to counties, cities, and other entities receiving contracts pursuant to RCW 43.185C.080(3) for homeless housing programs and services including, but not limited to, emergency housing and shelter, temporary housing, permanent supportive housing programs, and other homeless housing services and initiatives, including those funded through the document recording fee collected pursuant to RCW 36.22.250. Grant funds must be prioritized for maintaining existing levels of service and preventing the closure of existing beds or programs.(20) Within existing resources, the department must review current policies and practices regarding reimbursement documentation requirements for grant and contract recipients, with a focus on requirements for grants made under subsection (4) of this section and RCW 36.22.250(5), to improve the efficiency of the reimbursement process and streamline compliance processes for grants and contract recipients while continuing to manage risks related to financial controls and federal requirements. In reviewing policies and practices, the department may consider implementing process changes and other approaches, including but not limited to risk-based tiering of requirements for grant and contract recipients.(21) Within existing resources, the department must consult with permanent supportive housing providers awarded grants under subsection (4) of this section or RCW 36.22.250(5) to provide awardees the opportunity to provide feedback and develop recommendations on topics including, but not limited to, allowable expenditures under these grant programs, statewide application benchmarks for operations and maintenance costs per unit and services costs per tenant, and opportunities to streamline grant administration.(22) $229,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $229,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for implementation of the mobile home community sales program.(23) $107,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $55,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5298 (mobile home community sale). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2025, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.(24) $33,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $33,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5587 (affordable housing dev.). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2025, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.(25) $400,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 is provided solely for a grant to a Pierce county-based nonprofit with emergency shelters in Pierce, King, Thurston, and Kitsap counties which provides a comprehensive approach to addressing the root causes of homelessness to sustain emergency shelters.(26) $150,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 is provided solely for a grant to a south King county-based nonprofit family center for families experiencing homelessness to maintain services, including emergency shelter beds.(27) $200,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 is provided solely for a grant to a King county-based nonprofit organization that runs at least two emergency shelters with at least 500 beds to help families stay housed while researchers study the effects of direct rental assistance on families.(28) $74,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $6,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for the department to study the prevalence of housing options for individuals 55 years of age or older that market themselves as "senior independent living" or similarly in Washington state. By July 1, 2026, the department shall provide recommendations to the legislature for the creation of a registration process for senior independent living that increases consumer protection for residents and prospective residents.(29) $500,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $500,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for implementation of chapter 408, Laws of 2023 (ESSB 5599). The entirety of this amount is provided for the office of homeless youth for prevention and protection programs to provide supportive care grants to organizations to address the needs of youth seeking protected health care services.(30) $100,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $100,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for implementation of Engrossed House Bill No. 1217 (residential tenants). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2025, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 131. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCEâLOCAL GOVERNMENTGeneral FundâState Appropriation (FY 2026). . . .$30,488,000General FundâState Appropriation (FY 2027). . . .$27,669,000General FundâFederal Appropriation. . . .$55,565,000General FundâPrivate/Local Appropriation. . . .$1,137,000Climate Commitment AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$22,589,000Community Preservation and Development AuthorityAccountâState Appropriation. . . .$1,016,000Growth Management Planning and Environmental ReviewFundâState Appropriation. . . .$5,681,000Liquor Excise Tax AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$1,402,000Liquor Revolving AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$6,850,000Model Toxics Control Stormwater AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$100,000Natural Climate Solutions AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$4,136,000Public Facilities Construction Loan RevolvingAccountâState Appropriation. . . .$1,596,000Public Works Assistance AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$9,030,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$167,259,000The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) The department shall administer its growth management act technical assistance and pass-through grants so that smaller cities and counties receive proportionately more assistance than larger cities or counties.(2) $6,827,000 of the liquor revolving accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the department to contract with the municipal research and services center of Washington.(3) $100,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $100,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for the department to produce the biennial report identifying a list of projects to address incompatible developments near military installations as provided in RCW 43.330.520.(4) $1,160,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $1,159,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for the statewide broadband office established in RCW 43.330.532.(5) $9,000,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $9,000,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for the department for grants for updating and implementing comprehensive plans and development regulations in order to implement the requirements of the growth management act.(a) In allocating grant funding to local jurisdictions, awards must be based on a formula, determined by the department, to ensure that grants are distributed equitably among cities and counties. Grants will be used primarily to fund the review and update requirements for counties and cities required by RCW 36.70A.130. Funding provided on this formula basis shall cover additional county and city costs, if applicable, to implement chapter 254, Laws of 2021 (emergency shelters & housing) and to implement chapter 368, Laws of 2023 (land use permitting/local).(b) Within the amounts not utilized under (a) of this subsection, the department shall establish a competitive grant program to implement requirements of the growth management act.(c) Up to $500,000 per biennium may be allocated toward growth management policy research and development or to assess the ongoing effectiveness of existing growth management policy.(d) The department must develop a process for consulting with local governments, affected stakeholders, and the appropriate committees of the legislature to establish emphasis areas for competitive grant distribution and for research priorities.(e) $149,000 of the amounts appropriated in this subsection for fiscal year 2026 is for the department to develop recommendations for the integration of special purpose districts into the state's growth management planning framework. The department must provide a final report with recommendations to the governor's office and the appropriate committees of the legislature by December 1, 2025.(6) Within the amounts provided in this section, the department must publish on its website housing data needed to complete housing needs assessments required by RCW 36.70A.070(2)(a). The data shall include:(a) Housing profiles for each county and city in the state, including cost burden, vacancy, and income;(b) Data to assess racially disparate impacts, exclusion, and displacement; and(c) A dashboard to display data in an easily accessible format.(7) $847,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $847,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely to increase middle housing.(8) $22,544,000 of the climate commitment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for local government climate planning implementation.(9) $67,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $67,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for the noise abatement program for qualifying port districts.(10) $2,750,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 is provided solely for a contract with a public or private entity for the purpose of public safety and security activities related to the 2026 world cup event. Funding may be provided for law enforcement and fire department resources, emergency management, traffic control, and security at official event venues, including fields and fan activation areas.(11) $100,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 is provided solely for a grant to the city of Battle Ground for a document management system.(12) $53,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $35,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for a grant to the city of Issaquah to conduct a two-year pilot program of a biometric monitoring system.(13) $375,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $375,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely as pass-through funding to Walla Walla Community College for its water and environmental center.(14) $500,000 of the community preservation and development authority accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the Central district community preservation and development authority established in RCW 43.167.070 to carry out the duties and responsibilities set forth in RCW 43.167.030.(15) $500,000 of the community preservation and development authority accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the Pioneer Square-International district community preservation and development authority established in RCW 43.167.060 to carry out the duties and responsibilities set forth in RCW 43.167.030.(16) $2,500,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $2,500,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for the department to provide grants to entities that provide digital navigator services, devices, and subscriptions. These services must include, but are not limited to, one-on-one assistance for people with limited access to services, including individuals seeking work, students seeking digital technical support, families supporting students, English language learners, medicaid clients, people experiencing poverty, and seniors.(17) $1,809,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $2,008,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 1096 (lot splitting), Second Substitute House Bill No. 1183 (building codes), Third Substitute House Bill No. 1491 (transit-oriented housing dev), Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5148 (GMA housing element), Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5184 (minimum parking requirements), Engrossed Senate Bill No. 5471 (middle housing), Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5509 (child care center siting), Engrossed Senate Bill No. 5559 (UGA subdivision process), and Substitute Senate Bill No. 5587 (affordable housing dev).NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 132. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCEâOFFICE OF ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENTGeneral FundâState Appropriation (FY 2026). . . .$15,018,000General FundâState Appropriation (FY 2027). . . .$15,522,000General FundâFederal Appropriation. . . .$8,153,000General FundâPrivate/Local Appropriation. . . .$1,269,000Dedicated Cannabis AccountâState Appropriation(FY 2026). . . .$3,706,000Dedicated Cannabis AccountâState Appropriation(FY 2027). . . .$3,831,000Andy Hill Cancer Research Endowment Fund MatchTransfer AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$22,220,000Climate Commitment AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$951,000Community and Economic Development Fee AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$765,000Economic Development Strategic Reserve AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$2,851,000Statewide Tourism Marketing AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$3,021,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$77,307,000The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) $4,152,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $4,152,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for associate development organizations. During the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium, the department shall consider an associate development organization's total resources when making contracting and fund allocation decisions, in addition to the schedule provided in RCW 43.330.086. The department may distribute the funding as follows:(a) For associate development organizations serving urban counties, which are counties other than rural counties as defined in RCW 82.14.370, a locally matched allocation of up to $1.00 per capita, totaling no more than $300,000 per organization; and(b) For associate development organizations in rural counties, as defined in RCW 82.14.370, a $1.00 per capita allocation with a base allocation of $50,000.(2) $150,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $150,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for the northwest agriculture business center.(3) $1,335,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $1,335,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for the small business export assistance program, for the department to establish representation in key international markets that will provide the greatest opportunities for increased trade and investment for small businesses in the state of Washington, and for a grant to a business center that provides confidential, no-cost, one-on-one, client-centered assistance to small businesses to expand outreach in underserved communities, especially Black, indigenous, and people of color-owned businesses, providing targeted assistance where needed. Funding may also be used to collaborate with the department, the Washington economic development association, and others to develop a more effective and efficient service delivery system for Washington's women and minority-owned small businesses.(4) $60,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $60,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for the department to submit the necessary Washington state membership dues for the Pacific Northwest economic region.(5) $1,219,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $1,219,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for the department to identify and invest in strategic growth areas, support key sectors, and align existing economic development programs and priorities. The department must consider Washington's position as the most trade-dependent state when identifying priority investments. The department must engage states and provinces in the northwest as well as associate development organizations, small business development centers, chambers of commerce, ports, and other partners to leverage the funds provided. Sector leads established by the department must include the industries of: (a) Aerospace; (b) clean technology and renewable and nonrenewable energy; (c) wood products and other natural resource industries; (d) information and communication technology; (e) life sciences and global health; (f) maritime; (g) military and defense; and (h) creative industries. The department may establish these sector leads by hiring new staff, expanding the duties of current staff, or working with partner organizations and or other agencies to serve in the role of sector lead.(6) $22,220,000 of the Andy Hill cancer research endowment fund match transfer accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the Andy Hill cancer research endowment program. Amounts provided in this subsection may be used for grants and administration costs.(7) $100,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $100,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for a grant to assist people with limited incomes in urban areas of the state start and sustain small businesses. The grant recipient must be a nonprofit organization involving a network of microenterprise organizations and professionals to support micro entrepreneurship and access to economic development resources.(8) $1,000,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $1,000,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for a nonprofit organization whose sole purpose is to provide grants, capacity building, and technical assistance support to a network of microenterprise development organizations. The microenterprise development organizations will support rural and urban Black, indigenous and people of color owned businesses, veteran owned businesses, and limited resourced and other hard to serve businesses with five or fewer employees throughout the state with business training, technical assistance, and microloans.(9) $200,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $200,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely to strengthen capacity of the keep Washington working act work group established in RCW 43.330.510.(10)(a) $100,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 is provided solely for the department to develop a state quantum computing strategy and help shape a regional quantum computing ecosystem. This includes, but is not limited to:(i) Defining partnership approaches with regional quantum stakeholder groups;(ii) Exploration of quantum application research in specific industry areas such as nuclear physics, energy and renewables, materials science, or chemistry;(iii) Identifying and defining research and development opportunities with Washington-based research institutions including the University of Washington and Pacific Northwest national laboratory; and(iv) Partnering with industry to develop plans to attract federal investment.(b) The department may contract with a Washington state-based quantum computing manufacturing entity to assist with completing obligations under this subsection.(11) $300,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 is provided solely for the city of Seattle to lease space for nonprofit and academic institutions to incubate technology business startups, especially those focusing on artificial intelligence and develop and teach curricula to skill up workers to use artificial intelligence as a business resource.(12) $500,000 of the climate commitment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the department to contract with a nonregulatory coalition located in Seattle that supports the strategic development and activation of Washington state's participation in the West Coast wide-floating offshore wind supply chain through a collaborative approach. The department and nonregulatory coalition shall identify economic, community, and workforce development opportunities resulting from Washington state's participation in the offshore wind supply chain through conducting convenings, workshops, and studies as appropriate.(13) Sufficient amounts are provided in this section for the department to administer a grant program to cannabis licensees holding a license issued after July 1, 2024, who meet the social equity applicant criteria under RCW 69.50.335. The department must award grants primarily based on the strength of the social equity plans submitted by cannabis licensees but may also consider additional criteria if deemed necessary or appropriate by the department. Technical assistance activities eligible for funding include, but are not limited to:(a) Assistance navigating the cannabis licensure process;(b) Cannabis-business specific education and business plan development;(c) Regulatory compliance training;(d) Financial management training and assistance in seeking financing;(e) Strengthening a social equity plan as defined in RCW 69.50.101; and(f) Connecting social equity applicants with established industry members and tribal cannabis enterprises and programs for mentoring and other forms of support.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 133. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCEâENERGY AND INNOVATIONGeneral FundâState Appropriation (FY 2026). . . .$3,601,000General FundâState Appropriation (FY 2027). . . .$3,522,000General FundâFederal Appropriation. . . .$39,799,000General FundâPrivate/Local Appropriation. . . .$106,000Building Code Council AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$19,000Climate Commitment AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$54,112,000Community and Economic Development Fee AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$160,000Energy Efficiency AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$20,000Low-Income Weatherization and StructuralRehabilitation Assistance AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$1,416,000Natural Climate Solutions AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$166,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$102,921,000The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) The department is authorized to require an applicant to pay an application fee to cover the cost of reviewing the project and preparing an advisory opinion on whether a proposed electric generation project or conservation resource qualifies to meet mandatory conservation targets.(2) $500,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $500,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely to build a mapping and forecasting tool that provides locations and information on charging and refueling infrastructure as required in chapter 300, Laws of 2021 (zero emissions transp.). The department shall collaborate with the interagency electric vehicle coordinating council established in chapter 182, Laws of 2022 (transportation resources) when developing the tool and must work to meet benchmarks established in chapter 182, Laws of 2022 (transportation resources).(3) $5,000,000 of the climate commitment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for grants to support port districts, counties, cities, towns, special purpose districts, any other municipal corporations or quasi-municipal corporations, and tribes to support siting and permitting of clean energy projects in the state. Eligible uses of grant funding provided in this section include supporting predevelopment work for sites intended for clean energy projects, land use studies, conducting or engaging in planning efforts such as planned actions and programmatic environmental impact statements, and staff to improve permit timeliness and certainty.(4)(a) $500,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 is provided solely for the department to contract with one or more of the western national laboratories, or a similar independent research organization, in consultation with state and federal energy agencies, stakeholders, and relevant utilities, to conduct an analysis for new electricity generation, transmission, ancillary services, efficiency and storage sufficient to offset those presently provided by the lower Snake river dams. The analysis should include a list of requirements for a replacement portfolio that diversifies and improves the resilience and maintains the reliability and adequacy of the electric power system, is consistent with the state's statutory and regulatory requirements for clean electricity generation, and is supplementary to the resources that will be required to replace fossil fuels in the electrical generation, transportation, industry, and buildings sectors. The department and its contractor's assessment will include quantitative analysis based on available data as well as qualitative input gathered from tribal and other governments, the Northwest power and conservation council, relevant utilities, and other key stakeholders. The analysis must include the following:(i) Expected trends for demand, and distinct scenarios that examine potential outcomes for electricity demand, generation, and storage technologies development, land use and land use constraints, and cost through 2050, as well as the most recent analysis of future resource adequacy and reliability;(ii) A resource portfolio approach in which a combination of commercially available generating resources, energy efficiency, conservation, and demand response programs, transmission resources, and other programs and resources that would be necessary prerequisites to replace the power and grid reliability services otherwise provided by the lower Snake river dams and the time frame needed to put those resources into operation;(iii) Identification of generation and transmission siting options consistent with the overall replacement resource portfolio, in coordination with other state processes and requirements supporting the planning of clean energy and transmission siting;(iv) An evaluation of alternatives for the development, ownership and operation of the replacement resource portfolio;(v) Examination of possible impacts and opportunities that might result from the renewal of the Columbia river treaty, revisions of the Bonneville power administration preference contracts, implementation of the western resource adequacy program (WRAP), and other changes in operation and governance of the regional electric power system, consistent with statutory and regulatory requirements of the clean energy transformation act;(vi) Identification of revenue and payment structures sufficient to maintain reliable and affordable electricity supplies for ratepayers, with emphasis on overburdened communities;(vii) Development of distinct scenarios that examine different potential cost and timeline potentials for development and implementation of identified generation and transmission needs and options including planning, permitting, design, and construction, including relevant federal authorities, consistent with the statutory and regulatory requirements of the clean energy transformation act;(viii) Quantification of impacts to greenhouse gas emissions including life-cycle emissions analysis associated with implementation of identified generation and transmission needs and options including (A) planning, permitting, design, and construction, and, if relevant, emissions associated with the acquisition of non-Washington state domestic or foreign sources of electricity, and (B) any additional operations of existing fossil-fueled generating resources; and(ix) An inventory of electricity demand by state-owned or operated facilities and information needed to complete a request for proposals (RFP) to satisfy this demand through new nonhydro renewable energy generation and/or conservation.(b) The department shall, to the extent determined practicable, consider related analyses undertaken by the federal government as part of the Columbia river system operation stay of litigation agreed to in National Wildlife Federation et al. v. National Marine Fisheries Service et al. in October 2021.(c) The department shall provide a status update to the energy and environment committees of the legislature and governor's office by June 30, 2026.(5) $13,088,000 of the climate commitment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the department to administer a grant program to assist owners of public buildings in covering the costs of conducting an investment grade energy audit for those buildings. Public buildings include those owned by state and local governments, tribes, and school districts.(6) $1,078,000 of the climate commitment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the department to develop plans to test hydrogen combustion and resulting nitrogen oxides (NOx) emissions, technical assistance for strategic end uses of hydrogen, a feasibility assessment regarding underground storage of hydrogen in Washington, and an environmental justice toolkit for hydrogen projects.(7) $1,678,000 of the climate commitment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of chapter 344, Laws of 2024 (public building materials), including to develop and maintain a publicly accessible database for covered projects to submit environmental and working conditions data, to convene a technical work group, and to develop legislative reports.(8) $2,500,000 of the climate commitment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the department for activities that engage tribes or overburdened communities when siting renewable energy generation or electrical transmission facilities in Washington state. Of the amounts provided in this subsection:(a) $2,000,000 of the climate commitment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for engagement of a tribal collaborative and participating tribes to identify areas with higher and lower potential for avoiding conflicts with tribes when siting renewable energy generation and electrical transmission facilities. The effort must consider tribal renewable energy and transmission needs, tribal sovereignty and rights, sensitive natural areas and working lands, and the goal to minimize harm while maximizing benefits to tribal communities. The department may contract for this purpose.(b) $500,000 of the climate commitment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the department to engage with communities to create a framework and process to support early and ongoing overburdened community input for the planning and development of transmission corridors. This shall, to the extent feasible, include identifying ways for overburdened communities to benefit from transmission corridor development as well as ways to reduce and avoid conflict with overburdened communities in the development of transmission corridors. Engagement activities may be coordinated with the tribal collaborative described in section 133 of this act and other relevant community engagement activities within the department.(9)(a) $200,000 of the climate commitment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for a grant to continue the Washington just and rapid transition climate tech program. The grant will provide funding for the recruitment, development, business training, and support of underserved climate technology innovators, entrepreneurs, and organizations developing or deploying solutions in the areas of renewable energy, energy efficiency, sustainable transportation, and other technology solving for the environmental challenges facing overburdened communities in Washington.(b) Activities may include supporting entrepreneurs in preparing for private investment; technical assistance for entrepreneurs receiving state directed federal equity and debt capital; assistance accessing or leveraging the use of federal funding; business coaching and mentoring; and connections to technical and business resources.(c) The grant recipient must be a nonprofit organization that has been awarded, from the state of Washington, federal state small business credit initiative funds for investment in Washington climate tech entrepreneurs, and must also have experience managing investment funding and providing entrepreneurial support programs and federal funding assistance to early-stage climate start-ups and businesses based in Washington. The grant recipient should have experience providing services to individuals and companies led by individuals from underrepresented groups, including BIPOC, women, and individuals residing in rural communities and have working partnerships with state research universities, climate technology industry associations, and community-based organizations serving underserved communities.(10) $300,000 of the climate commitment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the department to provide assistance and develop financing recommendations to increase transmission capacity in Washington. The department must use the funding provided in this subsection to:(a) Provide assistance to local and tribal governments regarding the permitting of electric transmission projects which includes, but is not limited to, providing easily accessible information on advanced transmission technologies in Washington and identifying applicable codes and ordinances that support transmission facilities for the purpose of providing frameworks that local and tribal governments may consider or adopt;(b) Provide technical assistance to transmission operators for increasing and enhancing transmission capacity with reconductoring and other advanced transmission technologies; and(c) Identify the appropriate finance mechanisms needed to improve capacity to develop electric transmission in Washington. By November 1, 2025, the department must submit a report that analyzes financing options for transmission projects and provides recommendations to the governor and the appropriate committees of the legislature.(11) $163,000 of the climate commitment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the department to administer a pilot program to provide grants and technical assistance to support planning, predevelopment, and installation of commercial, dual-use solar power demonstration projects. Eligible grant recipients may include, but are not limited to, nonprofit organizations, public entities, and federally recognized tribes.(12)(a) $10,000,000 of the climate commitment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the department to administer a program to assist community-based organizations, local governments, ports, tribes, and other entities to access federal tax incentives and grants. Eligible entities for the program include, but are not limited to, local governments in Washington, tribal governments and tribal entities, community-based organizations, housing authorities, ports, transit agencies, nonprofit organizations, and for-profit businesses. The department shall prioritize assistance that benefits vulnerable populations in overburdened communities, with a goal of directing at least 25 percent of funds to this purpose.(b) Within the amounts provided in (a) of this subsection, the department must contract with a nonprofit organization to provide the following services:(i) Development of tax guidance resources for clean energy tax credits, including core legal documents to be used broadly across stakeholders;(ii) Providing tailored marketing materials for these resources targeting underserved entities; and(iii) Providing funds to subcontract with clean energy tax attorneys to pilot office hours style support available to eligible entities across the state.(13) $3,500,000 of the climate commitment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the department to provide and facilitate access to energy assistance programs, including incentives, energy audits, and rebate programs to retrofit homes and small businesses.(14) $250,000 of the climate commitment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the department to contract with a nonprofit entity that represents the maritime industry to develop and publish a strategic framework regarding the production, supply, and use of sustainable maritime fuels and deployment of low and zero-emissions vessel technologies in Washington. Analyses will include relevant human and environmental health and equity considerations. Funding under this subsection may be used for activities including, but not limited to, convening stakeholders and building organizational capacity. Stakeholder engagement pursuant to this subsection shall include, at a minimum, engagement with federal and state agencies, ports, industry, labor, research institutions, nongovernmental organizations, and relevant federally recognized tribes.(15) $456,000 of the climate commitment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the department to develop guidance documents regarding the different types of battery energy storage systems technologies. The guidance documents must address safety considerations, emergency response preparation and requirements, and siting and zoning. The department shall contract with a facilitator to convene a work group of staff and relevant stakeholders with expertise on the topic. The guidance documents shall be completed by June 30, 2027.(16) $719,000 of the climate commitment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the department to develop a guidebook to support local governments in integrating clean energy development into planning and zoning requirements, including dual-use clean energy technologies and colocation with agricultural uses. The guidebook shall be developed through a stakeholder engagement process that includes, but is not limited to, federally recognized tribes and local governments. The department shall offer direct technical assistance to local governments, including methods and best practices for siting clean energy projects and colocation of energy facilities with agricultural operations, open space areas, and other land uses.(17) $450,000 of the climate commitment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the department to contract with the Washington state academy of sciences to complete a study to determine the value of distributed solar and storage in Washington state. Including any factors that it finds relevant, the academy shall develop policy recommendations and options for a methodology or methodologies that utility regulators and governing bodies may use after the statutory four percent net metering threshold is met. The academy shall submit a final report to the department and the utilities and transportation commission by October 1, 2026.(18) $197,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 is provided solely for the department to complete the final report of the electrical transmission workforce needs study pursuant to section 1117(40) of this act. The department must submit the final report of the study to the appropriate committees of the legislature by November 1, 2025.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 134. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCEâPROGRAM SUPPORTGeneral FundâState Appropriation (FY 2026). . . .$6,539,000General FundâState Appropriation (FY 2027). . . .$5,692,000General FundâFederal Appropriation. . . .$7,902,000General FundâPrivate/Local Appropriation. . . .$2,075,000Dedicated Cannabis AccountâState Appropriation(FY 2026). . . .$2,000Climate Commitment AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$1,753,000Growth Management Planning and Environmental ReviewFundâState Appropriation. . . .$148,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$24,111,000The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) $253,000 of the climate commitment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the department to incorporate equity and environmental justice into agency grant programs with the goal of reducing programmatic barriers to vulnerable populations in overburdened communities in accessing department funds. The department shall prioritize grant programs receiving funds from the accounts established under RCW 70A.65.240, 70A.65.250, 70A.65.260, 70A.65.270, and 70A.65.280.(2) $1,500,000 of the climate commitment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the department to continue implementation of chapter 70A.02 RCW.(3) $175,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $175,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for language access activities, which may include translation services, interpretation services, and in-language material development.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 135. FOR THE ECONOMIC AND REVENUE FORECAST COUNCILGeneral FundâState Appropriation (FY 2026). . . .$948,000General FundâState Appropriation (FY 2027). . . .$946,000Lottery Administrative AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$50,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$1,944,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 136. FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENTGeneral FundâState Appropriation (FY 2026). . . .$16,140,000General FundâState Appropriation (FY 2027). . . .$16,270,000General FundâFederal Appropriation. . . .$36,493,000General FundâPrivate/Local Appropriation. . . .$539,000Climate Commitment AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$3,004,000Performance Audits of Government AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$2,000Personnel Service AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$24,571,000Higher Education Personnel Services AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$1,428,000Statewide 988 Behavioral Health Crisis Response LineAccountâState Appropriation. . . .$300,000Statewide Information Technology System DevelopmentRevolving AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$154,207,000Office of Financial Management Central ServiceAccountâState Appropriation. . . .$34,140,000Labor Relations Service Nonappropriated AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$11,797,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$298,891,000The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1)(a) The student achievement council and all institutions of higher education as defined in RCW 28B.92.030 and eligible for state financial aid programs under chapters 28B.92 and 28B.118 RCW shall ensure that data needed to analyze and evaluate the effectiveness of state financial aid programs are promptly transmitted to the education data center so that it is available and easily accessible. The data to be reported must include but not be limited to:(i) The number of Washington college grant and college bound recipients;(ii) Persistence and completion rates of Washington college grant recipients and college bound recipients, disaggregated by institution of higher education;(iii) Washington college grant recipients grade point averages; and(iv) Washington college grant and college bound scholarship program costs.(b) The student achievement council shall submit student unit record data for state financial aid program applicants and recipients to the education data center.(2)(a) $153,269,000 of the information technology system development revolving accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the one Washington enterprise resource planning statewide program phase 1A (agency financial reporting system replacement) and is subject to the conditions, limitations, and review requirements of section 701 of this act.(b) Of the amount provided in this subsection:(i) $15,300,000 of the information technology system development revolving accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for a technology pool in fiscal year 2026 to pay for phase 1A (agency financial reporting system replacementâcore financials) state agency costs due to legacy system remediation work associated with impacted financial systems and interfaces. The office of financial management must manage the pool, authorize funds, track funds authorized and spent by agency by fiscal month, and report after each fiscal month close on the agency spending to Washington technology solutions so that the spending is included in the statewide dashboard actual spending each fiscal month for phase 1A and included on the program dashboard for program actual spend;(ii) $27,563,000 of the information technology system development revolving accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for an agency readiness pool in fiscal year 2026 to pay for phase 1A (agency financial reporting system replacement-core financials) state agency costs incurred in preparation for a successful transition to phase 1A. The office of financial management must manage this pool, authorize funds, track funds authorized and spent by agency by fiscal month, and report after each fiscal month close on the agency spending to Washington technology solutions so that the spending is included in the statewide dashboard actual spending each fiscal month for phase 1A and included on the program dashboard program actual spend; and(iii) $988,000 of the information technology system development revolving accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for an interagency agreement in fiscal year 2026 with Washington technology solutions for one dedicated information technology consultant and two dedicated system architect staff. These staff will work with state agencies to ensure preparation and timely decommission of information technology systems that will no longer be necessary post implementation of phase 1A (agency financial reporting system replacement-core financials).(c) The one Washington solution and team must use an agile development model holding live demonstrations of functioning software, developed using incremental user research, held at the end of two-week sprints.(d) The one Washington solution must be capable of being continually updated, as necessary.(e) Beginning July 1, 2025, the office of financial management shall provide written quarterly reports, within 30 calendar days of the end of each fiscal quarter, to legislative fiscal committees and the legislative evaluation and accountability program committee to include how funding was spent compared to the budget spending plan for the prior quarter by fiscal month and what the ensuing quarter budget will be by fiscal month. All reporting must be separated by phase of one Washington subprojects. The written report must also include:(i) A list of quantifiable deliverables scheduled for that quarter, including those accomplished and the amount spent associated with each deliverable, by fiscal month;(ii) A report on the contract full-time equivalent charged compared to the budget spending plan by fiscal month for each contracted vendor, to include interagency agreements with other state agencies, and what the ensuing contract equivalent budget spending plan assumes by fiscal month;(iii) A report identifying each state agency that applied for and received technology pool resources under (b)(i) of this subsection, the staffing equivalent used, and the actual spending by fiscal month by agency compared to the budget spending plan by fiscal month;(iv) A report identifying each state agency that applied for and received agency readiness pool resources under (b)(ii) of this subsection, the staffing equivalent used, and the actual spending by fiscal month by agency compared to the budget spending plan by fiscal month;(v) A report on budget spending plan by fiscal month by phase compared to actual spending by fiscal month, and the projected spending plan by fiscal month for the ensuing quarter;(vi) A report on current financial office performance metrics that at least 10 state agencies use, to include the monthly performance data, that began July 1, 2021;(vii) A report identifying each mandatory go-live phase 1A system by agency and system name, and the status on each system readiness compliance to meet the go-live date as of the start of the quarter and the percentage of compliance by the end of the quarter;(viii) An accounting of each known risk to the project identified by Washington technology solutions, the assigned quality assurance vendor, or the program during the last quarter, and then how each of these risks were addressed during the last quarter, what date each of these risks are anticipated to be resolved, and if the risk will be unresolved in the ensuing quarter;(ix) An accounting of any deliverables that were changed in the last quarter noting start and anticipated end dates before and after change, and any plans to change future deliverables to include what the deliverable was, what the new deliverable is, why the deliverable was or will be missed, what was done to mitigate this delay, and what the revised deliverable date is; and(x) The project roll-out schedule by phase to include the date each phase will go live compared to the last known go-live date. If the go-live date changed since the last quarterly report, the report must reference the last go-live date compared to the new one and include detail on why the schedule will be missed, how the project mitigated additional delays, and what the additional time in the schedule is anticipated to cost by fiscal year.(f) Prior to the expenditure of the amounts provided in this subsection, the director of the office of financial management must review and approve the spending in writing.(g) The legislature intends to provide additional funding for fiscal year 2027 costs for phase 1A (agency financial reporting system replacement) to be completed.(3) $250,000 of the office of financial management central services accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for a dedicated information technology budget staff for the work associated with statewide information technology projects that at least are subject to the conditions, limitations, and review requirements of section 701 of this act and are under the oversight of Washington technology solutions. The staff will be responsible for providing a monthly financial report after each fiscal month close to fiscal staff of the senate ways and means and house appropriations committees to reflect at least:(a) Fund balance of the information technology pool account after each fiscal month close;(b) Amount by information technology project, differentiated if in the technology pool or the agency budget, of what funding has been approved to date and for the last fiscal month;(c) Amount by agency of what funding has been approved to date and for the last fiscal month;(d) Total amount approved to date, differentiated if in the technology pool or the agency budget, and for the last fiscal month;(e) A projection for the information technology pool account by fiscal month through the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium close, and a calculation spent to date as a percentage of the total appropriation;(f) A projection of each information technology project spending compared to budget spending plan by fiscal month through the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium, and a calculation of amount spent to date as a percentage of total project cost; and(g) A list of agencies and projects that have not yet applied for nor been approved for funding by the office of financial management.(4) Within existing resources, the labor relations section shall produce a report annually on workforce data and trends for the previous fiscal year. At a minimum, the report must include a workforce profile; information on employee compensation, including salaries and cost of overtime; and information on retention, including average length of service and workforce turnover.(5) The office of financial management must report to and coordinate with the department of ecology to track expenditures from climate commitment act accounts, as defined and described in RCW 70A.65.300 and chapter 173-446B WAC.(6) Within existing resources, the office will maintain a data portal to track state agency expenditures from climate commitment act accounts as defined and described in RCW 70A.65.300 and chapter 173-446B WAC. The data portal must be coordinated with the department of ecology.(7) $250,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $250,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for implementation of chapter 245, Laws of 2022 (state boards, etc./stipends).(8)(a) $100,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 is provided solely for the office of financial management to complete a study of the future long-term uses of the Olympic heritage behavioral health campus. The study must assess the options for maximizing the facility's ability to receive federal matching funds for services provided while contributing to the health of the entire state behavioral health system based on community needs. The study must examine Washington behavioral health system trends, including demand and capacity for voluntary and involuntary behavioral health in-patient treatment, forecasted bed need and current and planned statewide capacity for civil and forensic state hospital populations, short-term civil commitment capacity trends, and trends in prosecutorial forensic referrals. The study must also consider area provider admittance and refusal rates. The study must include:(i) An analysis on the types of services which could be provided at the property, including but not limited to:(A) Voluntary behavioral health treatment services, including diversion, prediversion, and specialty services for people with co-occurring conditions including substance use disorders, intellectual or developmental disabilities, traumatic brain disorders, or dementia;(B) Services for patients that are deemed not guilty by reason of insanity;(C) Integrated service approaches that address medical, housing, vocational, and other needs of behaviorally disabled individuals with criminal legal involvement or likelihood of criminal legal involvement;(D) Long-term involuntary treatment services for specialized populations such as those with developmental disabilities or dementia;(E) Short-term involuntary treatment services;(F) Long-term involuntary treatment services for civil conversion patients;(G) Out-patient intensive behavioral health treatment including partial hospitalization and intensive outpatient care;(H) Crisis response services; and(I) Other services that will increase the state's ability to comply with requirements for providing timely admission of competency restoration patients into treatment beds;(ii) Review of potential for additional capacity or services on the entirety of the property, including any capital improvements needed to expand services under the options described in (a)(i) of this subsection;(iii) Identification and evaluation of strategies to obtain federal matching funding opportunities, specifically focusing on innovative medicaid framework adjustments and the consideration of necessary state plan amendments;(iv) Estimated costs, required staffing and workforce availability for each of the recommended types of services if available; and(v) Consideration of options for providers that can provide the different services recommended at the facility and an analysis on the cost differential and potential federal reimbursement for the different providers. The office of financial management may consider a variety of provider types or partners, including, but not limited to:(A) Tribal or local governments;(B) Acute care hospitals already providing similar care;(C) Providers contracted by the health care authority; and(D) State-operated options.(b) The office of financial management shall consult with the University of Washington school of medicine, the health care authority, and the department of social and health services in developing and conducting the study.(c) The office of financial management shall submit a final report with its findings and recommendations to the governor and the appropriate policy and fiscal committees of the legislature by December 1, 2025.(d) The office of financial management may contract with one or more third parties and consult with other state entities to conduct the study. The contract is exempt from the competitive procurement requirements in chapter 39.26 RCW.(9) $352,000 of the labor relations service nonappropriated accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Senate Bill No. 5653 (fish and wildlife officers). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2025, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 137. FOR THE OFFICE OF ADMINISTRATIVE HEARINGSAdministrative Hearings Revolving AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$72,878,000Administrative Hearings Revolving AccountâLocalAppropriation. . . .$12,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$72,890,000The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) $809,000 of the administrative hearings revolving accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5291 (long-term services trust). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2025, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.(2) $24,000 of the administrative hearings revolving accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5217 (pregnancy accommodations). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2025, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.(3) $56,000 of the administrative hearings revolving accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 1213 (paid family and medical leave protections). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2025, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.(4) $39,000 of the administrative hearings revolving accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Substitute House Bill No. 1644 (working minors). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2025, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 138. FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE LOTTERYLottery Administrative AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$31,618,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$31,618,000The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) No portion of this appropriation may be used for acquisition of gaming system capabilities that violate state law.(2) Pursuant to RCW 67.70.040, the commission shall take such action necessary to reduce retail commissions to an average of 5.1 percent of sales.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 139. FOR THE COMMISSION ON HISPANIC AFFAIRSGeneral FundâState Appropriation (FY 2026). . . .$1,173,000General FundâState Appropriation (FY 2027). . . .$1,199,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$2,372,000The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: $105,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $105,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for grants to gang youth intervention specialists for a pilot program within high schools in Washington. Grants may be provided without using a competitive selection process.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 140. FOR THE COMMISSION ON AFRICAN-AMERICAN AFFAIRSGeneral FundâState Appropriation (FY 2026). . . .$559,000General FundâState Appropriation (FY 2027). . . .$541,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$1,100,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 141. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF RETIREMENT SYSTEMSâOPERATIONSDepartment of Retirement Systems Expense AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$124,988,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$124,988,000The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) $45,493,000 of the department of retirement systems expense accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for pension system modernization, and is subject to the conditions, limitations, and review requirements of section 701 of this act.(2) $20,000 of the department of retirement systems expense accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Senate Bill No. 5306 (pension credit for leave). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2025, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 142. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF REVENUEGeneral FundâState Appropriation (FY 2026). . . .$431,882,000General FundâState Appropriation (FY 2027). . . .$448,347,000Timber Tax Distribution AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$8,187,000Business License AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$20,025,000Waste Reduction, Recycling, and Litter ControlAccountâState Appropriation. . . .$184,000Model Toxics Control Operating AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$128,000Financial Services Regulation Nonappropriated FundâState Appropriation. . . .$5,000,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$913,753,000The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) $1,661,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $1,661,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for the implementation of chapter 196, Laws of 2021 (capital gains tax).(2) $253,005,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $273,103,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for implementation of chapter 195, Laws of 2021 (working families tax exempt.). Of the total amounts provided in this subsection:(a) $14,005,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $14,103,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for administration of the working families tax exemption program; and(b) $239,000,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $259,000,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for remittances under the working families tax exemption program.(3) $6,976,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $4,510,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for the department to implement 2025 revenue legislation. Within the amounts provided in this section, funding is sufficient for the department to implement Substitute Senate Bill No. 5314 (capital gains tax) and Engrossed Substitute House Bill No. 2061 (duty-free sales enterprises).(4) $181,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 is provided solely to support the underground economy task force created in section 906, chapter 376, Laws of 2024.(5) Within existing resources, during the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium, the department of revenue shall implement an expanded voluntary disclosure program for all entities engaged in investment activities that are not a banking, lending, or security business, as defined in RCW 82.04.4281. Unless an audit has been commenced by the department as of July 1, 2025, all such entities may participate in the expanded voluntary disclosure program. During the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium, the department shall waive all penalties and interest for participating entities of the expanded voluntary disclosure program for the purpose of registering and collecting revenue due from businesses.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 143. FOR THE BOARD OF TAX APPEALSGeneral FundâState Appropriation (FY 2026). . . .$2,810,000General FundâState Appropriation (FY 2027). . . .$2,847,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$5,657,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 144. FOR THE OFFICE OF MINORITY AND WOMEN'S BUSINESS ENTERPRISESGeneral FundâState Appropriation (FY 2026). . . .$3,611,000General FundâState Appropriation (FY 2027). . . .$3,677,000Minority and Women's Business Enterprises AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$8,350,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$15,638,000The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The office of minority and women's business enterprises shall consult with the Washington state office of equity on the Washington state toolkit for equity in public spending.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 145. FOR THE INSURANCE COMMISSIONERGeneral FundâState Appropriation (FY 2026). . . .$300,000General FundâState Appropriation (FY 2027). . . .$800,000General FundâFederal Appropriation. . . .$6,780,000Insurance Commissioner's Regulatory AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$95,465,000Insurance Commissioner's Fraud AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$4,851,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$108,196,000The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) $1,244,000 of the insurance commissioner's regulatory accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the commissioner to continue its work on behavioral health parity compliance, enforcement, and provider network oversight. The commissioner may use internal staff and contracted experts to oversee provider directories and evaluate consumer access to services for mental health and substance use disorders in state-regulated individual, small group, and large group health plans.(2) $350,000 of the insurance commissioner's regulatory accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the commissioner to study the feasibility of using a joint underwriting association to provide property and liability insurance coverage for child care centers, group foster homes, family child care homes, child and youth serving organizations, and child placement services. The commissioner must provide a report of findings to the appropriate policy committees of the legislature by December 31, 2025.(a) The commissioner shall collect information from entities transacting insurance in the state and other sources to evaluate feasibility, limitations, and options. Any authorized insurers, unauthorized insurers, and risk retention groups contacted for purposes of this study are required to provide the requested information to the commissioner. The commissioner may confer with government entities, insurers, and stakeholders as needed for the feasibility study and report of findings.(b) The commissioner may contract with actuaries and other consultants, as needed, to analyze data gathered, evaluate feasibility, assess limitations, develop options and recommendations, and prepare the report.(c) The study shall evaluate, at a minimum:(i) Concerns with the cost or availability of property and liability coverage for child care centers, group foster homes, family child care homes, child and youth serving organizations, and child placement services;(ii) Barriers that child care centers, group foster homes, family child care homes, child and youth serving organizations, and child placement services experience in accessing adequate property and liability coverage;(iii) Whether and how a joint underwriting association might suit the property and liability coverage needs of child care centers, group foster homes, family child care homes, child and youth serving organizations, and child placement services, and any limitations of a joint underwriting association in meeting the need; and(iv) Statutory or implementation considerations relevant to legislative deliberations regarding feasibility.(3) $3,297,000 of the insurance commissioner's regulatory accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the commissioner to enhance consumer education, outreach, counseling, and complaint resolution for elders and persons with disabilities related to medicare program enrollment and access to care through the senior health insurance benefit advisor program. Activities under this subsection may include but are not limited to: Contracts with community-based organizations with language skills and relationships with medicare beneficiaries; permanent or part-time staffing; volunteer recruitment; and outreach activities.(4) $187,000 of the insurance commissioner's regulatory accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Senate Bill No. 5721 (automobile insurance). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2025, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.(5) $290,000 of the insurance commissioner's regulatory accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5351 (dental insurance practices). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2025, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.(6) $528,000 of the insurance commissioner's regulatory accountâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 is provided solely for the commissioner to study insurers' use of credit history, credit-based insurance scores, other rate factors that may have disparate impacts on Washington residents, and alternatives to their use, in determining personal insurance premiums, rates, or eligibility for coverage, and the associated impacts to consumer costs and the availability of insurance. The commissioner must provide a report of findings to the appropriate policy committees of the legislature by November 1, 2026.(a) In conducting the study, the commissioner shall:(i) Collect information from entities transacting personal insurance as defined in RCW 48.19.035(1)(e), and any identified authorized insurers are required to provide the requested information to the commissioner;(ii) Investigate and obtain any other relevant information that may assist the commissioner with analyzing insurers' use of credit history, credit-based insurance scoring models, other rate factors that may disparately impact Washington residents, and alternatives to their use, in determining personal insurance premiums, rates, eligibility for coverage, and evaluating the associated impacts to consumer costs and the availability of insurance;(iii) Contract with actuarial and other consultants, as needed, to:(A) Analyze insurers' use of credit history, credit-based insurance scoring models, or other rate factors that may disparately impact Washington residents, in determining premiums, rates, and eligibility for coverage for people of various races, ethnicities, sexes, socioeconomic status, and national origins;(B) Identify and analyze alternate rate factors that could be used to determine premiums, rates, and eligibility for coverage that neither rely on credit history or credit-based insurance scoring models, nor disparately impact Washington residents of various races, ethnicities, sexes, socioeconomic status, or national origins; and(C) Analyze the likely impact of insurers' uses under (a)(iii)(A) of this subsection and alternative rate factors identified under (a)(iii)(B) of this subsection, on consumer costs, rates, premiums eligibility for coverage, and availability of insurance for people of various races, ethnicities, sexes, socioeconomic status, and national origins; and(iv) Develop for legislative consideration, policy options and their likely impacts on consumer costs, premiums, rates, eligibility for coverage, and the availability of personal insurance, of use of rate plans that include and exclude credit history, credit-based insurance scoring models, or other rate factors that may have a disparate impact on Washington residents.(b) Consistent with RCW 43.01.036, the commissioner shall submit a final report by November 1, 2026, with review findings, policy options, and recommendations regarding allowance, prohibition, or contingent use, of credit history, credit-based insurance scoring models, other disparately impactful rating factors, and alternatives to their use, for personal insurance, and the associated impacts on consumer costs, premiums, rates, eligibility for coverage, and availability of insurance for people of various races, ethnicities, sexes, socioeconomic status, and national origins.(c) Data requested by, or provided to, the commissioner and the commissioner's contracted consultants for the purpose of complying with the study and reporting requirements in this subsection is confidential by law and privileged and is not subject to public disclosure under chapter 48.02.065(8) RCW. Nothing in this subsection prohibits the commissioner from preparing and publishing reports, analyses, or other documents using the data received under this subsection so long as the data is in aggregate form and does not permit the identification of information related to individual companies. Data in the aggregate form is deemed public records available for public inspection. Nothing in this subsection affects, limits, or amends the commissioner's authority under chapter 48.37 RCW.(7) $737,000 of the insurance commissioner's regulatory accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5291 (long-term services trust). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2025, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.(8) $284,000 of the insurance commissioner's regulatory accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Substitute House Bill No. 1669 (prosthetic limb coverage). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2025, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.(9) $56,000 of the insurance commissioner's regulatory accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5419 (reports of fire losses). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2025, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.(10) $157,000 of the insurance commissioner's regulatory accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Senate Bill No. 5108 (service contracts). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2025, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.(11)(a) $250,000 of the insurance commissioner's regulatory accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the commissioner, in consultation with the health care authority, to complete an analysis of the cost to implement an obesity treatment benefit as described in Senate Bill No. 5353 (diabetes and obesity).(b) The commissioner must contract with one or more consultants to obtain utilization and cost data from the Washington state all payer claims database and, if needed, Washington state health carriers, as defined in RCW 48.43.005, necessary to provide an estimate of the fiscal impact of including an obesity treatment benefit in the commercial health plan market.(c) The analysis must include, but is not limited to, a utilization and cost analysis of each of the following services:(i) Intensive health, behavioral, and lifestyle treatment;(ii) Metabolic and bariatric surgery; and(iii) Food and drug administration-approved obesity medication.(d) The report should include projected costs in the individual, small group and large group markets, separate and in the aggregate, expressed both as total annual costs and per member per month costs for plan years 2028 through 2029.(e) The commissioner must report the findings of the analysis to the governor and appropriate committees of the legislature by September 30, 2026.(12) $350,000 of the insurance commissioner's regulatory accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the commissioner to review and evaluate the efficacy of current property protection class rating methodologies and to study the feasibility of modernizing community property classification rating schedules to more accurately reflect the fire protection risk and available mitigations for a specific property by December 31, 2025.(13) $491,000 of the insurance commissioner's fraud accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the commissioner to collaborate with the Pierce county prosecuting attorney's office regarding the criminal prosecution of matters investigated by the limited authority peace officers employed by the commissioner.(14) $100,000 of the insurance commissioner's regulatory accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 1686 (health care entity registry). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2025, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.(15) $1,287,000 of the insurance commissioner's regulatory accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 1432 (mental health services). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2025, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.(16) $14,000 of the insurance commissioner's regulatory accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Substitute House Bill No. 1971 (prescription hormone therapy). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2025, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.(17) $250,000 of the insurance commissioner's regulatory accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the commissioner to enter into an interagency agreement with the health care authority to support economic, actuarial, or other modeling related to design of a universal health care system, as directed in RCW 41.05.840.(18) $116,000 of the insurance commissioner's regulatory accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Substitute House Bill No. 1392 (medicaid access program). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2025, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.(19) $273,000 of the insurance commissioner's regulatory accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5579 (health/contract terminations). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2025, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.(20) $300,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $800,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely to the office of the insurance commissioner to defray costs during plan year 2026 incurred by carriers for coverage in qualified health plans of state-mandated health benefits included in the state essential health benefits benchmark plan as approved by the federal centers for medicare and medicaid services on October 7, 2024, that are not permitted to be treated as an essential health benefit under federal law or regulation.(21) $368,000 of the insurance commissioner's regulatory accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute House Bill No. 1516 (insurance/affordable units). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2025, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 146. FOR THE STATE INVESTMENT BOARDState Investment Board Expense AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$90,325,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$90,325,000The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: $170,000 of the state investment board expense accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Senate Joint Resolution No. 8201 (investment/LTSS accounts). If the resolution is not enacted by June 30, 2025, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 147. FOR THE LIQUOR AND CANNABIS BOARDGeneral FundâState Appropriation (FY 2026). . . .$620,000General FundâState Appropriation (FY 2027). . . .$638,000General FundâFederal Appropriation. . . .$3,210,000General FundâPrivate/Local Appropriation. . . .$75,000Dedicated Cannabis AccountâState Appropriation(FY 2026). . . .$14,486,000Dedicated Cannabis AccountâState Appropriation(FY 2027). . . .$14,966,000Liquor Revolving AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$105,057,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$139,052,000The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) The liquor and cannabis board may require electronic payment of the cannabis excise tax levied by RCW 69.50.535. The liquor and cannabis board may allow a waiver to the electronic payment requirement for good cause as provided by rule.(2) $8,208,000 of the liquor revolving accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the tax and fee systems replacement and are subject to the conditions, limitations, and review requirements of section 701 of this act.(3) $117,000 of the liquor revolving accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Senate Bill No. 5206 (cannabis advertising). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2025, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.(4) $165,000 of the liquor revolving accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5786 (liquor license fees). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2025, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.(5) $1,367,000 of the liquor revolving accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute House Bill No. 1515 (alcohol service in public). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2025, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.(6) $28,000 of the liquor revolving accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed House Bill No. 1602 (liquor food service options). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2025, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.(7) Within existing resources appropriated in this section, by December 1, 2025, the liquor and cannabis board, in consultation with the department of commerce when specified in this subsection, shall evaluate the cannabis social equity program as provided in this subsection and submit a report to the governor and appropriate committees of the legislature with findings and policy options. In conducting the evaluation, the board shall provide opportunities for public comment on the cannabis social equity program from communities throughout Washington. The evaluation must include the following components:(a) A review of feedback received by the board in public comments from individuals that the program is intended to benefit, the public, and the cannabis industry;(b) An examination of the issuance and reissuance of cannabis retailer licenses that began before January 1, 2025, under the provisions of chapter 236, Laws of 2020, including a comparative analysis of the applicants who successfully secured a location and were issued a cannabis retailer license relative to applicants whose status remains pending but were issued a preliminary letter of approval by the board;(c) An examination, in consultation with the department of commerce, of grants awarded and the mentorships provided under RCW 43.330.540 and opportunities for the alignment of the board's implementation of the cannabis social equity program with the department of commerce's implementation of RCW 43.330.540;(d) The demographic information about owners of licensed cannabis businesses who became licensed under the cannabis social equity program, to the extent such information is available or obtainable by the board;(e) The identification of any provisions of law or rule and any economic, market, or practical factors that effectively prevent or hinder the successful opening, operation, and business success of cannabis businesses licensed under the cannabis social equity program; and(f) An examination of the impact of provisions in laws and rules on cannabis licensees in the cannabis social equity program with respect to: (i) Permissible locations for the siting of licensed cannabis businesses, including distance restrictions in RCW 69.50.331(8), zoning or other location restrictions in local government ordinances, and local written objections under RCW 69.50.331(11); (ii) the mobility of cannabis licenses to or between jurisdictions; (iii) the ability of persons holding an existing cannabis retailer license or title certificate for a cannabis retailer business to apply for a cannabis license under a cannabis social equity program, when the license or certificate holder is located in a local jurisdiction that is subject to a ban or moratorium on cannabis retail businesses; (iv) prioritizing license applications through use of a third-party contractor, using a scoring rubric developed by the board; (v) restrictions on the transfer or assumption of a cannabis license issued through the cannabis social equity program, other than to individuals or groups of individuals who comply with the requirements for initial licensure as a social equity applicant for a period of at least five years from the date of initial licensure; and (vi) the definition of a "social equity applicant."NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 148. FOR THE UTILITIES AND TRANSPORTATION COMMISSIONPublic Service Revolving AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$72,453,000Public Service Revolving AccountâFederalAppropriation. . . .$100,000Pipeline Safety AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$3,759,000Pipeline Safety AccountâFederal Appropriation. . . .$3,473,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$79,785,000The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) Up to $800,000 of the public service revolving accountâstate appropriation in this section is for the utilities and transportation commission to supplement funds committed by a telecommunications company to expand rural broadband service on behalf of an eligible governmental entity. The amount in this subsection represents payments collected by the utilities and transportation commission pursuant to the Qwest performance assurance plan.(2) $617,000 of the public service revolving accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5284 (solid waste management). If the bill in not enacted by June 30, 2025, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.(3) $239,000 of the public service revolving accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5445 (local energy resilience). If the bill in not enacted by June 30, 2025, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.(4) $39,000 of the public service revolving accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute House Bill No. 1990 (utility disaster costs). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2025, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.(5) $71,000 of the public service revolving accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Substitute House Bill No. 1522 (utility wildfire mitigation). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2025, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.(6) $202,000 of the public service revolving accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute House Bill No. 1514 (low carbon thermal energy). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2025, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 149. FOR THE MILITARY DEPARTMENTGeneral FundâState Appropriation (FY 2026). . . .$16,219,000General FundâState Appropriation (FY 2027). . . .$15,961,000General FundâFederal Appropriation. . . .$148,158,000911 AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$55,114,000Disaster Response AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$52,763,000Disaster Response AccountâFederal Appropriation. . . .$702,432,000Military Department Rent and Lease AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$1,409,000Military Department Active State Service AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$400,000Natural Climate Solutions AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$55,000Oil Spill Prevention AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$855,000Worker and Community Right to Know FundâStateAppropriation. . . .$2,243,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$995,609,000The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) The military department shall submit a report to the office of financial management and the legislative fiscal committees by February 1st and October 31st of each year detailing information on the disaster response account, including: (a) The amount and type of deposits into the account; (b) the current available fund balance as of the reporting date; and (c) the projected fund balance at the end of the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium based on current revenue and expenditure patterns.(2) $40,000,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation is provided solely for homeland security, subject to the following conditions: Any communications equipment purchased by local jurisdictions or state agencies shall be consistent with standards set by the Washington state interoperability executive committee.(3) $11,000,000 of the 911 accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for financial assistance to counties.(4) $784,000 of the disaster response accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for fire suppression training, equipment, and supporting costs to national guard soldiers and airmen.(5) $876,000 of the disaster response accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for a dedicated access and functional needs program manager, access and functional need services, and a dedicated tribal liaison to assist with disaster preparedness and response.(6) The department must report to and coordinate with the department of ecology to track expenditures from climate commitment act accounts, as defined and described in RCW 70A.65.300 and chapter 173-446B WAC.(7)(a) $355,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 is provided solely for the department to conduct a study regarding statewide building code and construction standards pertaining to earthquake and tsunami resilience as well as recommendations for functional recovery of buildings and critical infrastructure directly following an earthquake. In conducting the study, the department must request input from the state building code council and representatives of appropriate public and private sector entities. The department may contract for all or a portion of the study. The study must, at a minimum, include an assessment of:(i) Functional recovery building code standards that are being developed at the federal level, have been proposed or adopted in other countries, states, or local jurisdictions with a high risk of earthquakes, or are developed by public or private organizations with expertise in earthquake performance standards and safety;(ii) The levels of functional recovery supported by current state and local building and construction codes;(iii) The objectives, feasibility, necessary measures, and estimated costs of adopting and implementing statewide functional recovery building code standards, and how this assessment is impacted by whether the standards:(A) Are mandatory or voluntary;(B) Apply to only certain types of structures and infrastructure or prioritize certain types of structures and infrastructure;(C) Apply to existing structures and infrastructure in addition to new construction;(D) Are intended to apply to only specific seismic hazard levels; or(E) Include nonstructural components as well as structural systems;(iv) How statewide standards for functional recovery would fit into an all hazards approach for state emergency response and recovery;(v) Funding opportunities that provide for the coordination of state and federal funds for the purposes of improving the state's preparedness for functional recovery following a significant earthquake or tsunami; and(vi) Equity considerations for the development of statewide building code standards for functional recovery.(b) The department must submit a final report summarizing the study's findings and including policy recommendations relating to statewide building code standards for functional recovery to the appropriate committees of the legislature by May 1, 2026.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 150. FOR THE PUBLIC EMPLOYMENT RELATIONS COMMISSIONGeneral FundâState Appropriation (FY 2026). . . .$2,765,000General FundâState Appropriation (FY 2027). . . .$2,740,000Personnel Service AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$4,872,000Higher Education Personnel Services AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$1,613,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$11,990,000The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) $61,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $41,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5503 (public employee bargaining). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2025, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.(2) $119,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $99,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Substitute House Bill No. 1141 (ag. cannabis workers). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2025, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 151. FOR THE BOARD OF ACCOUNTANCYCertified Public Accountants' AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$4,802,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$4,802,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 152. FOR THE BOARD FOR VOLUNTEER FIREFIGHTERSVolunteer Firefighters' and Reserve Officers'Administrative AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$1,563,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$1,563,000The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: $50,000 of the volunteer firefighters' and reserve officers' administrative accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the board to contract with the department of commerce to conduct a study on the extension of duty-related occupational disease presumptions to participants in the volunteer firefighters' relief and pension system. The study must examine the presumption in RCW 51.32.185, and report to the fiscal committees of the legislature by June 30, 2026, on the prevalence of these conditions among volunteer firefighters, and the fiscal impact of extending additional relief and pension benefits to participants.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 153. FOR THE FORENSIC INVESTIGATION COUNCILDeath Investigations AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$841,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$841,000The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1)(a) $250,000 of the death investigations accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for providing financial assistance to local jurisdictions in multiple death investigations. The forensic investigation council shall develop criteria for awarding these funds for multiple death investigations involving an unanticipated, extraordinary, and catastrophic event or those involving multiple jurisdictions.(b) Of the amount provided in this subsection, $30,000 of the death investigations accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the Adams county crime lab to investigate a double homicide that occurred in fiscal year 2021.(2) $210,000 of the death investigations accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for providing financial assistance to local jurisdictions in identifying human remains.(3) The forensic investigation council must collaborate and work with the Washington state patrol for the patrol to provide services related to public records requests, to include responding to, or assisting the council in responding to, public disclosure requests received by the council.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 154. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ENTERPRISE SERVICESGeneral FundâState Appropriation (FY 2026). . . .$18,229,000General FundâState Appropriation (FY 2027). . . .$17,985,000General FundâPrivate/Local Appropriation. . . .$102,000Building Code Council AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$2,266,000Climate Commitment AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$1,308,000Prescribed Fire Claims AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$2,000,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$41,890,000The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) $6,672,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $6,725,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for the payment of facilities and services charges to include campus rent, parking, security, contracts, public and historic facilities, financial cost recovery, and capital projects surcharges allocable to the senate, house of representatives, statute law committee, legislative support services, and joint legislative systems committee. The department shall allocate charges attributable to these agencies among the affected revolving funds. The department shall maintain an interagency agreement with these agencies to establish performance standards, prioritization of preservation and capital improvement projects, and quality assurance provisions for the delivery of services under this subsection. The legislative agencies named in this subsection shall continue to have all of the same rights of occupancy and space use on the capitol campus as historically established.(2) Before any agency may purchase a passenger motor vehicle as defined in RCW 43.19.560, the agency must have approval from the director of the department of enterprise services. Agencies that are exempted from the requirement are the Washington state patrol, Washington state department of transportation, and the department of natural resources.(3) From the fee charged to master contract vendors, the department shall transfer to the office of minority and women's business enterprises in equal monthly installments $1,500,000 in fiscal year 2026 and $1,300,000 in fiscal year 2027.(4) Within existing resources, the department, in collaboration with Washington technology solutions, must provide a report to the governor and fiscal committees of the legislative by October 31 of each calendar year that reflects information technology contract information based on a contract snapshot from June 30 of that same calendar year, and must also include any contract that was active since July 1 of the previous calendar year. The department will coordinate to receive contract information for all contracts to include those where the department has delegated authority so that the report includes statewide contract information. The report must contain a list of all information technology contracts to include the agency name, contract number, vendor name, contract term start and end dates, contract dollar amount in total, and contract dollar amounts by state fiscal year. The report must also include, by contract, the contract spending projections by state fiscal year for each ensuing state fiscal year through the contract term, and note the type of service delivered. The list of contracts must be provided electronically in Excel and be sortable by all field requirements. The report must also include trend analytics on information technology contracts, and recommendations for reducing costs where possible.(5) $654,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $654,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for the department, in collaboration with the state efficiency and environmental performance program, to implement the zero emission vehicle strategy.(6) $1,501,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $1,500,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for zero emission electric vehicle supply equipment infrastructure at facilities to accommodate charging station installation. The electric vehicle charging equipment must allow for the collection of usage data and must be coordinated with the state efficiency and environmental performance program. The department must prioritize locations based on state efficiency and environmental performance location priorities, and at least where zero emission fleet vehicles are or are scheduled to be purchased. The department must report when and where the equipment was installed, usage data at each charging station, and the state agencies and facilities that benefit from the installation of the charging station to the fiscal committees of the legislature by June 30. The department shall collaborate with the interagency electric vehicle coordinating council to implement this subsection and must work to meet benchmarks established in chapter 182, Laws of 2022 (transportation resources).(7)(a) $6,052,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $6,052,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for contracting with a nonprofit organization to produce gavel-to-gavel television coverage of state government deliberations and other events statewide. The funding level for each year of the contract shall be based on the amount provided in this subsection. The nonprofit organization shall be required to raise contributions or commitments to make contributions, in cash or in kind, in an amount equal to 40 percent of the state contribution. The department may make full or partial payment once all criteria in this subsection have been satisfactorily documented.(b) The legislature finds that the commitment of on-going funding is necessary to ensure continuous, autonomous, and independent coverage of public affairs. For that purpose, the department shall enter into a contract with the nonprofit organization to provide public affairs coverage.(c) The nonprofit organization shall prepare an annual independent audit, an annual financial statement, and an annual report, including benchmarks that measure the success of the nonprofit organization in meeting the intent of the program.(d) No portion of any amounts disbursed pursuant to this subsection may be used, directly or indirectly, for any of the following purposes:(i) Attempting to influence the passage or defeat of any legislation by the legislature of the state of Washington, by any county, city, town, or other political subdivision of the state of Washington, or by the congress, or the adoption or rejection of any rule, standard, rate, or other legislative enactment of any state agency;(ii) Making contributions reportable under chapter 42.17A RCW; or(iii) Providing any: (A) Gift; (B) honoraria; or (C) travel, lodging, meals, or entertainment to a public officer or employee.(8) $15,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 is provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5655 (child care centers/buildings). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2025, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.(9) $112,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 is provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5552 (kit homes/building codes). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2025, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.(10) $2,000,000 of the prescribed fire claims accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 1563 (prescribed fire claims). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2025, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 155. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ARCHAEOLOGY AND HISTORIC PRESERVATIONGeneral FundâState Appropriation (FY 2026). . . .$4,040,000General FundâState Appropriation (FY 2027). . . .$3,973,000General FundâFederal Appropriation. . . .$2,559,000General FundâPrivate/Local Appropriation. . . .$14,000Climate Commitment AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$617,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$11,203,000The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) $350,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $350,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for the Washington main street program.(2) $125,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $125,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for the implementation of the black historic sites survey project.(3) The department must report to and coordinate with the department of ecology to track expenditures from climate commitment act accounts, as defined and described in RCW 70A.65.300 and chapter 173-446B WAC.(4) $30,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $30,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for the department to participate in and contribute to a multiagency permitting team for the purpose of streamlining the review of environmental restoration projects that directly benefit fish or fish habitat. Projects for review by the multiagency permitting team must be submitted under a joint aquatic resources permit application and have had a project review completed by the department of archaeology and historic preservation regarding cultural resources protection requirements, including the requirements of executive order 21-02. In general, the multiagency permitting team is comprised of state agencies with jurisdictional responsibility for the project proposal, local governments in whose geographical jurisdiction the project would be located, and any other expertise that may be needed in review of the project. State agencies are responsible for carrying out their own permit review and approval process.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 156. FOR THE WASHINGTON TECHNOLOGY SOLUTIONS AGENCYGeneral FundâState Appropriation (FY 2026). . . .$188,000General FundâState Appropriation (FY 2027). . . .$188,000Washington Technology Solutions Revolving AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$140,085,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$140,461,000The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) $2,000,000 of the Washington technology solutions revolving accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for experienced information technology project managers to provide critical support to agency IT projects that are under oversight from Washington technology solutions. The staff or vendors will:(a) Provide master level project management guidance to agency IT stakeholders;(b) Consider statewide best practices from the public and private sectors, independent review and analysis, vendor management, budget and timing quality assurance and other support of current or past IT projects in at least Washington state and share these with agency IT stakeholders and legislative fiscal staff at least twice annually and post these to the statewide IT dashboard; and(c) Provide independent recommendations to legislative fiscal committees by December of each calendar year on oversight of IT projects to include opportunities for accountability and performance metrics.(2) $2,226,000 of the Washington technology solutions revolving accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the enterprise data management pilot project, and is subject to the conditions, limitations, and review requirements of section 701 of this act.(3) $16,655,000 of the Washington technology solutions revolving accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the office of cyber security.(4) $2,692,000 of the Washington technology solutions revolving accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the office of privacy and data protection.(5) Washington technology solutions shall work with customer agencies using the Washington state electronic records vault (WASERV) to identify opportunities to:(a) Reduce storage volumes and costs associated with vault records stored beyond the agencies' record retention schedules; and(b) Assess a customized service charge as defined in chapter 304, Laws of 2017 for costs of using WASERV to prepare data compilations in response to public records requests.(6)(a) In conjunction with Washington technology solutions' prioritization of proposed information technology expenditures, agency budget requests for proposed information technology expenditures must include the following:(i) The agency's priority ranking of each information technology request;(ii) The estimated cost by fiscal year and by fund for the current biennium;(iii) The estimated cost by fiscal year and by fund for the ensuing biennium;(iv) The estimated total cost for the current and ensuing biennium;(v) The total cost by fiscal year, by fund, and in total, of the information technology project since it began;(vi) The estimated cost by fiscal year and by fund over all biennia through implementation and close out and into maintenance and operations;(vii) The estimated cost by fiscal year and by fund for service level agreements once the project is implemented;(viii) The estimated cost by fiscal year and by fund for agency staffing for maintenance and operations once the project is implemented; and(ix) The expected fiscal year when the agency expects to complete the request.(b) Washington technology solutions and the office of financial management may request agencies to include additional information on proposed information technology expenditure requests.(7) Washington technology solutions must not increase fees charged for existing services without prior approval by the office of financial management. The agency may develop fees to recover the actual cost of new infrastructure to support increased use of cloud technologies.(8) Within existing resources, the agency must provide oversight of state procurement and contracting for information technology goods and services by the department of enterprise services.(9) Within existing resources, the agency must host, administer, and support the state employee directory in an online format to provide public employee contact information.(10) The health care authority, the health benefit exchange, the department of social and health services, the department of health, the department of corrections, and the department of children, youth, and families shall work together within existing resources to establish the health and human services enterprise coalition (the coalition). The coalition, led by the health care authority, must be a multi-organization collaborative that provides strategic direction and federal funding guidance for projects that have cross-organizational or enterprise impact, including information technology projects that affect organizations within the coalition. Washington technology solutions shall maintain a statewide perspective when collaborating with the coalition to ensure that the development of projects identified in this report are planned for in a manner that ensures the efficient use of state resources and maximizes federal financial participation. The work of the coalition and any project identified as a coalition project is subject to the conditions, limitations, and review provided in section 701 of this act.(11) $9,101,000 of the Washington technology solutions revolving accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the creation and ongoing delivery of information technology services tailored to the needs of small agencies. The scope of services must include, at a minimum, full-service desktop support, service assistance, security, and consultation.(12) $86,566,000 of the Washington technology solutions revolving accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the procurement and distribution of Microsoft 365 licenses which must include advanced security features and cloud-based private branch exchange capabilities for state agencies. The office must report annually to fiscal committees of the legislature each December 31, on the count and type of licenses distributed by Washington technology solutions to each state agency. The report must also separately report on the count and type of Microsoft 365 licenses that state agencies have in addition to those that are distributed by Washington technology solutions so that the total count, type of license, and cost is known for statewide Microsoft 365 licenses.(13) Washington technology solutions shall maintain an information technology project dashboard that, at minimum, provides updated information each fiscal month on the projects subject to section 701 of this act.(a) The statewide information technology dashboard must include, at a minimum, the:(i) Start date of the project;(ii) End date of the project, when the project will close out and implementation will commence;(iii) Term of the project in state fiscal years across all biennia to reflect the start of the project through the end of the project;(iv) Total project cost from start date through the end date of the project in total dollars, and a subtotal of near general fund outlook;(v) Near general fund outlook budget and actual spending in total dollars and by fiscal month for central service agencies that bill out project costs;(vi) Start date of maintenance and operations;(vii) Estimated annual state fiscal year cost of maintenance and operations after implementation and close out;(viii) Actual spending by state fiscal year and in total for state fiscal years that have closed;(ix) Date a feasibility study was completed or note if none has been completed to date;(x) Monthly project status assessments on scope, schedule, budget, and overall by the:(A) Washington technology solutions;(B) Quality assurance vendor, if applicable; and(C) Agency project team;(xi) Monthly quality assurance reports, if applicable;(xii) Monthly Washington technology solutions status reports on budget, scope, schedule, and overall project status; and(xiii) Historical project budget and expenditures through fiscal year 2025.(b) The statewide dashboard must retain a roll up of the entire project cost, including all subprojects, that can display subproject detail. This includes coalition projects that are active. For projects that include multiple agencies or subprojects and roll up, the dashboard must display:(i) A separate technology budget and investment plan for each impacted agency. If the impacted agency has funding appropriated to another agency, as is done with the statewide electronic health records solution where the federal funding is appropriated to the health care authority and not at the department of corrections, then the technology budget must be compiled in the lead agency technology budget only, referencing any differences in appropriation index, as described in section 701(4)(b)(iii)(B) of this act; and(ii) A statewide project technology budget roll up that includes each affected agency at the subproject level.(c) Washington technology solutions may recommend additional elements to include but must have agreement with legislative fiscal committees and the office of financial management prior to including additional elements.(d) The agency must ensure timely posting of project data on the statewide information technology dashboard for at least each project funded in the budget and those projects subject to the conditions, limitations, and review requirements of section 701 of this act to include, at a minimum, posting on the dashboard:(i) The budget funded level by project for each project under oversight within 30 calendar days of the budget being signed into law;(ii) The project historical expenditures through completed fiscal years by December 31; and(iii) Whether each project has completed a feasibility study.(e) Washington technology solutions must post to the statewide dashboard a list of funding received by fiscal year by enacted session law, and how much was received citing chapter law as a list of funding provided by fiscal year.(14) Within existing resources, Washington technology solutions must collaborate with the department of enterprise services on the annual contract report that provides information technology contract information. Washington technology solutions will:(a) Provide data to the department of enterprise services annually by September 1 of each year; and(b) Provide analysis on contract information for all agencies comparing spending across state fiscal years by, at least, the contract spending towers.(15) $8,666,000 of the Washington technology solutions revolving accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of the enterprise cloud computing program as outlined in the December 2020 Washington state cloud readiness report. Funding provided includes, but is not limited to, cloud service broker resources, cloud center of excellence, cloud management tools, a network assessment, cybersecurity governance, and a cloud security roadmap.(16) $3,498,000 of the Washington technology solutions revolving accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of the recommendations of the cloud transition task force report to include:(a) A cloud readiness program to help agencies plan and prepare for transitioning to cloud computing;(b) A cloud retraining program to provide a coordinated approach to skills development and retraining; and(c) Staffing to define career pathways and core competencies for the state's information technology workforce.(17) Washington technology solutions must collaborate with the office of the secretary of state in the evaluation of the office of the secretary of state's information technology infrastructure and applications in determining the appropriate candidates for the location of data and the systems that could be exempt from Washington technology solutions oversight.(18)(a) Washington technology solutions must include the enterprise statewide electronic health records program on the statewide information technology program dashboard for those agencies appropriated funding for the statewide electronic health records solution. The program dashboard must ensure the program detail will roll up the below required subprojects:(i) Enterprise foundational statewide electronic health records system, appropriated to the health care authority;(ii) Department of corrections statewide electronic health records, appropriated to the department of corrections;(iii) Department of social and health services statewide electronic health records, appropriated to the department of social and health services; and(iv) Health care authority statewide electronic health records, appropriated to the health care authority.(b) The Washington technology solutions must report to the technology services board by December 31, 2025, on the status of the following statewide electronic health records solution go-live dates:(i) August 15, 2027, for the department of corrections;(ii) August 15, 2027, for the department of social and health services; and(iii) August 15, 2027, for the health care authority;The update must include any changes to the scheduled go-live dates by agency, reporting on all risks to the schedule for the above milestone go-live dates by agency, include detail on why the schedule will be missed by agency, how the project mitigated additional delays, and what the additional time in the schedule is anticipated to cost by fiscal year by fund source by agency, and in total.(c) Washington technology solutions must:(i) Require that vendors for the statewide electronic health records solution must use an agile development model holding live demonstrations of functioning software, be developed using incremental user research, and held at the end of two-week sprints;(ii) Require the solutions be capable of being continually updated, as necessary; and(iii) Ensure development of the statewide electronic health records solution shall include consideration of national interoperability standards, such as United States core data for interoperability or the trusted exchange framework and common agreement.(19) In collaboration with the department of health and the health care authority:(a) Washington technology solutions must actively consult and provide oversight over:(i) The department of health 988 technology platform that must provide interoperability capabilities between the 988-related system and the health care authority's 988-related system;(ii) The health care authority 988 technology platform that must provide interoperability capabilities between the 988-related system and the department of health's 988 call center platform;(iii) How the platforms in (a)(i) and (ii) of this subsection will meet the statutory requirements for technology platform functionality and implementation dates as established in chapter 364, Laws of 2024, and must report on the progress of both platforms' budget, scope, schedule, and milestone accomplishments at a technology services board meeting by October 31, 2025. The update must include any changes to the scheduled October 1, 2025, request for proposal issuance and the January 1, 2028, go-live date by agency, reporting on all risks to the schedule for the milestone dates by agency, include detail on why the schedule will be missed by agency, how the project mitigated additional delays, and what the additional time in the schedule is anticipated to cost by fiscal year by fund source by agency, and in total; and(b) Washington technology solutions must:(i) Require that vendors for the 988 technology platforms must use an agile development model holding live demonstrations of functioning software, be developed using incremental user research, and held at the end of two-week sprints; and(ii) Require the solutions be capable of being continually updated, as necessary.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 157. FOR THE BOARD OF REGISTRATION OF PROFESSIONAL ENGINEERS AND LAND SURVEYORSProfessional Engineers' AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$5,018,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$5,018,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 158. FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE LEADERSHIP BOARDWashington State Leadership Board AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$1,696,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$1,696,000The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) $374,000 of the Washington state leadership board accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of chapter 96, Laws of 2022 (WA state leadership board).(2) $1,200,000 of the Washington state leadership board accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementing programming in RCW 43.388.010, and specifically the Washington world fellows program, sports mentoring program/boundless Washington, compassion scholars, and the Washington state leadership awards.(End of part)PART IIHUMAN SERVICESNEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 201. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES(1) The appropriations to the department of social and health services in this act shall be expended for the programs and in the amounts specified in this act. Appropriations made in this act to the department of social and health services shall initially be allotted as required by this act. Subsequent allotment modifications shall not include transfers of moneys between sections of this act except as expressly provided in this act, nor shall allotment modifications permit moneys that are provided solely for a specified purpose to be used for other than that purpose.(2) The department of social and health services shall not initiate any services that require expenditure of state general fund moneys unless expressly authorized in this act or other law. The department may seek, receive, and spend, under RCW 43.79.260 through 43.79.282, federal moneys not anticipated in this act as long as the federal funding does not require expenditure of state moneys for the program in excess of amounts anticipated in this act. If the department receives unanticipated unrestricted federal moneys, those moneys shall be spent for services authorized in this act or in any other legislation providing appropriation authority, and an equal amount of appropriated state general fund moneys shall lapse. Upon the lapsing of any moneys under this subsection, the office of financial management shall notify the legislative fiscal committees. As used in this subsection, "unrestricted federal moneys" includes block grants and other funds that federal law does not require to be spent on specifically defined projects or matched on a formula basis by state funds.(3) The legislature finds that medicaid payment rates, as calculated by the department pursuant to the appropriations in this act, bear a reasonable relationship to the costs incurred by efficiently and economically operated facilities for providing quality services and will be sufficient to enlist enough providers so that care and services are available to the extent that such care and services are available to the general population in the geographic area. The legislature finds that cost reports, payment data from the federal government, historical utilization, economic data, and clinical input constitute reliable data upon which to determine the payment rates.(4) The department shall to the maximum extent practicable use the same system for delivery of spoken-language interpreter services for social services appointments as the one established for medical appointments in the health care authority. When contracting directly with an individual to deliver spoken language interpreter services, the department shall only contract with language access providers who are working at a location in the state and who are state-certified or state-authorized, except that when such a provider is not available, the department may use a language access provider who meets other certifications or standards deemed to meet state standards, including interpreters in other states.(5) Information technology projects or investments and proposed projects or investments impacting time capture, payroll and payment processes and systems, eligibility, case management, and authorization systems within the department of social and health services are subject to technical oversight by Washington technology solutions.(6)(a) The department shall facilitate enrollment under the medicaid expansion for clients applying for or receiving state funded services from the department and its contractors. Prior to open enrollment, the department shall coordinate with the health care authority to provide referrals to the Washington health benefit exchange for clients that will be ineligible for medicaid.(b) To facilitate a single point of entry across public and medical assistance programs, and to maximize the use of federal funding, the health care authority, the department of social and health services, and the health benefit exchange will coordinate efforts to expand HealthPlanfinder access to public assistance and medical eligibility staff. The department shall complete medicaid applications in the HealthPlanfinder for households receiving or applying for public assistance benefits.(7) The health care authority, the health benefit exchange, the department of social and health services, the department of health, the department of corrections, and the department of children, youth, and families shall work together within existing resources to establish the health and human services enterprise coalition (the coalition). The coalition, led by the health care authority, must be a multi-organization collaborative that provides strategic direction and federal funding guidance for projects that have cross-organizational or enterprise impact, including information technology projects that affect organizations within the coalition. Washington technology solutions shall maintain a statewide perspective when collaborating with the coalition to ensure that projects are planned for in a manner that ensures the efficient use of state resources, support the adoption of a cohesive technology and data architecture, and maximize federal financial participation. The work of the coalition is subject to the conditions, limitations, and review provided in section 701 of this act.(8) The department must report to and coordinate with the department of ecology to track expenditures from climate commitment act accounts, as defined and described in RCW 70A.65.300 and chapter 173-446B WAC.(9) The department shall promptly notify the office of the attorney general upon the receipt of a request from or on behalf of a federal agency or a federal, state, or local law enforcement authority for health care information, as defined in RCW 70.02.010, program eligibility information for individuals, information that may identify a health care provider's or facility's delivery of health care services to noncitizens, or the delivery of protected health care services as defined in RCW 7.115.010 where the request may impact expenditures for such services. The department shall require contracted entities to notify the department promptly upon receipt of a request from a federal agency or law enforcement authority as described in this subsection.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 202. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICESâMENTAL HEALTH PROGRAMGeneral FundâState Appropriation (FY 2026). . . .$703,408,000General FundâState Appropriation (FY 2027). . . .$729,030,000General FundâFederal Appropriation. . . .$204,706,000General FundâPrivate/Local Appropriation. . . .$15,151,000Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery FundâFederalAppropriation. . . .$7,575,000Model Toxics Control Operating AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$680,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$1,660,550,000The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) The state psychiatric hospitals and residential treatment facilities may use funds appropriated in this subsection to purchase goods, services, and supplies through hospital group purchasing organizations when it is cost-effective to do so.(2) $320,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $320,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for a community partnership between western state hospital and the city of Lakewood to support community policing efforts in the Lakewood community surrounding western state hospital. The amounts provided in this subsection are for the salaries, benefits, supplies, and equipment for the city of Lakewood to produce incident and police response reports, investigate potential criminal conduct, assist with charging consultations, liaison between staff and prosecutors, provide staff training on criminal justice procedures, assist with parking enforcement, and attend meetings with hospital staff.(3) $45,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $45,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for payment to the city of Lakewood for police services provided by the city at western state hospital and adjacent areas.(4) $320,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $320,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for the salaries, benefits, supplies, and equipment for one full-time investigator, one full-time police officer, and one full-time community services officer for policing efforts at eastern state hospital. The department must collect data from the city of Medical Lake on the use of the funds and the number of calls responded to by the community policing program and submit a report with this information to the office of financial management and the appropriate fiscal committees of the legislature each December of the fiscal biennium.(5) $25,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $25,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for payment to the city of Medical Lake for police services provided by the city at eastern state hospital and adjacent areas.(6) $250,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $250,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for the department, in collaboration with the health care authority, to develop and implement a predictive modeling tool which identifies clients who are at high risk of future involvement with the criminal justice system and for developing a model to estimate demand for civil and forensic state hospital bed needs pursuant to the following requirements.(a) By the first day of each December during the fiscal biennium, the department, in coordination with the health care authority, must submit a report to the office of financial management and the appropriate committees of the legislature that summarizes how the predictive modeling tool has been implemented and includes the following: (i) The number of individuals identified by the tool as having a high risk of future criminal justice involvement; (ii) the method and frequency for which the department is providing lists of high-risk clients to contracted managed care organizations and behavioral health administrative services organizations; (iii) a summary of how the managed care organizations and behavioral health administrative services organizations are utilizing the data to improve the coordination of care for the identified individuals; and (iv) a summary of the administrative data to identify whether implementation of the tool is resulting in increased access and service levels and lower recidivism rates for high-risk clients at the state and regional level.(b) The department must provide staff support for the forensic and long-term civil commitment bed forecast which must be conducted under the direction of the office of financial management. The forecast methodology, updates, and methodology changes must be conducted in coordination with staff from the department, the health care authority, the office of financial management, and the appropriate fiscal committees of the state legislature. The model shall incorporate factors for capacity in state hospitals as well as contracted facilities, which provide similar levels of care, referral patterns, wait lists, lengths of stay, and other factors identified as appropriate for estimating the number of beds needed to meet the demand for civil and forensic state hospital services. Factors should include identification of need for the services and analysis of the effect of community investments in behavioral health services and other types of beds that may reduce the need for long-term civil commitment needs. The forecast must be updated each February, June, and November during the fiscal biennium and the department must submit a report to the legislature and the appropriate committees of the legislature summarizing the updated forecast based on the caseload forecast council's schedule for entitlement program forecasts.(7) $9,119,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $9,145,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for the settlement agreement under Trueblood, et al. v. Department of Social and Health Services, et al., United States District Court for the Western District of Washington, Cause No. 14-cv-01178-MJP. The department, in collaboration with the health care authority and the criminal justice training commission, must implement the provisions of the settlement agreement pursuant to the timeline and implementation plan provided for under the settlement agreement. This includes implementing provisions related to competency evaluations, competency restoration, forensic navigators, crisis diversion and supports, education and training, and workforce development.(8) $7,147,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $7,147,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely to maintain implementation of efforts to improve the timeliness of competency evaluation services for individuals who are in local jails pursuant to chapter 5, Laws of 2015 (timeliness of competency treatment and evaluation services). This funding must be used solely to maintain increases in the number of competency evaluators that began in fiscal year 2016 pursuant to the settlement agreement under Trueblood, et al. v. Department of Social and Health Services, et al., United States District Court for the Western District of Washington, Cause No. 14-cv-01178-MJP.(9) $71,690,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $77,825,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for implementation of efforts to improve the timeliness of competency restoration services pursuant to chapter 5, Laws of 2015 (timeliness of competency treatment and evaluation services) and the settlement agreement under Trueblood, et al. v. Department of Social and Health Services, et al., United States District Court for the Western District of Washington, Cause No. 14-cv-01178-MJP. These amounts must be used to maintain increases that were implemented between fiscal year 2016 and fiscal year 2025. Pursuant to chapter 7, Laws of 2015 1st sp. sess. (timeliness of competency treatment and evaluation services), the department may contract some of these amounts for services at alternative locations if the secretary determines that there is a need.(10) $84,565,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026, $77,343,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027, and $960,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely for the department to continue to implement an acuity based staffing tool at western state hospital and eastern state hospital in collaboration with the hospital staffing committees. The staffing tool must be used to identify, on a daily basis, the clinical acuity on each patient ward and determine the minimum level of direct care staff by profession to be deployed to meet the needs of the patients on each ward. The department must evaluate interrater reliability of the tool within each hospital and between the two hospitals. The department must also continue to update, in collaboration with the office of financial management's labor relations office, the staffing committees, and state labor unions, an overall state hospital staffing plan that looks at all positions and functions of the facilities.(a) Within the amounts provided in this section, the department must establish, monitor, track, and report monthly staffing and expenditures at the state hospitals, including overtime and use of locums, to the functional categories identified in the recommended staffing plan. The allotments and tracking of staffing and expenditures must include all areas of the state hospitals, must be done at the ward level, and must include contracted facilities providing forensic restoration services as well as the office of forensic mental health services.(b) By December 1st of each fiscal year of the biennium, the department must submit reports to the office of financial management and the appropriate committees of the legislature that provide a comparison of monthly spending, staffing levels, overtime, and use of locums for the prior year compared to allotments and to the recommended state hospital staffing model. The format for these reports must be developed in consultation with staff from the office of financial management and the appropriate committees of the legislature. The reports must include a summary of the results of the evaluation of the interrater reliability in use of the staffing acuity tool and an update from the hospital staffing committees.(c) Monthly staffing levels and related expenditures at the state hospitals must not exceed official allotments without prior written approval from the director of the office of financial management. In the event the director of the office of financial management approves an increase in monthly staffing levels and expenditures beyond what is budgeted, notice must be provided to the appropriate committees of the legislature within 30 days of such approval. The notice must identify the reason for the authorization to exceed budgeted staffing levels and the time frame for the authorization. Extensions of authorizations under this subsection must also be submitted to the director of the office of financial management for written approval in advance of the expiration of an authorization. The office of financial management must notify the appropriate committees of the legislature of any extensions of authorizations granted under this subsection within 30 days of granting such authorizations and identify the reason and time frame for the extension.(11) $8,611,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026, $8,611,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027, and $924,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely for a violence reduction team at western state hospital to improve patient and staff safety at eastern and western state hospitals. A report must be submitted by December 1st of each fiscal year of the biennium, which includes a description of the violence reduction or safety strategy, a profile of the types of patients being served, the staffing model being used, and outcomes associated with each strategy. The outcomes section should include tracking data on facility-wide metrics related to patient and staff safety as well as individual outcomes related to the patients served.(12) $2,593,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $2,593,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for services to patients found not guilty by reason of insanity under the Ross v. Lashway settlement agreement.(13) Within the amounts provided in this subsection, the department must develop and submit an annual state hospital performance report for eastern and western state hospitals. Each measure included in the performance report must include baseline performance data, agency performance targets, and performance for the most recent fiscal year. The performance report must include a one page dashboard as well as charts for each fiscal year and quality of care measure broken out by hospital and including but not limited to: (a) Monthly FTE expenditures compared to allotments; (b) monthly dollar expenditures compared to allotments; (c) monthly FTE expenditures per thousand patient bed days; (d) monthly dollar expenditures per thousand patient bed days; (e) percentage of FTE expenditures for overtime; (f) average length of stay by category of patient; (g) average monthly civil wait list; (h) average monthly forensic wait list; (i) rate of staff assaults per thousand patient bed days; (j) rate of patient assaults per thousand patient bed days; (k) average number of days to release after a patient has been determined to be clinically ready for discharge; and (l) average monthly vacancy rates for key clinical positions. The department must submit the state hospital performance report to the office of financial management and the appropriate committees of the legislature by the first day of each December of the biennium.(14) $135,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $135,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for the department to maintain an on-site safety compliance officer, stationed at western state hospital, to provide oversight and accountability of the hospital's response to safety concerns regarding the hospital's work environment.(15) $100,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $100,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for the department to track compliance with the requirements of RCW 71.05.365 for transition of state hospital patients into community settings within 14 days of the determination that they no longer require active psychiatric treatment at an inpatient level of care. The department must use these amounts to track the following elements related to this requirement: (a) The date on which an individual is determined to no longer require active psychiatric treatment at an inpatient level of care; (b) the date on which the behavioral health entities and other organizations responsible for resource management services for the person is notified of this determination; and (c) the date on which either the individual is transitioned to the community or has been reevaluated and determined to again require active psychiatric treatment at an inpatient level of care. The department must provide this information in regular intervals to behavioral health entities and other organizations responsible for resource management services. The department must summarize the information and provide a report to the office of financial management and the appropriate committees of the legislature on progress toward meeting the 14 day standard by December 1st of each year of the biennium.(16) $298,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $297,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for maintenance of the facility, property, and assets at the Brockmann campus located in Clark county.(17) $77,102,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $81,301,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for the department to operate the maple lane campus as described in (a) and (b) of this subsection.(a) The department shall operate the Oak, Columbia, and Cascade cottages to provide:(i) Treatment services to individuals committed to a state hospital under chapter 71.05 RCW pursuant to the dismissal of criminal charges and a civil evaluation ordered under RCW 10.77.086 or 10.77.088; and(ii) Treatment services to individuals acquitted of a crime by reason of insanity and subsequently ordered to receive treatment services under RCW 10.77.120.(b) The department shall open and operate the Baker and Chelan cottages to provide treatment services to individuals committed to a state hospital under chapter 71.05 RCW pursuant to the dismissal of criminal charges and a civil evaluation ordered under RCW 10.77.086 or 10.77.088.(c) In considering placements at the maple lane campus, the department must maximize forensic bed capacity at the state hospitals for individuals in jails awaiting admission that are class members of Trueblood, et al. v. Department of Social and Health Services, et al., United States district court for the western district of Washington, cause no. 14-cv-01178-MJP.(18) $1,412,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $1,412,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for relocation, storage, and other costs associated with building demolition on the western state hospital campus.(19) Within the amounts provided in this section, the department is provided funding to operate civil long-term inpatient beds at the state hospitals as follows:(a) Funding is sufficient for the department to operate 162 civil beds at eastern state hospital in both fiscal year 2026 and fiscal year 2027.(b) Funding is sufficient for the department to operate 287 civil beds at western state hospital in both fiscal year 2026 and fiscal year 2027.(c) The department shall fully operate funded civil capacity at eastern state hospital, including reopening and operating civil beds that are not needed for eastern Washington residents to provide services for western Washington residents.(d) The department shall coordinate with the health care authority toward increasing community capacity for long-term inpatient services required under section 214(30) of this act.(20)(a) $59,650,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $59,650,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for the department to operate 74 beds in three wards in the Olympic heritage behavioral health facility.(b) The department may not use the remaining 38 beds at the facility for any purpose and must permit the contractor selected by the health care authority to utilize the beds pursuant to and upon completion of the contracted process outlined in section 214 of this act.(21) $61,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $29,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute House Bill No. 1359 (criminal insanity). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2025, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.(22) $175,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $175,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute House Bill No. 1162 (health care work violence). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2025, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.(23) $3,278,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $4,345,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for implementation of chapter 453, Laws of 2023 (competency evaluations).(24) $4,118,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026, $4,118,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027, and $396,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely for the department to address delays in patient discharge as provided in this subsection.(a) The department shall hire staff dedicated to discharge reviews, including psychologists to complete reviews and staff for additional discharge review work, including, but not limited to, scheduling, planning, and providing transportation; and establish and implement a sex offense and problematic behavior program as part of the sex offense review and referral team program.(b) Of the amounts provided in this subsection, $504,000 per year shall be used for bed fees for patients who are not guilty by reason of insanity.(c) The department shall track data as it relates to this subsection and, where available, compare it to historical data.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 203. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICESâDEVELOPMENTAL DISABILITIES PROGRAM(1) COMMUNITY SERVICESGeneral FundâState Appropriation (FY 2026). . . .$1,328,114,000General FundâState Appropriation (FY 2027). . . .$1,390,855,000General FundâFederal Appropriation. . . .$2,781,638,000General FundâPrivate/Local Appropriation. . . .$4,486,000Developmental Disabilities Community ServicesAccountâState Appropriation. . . .$2,020,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$5,507,113,000The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(a) Individuals who receive supplemental security income (SSI) state supplemental payments shall not become eligible for medical assistance under RCW 74.09.510 solely on the basis of receiving those payments.(b) In accordance with RCW 18.51.050, 18.20.050, 70.128.060, and 43.135.055, the department is authorized to increase nursing facility, assisted living facility, and adult family home fees as necessary to fully support the actual costs of conducting the licensure, inspection, and regulatory programs. The license fees may not exceed the department's annual licensing and oversight activity costs and shall include the department's cost of paying providers for the amount of the license fee attributed to medicaid clients.(i) The current annual license renewal fee for adult family homes is $450 per bed. A nonrefundable processing fee of $2,750 shall be charged for the initial licensing of each adult family home. In addition, a processing fee of $700 shall be imposed on providers submitting an application for a change of ownership.(ii) The current annual license renewal fee for assisted living facilities is $383 per bed in fiscal year 2026 and $381 in fiscal year 2027.(iii) The current annual license renewal fee for nursing facilities is $814 per bed in fiscal year 2026 and $834 per bed in fiscal year 2027.(c) $14,742,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026, $35,028,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027, and $62,704,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely for the rate increase for the new consumer-directed employer contracted individual providers as set by the consumer-directed employer rate setting board in accordance with RCW 74.39A.530.(d) $1,146,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026, $2,755,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027, and $4,914,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely for the homecare agency parity consistent with the rate set by the consumer-directed employer rate setting board in accordance with RCW 74.39A.530.(e) $1,027,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026, $1,862,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027, and $3,639,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely for administrative costs of the consumer-directed employer as set by the consumer-directed employer rate setting board in accordance with RCW 74.39A.530.(f) $228,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026, $420,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027, and $817,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely to increase the administrative rate for home care agencies by 30 cents per hour effective July 1, 2025, and an additional 23 cents per hour effective July 1, 2026.(g) $6,953,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026, $7,815,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027, and $18,212,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely for the implementation of an agreement reached between the governor and the adult family home council under the provisions of chapter 41.56 RCW for the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium, as provided in section 907 of this act.(h) The department may authorize a one-time waiver of all or any portion of the licensing and processing fees required under RCW 70.128.060 in any case in which the department determines that an adult family home is being relicensed because of exceptional circumstances, such as death or incapacity of a provider, and that to require the full payment of the licensing and processing fees would present a hardship to the applicant. In these situations the department is also granted the authority to waive the required residential administrator training for a period of 120 days if necessary to ensure continuity of care during the relicensing process.(i)(i) $10,722,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026, $10,722,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027, and $21,190,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely to increase rates by two percent, effective July 1, 2025, for community residential service providers. This includes supported living, group home, group training home, licensed staff residential services, community protection, and children's out-of-home services to individuals with developmental disabilities. The full amount must be used for compensation increases for direct support professionals and other direct care workers in these settings.(ii) Contracted agency providers must include staffing information in their community residential cost reports. This includes wages, health insurance, number of positions, and turnover. The data must be broken out specifically for direct support professionals and published on the department's residential programs reimbursement website.(j) Community residential cost reports that are submitted by or on behalf of contracted agency providers are required to include information about agency staffing including health insurance, wages, number of positions, and turnover.(k) Sufficient appropriations are provided to continue community alternative placement beds that prioritize the transition of clients who are ready for discharge from the state psychiatric hospitals, but who have additional long-term care or developmental disability needs.(i) Community alternative placement beds include enhanced service facility beds, adult family home beds, skilled nursing facility beds, shared supportive housing beds, state operated living alternative beds, and assisted living facility beds.(ii) Each client must receive an individualized assessment prior to leaving one of the state psychiatric hospitals. The individualized assessment must identify and authorize personal care, nursing care, behavioral health stabilization, physical therapy, or other necessary services to meet the unique needs of each client. It is the expectation that, in most cases, staffing ratios in all community alternative placement options described in (i)(i) of this subsection will need to increase to meet the needs of clients leaving the state psychiatric hospitals. If specialized training is necessary to meet the needs of a client before he or she enters a community placement, then the person centered service plan must also identify and authorize this training.(iii) When reviewing placement options, the department must consider the safety of other residents, as well as the safety of staff, in a facility. An initial evaluation of each placement, including any documented safety concerns, must occur within thirty days of a client leaving one of the state psychiatric hospitals and entering one of the community placement options described in (i)(i) of this subsection. At a minimum, the department must perform two additional evaluations of each placement during the first year that a client has lived in the facility.(iv) In developing bed capacity, the department shall consider the complex needs of individuals waiting for discharge from the state psychiatric hospitals.(l) Sufficient appropriations are provided for discharge case managers stationed at the state psychiatric hospitals. Discharge case managers will transition clients ready for hospital discharge into less restrictive alternative community placements. The transition of clients ready for discharge will free up bed capacity at the state psychiatric hospitals.(m) The annual certification renewal fee for community residential service businesses is $859 per client in fiscal year 2026 and $859 per client in fiscal year 2027. The annual certification renewal fee may not exceed the department's annual licensing and oversight activity costs.(n) $3,042,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026, $3,115,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027, and $2,695,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided for enhanced respite beds across the state for children. These services are intended to provide families and caregivers with a break in caregiving, the opportunity for behavioral stabilization of the child, and the ability to partner with the state in the development of an individualized service plan that allows the child to remain in his or her home. The department must provide the legislature with a respite utilization report in January of each year that provides information about the number of children who have used enhanced respite in the preceding year, as well as the location and number of days per month that each respite bed was occupied.(o) $2,553,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $2,621,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided for 13 community respite beds across the state for adults. These services are intended to provide families and caregivers with a break in caregiving and the opportunity for stabilization of the individual in a community-based setting as an alternative to using a residential habilitation center to provide planned or emergent respite. The department must provide the legislature with a respite utilization report by January of each year that provides information about the number of individuals who have used community respite in the preceding year, as well as the location and number of days per month that each respite bed was occupied.(p) $204,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026, $204,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027, and $512,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely for a one-time bridge rate for assisted living facilities, enhanced adult residential centers, and adult residential centers, with high medicaid occupancy. The bridge rate does not replace or substitute the capital add-on rate found in RCW 74.39A.320 and the same methodology from RCW 74.39A.320 shall be used to determine each facility's medicaid occupancy percentage for the purposes of this one-time bridge rate add-on. Facilities with a medicaid occupancy level 75 percent or more shall receive a $20.99 add-on per resident day effective July 1, 2025.(q) A nonrefundable fee of $485 shall be charged for each application to increase bed capacity at an adult family home to seven or eight beds.(r) The appropriations in this section include sufficient funding to provide access to the individual and family services waiver and the basic plus waiver to those individuals on the service request list as forecasted by the caseload forecast council. For subsequent policy level budgets, the department shall submit a request for funding associated with individuals requesting to receive the individual and family services waiver and the basic plus waiver in accordance with the courtesy forecasts provided by the caseload forecast council.(s) $332,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026, $740,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027, and $1,074,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely for supported employment and community inclusion services for those individuals with intellectual or developmental disabilities who are transitioning from high school in the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium and are anticipated to utilize these services. Within amounts appropriated in this section, the department shall, no later than September 1, 2025, and September 1, 2026, submit to the governor and the appropriate committees of the legislature a forecast of: (i) The total caseload of individuals anticipated to utilize supported employment and community inclusion services; and (ii) the caseload of individuals transitioning from high school anticipated to utilize supported employment and community inclusion services. These forecasts shall be utilized to inform the governor's operating maintenance and policy level budgets during the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium and shall include data that begins with fiscal year 2018, incorporates actual entries and exits, and delineates the community inclusion caseload from the supported employment caseload for both the total supported employment and community inclusion caseload forecasts and the separate caseload forecasts of those individuals transitioning from high school.(t) $3,345,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $3,345,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for the department to provide personal care services for up to 33 clients who are not United States citizens and who are ineligible for medicaid upon their discharge from an acute care hospital. The department must prioritize the funding provided in this subsection for such clients in acute care hospitals who are also on the department's wait list for services.(u)(i) $9,346,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026, $9,376,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027, and $15,292,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely for the department to operate a transitional facility specializing in treatment for youth aged 13-17 who have intellectual and developmental disabilities, or autism spectrum disorder, and a severe psychiatric diagnosis requiring 24/7 care under the direction of a physician. Youth admitted to the facility require health services wherein treatment modalities and interventions are adapted to specifically provide youth with I/DD benefits from the level of care provided. Services must be provided at a leased property in Burien, serve no more than 12 youth at one time, and be implemented in a way that prioritizes transition to less restrictive community-based settings. Youth shall be voluntarily admitted to the facility by their own consent or the consent of their guardian or legal representative. The department shall collaborate with the department of children, youth, and families to identify youth for placement in this setting and regarding appropriate discharge options with a focus on less restrictive community-based settings.(ii) The department and the health care authority shall collaborate in the identification and evaluation of strategies to obtain federal matching funding opportunities, specifically focusing on innovative medicaid framework adjustments and the consideration of necessary state plan amendments. This collaborative effort aims not only to enhance the funding available for the operation of the facility but also to maintain adherence to its fundamental objective of offering voluntary, transitional services. These services are designed to facilitate the transition of youth to community-based settings that are less restrictive, aligning with the facility's commitment to supporting youth with complex needs in a manner that encourages their movement toward independence.(v) $118,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026, $118,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027, and $204,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely for implementation of Substitute House Bill No. 1272 (children in crisis program). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2025, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.(w) $486,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation and $420,000 of the general fundâprivate/local appropriation are provided solely for a rate add-on for adult family homes in the amount necessary to reimburse for the annual license renewal fee increase included in (b)(i) of this subsection that is paid on medicaid beds.(x) $21,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation and $18,000 of the general fundâprivate/local appropriation are provided solely for a rate add-on for assisted living facilities in the amount necessary to reimburse for the annual license renewal fee increase included in (b)(ii) of this subsection that is paid on medicaid beds.(y) $12,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $12,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for implementation of Senate Bill No. 5079 (DSHS overpayments). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2025, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.(z) $1,326,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026, $5,015,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027, and $5,850,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5393 (Yakima & Rainier schools). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2025, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.(2) INSTITUTIONAL SERVICESGeneral FundâState Appropriation (FY 2026). . . .$156,314,000General FundâState Appropriation (FY 2027). . . .$151,860,000General FundâFederal Appropriation. . . .$256,720,000General FundâPrivate/Local Appropriation. . . .$19,501,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$584,395,000The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(a) Individuals receiving services as supplemental security income (SSI) state supplemental payments may not become eligible for medical assistance under RCW 74.09.510 due solely to the receipt of SSI state supplemental payments.(b) The residential habilitation centers may use funds appropriated in this subsection to purchase goods, services, and supplies through hospital group purchasing organizations when it is cost-effective to do so.(c) Sufficient appropriations are provided for the department to support the transition of individuals residing at Rainier School or the three other residential habilitation centers, into appropriate alternative residential settings, should those facilities be closed. The department shall ensure that each affected individual is offered a meaningful choice of alternative placements, including other residential habilitation centers, supported living arrangements, state operated living alternatives, adult family homes, skilled nursing facilities, or other community-based settings. When transitioning individuals, the department shall prioritize client choice, autonomy, individual preferences, medical and behavioral health care needs, and opportunities for community integration. The department shall develop individualized transition plans in collaboration with each resident, their family or legal guardian, caregivers, and support providers. The department shall coordinate closely with other state agencies, local entities, health care providers, and community stakeholders to ensure seamless transitions. The funding provided shall cover all costs associated with assessments, planning, relocation expenses, necessary housing modifications, staff training, crisis support, and related transition activities. Additionally, the department shall implement robust oversight and accountability measures, regularly monitoring transition outcomes, individual well-being and satisfaction.(d) $100,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 is provided solely for the department, in consultation with Pierce county, the city of Buckley, interested stakeholder groups, the department of enterprise services, and the office of financial management, to conduct a review of, and provide recommendations on, the conversion of the Rainier School property and facilities to an alternate use or transferring ownership and operations to a third party capable of continuing services for this population. No later than June 30, 2026, the department shall submit to the governor and the appropriate committees of the legislature a report of its findings and a prioritized list of recommendations that includes:(i) In coordination with the city of Buckley and other appropriate stakeholders, identification of the recommended solution for ongoing maintenance and operations of the water treatment facility on the Rainier School campus; and(ii) In consultation with appropriate stakeholders:(A) With consideration of recommendations included in the 2023 Rainier School footprint reduction report to the legislature, identification of alternate uses of the Rainier School property and facilities, a recommendation of the highest and best future use of the Rainier School property and facilities that includes consideration of transferring ownership and operations to a qualified third party capable of continuing services for this population, and a detailed plan for achieving the recommendation; and(B) Identification of any current revenue sources from the sale or lease of the property or facilities, the associated value of those sales or leases, the account into which those sales or leases are deposited, an explanation of the rationale for any sale or lease revenue that is not deposited into the developmental disabilities community services account referenced in RCW 71A.20.170, and a recommendation of whether any existing leases should be discontinued upon closure or transfer of ownership of the Rainier School.(3) PROGRAM SUPPORTGeneral FundâState Appropriation (FY 2026). . . .$3,714,000General FundâState Appropriation (FY 2027). . . .$3,774,000General FundâFederal Appropriation. . . .$4,267,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$11,755,000(4) SPECIAL PROJECTSGeneral FundâState Appropriation (FY 2026). . . .$68,000General FundâState Appropriation (FY 2027). . . .$71,000General FundâFederal Appropriation. . . .$1,094,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$1,233,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 204. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICESâAGING AND ADULT SERVICES PROGRAMGeneral FundâState Appropriation (FY 2026). . . .$2,688,279,000General FundâState Appropriation (FY 2027). . . .$2,884,087,000General FundâFederal Appropriation. . . .$6,839,614,000General FundâPrivate/Local Appropriation. . . .$122,541,000Traumatic Brain Injury AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$7,204,000Skilled Nursing Facility Safety Net Trust AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$133,360,000Long-Term Services and Supports Trust AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$214,874,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$12,889,959,000The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1)(a) For purposes of implementing chapter 74.46 RCW, the weighted average nursing facility payment rate may not exceed $376.54 for fiscal year 2026 and may not exceed $394.32 for fiscal year 2027. Appropriations provided in this section are sufficient to partially implement the case mix adjustment methodology to adjust rates of individual facilities for case mix changes as specified in RCW 74.46.485 and stay within the specific budget dials. The weighted average nursing facility payment rates in this subsection (1) include the following: $35,436,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $39,028,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely for a facility-specific add-on to help mitigate for the removal of one-time rate increases provided in the 2023-2025 fiscal biennium in an amount that does not exceed the fiscal year 2026 weighted average nursing facility payment rate referenced in this subsection.(b) The department shall provide a medicaid rate add-on to reimburse the medicaid share of the skilled nursing facility safety net assessment as a medicaid allowable cost. The nursing facility safety net rate add-on may not be included in the calculation of the annual statewide weighted average nursing facility payment rate.(2) In accordance with RCW 18.51.050, 18.20.050, 70.128.060, and 43.135.055, the department is authorized to increase nursing facility, assisted living facility, and adult family home fees as necessary to fully support the actual costs of conducting the licensure, inspection, and regulatory programs. The license fees may not exceed the department's annual licensing and oversight activity costs and shall include the department's cost of paying providers for the amount of the license fee attributed to medicaid clients.(a) The current annual license renewal fee for adult family homes is $450 per bed. A nonrefundable processing fee of $2,750 shall be charged for the initial licensing of each adult family home. In addition, a processing fee of $700 shall be imposed on providers submitting an application for a change of ownership.(b) The current annual license renewal fee for assisted living facilities is $383 per bed in fiscal year 2026 and $381 in fiscal year 2027.(c) The current annual license renewal fee for nursing facilities is $814 per bed in fiscal year 2026 and $834 per bed in fiscal year 2027.(3) The department is authorized to place long-term care clients residing in nursing homes and paid for with state-only funds into less restrictive community care settings while continuing to meet the client's care needs.(4) $33,412,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026, $80,128,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027, and $143,047,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely for the rate increase for the new consumer-directed employer contracted individual providers as set by the consumer-directed rate setting board in accordance with RCW 74.39A.530.(5) $10,012,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026, $23,830,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027, and $42,637,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely for the homecare agency parity consistent with the rate set by the consumer-directed employer rate setting board in accordance with RCW 74.39A.530.(6) $2,327,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026, $4,259,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027, and $8,297,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely for administrative costs of the consumer-directed employer as set by the consumer-directed employer rate setting board in accordance with RCW 74.39A.530.(7) $1,991,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026, $3,637,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027, and $7,090,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely to increase the administrative rate for home care agencies by 30 cents per hour effective July 1, 2025, and an additional 23 cents per hour effective July 1, 2026.(8) The department may authorize a one-time waiver of all or any portion of the licensing and processing fees required under RCW 70.128.060 in any case in which the department determines that an adult family home is being relicensed because of exceptional circumstances, such as death or incapacity of a provider, and that to require the full payment of the licensing and processing fees would present a hardship to the applicant. In these situations the department is also granted the authority to waive the required residential administrator training for a period of 120 days if necessary to ensure continuity of care during the relicensing process.(9) In accordance with RCW 18.390.030, the biennial registration fee for continuing care retirement communities shall be $900 for each facility.(10) Appropriations in this section are sufficient to fund discharge case managers stationed at the state psychiatric hospitals. Discharge case managers will transition clients ready for hospital discharge into less restrictive alternative community placements. The transition of clients ready for discharge will free up bed capacity at the state psychiatric hospitals.(11) Appropriations in this section are sufficient to fund financial service specialists stationed at the state psychiatric hospitals. Financial service specialists will help to transition clients ready for hospital discharge into alternative community placements. The transition of clients ready for discharge will free up bed capacity at the state hospitals.(12) The department shall continue to administer tailored support for older adults, medicaid alternative care, presumptive eligibility, and housing supports, as described in initiative 2 of the 1115 demonstration waiver. This initiative will be funded by the health care authority through the medicaid quality improvement program. The secretary in collaboration with the director of the health care authority shall report to the office of financial management all expenditures of this subsection and shall provide such fiscal data in the time, manner, and form requested. The department shall not increase general fundâstate expenditures on this initiative.(13) $54,119,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026, $64,390,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027, and $147,644,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely for the implementation of an agreement reached between the governor and the adult family home council under the provisions of chapter 41.56 RCW for the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium, as provided in section 908 of this act.(14) Appropriations provided in this section are sufficient to continue community alternative placement beds that prioritize the transition of clients who are ready for discharge from the state psychiatric hospitals, but who have additional long-term care or developmental disability needs.(a) Community alternative placement beds include enhanced service facility beds, adult family home beds, skilled nursing facility beds, shared supportive housing beds, state operated living alternative beds, assisted living facility beds, adult residential care beds, and specialized dementia beds.(b) Each client must receive an individualized assessment prior to leaving one of the state psychiatric hospitals. The individualized assessment must identify and authorize personal care, nursing care, behavioral health stabilization, physical therapy, or other necessary services to meet the unique needs of each client. It is the expectation that, in most cases, staffing ratios in all community alternative placement options described in (a) of this subsection will need to increase to meet the needs of clients leaving the state psychiatric hospitals. If specialized training is necessary to meet the needs of a client before he or she enters a community placement, then the person centered service plan must also identify and authorize this training.(c) When reviewing placement options, the department must consider the safety of other residents, as well as the safety of staff, in a facility. An initial evaluation of each placement, including any documented safety concerns, must occur within thirty days of a client leaving one of the state psychiatric hospitals and entering one of the community placement options described in (a) of this subsection. At a minimum, the department must perform two additional evaluations of each placement during the first year that a client has lived in the facility.(d) In developing bed capacity, the department shall consider the complex needs of individuals waiting for discharge from the state psychiatric hospitals.(15) The annual certification renewal fee for community residential service businesses is $859 per client in fiscal year 2026 and $859 per client in fiscal year 2027. The annual certification renewal fee may not exceed the department's annual licensing and oversight activity costs.(16) $5,245,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $5,245,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for services and support to individuals who are deaf, hard of hearing, or deaf-blind.(17) $8,747,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026, $8,747,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027, and $19,878,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely for a one-time bridge rate for assisted living facilities, enhanced adult residential centers, and adult residential centers, with high medicaid occupancy. The bridge rate does not replace or substitute the capital add-on rate found in RCW 74.39A.320 and the same methodology from RCW 74.39A.320 shall be used to determine each facility's medicaid occupancy percentage for the purposes of this one-time bridge rate add-on. Facilities with a medicaid occupancy level 75 percent or more shall receive a $20.99 add-on per resident day effective July 1, 2025.(18) A nonrefundable fee of $485 shall be charged for each application to increase bed capacity at an adult family home to seven or eight beds.(19) $1,858,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $1,857,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for operation of the volunteer services program. Funding must be prioritized towards serving populations traditionally served by long-term care services to include senior citizens and persons with disabilities.(20) $989,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $989,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for the kinship navigator program in the Colville Indian reservation, Yakama Nation, and other tribal areas.(21) The traumatic brain injury council shall collaborate with other state agencies in their efforts to address traumatic brain injuries to ensure that efforts are complimentary and continue to support the state's broader efforts to address this issue.(22) $2,807,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026, $2,811,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027, and $70,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely for the kinship care support program. Of the amounts provided in this subsection:(a) $863,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $867,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for the kinship care support program.(b) $1,726,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026, $1,734,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027, and $70,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely for kinship navigators, including an increase in the number of kinship navigators so that each area agency on aging has one kinship navigator and King county has two kinship navigators.(23) $2,574,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $2,567,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for the department to provide personal care services for up to 40 clients who are not United States citizens and who are ineligible for medicaid upon their discharge from an acute care hospital. The department must prioritize the funding provided in this subsection for such clients in acute care hospitals who are also on the department's wait list for services.(24) $24,848,000 of the long-term services and supports trust accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the information technology project for the long-term services and supports trust program, and is subject to the conditions, limitations, and review requirements of section 701 of this act.(25) $13,982,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $13,982,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for the area agencies on aging to maintain senior nutrition services. This includes, but is not limited to, meals at sites, through pantries, and home-delivery.(26) $3,831,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026, $7,859,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027, and $7,187,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely for the nursing home to community program to increase the rental subsidy base to $1,400 and expand the program by 200 slots.(27) $150,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 is provided solely for the department to contract with an organization to enhance direct services, outreach, and case management services for seniors residing in at least four senior housing communities located within a city adjacent to a major international airport in King county. These funds must be used to connect seniors to health, housing, and social resources to support their ability to live independently and safely in their homes.(28) $750,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $750,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for community-based dementia education and support activities in three areas of the state, including dementia resource catalyst staff and direct services for people with dementia and their caregivers.(29)(a) $20,662,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026, $22,745,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027, and $43,416,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely for the operating costs associated with enhanced service facilities.(b) The department shall broaden the current discharge and referral case management practices for difficult to discharge hospital patients waiting in acute care hospitals to include referrals to all long-term care behavioral health settings, including enhanced services facilities, enhanced adult residential care, and enhanced adult residential care with community stability supports contracts or community behavioral health support services, including supportive supervision and oversight and skills development and restoration. These home and community-based providers are contracted to provide various levels of personal care, nursing, and behavior supports for difficult to discharge hospital patients with significant behavior support needs.(c) Patients ready to discharge from acute care hospitals with diagnosed behaviors or behavior history, and a likelihood of unsuccessful placement in other licensed long-term care facilities, a history of rejected applications for admissions, or a history of unsuccessful placements shall be fully eligible for referral to available beds in enhanced services facilities or enhanced adult residential care with contracts that adequately meet the patient's long-term care needs.(d) Previous or current detainment under the involuntary treatment act shall not be a requirement for individuals in acute care hospitals to be eligible for these specialized settings. The department shall develop a standard process for acute care hospitals to refer patients to the department for placement in enhanced services facilities and enhanced adult residential care with contracts to provide behavior support.(30) $1,761,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026, $1,761,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027, and $4,162,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely for case managers at the area agencies on aging to coordinate care for medicaid clients with mental illness who are living in their own homes. Work shall be accomplished within existing standards for case management and no requirements will be added or modified unless by mutual agreement between the department of social and health services and area agencies on aging.(31) $14,447,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026, $14,510,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027, and $28,959,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely for nursing home services and emergent building costs at the transitional care center of Seattle.(32) $3,800,000 of the traumatic brain injury accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Substitute House Bill No. 1848 (traumatic brain injuries). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2025, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.(33) $3,681,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation and $3,179,000 of the general fundâprivate/local appropriation are provided solely for a rate add-on for adult family homes in the amount necessary to reimburse for the annual license renewal fee increase included in subsection (2)(a) of this section that is paid on medicaid beds.(34) $2,216,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation and $1,974,000 of the general fundâprivate/local appropriation are provided solely for a rate add-on for assisted living facilities in the amount necessary to reimburse for the annual license renewal fee increase included in subsection (2)(b) of this section that is paid on medicaid beds.(35) $3,944,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation and $3,580,000 of the general fundâprivate/local appropriation are provided solely for a rate add-on for nursing facilities in the amount necessary to reimburse for the annual license renewal fee increase included in subsection (2)(c) of this section that is paid on medicaid beds.(36) $438,000 of the general fundâprivate/local appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5337 (memory care services). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2025, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.(37) $4,722,000 of the long-term services and supports trust accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5291 (long-term services trust). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2025, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.(38) $38,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $38,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for implementation of Senate Bill No. 5079 (DSHS overpayments). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2025, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 205. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICESâECONOMIC SERVICES PROGRAMGeneral FundâState Appropriation (FY 2026). . . .$761,681,000General FundâState Appropriation (FY 2027). . . .$710,910,000General FundâFederal Appropriation. . . .$1,910,479,000General FundâPrivate/Local Appropriation. . . .$5,002,000Administrative Contingency AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$4,000,000Domestic Violence Prevention AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$2,404,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$3,394,476,000The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1)(a) $201,111,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026, $183,932,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027, $868,255,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation, and $4,000,000 of the administrative contingency accountâstate appropriation are provided solely for all components of the WorkFirst program. Within the amounts provided for the WorkFirst program, the department may provide assistance using state-only funds for families eligible for temporary assistance for needy families. The budget structure must include budget units for the following: Cash assistance, child care, WorkFirst activities, and administration of the program. Within these budget units, the department must develop program index codes for specific activities and develop allotments and track expenditures using these codes. The department shall report to the office of financial management and the relevant fiscal and policy committees of the legislature prior to adopting a structure change.(b) $530,530,000 of the amounts in (a) of this subsection is for assistance to clients, including grants, diversion cash assistance, and additional diversion emergency assistance including but not limited to assistance authorized under RCW 74.08A.210. The department may use state funds to provide support to working families that are eligible for temporary assistance for needy families but otherwise not receiving cash assistance.(c)(i) $167,934,000 of the amounts in (a) of this subsection is for WorkFirst job search, education and training activities, barrier removal services, limited English proficiency services, and tribal assistance under RCW 74.08A.040. The department must allocate this funding based on client outcomes and cost effectiveness measures. Within amounts provided in this subsection (1)(c), the department shall implement the working family support program.(ii) $2,474,000 of the amounts provided in (c)(i) of this subsection is for enhanced transportation assistance. The department must prioritize the use of these funds for the recipients most in need of financial assistance to facilitate their return to work. The department must not utilize these funds to supplant repayment arrangements that are currently in place to facilitate the reinstatement of drivers' licenses.(d) Of the amounts in (a) of this subsection, $353,402,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation is for the working connections child care program under RCW 43.216.020 within the department of children, youth, and families. The department is the lead agency for and recipient of the federal temporary assistance for needy families grant. A portion of this grant must be used to fund child care subsidies expenditures at the department of children, youth, and families.(i) The department of social and health services shall work in collaboration with the department of children, youth, and families to determine the appropriate amount of state expenditures for the working connections child care program to claim towards the state's maintenance of effort for the temporary assistance for needy families program. The departments will also collaborate to track the average monthly child care subsidy caseload and expenditures by fund type, including child care development fund, general fundâstate appropriation, and temporary assistance for needy families for the purpose of estimating the annual temporary assistance for needy families reimbursement from the department of social and health services to the department of children, youth, and families.(ii) On December 1st of each year of the biennium the department of children, youth, and families must report to the governor and the appropriate fiscal and policy committees of the legislature the total state contribution for the working connections child care program claimed the previous fiscal year towards the state's maintenance of effort for the temporary assistance for needy families program and the total temporary assistance for needy families reimbursement from the department of social and health services for the previous fiscal year.(e) Of the amounts in (a) of this subsection, $68,496,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation is for child welfare services within the department of children, youth, and families.(f) Of the amounts in (a) of this subsection, $136,939,000 is for WorkFirst administration and overhead.(g)(i) The department shall submit quarterly expenditure reports to the governor, the fiscal committees of the legislature, and the legislative WorkFirst poverty reduction oversight task force under RCW 74.08A.341. In addition to these requirements, the department must detail any fund transfers across budget units identified in (a) through (e) of this subsection. The department shall not initiate any services that require expenditure of state general fund moneys that are not consistent with policies established by the legislature.(ii) The department may transfer up to 10 percent of funding between budget units identified in (b) through (f) of this subsection. The department shall provide notification prior to any transfer to the office of financial management and to the appropriate legislative committees and the legislative-executive WorkFirst poverty reduction oversight task force. The approval of the director of financial management is required prior to any transfer under this subsection.(h) On January 2nd and July 1st of each year, the department shall provide a maintenance of effort and participation rate tracking report for temporary assistance for needy families to the office of financial management, the appropriate policy and fiscal committees of the legislature, and the legislative-executive WorkFirst poverty reduction oversight task force. The report must detail the following information for temporary assistance for needy families:(i) An overview of federal rules related to maintenance of effort, excess maintenance of effort, participation rates for temporary assistance for needy families, and the child care development fund as it pertains to maintenance of effort and participation rates;(ii) Countable maintenance of effort and excess maintenance of effort, by source, provided for the previous federal fiscal year;(iii) Countable maintenance of effort and excess maintenance of effort, by source, for the current fiscal year, including changes in countable maintenance of effort from the previous year;(iv) The status of reportable federal participation rate requirements, including any impact of excess maintenance of effort on participation targets;(v) Potential new sources of maintenance of effort and progress to obtain additional maintenance of effort;(vi) A two-year projection for meeting federal block grant and contingency fund maintenance of effort, participation targets, and future reportable federal participation rate requirements; and(vii) Proposed and enacted federal law changes affecting maintenance of effort or the participation rate, what impact these changes have on Washington's temporary assistance for needy families program, and the department's plan to comply with these changes.(i) In the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium, it is the intent of the legislature to provide appropriations from the state general fund for the purposes of (a) of this subsection if the department does not receive additional federal temporary assistance for needy families contingency funds in each fiscal year as assumed in the budget outlook.(2) $3,545,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $3,545,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for naturalization services.(3) $2,366,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 is provided solely for employment services for refugees and immigrants, of which $1,774,000 is provided solely for the department to pass through to statewide refugee and immigrant assistance organizations for limited English proficiency pathway services; and $2,366,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 is provided solely for employment services for refugees and immigrants, of which $1,774,000 is provided solely for the department to pass through to statewide refugee and immigrant assistance organizations for limited English proficiency pathway services.(4) On January 1st of each year, the department must report to the governor and the legislature on all sources of funding available for both refugee and immigrant services and naturalization services during the current fiscal year and the amounts expended to date by service type and funding source. The report must also include the number of clients served and outcome data for the clients.(5) To ensure expenditures remain within available funds appropriated in this section, the legislature establishes the benefit under the state food assistance program, pursuant to RCW 74.08A.120, to be 100 percent of the federal supplemental nutrition assistance program benefit amount.(6) The department shall review clients receiving services through the aged, blind, or disabled assistance program, to determine whether they would benefit from assistance in becoming naturalized citizens, and thus be eligible to receive federal supplemental security income benefits. Those cases shall be given high priority for naturalization funding through the department.(7) The department shall continue the interagency agreement with the department of veterans' affairs to establish a process for referral of veterans who may be eligible for veterans' services. This agreement must include out-stationing department of veterans' affairs staff in selected community service office locations in King and Pierce counties to facilitate applications for veterans' services.(8) $1,000,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $1,000,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for operational support of the Washington information network 211 organization.(9) $560,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $560,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for a state-funded employment and training program for recipients of the state's food assistance program.(10) $4,984,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026, $4,406,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027, and $17,548,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely for the alignment of eligibility rules in accordance with federal center for medicare and medicaid services' regulations in 42 C.F.R. Sec. 433.112(b) and in coordination with the health benefit exchange. Funding is subject to the conditions, limitations, and review requirements of section 701 of this act.(11) Within existing resources, a revised integrated eligibility and enrollment roadmap and schedule will be created to accommodate eligibility rule updates that are necessary to meet the federal center for medicare and medicaid services' regulations.(12) $1,067,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026, $1,067,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027, and $4,980,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely for the integrated eligibility and enrollment modernization project office.(13)(a) $500,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 is provided solely for sponsorship stabilization funds for eligible unaccompanied children and their sponsors.(b) Of the amounts provided in (a) of this subsection, $350,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 is provided solely for sponsorship stabilization funds for eligible unaccompanied children and their sponsors in order to address financial hardship and support household well-being. Stabilization funds can be used to support the sponsorship household with costs of housing, childcare, transportation, internet and data services, household goods, and other unmet needs. The funds may be provided on behalf of an unaccompanied child when the following eligibility criteria are met:(i) The unaccompanied child is between the ages of 0-17, has been placed in Washington under the care of a nonparental sponsor following release from the United States office of refugee resettlement custody, and has not been reunified with a parent; and(ii) The sponsorship household demonstrates financial need and has an income below 250 percent of the federal poverty level. A sponsorship household receiving stabilization funds on behalf of a child who turns 18 may continue to receive funds for an additional 60 days after the child reaches 18 years of age.(c) The department may work with community-based organizations to administer sponsorship stabilization supports. Up to 10 percent of the amounts provided in (b) of this subsection may be used by the community-based organizations to cover administrative expenses associated with the distribution of these supports.(d) Of the amounts provided in (a) of this subsection, up to $150,000 is provided solely to cover the administrative resources necessary for the department to administer the sponsorship stabilization program.(14) $185,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 is provided solely for the department to meet the terms of its settlement agreement with the United States department of agriculture (USDA), specifically to fund employment and training program services and activities targeted to able-bodied adults without dependents receiving food benefits from the USDA supplemental nutrition assistance program, but open to all basic food employment and training participants including participants who are not able-bodied adults without dependents.(15) $1,140,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $1,141,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely to fully integrate the asset verification system into the automated client eligibility system (ACES).(16)(a) $6,911,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026, $4,924,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027, and $11,837,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely for the implementation of the summer electronic benefit transfer program for the summer break months following the 2024-25 and 2025-26 school years. The program implementation must align with the federal summer electronic benefit program requirements defined in the consolidated appropriations act, 2023 (136 Stat. 4459). The department may use a third-party entity to administer the program through March of 2027.(b) Within existing resources, the department must submit a report by September 12, 2025, to the appropriate policy and fiscal committees of the legislature and the governor that includes detailed estimates of the cost and timeline to administer the summer electronic benefit transfer program within the community services division. The report shall also include a comparison of the potential benefits and risks of administering the program within the division or through using a vendor and any recommendations the department may have.(17)(a) $25,000,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 is provided solely to the office of refugee and immigrant assistance to expand support services for individuals newly arriving to the United States and Washington who do not qualify for federal refugee resettlement program services. Support services include, but are not limited to, housing assistance, food, transportation, childhood education services, education and employment supports, connection to legal services, and social services navigation.(b) Of the amounts in (a) of this subsection, up to $810,000 for fiscal year 2026 is provided solely for staffing at the office of refugee and immigrant assistance to cover the administrative expenses of implementing this subsection.(18) By June 30th of each fiscal year, the department must submit a report to the governor and the legislature that shows the prior fiscal year's call and lobby wait times by month and queue, number of customer contacts by month and queue, processing times for the various queues for the three most recent fiscal years along with an explanation for any changes to the most recent year's processing times, number of filled public benefit specialists 3 positions and vacancies by month, any available wait time impacts associated with the individual technology solution enhancements, any telephonic savings experienced due to fewer customers waiting on hold, and recommendations to continue reducing customer wait times.(19) Within existing resources, the department shall assess the ongoing feasibility of continuing services with a third-party employment verification vendor. A report shall be submitted to the legislature and governor by September 12, 2025, that includes the following:(a) A detailed overview of the current employment verification process, including the general instances in which employment verification is deemed necessary, when the third-party vendor is used to complete this task and who completes the verification;(b) Current cost of the third-party vendor along with projected rate increases;(c) Available options to reduce the ongoing cost of using a third-party vendor for employment verification services, including but not limited to an inventory of available vendors and their rates and ways to streamline employment verification costs by reducing duplicative or unnecessary searches;(d) Costs and risks associated with using in-house services to verify employment instead of using a third-party vendor; and(e) Recommendations of cost-effective and sustainable employment verification options.(20) $154,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $154,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for implementation of Senate Bill No. 5079 (DSHS overpayments). If this bill is not enacted by June 30, 2025, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.(21) $192,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026, $163,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027, and $465,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely to support the expansion of the federal supplemental nutrition assistance program tribal eligibility determination project to an additional five tribes.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 206. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICESâVOCATIONAL REHABILITATION PROGRAMGeneral FundâState Appropriation (FY 2026). . . .$25,410,000General FundâState Appropriation (FY 2027). . . .$25,958,000General FundâFederal Appropriation. . . .$121,507,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$172,875,000The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) $550,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $550,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for grants to federally recognized tribes of Washington to support culturally appropriate vocational rehabilitation services and adaptive technologies for tribal members with disabilities who are seeking employment.(2) $150,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 is provided solely for the department to contract with community-based nonprofit organizations that collaborate statewide to provide services in counties west of the Cascade mountains, in central Washington, and counties in the most eastern part of the state. The entities must specialize in fostering independent living core services, community integration, and accessibility for individuals with developmental disabilities. These nonprofit organizations must have knowledge, demonstrate effectiveness, and specialize in fostering independent living, community integration, and accessibility for individuals with developmental disabilities. These funds must be used to support efforts to enhance inclusive community spaces, assist individuals transitioning from institutional settings to independent living, and strengthen capacity for more inclusive emergency preparedness.(3) $3,208,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5253 (special education services) to extend client services to students through the school year students turn 22. If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2025, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 207. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICESâSPECIAL COMMITMENT PROGRAMGeneral FundâState Appropriation (FY 2026). . . .$80,354,000General FundâState Appropriation (FY 2027). . . .$80,835,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$161,189,000The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The special commitment center may use funds appropriated in this subsection to purchase goods, services, and supplies through hospital group purchasing organizations when it is cost-effective to do so.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 208. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICESâADMINISTRATION AND SUPPORTING SERVICES PROGRAMGeneral FundâState Appropriation (FY 2026). . . .$124,811,000General FundâState Appropriation (FY 2027). . . .$125,044,000General FundâFederal Appropriation. . . .$152,146,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$402,001,000The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) Within amounts appropriated in this section, the department shall provide to the department of health, where available, the following data for all nutrition assistance programs funded by the United States department of agriculture and administered by the department. The department must provide the report for the preceding federal fiscal year by February 1, 2026, and February 1, 2027. The report must provide:(a) The number of people in Washington who are eligible for the program;(b) The number of people in Washington who participated in the program;(c) The average annual participation rate in the program;(d) Participation rates by geographic distribution; and(e) The annual federal funding of the program in Washington.(2) $399,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026, $467,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027, and $508,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely for the implementation of an agreement reached between the governor and the Washington federation of state employees for the language access providers under the provisions of chapter 41.56 RCW for the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium as provided in section 907 of this act.(3) $138,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026, $138,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027, and $161,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely for implementation of Substitute House Bill No. 1272 (children in crisis program). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2025, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.(4)(a) $931,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $9,839,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely for the statewide electronic health records solution and is subject to the conditions, limitations, and review requirements of section 701 of this act.(b) The statewide electronic health records solution must use an agile development model holding live demonstrations of functioning software, developed using incremental user research, held at the end of two-week sprints.(c) The statewide electronic health records solution must be capable of being continually updated, as necessary.(d)(i) The department must collaborate with the department of corrections and the health care authority and, as a team, must work to successfully meet budget, scope, and schedule for the statewide electronic health records solution.(ii) Beginning July 1, 2025, the department of social and health services agency project team shall provide necessary updates to the health care authority foundational project team for the statewide electronic health records solution within 15 calendar days of the end of each fiscal quarter.(iii) The information provided to the authority shall include how funding was spent compared to the budget spending plan for the prior quarter by fiscal month and what the next quarter budget will be by fiscal month.(iv) The requirements of the quarterly report are provided in section 211(58) of this act.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 209. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICESâPAYMENTS TO OTHER AGENCIES PROGRAMGeneral FundâState Appropriation (FY 2026). . . .$82,964,000General FundâState Appropriation (FY 2027). . . .$68,511,000General FundâFederal Appropriation. . . .$67,585,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$219,060,000The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: Within the amounts appropriated in this section, the department must extend master property insurance to all buildings owned by the department valued over $250,000 and to all locations leased by the department with contents valued over $250,000.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 210. FOR THE STATE HEALTH CARE AUTHORITY(1)(a) During the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium, the health care authority shall provide support and data as required by the office of the state actuary in providing the legislature with health care actuarial analysis, including providing any information in the possession of the health care authority or available to the health care authority through contracts with providers, plans, insurers, consultants, or any other entities contracting with the health care authority.(b) Information technology projects or investments and proposed projects or investments impacting time capture, payroll and payment processes and systems, eligibility, case management, and authorization systems within the health care authority are subject to technical oversight by Washington technology solutions.(2) The health care authority shall not initiate any services that require expenditure of state general fund moneys unless expressly authorized in this act or other law. The health care authority may seek, receive, and spend, under RCW 43.79.260 through 43.79.282, federal moneys not anticipated in this act as long as the federal funding does not require expenditure of state moneys for the program in excess of amounts anticipated in this act. If the health care authority receives unanticipated unrestricted federal moneys, those moneys shall be spent for services authorized in this act or in any other legislation providing appropriation authority, and an equal amount of appropriated state general fund moneys shall lapse. Upon the lapsing of any moneys under this subsection, the office of financial management shall notify the legislative fiscal committees. As used in this subsection, "unrestricted federal moneys" includes block grants and other funds that federal law does not require to be spent on specifically defined projects or matched on a formula basis by state funds.(3)(a) The health care authority, the health benefit exchange, the department of social and health services, the department of health, the department of corrections, and the department of children, youth, and families shall work together within existing resources to establish the health and human services enterprise coalition (the coalition). The coalition, led by the health care authority, must be a multi-organization collaborative that provides strategic direction and federal funding guidance for projects that have cross-organizational or enterprise impact, including information technology projects that affect organizations within the coalition. Washington technology solutions shall maintain a statewide perspective when collaborating with the coalition to ensure that projects are planned for in a manner that ensures the efficient use of state resources, supports the adoption of a cohesive technology and data architecture, and maximizes federal financial participation. The work of the coalition and any project identified as a coalition project is subject to the conditions, limitations, and review provided in section 701 of this act.(b) The health care authority must submit a report on November 1st of each fiscal year to the fiscal committees of the legislature. The report must include, at a minimum:(i) A list of active coalition projects as of July 1st of the fiscal year. This must include all current and ongoing coalition projects, which coalition agencies are involved in these projects, and the funding being expended on each project, including in-kind funding. For each project, the report must include which federal requirements each coalition project is working to satisfy, and when each project is anticipated to satisfy those requirements; and(ii) A list of coalition projects that are planned in the current and following fiscal year. This must include which coalition agencies are involved in these projects, including the anticipated in-kind funding by agency, and if a budget request will be submitted for funding. This must reflect all funding required by fiscal year and by fund source and include the budget outlook period.(4) The health care authority shall promptly notify the office of the attorney general upon the receipt of a request from or on behalf of a federal agency or a federal, state, or local law enforcement authority for health care information, as defined in RCW 70.02.010, program eligibility information for individuals, information that may identify a health care provider's or facility's delivery of health care services to noncitizens, or the delivery of protected health care services as defined in RCW 7.115.010 where the request may impact expenditures for such services. The authority shall require contracted entities to notify the authority promptly upon receipt of a request from a federal agency or law enforcement authority as described in this subsection.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 211. FOR THE STATE HEALTH CARE AUTHORITYâMEDICAL ASSISTANCEGeneral FundâState Appropriation (FY 2026). . . .$3,297,488,000General FundâState Appropriation (FY 2027). . . .$3,238,506,000General FundâFederal Appropriation. . . .$20,698,162,000General FundâPrivate/Local Appropriation. . . .$1,799,623,000Dedicated Cannabis AccountâState Appropriation(FY 2026). . . .$19,780,000Dedicated Cannabis AccountâState Appropriation(FY 2027). . . .$20,850,000Emergency Medical Services and Trauma Care SystemsTrust AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$15,086,000Hospital Safety Net Assessment AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$1,811,036,000Long-Term Services and Supports Trust AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$10,142,000Medicaid Access Program AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$35,000,000Medical Aid AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$540,000Statewide 988 Behavioral Health Crisis Response LineAccountâState Appropriation. . . .$1,610,000Telebehavioral Health Access AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$7,608,000Ambulance Transport FundâState Appropriation. . . .$12,368,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$30,967,799,000The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) The authority may not accept or expend any federal funds received under an 1115 demonstration waiver except as described in this section unless the legislature has appropriated the federal funding. To ensure compliance with legislative requirements and terms and conditions of the waiver, the authority shall implement the renewal of the 1115 demonstration waiver and reporting requirements with oversight from the office of financial management. The legislature finds that appropriate management of the renewal of the 1115 demonstration waiver as set forth in subsections (2), (3), and (4) of this section requires sound, consistent, timely, and transparent oversight and analytic review in addition to lack of redundancy with other established measures. The patient must be considered first and foremost in the implementation and execution of the demonstration waiver. To accomplish these goals, the authority shall develop consistent performance measures that focus on population health and health outcomes. The authority shall limit the number of projects that accountable communities of health may participate in under initiative 1 to a maximum of six and shall seek to develop common performance measures when possible. The joint select committee on health care oversight will evaluate the measures chosen: (a) For effectiveness and appropriateness; and (b) to provide patients and health care providers with significant input into the implementation of the demonstration waiver to promote improved population health and patient health outcomes. In cooperation with the department of social and health services, the authority shall consult with and provide notification of work on applications for federal waivers, including details on waiver duration, financial implications, and potential future impacts on the state budget to the joint select committee on health care oversight prior to submitting these waivers for federal approval. Prior to final approval or acceptance of funds by the authority, the authority shall submit the special terms and conditions as submitted to the centers for medicare and medicaid services and the anticipated budget for the duration of the renewed waiver to the governor, the joint select committee on health care, and the fiscal committees of the legislature. By federal standard any programs created or funded by this waiver do not create an entitlement. The demonstration period for the waiver as described in subsections (2), (3), and (4) of this section began July 1, 2023.(2)(a) $657,598,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation and $207,273,000 of the general fundâlocal appropriation are provided solely for accountable communities of health described in initiative 1 of the 1115 demonstration waiver and this is the maximum amount that may be expended for this purpose. In renewing this initiative, the authority shall consider local input regarding community needs and shall limit total local projects to no more than six. To provide transparency to the appropriate fiscal committees of the legislature, the authority shall provide fiscal staff of the legislature query ability into any database of the fiscal intermediary that authority staff would be authorized to access. The authority shall not supplement the amounts provided in this subsection with any general fundâstate moneys appropriated in this section or any moneys that may be transferred pursuant to subsection (1) of this section. The director shall report to the fiscal committees of the legislature all expenditures under this subsection and provide such fiscal data in the time, manner, and form requested by the legislative fiscal committees.(b) $557,333,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation and $227,643,000 of the general fundâprivate/local appropriation are provided solely for the medicaid quality improvement program and this is the maximum amount that may be expended for this purpose. Medicaid quality improvement program payments do not count against the 1115 demonstration waiver spending limits and are excluded from the waiver's budget neutrality calculation. The authority may provide medicaid quality improvement program payments to apple health managed care organizations and their partnering providers as they meet designated milestones. Partnering providers and apple health managed care organizations must work together to achieve medicaid quality improvement program goals according to the performance period timelines and reporting deadlines as set forth by the authority. The authority may only use the medicaid quality improvement program to support initiatives 1, 2, and 3 as described in the 1115 demonstration waiver and may not pursue its use for other purposes. Any programs created or funded by the medicaid quality improvement program do not constitute an entitlement for clients or providers. The authority shall not supplement the amounts provided in this subsection with any general fundâstate, general fundâfederal, or general fundâlocal moneys appropriated in this section or any moneys that may be transferred pursuant to subsection (1) of this section. The director shall report to the joint select committee on health care oversight not less than quarterly on financial and health outcomes. The director shall report to the fiscal committees of the legislature all expenditures under this subsection and shall provide such fiscal data in the time, manner, and form requested by the legislative fiscal committees.(c) In collaboration with the accountable communities of health, the authority will submit a report to the governor and the joint select committee on health care oversight describing how each of the accountable community of health's work aligns with the community needs assessment no later than December 1, 2026.(d) Performance measures and payments for accountable communities of health shall reflect accountability measures that demonstrate progress toward transparent, measurable, and meaningful goals that have an impact on improved population health and improved health outcomes, including a path to financial sustainability. While these goals may have variation to account for unique community demographics, measures should be standardized when possible.(3) $146,275,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation and $146,290,000 of the general fundâlocal appropriation are provided solely for long-term support services as described in initiative 2 of the 1115 demonstration waiver as well as administrative expenses for initiative 3 and this is the maximum amount that may be expended for this purpose. The authority shall contract with and provide funding to the department of social and health services to administer initiative 2. The director in cooperation with the secretary of the department of social and health services shall report to the office of financial management all of the expenditures of this section and shall provide such fiscal data in the time, manner, and form requested. The authority shall not supplement the amounts provided in this subsection with any general fundâstate moneys appropriated in this section or any moneys that may be transferred pursuant to subsection (1) of this section.(4)(a) $131,704,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation and $58,916,000 of the general fundâlocal appropriation are provided solely for supported housing and employment services described in initiative 3a and 3b of the 1115 demonstration waiver and this is the maximum amount that may be expended for this purpose. Under this initiative, the authority and the department of social and health services shall ensure that allowable and necessary services are provided to eligible clients as identified by the department or its third-party administrator. The authority and the department, in consultation with the medical assistance expenditure forecast work group, shall ensure that reasonable reimbursements are established for services deemed necessary within an identified limit per individual. The authority shall not supplement the amounts provided in this subsection with any general fundâstate moneys appropriated in this section or any moneys that may be transferred pursuant to subsection (1) of this section. The director shall report to the joint select committee on health care oversight no less than quarterly on financial and health outcomes. The director shall also report to the fiscal committees of the legislature all of the expenditures of this subsection and shall provide such fiscal data in the time, manner, and form requested by the legislative fiscal committees.(b) $62,475,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation and $44,275,000 of the general fundâlocal appropriation are provided solely for additional housing supports described in the 1115 demonstration waiver and this is the maximum amount that may be expended for this purpose. The authority shall not supplement the amounts provided in this subsection with any general fundâstate moneys appropriated in this section or any moneys that may be transferred pursuant to subsection (1) of this section. The director shall report to the joint select committee on health care oversight no less than quarterly on financial and health outcomes. The director shall also report to the fiscal committees of the legislature all of the expenditures of this subsection and shall provide such fiscal data in the time, manner, and form requested by the legislative fiscal committees.(c) The director shall report to the joint select committee on health care oversight no less than quarterly on utilization and caseload statistics for both supportive housing and employment services and its progress toward increasing uptake and availability for these services.(5)(a) $1,000,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $1,000,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for supported employment services and $1,000,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $1,000,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for supported housing services, similar to the services described in initiatives 3a and 3b of the 1115 demonstration waiver to individuals who are ineligible for medicaid. Under these initiatives, the authority and the department of social and health services shall ensure that allowable and necessary services are provided to eligible clients as identified by the authority or its third-party administrator. Before authorizing services, eligibility for initiative 3a or 3b of the 1115 demonstration waiver must first be determined.(b) The director shall report to the fiscal committees of the legislature no less than quarterly on expenditures and utilization data for both supportive housing and employment services under this subsection.(6)(a) $4,534,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026, $6,370,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027, $157,866,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation, and $91,178,000 of the general fundâprivate/local appropriation are provided solely for prerelease services including, but not limited to, case management, clinical consultations, medication assisted therapy, community health worker services, 30-day supply of medications, durable medical equipment, medications, laboratory services, and radiology services.(b) The authority shall coordinate with the department of corrections for prison reentry implementation pursuant to the waiver terms. The authority will coordinate with tribes, other state agencies, and jail administrations as necessary to achieve the terms of the section 1115 medicaid transformation waiver. The authority shall use its statutory reentry advisory work group and subgroups as necessary to coordinate with partners to achieve these goals.(7) Sufficient amounts are appropriated in this subsection to implement the medicaid expansion as defined in the social security act, section 1902(a)(10)(A)(i)(VIII).(8) The legislature finds that medicaid payment rates, as calculated by the health care authority pursuant to the appropriations in this act, bear a reasonable relationship to the costs incurred by efficiently and economically operated facilities for providing quality services and will be sufficient to enlist enough providers so that care and services are available to the extent that such care and services are available to the general population in the geographic area. The legislature finds that the cost reports, payment data from the federal government, historical utilization, economic data, and clinical input constitute reliable data upon which to determine the payment rates.(9) Based on quarterly expenditure reports and caseload forecasts, if the health care authority estimates that expenditures for the medical assistance program will exceed the appropriations, the health care authority shall take steps including but not limited to reduction of rates or elimination of optional services to reduce expenditures so that total program costs do not exceed the annual appropriation authority.(10) In determining financial eligibility for medicaid-funded services, the health care authority is authorized to disregard recoveries by Holocaust survivors of insurance proceeds or other assets, as defined in RCW 48.104.030.(11) The legislature affirms that it is in the state's interest for Harborview medical center to remain an economically viable component of the state's health care system.(12) When a person is ineligible for medicaid solely by reason of residence in an institution for mental diseases, the health care authority shall provide the person with the same benefits as he or she would receive if eligible for medicaid, using state-only funds to the extent necessary.(13) $4,261,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026, $4,261,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027, and $8,522,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely for low-income disproportionate share hospital payments.(14) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, the health care authority shall provide disproportionate share hospital payments to hospitals that provide services to children in the children's health program who are not eligible for services under Title XIX or XXI of the federal social security act due to their citizenship status.(15) $7,000,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation is provided solely for supplemental payments to nursing homes operated by public hospital districts. The public hospital district shall be responsible for providing the required nonfederal match for the supplemental payment, and the payments shall not exceed the maximum allowable under federal rules. It is the legislature's intent that the payments shall be supplemental to and shall not in any way offset or reduce the payments calculated and provided in accordance with part E of chapter 74.46 RCW. It is the legislature's further intent that costs otherwise allowable for rate-setting and settlement against payments under chapter 74.46 RCW shall not be disallowed solely because such costs have been paid by revenues retained by the nursing home from these supplemental payments. The supplemental payments are subject to retrospective interim and final cost settlements based on the nursing homes' as-filed and final medicare cost reports. The timing of the interim and final cost settlements shall be at the health care authority's discretion. During either the interim cost settlement or the final cost settlement, the health care authority shall recoup from the public hospital districts the supplemental payments that exceed the medicaid cost limit and/or the medicare upper payment limit. The health care authority shall apply federal rules for identifying the eligible incurred medicaid costs and the medicare upper payment limit.(16) The health care authority shall continue the inpatient hospital certified public expenditures program for the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium. The program shall apply to all public hospitals, including those owned or operated by the state, except those classified as critical access hospitals or state psychiatric institutions. The health care authority shall submit reports to the governor and legislature by November 1st of each fiscal year that evaluate whether savings continue to exceed costs for this program. If the certified public expenditures (CPE) program in its current form is no longer cost-effective to maintain, the health care authority shall submit a report to the governor and legislature detailing cost-effective alternative uses of local, state, and federal resources as a replacement for this program. During fiscal year 2026 and fiscal year 2027, hospitals in the program shall be paid and shall retain 100 percent of the federal portion of the allowable hospital cost for each medicaid inpatient fee-for-service claim payable by medical assistance and 100 percent of the federal portion of the maximum disproportionate share hospital payment allowable under federal regulations. For the purpose of determining the amount of any state grant under this subsection, payments will include the federal portion of medicaid program supplemental payments received by the hospitals. Inpatient medicaid payments shall be established using an allowable methodology that approximates the cost of claims submitted by the hospitals. Payments made to each hospital in the program in each fiscal year of the biennium shall be compared to a baseline amount. The baseline amount will be determined by the total of (a) the inpatient claim payment amounts that would have been paid during the fiscal year had the hospital not been in the CPE program based on the reimbursement rates developed, implemented, and consistent with policies approved in the 2025-2027 biennial operating appropriations act and in effect on July 1, 2015, (b) one-half of the indigent assistance disproportionate share hospital payment amounts paid to and retained by each hospital during fiscal year 2005, and (c) all of the other disproportionate share hospital payment amounts paid to and retained by each hospital during fiscal year 2005 to the extent the same disproportionate share hospital programs exist in the 2019-2021 fiscal biennium. If payments during the fiscal year exceed the hospital's baseline amount, no additional payments will be made to the hospital except the federal portion of allowable disproportionate share hospital payments for which the hospital can certify allowable match. If payments during the fiscal year are less than the baseline amount, the hospital will be paid a state grant equal to the difference between payments during the fiscal year and the applicable baseline amount. Payment of the state grant shall be made in the applicable fiscal year and distributed in monthly payments. The grants will be recalculated and redistributed as the baseline is updated during the fiscal year. The grant payments are subject to an interim settlement within 11 months after the end of the fiscal year. A final settlement shall be performed. To the extent that either settlement determines that a hospital has received funds in excess of what it would have received as described in this subsection, the hospital must repay the excess amounts to the state when requested.(17) The health care authority shall seek public-private partnerships and federal funds that are or may become available to provide ongoing support for outreach and education efforts under the federal children's health insurance program reauthorization act of 2009.(18) The health care authority shall target funding for maternity support services towards pregnant women with factors that lead to higher rates of poor birth outcomes, including hypertension, a preterm or low birth weight birth in the most recent previous birth, a cognitive deficit or developmental disability, substance abuse, severe mental illness, unhealthy weight or failure to gain weight, tobacco use, or African American or Native American race. The health care authority shall prioritize evidence-based practices for delivery of maternity support services. To the extent practicable, the health care authority shall develop a mechanism to increase federal funding for maternity support services by leveraging local public funding for those services.(19) The authority shall submit a report to the governor and the legislature by September 15, 2026, that delineates the number of individuals in medicaid managed care, by carrier, age, gender, and eligibility category, receiving preventative services and vaccinations. The report should include baseline and benchmark information from the previous two fiscal years and should be inclusive of, but not limited to, services recommended under the United States preventative services task force, advisory committee on immunization practices, early and periodic screening, diagnostic, and treatment (EPSDT) guidelines, and other relevant preventative and vaccination medicaid guidelines and requirements.(20) Managed care contracts must incorporate accountability measures that monitor patient health and improved health outcomes, and shall include an expectation that each patient receive a wellness examination that documents the baseline health status and allows for monitoring of health improvements and outcome measures.(21) Sufficient amounts are appropriated in this section for the authority to provide an adult dental benefit.(22) The health care authority shall coordinate with the department of social and health services to provide referrals to the Washington health benefit exchange for clients that will be ineligible for medicaid.(23) To facilitate a single point of entry across public and medical assistance programs, and to maximize the use of federal funding, the health care authority, the department of social and health services, and the health benefit exchange will coordinate efforts to expand HealthPlanfinder access to public assistance and medical eligibility staff. The health care authority shall complete medicaid applications in the HealthPlanfinder for households receiving or applying for medical assistance benefits.(24) $90,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026, $90,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027, and $180,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely to continue operation by a nonprofit organization of a toll-free hotline that assists families to learn about and enroll in the apple health for kids program.(25) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, the authority shall reimburse for primary care services provided by naturopathic physicians.(26) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, the authority shall continue to provide coverage for pregnant teens that qualify under existing pregnancy medical programs, but whose eligibility for pregnancy related services would otherwise end due to the application of the new modified adjusted gross income eligibility standard.(27) Sufficient amounts are appropriated in this section to remove the mental health visit limit and to provide the shingles vaccine and screening, brief intervention, and referral to treatment benefits that are available in the medicaid alternative benefit plan in the classic medicaid benefit plan.(28) The authority shall use revenue appropriated from the dedicated cannabis account for contracts with community health centers under RCW 69.50.540 in lieu of general fundâstate payments to community health centers for services provided to medical assistance clients, and it is the intent of the legislature that this policy will be continued in subsequent fiscal biennia.(29) For any service eligible under the medicaid state plan for encounter payments, managed care organizations at the request of a rural health clinic shall pay the full published encounter rate directly to the clinic. At no time will a managed care organization be at risk for or have any right to the supplemental portion of the claim. Payments will be reconciled on at least an annual basis between the managed care organization and the authority, with final review and approval by the authority.(30) Sufficient amounts are appropriated in this section for the authority to provide a medicaid equivalent adult dental benefit to clients enrolled in the medical care service program.(31) Sufficient amounts are provided in this section for the authority to provide services identical to those services covered by the Washington state family planning waiver program as of August 2018 to individuals who:(a) Are 19 years of age;(b) Are at or below 260 percent of the federal poverty level as established in WAC 182-505-0100;(c) Are not covered by other public or private insurance; and(d) Need family planning services and are not currently covered by or eligible for another medical assistance program for family planning.(32) The authority shall ensure that appropriate resources are dedicated to implementing the recommendations of the centers for medicare and medicaid services center for program integrity as provided to the authority in the January 2019 Washington focused program integrity review final report. Additionally, the authority shall:(a) Work to ensure the efficient operations of the managed care plans, including but not limited to, a deconflicting process for audits with and among the managed care plans and the medicaid fraud division at the attorney general's office, to ensure the authority staff perform central audits of cases that appear across multiple managed care plans, versus the audits performed by the individual managed care plans or the fraud division;(b) Remain accountable for operating in an effective and efficient manner, including performing program integrity activities that ensure high value in the medical assistance program in general and in medicaid managed care specifically;(c) Work with its contracted actuary and the medical assistance expenditure forecast work group to develop methods and metrics related to managed care program integrity activity that shall be incorporated into annual rate setting; and(d) Work with the medical assistance expenditure forecast work group to ensure the results of program integrity activity are incorporated into the rate setting process in a transparent, timely, measurable, quantifiable manner.(33)(a) The authority shall not enter into any future value-based arrangements with federally qualified health centers or rural health clinics prior to receiving approval from the office of financial management and the appropriate committees of the legislature.(b) The authority shall not modify the reconciliation process with federally qualified health centers or rural health clinics without notification to and the opportunity to comment from the office of financial management.(c) The authority shall require all managed care organizations to provide information to the authority to account for all payments to rural health clinics and federally qualified health centers to include how payments are made, including any additional payments and whether there is a sub-capitation arrangement or value-based purchasing arrangement.(d) For each fiscal year, the authority shall reconcile on an annual basis with rural health clinics and federally qualified health centers.(e) For each fiscal year, the authority shall properly accrue for any anticipated reconciliations with rural health clinics and federally qualified health centers during the fiscal year close process following generally accepted accounting practices.(34) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, the authority is to include allergen control bed and pillow covers as part of the durable medical equipment benefit for children with an asthma diagnosis enrolled in medical assistance programs.(35)(a) Sufficient funds are provided in this section for the authority for the reimbursement of services provided by doulas for apple health clients.(b) The authority shall continue to collaborate with an external organization for participatory and equity-focused engagement with doulas and doula partners across the state of Washington. This organization must work in collaboration with community partners who advance equitable access to improve perinatal outcomes and care through holistic services for multiracial communities.(c) The external organization will be responsible for implementing a statewide doula hub and referral system consistent with the recommendations for the design of a statewide doula hub and referral system report done in partnership with the authority.(d) The authority and the external organization will continue to collaborate on how to:(i) Provide statewide professional and workforce development and sustainability support for birth doulas;(ii) Increase statewide access to doula services for apple health birthing people;(iii) Assist doulas with department of health credentialing requirements;(iv) Assist doulas with the medicaid provider enrollment process including, but not limited to, support with:(A) Provider enrollment with the authority;(B) Contracting with medicaid managed care organizations;(C) Provider billing and claims submission processes;(D) Provider payment requirements; and(E) Eligibility within ProviderOne; and(v) Establish communications with birthing people, families, birth workers, and health care providers who are seeking to connect with state-certified and medicaid-enrolled birth doulas through a statewide directory or referral system.(36) Sufficient funds are provided in this section for the authority to extend continuous eligibility for apple health to children ages zero to six with income at or below 215 percent of the federal poverty level. The centers for medicare and medicaid services must approve the 1115 medicaid waiver prior to the implementation of this policy.(37) Sufficient funds are provided to continue reimbursing dental health aid therapists for services performed in tribal facilities for medicaid clients. The authority must leverage any federal funding that may become available as a result of appeal decisions from the centers for medicare and medicaid services or the United States court of appeals for the ninth circuit.(38) $500,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $500,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for the perinatal support warm line to provide peer support, resources, and referrals to new and expectant parents and people in the emotional transition to parenthood experiencing, or at risk of, postpartum depression or other mental health issues.(39) Sufficient funding is provided to remove the asset test from the medicare savings program review process.(40) Sufficient funding is provided to eliminate the mid-certification review process for the aged, blind, or disabled and housing and essential needs referral programs.(41) $2,545,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026, $2,545,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027, and $9,280,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely for reimbursement for community health worker services.(42) Sufficient amounts are appropriated in this section for the authority to provide coverage for all federal food and drug administration-approved HIV antiviral drugs without prior authorization. This coverage must be provided to apple health clients enrolled in both fee-for-service and managed care programs.(43) Sufficient funds are provided in this section to maintain access for primary care services for medicaid-enrolled patients through increased provider rates.(44) Sufficient funds are provided in this section for work required of the authority as specified in RCW 41.05.840.(45)(a) Sufficient funds are provided in this section for an outpatient directed payment program.(b) The authority shall:(i) Maintain the program to support the state's access and other quality of care goals and to not increase general fundâstate expenditures;(ii) Direct managed care organizations to make payments to eligible providers at levels required to ensure enrollees have timely access to critical high-quality care as allowed under 42 C.F.R. 438.6(c); and(iii) Increase medicaid payments for hospital outpatient services provided by UW Medicine hospitals and, at their option, UW Medicine affiliated hospitals to the average payment received from commercial payers.(c) Any incremental costs incurred by the authority in the development, implementation, and maintenance of this program shall be the responsibility of the participating hospitals.(d) Participating hospitals shall retain the full amount of payments provided under this program.(46)(a) Sufficient funds are provided in this section for an inpatient directed payment program.(b) The authority shall:(i) Design the program to support the state's access and other quality of care goals and to not increase general fundâstate expenditures;(ii) Upon approval, direct managed care organizations to make payments to eligible providers at levels required to ensure enrollees have timely access to critical high-quality care as allowed under 42 C.F.R. 438.6(c); and(iii) Increase medicaid payments for hospital inpatient services provided by UW Medicine and, at their option, UW Medicine affiliated hospitals to the average payment received from commercial payers.(c) Any incremental costs incurred by the authority in the development, implementation, and maintenance of this program shall be the responsibility of the participating hospitals.(d) Participating hospitals shall retain the full amount of payments provided under this program.(e) Participating hospitals will provide the local funds to fund the required nonfederal contribution.(f) This program shall be effective as soon as administratively possible.(47) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, the authority shall maintain and increase access for family planning services for patients seeking services through department of health sexual and reproductive health program family planning providers based on the rates in effect as of July 1, 2022.(48)(a) $11,838,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation and $11,838,000 of the general fundâprivate/local appropriation are provided solely for the authority, in consultation with the health and human services enterprise coalition, community-based organizations, health plans, accountable communities of health, and safety net providers, shall determine the cost and implementation impacts of a statewide community information exchange (CIE). A CIE platform must serve as a tool for addressing the social determinants of health, defined as nonclinical community and social factors such as housing, food security, transportation, financial strain, and interpersonal safety, that affect health, functioning, and quality-of-life outcomes.(b) Prior to issuing a request for proposals or beginning this project, the authority must work with stakeholders in (a) of this subsection to determine which platforms already exist within the Washington public and private health care system to determine interoperability needs and fiscal impacts to both the state and impacted providers and organizations that will be using a single statewide community information exchange platform.(c) The authority shall provide the office of financial management and fiscal committees of the legislature a proposal to leverage medicaid enterprise financing or other federal funds prior to beginning this project and shall not expend funds under a 1115 waiver or any other waiver without legislative authorization.(d) Sufficient funds are provided in this section for the authority to implement the community information exchange program. The technology solution chosen by the health care authority should be capable of interoperating with other state funded systems in Washington and should be able to electronically refer individuals to services using a closed-loop referral process. Funding for the community information exchange program is subject to the conditions, limitations, and review requirements of section 701 of this act.(49) Sufficient funds in this section are provided for staff dedicated to data review, analysis, and management, and policy analysis in support of the health care cost transparency board as described in chapter 70.390 RCW.(50)(a) $1,610,000 of the statewide 988 behavioral health crisis response line accountâstate appropriation and $1,572,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely for the planning phase of the 988 technology platform implementation project.(b) The authority must actively collaborate with Washington technology solutions and the department of health so that the statewide 988 technology solutions will be coordinated and interoperable.(c) By October 1, 2025, the authority must provide an update to legislative fiscal committees with the following details:(i) An identified technology solution, with a list of functionalities and the statutory requirement met by each functionality;(ii) Software, processes, and methods currently used by call centers and designated 988 contact hubs that the proposed technology platform would replace;(iii) The number of call centers and designated 988 contact hubs planning to transition all work processes to the proposed technology platform; and(iv) Identified risks and changes to the schedule and scope of the project.(d) The amounts in (a) of this subsection are subject to the conditions, limitations, and review requirements provided in section 701 of this act.(51) $1,034,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation is provided solely for the department of health's statewide 988 technology solution and is subject to the conditions, limitations, and review requirements of section 701 of this act. The state match is appropriated to the department of health, see section 226(21) of this act, and the authority must use the same program index as the department of health and the appropriation index assigned to the authority for this proviso when allotting and recording expenditures. This federal funding must be reflected in the department of health's technology budget, which will show both the federal funding from the authority and the state funding from the department of health.(52)(a) $71,376,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $70,976,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for the authority to implement a program with coverage comparable to the amount, duration, and scope of care provided in the categorically needy medicaid program for adult individuals who:(i) Have an immigration status making them ineligible for federal medicaid or federal subsidies through the health benefit exchange;(ii) Are age 19 and older, including over age 65, and have countable income of up to 138 percent of the federal poverty level; and(iii) Are not eligible for another full scope federally funded medical assistance program, including any expansion of medicaid coverage for deferred action for childhood arrivals recipients.(b) Within the amounts provided in this subsection, the authority shall use the same eligibility, enrollment, redetermination and renewal, and appeals procedures as categorically needy medicaid, except where flexibility is necessary to maintain privacy or minimize burden to applicants or enrollees.(c) The authority in collaboration with the health benefit exchange, the department of social and health services, and community organizations must develop and implement an outreach and education campaign.(d) The authority must provide the following information to the governor's office and appropriate committees of the legislature by February 1st and November 1st of each year:(i) Actual and forecasted expenditures;(ii) Actual and forecasted data from the caseload forecast council; and(iii) The availability and impact of any federal program or proposed rule that expands access to health care for the population described in this subsection, such as the expansion of medicaid coverage for deferred action for childhood arrivals recipients.(e) The amount provided in this subsection is the maximum amount allowable for the purposes of this program.(53) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, the authority shall make administrative and system changes in anticipation of receiving federal authority to provide continuous eligibility for children ages zero to six covered though the apple health children's health insurance program. The centers for medicare and medicaid services must approve the section 1115 medicaid waiver prior to the implementation of this policy.(54) $300,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $300,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for the Bree collaborative to support collaborative learning and targeted technical assistance for quality improvement initiatives.(55)(a) The authority shall collaborate with the University of Washington on a supplemental payment program for the family medicine residency network as a supplement to the family medical education funding with additional federal funding.(b) The authority shall provide a recommendation and report to the governor's office and fiscal committees of the legislature no later than September 30, 2025. The recommendation shall include how the supplemental payment program can improve the following:(i) Fiscal support for graduate medical education training;(ii) Access to quality health care services;(iii) The state's ability to ensure that medicaid graduate medical education funding supports the state's workforce development goals; and(iv) Health care access for underserved populations and regions.(56) $165,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $165,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely for the authority, in consultation with tribes, as required under 42 C.F.R. Sec. 431.408(b), to apply for a section 1115 waiver no later than December 31, 2025, to provide coverage of traditional health care practices.(57) $7,407,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026, $7,628,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027, and $26,468,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely for the authority to continue the health homes program from January 1, 2026, through December 31, 2026.(58)(a) $25,158,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $101,647,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely for the statewide electronic health records solution and is subject to the conditions, limitations, and review requirements of section 701 of this act.(b) The statewide electronic health records solution must use an agile development model holding live demonstrations of functioning software, developed using incremental user research, held at the end of two-week sprints.(c) The statewide electronic health records solution must be capable of being continually updated, as necessary.(d) The authority must ensure the development of the statewide electronic health records solution includes consideration of national interoperability standards, such as United States core data for interoperability or the trusted exchange framework and common agreement.(e) The authority must work collaboratively with the department of corrections agency project team, the department of social and health services agency project team, and the health care authority agency project team who are the state agencies included in the statewide electronic health records solution project and, as a team, must work to successfully meet budget, scope, and schedule for this project.(f) Beginning July 1, 2025, the authority shall provide written quarterly reports, within 30 calendar days of the end of each fiscal quarter, to legislative fiscal committees to include how funding was spent compared to the budget spending plan for the prior quarter by fiscal month and what the ensuing quarter budget will be by fiscal month. The written report must also include detail summarized for the entire statewide electronic health records solution, and also delineated by each separate component technology budget, which are: Enterprise foundational system, department of corrections, department of social and health services, and the health care authority. The written report must also include:(i) A list of quantifiable deliverables scheduled for that quarter, including those accomplished and the amount spent associated with each deliverable, by fiscal month and fund source;(ii) The contract full-time equivalent charged compared to the budget spending plan by month for each contracted vendor, to include interagency agreements with other state agencies, and what the next contract equivalent budget spending plan assumes by fiscal month and fund source;(iii) The budget spending plan compared to actual spending by fiscal month and fund source, and the projected spending plan by fiscal month and fund source for the next quarter; and(iv) An accounting of any deliverables that were changed in the last quarter, and any plans to change future deliverables, to include what the deliverable was, what the new deliverable is, why it was or will be missed, and what the revised deliverable date is.(59)(a) $379,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $1,258,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely for the statewide electronic health records solution and is subject to the conditions, limitations, and review requirements of section 701 of this act.(b) The statewide electronic health records solution must use an agile development model holding live demonstrations of functioning software, developed using incremental user research, held at the end of two-week sprints.(c) The statewide electronic health records solution must be capable of being continually updated, as necessary.(d)(i) The authority must collaborate with the department of corrections and the department of social and health services and, as a team, must work to successfully meet budget, scope, and schedule for the statewide electronic health records solution.(ii) Beginning July 1, 2025, the health care authority agency project team shall provide necessary updates to the health care authority foundational project team for the statewide electronic health records solution within 15 calendar days of the end of each fiscal quarter.(iii) The information provided to the authority shall include how funding was spent compared to the budget spending plan for the prior quarter by fiscal month and what the next quarter budget will be by fiscal month.(iv) The requirements of the quarterly report are listed in subsection (58) of this section.(60) $927,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation is provided solely for the department of corrections' statewide electronic health records solution and is subject to the conditions, limitations, and review requirements of section 701 of this act. The state match is appropriated to the department of corrections, see section 230(7)(h) of this act, and the authority must use the same program index as the department of corrections and the appropriation index assigned to the authority for this proviso when allotting and recording expenditures. This federal funding must be reflected in the department of corrections' technology budget, which will show both the federal funding from the authority and the state funding from the department of corrections.(61) $330,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026, $330,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027, and $786,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely to comply with federal eligibility rule changes required by the centers for medicare and medicaid services and funding is subject to the conditions, limitations, and review requirements of section 701 of this act.(62) $100,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 is provided solely for the authority to continue a public-private partnership with a state-based oral health foundation to connect medicaid patients to dental services and reduce barriers to accessing care.(63)(a) $50,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $50,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely for the authority, no later than October 1, 2025, to convene negotiations with representatives of primary care providers to develop budget-neutral, value-based prospective payment methodologies for primary care services provided to apple health enrollees, with the goal of entering into arrangements appropriate to each primary care delivery system no later than calendar year 2027. The authority shall prioritize the development of methodologies that grow capacity to provide comprehensive, whole person care. This includes, but is not limited to, promoting workforce stability, team-based delivery models, accountability for quality outcomes, equity-based care, and improvements in population health.(b) The authority shall, at a minimum, convene negotiations with representatives of the statewide associations representing the following categories of providers to develop budget-neutral payment methodologies that maximize access and quality for medicaid patients and are appropriate to their respective primary care delivery systems:(i) Family physicians;(ii) Pediatricians; and(iii) Federally qualified health centers.(64) $48,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 and $43,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5124 (SNF & rehab network adequacy). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2025, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.(65) $1,724,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026, $4,345,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027, and $6,068,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely for the authority in coordination with the department of social and health services to develop and implement a Katie Beckett section 1115 demonstration waiver. The authority shall limit enrollment to 1,000 clients during the waiver period. Based upon the experience developed during the waiver period, the authority shall make recommendations to the legislature for a future tax equity and fiscal responsibility act state plan option.(66) $200,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 is provided solely for the authority to contract with a managed care organization for an enhanced case management pilot program to expand resources for patients with post-acute care transitions. The managed care organization must cover the largest number of apple health clients in the state and implement the pilot program with a hospital in Columbia county. The pilot program must provide continuous support for 31 days post-discharge including, but not limited to:(a) Transportation;(b) Transitional housing assistance;(c) Rehabilitation referrals and coordination;(d) Safety net program navigation and enrollment;(e) Transitional primary care; and(f) 24-hour clinic phone support.(67) $50,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $50,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 1686 (health care entity registry). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2025, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.(68)(a) $300,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 is provided solely for one-time bridge grants to hospitals in financial distress or at risk of limiting access to labor and delivery services due to a low-volume of deliveries at the hospital.(b) To qualify for these grants, a hospital must:(i) Be located in Washington and not be part of a system of three or more hospitals;(ii) Serve individuals enrolled in state and federal medical assistance programs;(iii) Continue to maintain a medicaid population at similar utilization levels as the most current complete calendar year data;(iv) Be necessary for an adequate provider network for the medicaid program;(v) Demonstrate a plan for long-term financial sustainability; and(vi) Be at risk of limiting access to labor and delivery services due to:(A) A low-volume of deliveries at the hospital described in (c)(i) of this subsection; or(B) Serving a high percentage of individuals covered by public payers as described in (c)(ii) of this subsection.(c) The grants must be distributed in amounts not to exceed $150,000 per hospital to:(i) A hospital that had fewer than 200 births funded by medicaid in the hospital's labor and delivery unit in the previous calendar year according to health care authority records and is located in a municipality with a population between 9,000 and 12,000; and(ii) A public district hospital that had fewer than 250 births funded by public payers, including medicaid, tricare, and medicare, in the hospital's labor and delivery unit in the previous calendar year and is located on an island in Skagit county.(69) $111,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026, $63,385,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation, and $35,000,000 of the medicaid access program accountâstate appropriation are provided solely for implementation of Substitute House Bill No. 1392 (medicaid access program). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2025, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.(70) The amounts appropriated in this section are not sufficient to include coverage of prescription drugs for the treatment of obesity or weight loss under state or federally funded medical assistance programs. The authority shall not add coverage of prescription drugs for the treatment of obesity or weight loss without a specific appropriation from the legislature.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 212. FOR THE STATE HEALTH CARE AUTHORITYâEMPLOYEE AND RETIREE BENEFITS PROGRAMState Health Care Authority Administrative AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$46,618,000School Employees' Insurance Administrative AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$34,500,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$81,118,000The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) Any savings from reduced claims costs must be reserved for funding benefits during future fiscal biennia and may not be used for administrative expenses. The health care authority shall deposit any moneys received on behalf of the uniform medical plan resulting from rebates on prescription drugs, audits of hospitals, subrogation payments, or any other moneys received as a result of prior uniform medical plan claims payments, in the appropriate account to be used for insurance benefits.(2) Any changes to benefits must be approved by the applicable program board. Neither board shall make any changes to benefits without considering a comprehensive analysis of the cost of those changes, and shall not increase benefits unless offsetting cost reductions from other benefit revisions are sufficient to fund the changes. The public employees' benefits board shall not make any change in retiree eligibility criteria that reestablishes eligibility for enrollment in retiree benefits.(3) Each board shall collect a surcharge payment of $25 per month from members who use tobacco products, and a surcharge payment of not less than $50 per month from members who cover a spouse or domestic partner where the spouse or domestic partner has chosen not to enroll in another employer-based group health insurance that has benefits and premiums with an actuarial value of not less than 95 percent of the actuarial value of the public employees' benefits board plan with the largest enrollment. The surcharge payments shall be collected in addition to the member premium payment.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 213. FOR THE STATE HEALTH CARE AUTHORITYâHEALTH BENEFIT EXCHANGEGeneral FundâState Appropriation (FY 2026). . . .$8,766,000General FundâState Appropriation (FY 2027). . . .$8,609,000General FundâFederal Appropriation. . . .$87,363,000Education Legacy Trust AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$350,000Health Benefit Exchange AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$86,030,000State Health Care Affordability AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$85,000,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$276,118,000The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) The receipt and use of medicaid funds provided to the health benefit exchange from the health care authority are subject to compliance with state and federal regulations and policies governing the Washington apple health programs, including timely and proper application, eligibility, and enrollment procedures.(2)(a) By July 15th, October 15th, and January 15th of each year, the authority shall make a payment of 30 percent of the general fundâstate appropriation, 30 percent of the health benefit exchange accountâstate appropriation, and 30 percent of the health care affordability accountâstate appropriation to the exchange. By April 15th of each year, the authority shall make a payment of 10 percent of the general fundâstate appropriation, 10 percent of the health benefit exchange accountâstate appropriation, and 10 percent of the health care affordability accountâstate appropriation to the exchange.(b) The exchange shall monitor actual to projected revenues and make necessary adjustments in expenditures or carrier assessments to ensure expenditures do not exceed actual revenues.(c) Payments made from general fundâstate appropriation and health benefit exchange accountâstate appropriation shall be available for expenditure for no longer than the period of the appropriation from which it was made. When the actual cost of materials and services have been fully determined, and in no event later than the lapsing of the appropriation, any unexpended balance of the payment shall be returned to the authority for credit to the fund or account from which it was made, and under no condition shall expenditures exceed actual revenue.(3) $75,000,000 of the state health care affordability accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the exchange to administer a premium assistance program, as established in RCW 43.71.110. An individual is eligible for the premium assistance provided if the individual: (a) Has income up to 250 percent of the federal poverty level; and (b) meets other eligibility criteria as established in RCW 43.71.110(4)(a).(4)(a) $10,000,000 of the state health care affordability accountâstate appropriation is provided solely to provide premium assistance for customers ineligible for federal premium tax credits who meet the eligibility criteria established in subsection (3)(a) and (b) of this section, and is contingent upon continued approval of the applicable waiver described in RCW 43.71.120.(b) In the event the applicable waiver described in RCW 43.71.120 is suspended, terminated, or otherwise ended, $10,000,000 of the state health care affordability accountâstate appropriation is provided solely to:(i) Implement a state program with coverage comparable to individual market plans, for customers who would have been eligible under the waiver; and(ii) Provide state premium assistance to state program customers who meet the eligibility criteria established in subsection (3) of this section.(c) The exchange may establish or designate a separate entity to administer the state program. Administration of the state program must include, but is not limited to, establishing requirements for eligibility, continued participation, and carrier payments.(d) Moneys collected for premiums written on qualified health benefit plans and qualified dental plans offered through the state program must be deposited in the state health care affordability account under RCW 43.71.130, through a procedure established by the exchange that aligns with the requirements of RCW 48.14.0201(5)(b), 48.14.020(2), and 43.71.080.(e) The exchange, and any entity involved in implementing this program, is subject to RCW 43.17.425.(5) $1,117,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026, $1,182,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027, $12,510,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation, and $809,000 of the health benefit exchange accountâstate appropriation are provided solely to make improvements to healthplanfinder to comply with federal eligibility rule changes required by the centers for medicare and medicaid services and funding is subject to the conditions, limitations, and review requirements of section 701 of this act.(6) $1,000,000 of the health benefit exchange accountâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 is provided solely for the exchange, in collaboration with stakeholders, to begin development starting January 1, 2027, of an automated solution to ensure continuous health care coverage through qualified health plans for medicaid beneficiaries losing medicaid coverage through Washington healthplanfinder and is subject to the conditions, limitations, and review requirements of section 701 of this act.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 214. FOR THE STATE HEALTH CARE AUTHORITYâCOMMUNITY BEHAVIORAL HEALTH PROGRAMGeneral FundâState Appropriation (FY 2026). . . .$1,185,242,000General FundâState Appropriation (FY 2027). . . .$1,185,284,000General FundâFederal Appropriation. . . .$3,320,820,000General FundâPrivate/Local Appropriation. . . .$39,200,000Criminal Justice Treatment AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$27,541,000Problem Gambling AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$3,249,000Dedicated Cannabis AccountâState Appropriation(FY 2026). . . .$28,515,000Dedicated Cannabis AccountâState Appropriation(FY 2027). . . .$28,517,000Opioid Abatement Settlement AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$77,463,000Statewide 988 Behavioral Health Crisis Response LineAccountâState Appropriation. . . .$74,034,000Tribal Opioid Prevention and Treatment AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$16,814,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$5,986,679,000The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) For the purposes of this section, "behavioral health entities" means managed care organizations and behavioral health administrative services organizations that reimburse providers for behavioral health services.(2) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, funding is provided for implementation of the settlement agreement under Trueblood, et al. v. Department of Social and Health Services, et al., United States District Court for the Western District of Washington, Cause No. 14-cv-01178-MJP. In addition to amounts provided solely for implementation of the settlement agreement, class members must have access to supports and services funded throughout this section for which they meet eligibility and medical necessity requirements. The authority must include language in contracts that requires regional behavioral health entities to develop and implement plans for improving access to timely and appropriate treatment for individuals with behavioral health needs and current or prior criminal justice involvement who are eligible for services under these contracts.(3) $57,910,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026, $63,090,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027, and $15,804,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely to continue the phase-in of the settlement agreement under Trueblood, et al. v. Department of Social and Health Services, et al., United States District Court for the Western District of Washington, Cause No. 14-cv-01178-MJP. The authority, in collaboration with the department of social and health services and the criminal justice training commission, must implement the provisions of the settlement agreement pursuant to the timeline and implementation plan provided for under the settlement agreement. This includes implementing provisions related to competency evaluations, competency restoration, crisis diversion and supports, education and training, and workforce development.(4) $7,200,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $7,200,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely to continue diversion grant programs funded through contempt fines pursuant to Trueblood, et al. v. Department of Social and Health Services, et al., United States District Court for the Western District of Washington, Cause No. 14-cv-01178-MJP. The authority must consult with the plaintiffs and court monitor to determine, within the amounts provided, which of the programs will continue to receive funding through this appropriation. The programs shall use this funding to provide assessments, mental health treatment, substance use disorder treatment, case management, employment, and other social services.(5) $18,891,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026, $18,561,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027, and $41,062,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely for the authority and behavioral health entities to continue to contract for implementation of high-intensity programs for assertive community treatment (PACT) teams. In determining the proportion of medicaid and nonmedicaid funding provided to behavioral health entities with PACT teams, the authority shall consider the differences between behavioral health entities in the percentages of services and other costs associated with the teams that are not reimbursable under medicaid. The authority may allow behavioral health entities which have nonmedicaid reimbursable costs that are higher than the nonmedicaid allocation they receive under this section to supplement these funds with local dollars or funds received under subsection (7) of this section. The authority and behavioral health entities shall maintain consistency with all essential elements of the PACT evidence-based practice model in programs funded under this section.(6) $1,668,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026, $1,668,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027, and $3,040,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely for the authority to maintain a pilot project to incorporate peer bridging staff into behavioral health regional teams that provide transitional services to individuals returning to their communities.(7) $147,449,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $147,449,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for persons and services not covered by the medicaid program. To the extent possible, levels of behavioral health entity spending must be maintained in the following priority order: Crisis and commitment services; community inpatient services; and residential care services, including personal care and emergency housing assistance. These amounts must be distributed to behavioral health entities as follows:(a) $132,924,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $132,924,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for the authority to contract with behavioral health administrative service organizations for behavioral health treatment services not covered under the medicaid program. Within these amounts, behavioral health administrative service organizations must continue a 15 percent rate increase to providers receiving state funds for nonmedicaid services under this section that was originally effective January 1, 2024.(b) $14,524,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $14,525,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for the authority to contract with medicaid managed care organizations for wraparound services to medicaid enrolled individuals that are not covered under the medicaid program.(8) The authority is authorized to continue to contract directly, rather than through contracts with behavioral health entities for children's long-term inpatient facility services.(9) $2,990,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $3,029,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely to reimburse counties for the cost of conducting involuntary act judicial proceedings as follows:(a) $1,025,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $1,025,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely to reimburse Pierce county for the cost of conducting 180-day commitment hearings at the state psychiatric hospitals.(b) $504,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $504,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely to reimburse Spokane county for the cost of conducting 180-day commitment hearings at the state psychiatric hospitals.(c) $171,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $210,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely to reimburse Thurston county for the cost of conducting 180-day commitment hearings at the Maple Lane facility.(d) $1,290,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $1,290,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely to reimburse either King county or other legal services organizations, or both, for the cost of conducting involuntary treatment act commitment hearings at facilities operating within King county. These amounts must be prioritized for the cost of conducting 180-day commitment hearings at state-operated facilities including facilities operated by the department of social and health services and the University of Washington center for behavioral health and learning. Any remaining amounts may be used to reimburse either King county or other legal services organizations for the cost of other involuntary treatment act commitment hearings provided in other facilities within King county.(10) Behavioral health entities may use local funds to earn additional federal medicaid match, provided the locally matched rate does not exceed the upper-bound of their federally allowable rate range, and provided that the enhanced funding is used only to provide medicaid state plan or waiver services to medicaid clients. Additionally, behavioral health entities may use a portion of the state funds allocated in accordance with subsection (7) of this section to earn additional medicaid match, but only to the extent that the application of such funds to medicaid services does not diminish the level of crisis and commitment, community inpatient, residential care, and outpatient services presently available to persons not eligible for medicaid.(11) $2,062,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $2,062,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for mental health services for mentally ill offenders while confined in a county or city jail and for facilitating access to programs that offer mental health services upon release from confinement. The authority must collect information from the behavioral health entities on their plan for using these funds, the numbers of individuals served, and the types of services provided.(12) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, funding is provided for the authority to develop and phase in intensive mental health services for high needs youth consistent with the settlement agreement in T.R. v. Dreyfus and Porter.(13)(a) The authority must establish minimum and maximum funding levels for all reserves allowed under behavioral health administrative service organization contracts and include contract language that clearly states the requirements and limitations. The reserve levels must be informed by the types of risk carried by behavioral health administrative service organizations for mandatory services and also consider reasonable levels of operating reserves. The authority must monitor and ensure that behavioral health administrative service organization reserves do not exceed maximum levels. The authority must monitor revenue and expenditure reports and must require a behavioral health administrative service organization to submit a corrective action plan on how it will spend its excess reserves within a reasonable period of time, when its reported reserves exceed maximum levels established under the contract. The authority must review and approve such plans and monitor to ensure compliance. If the authority determines that a behavioral health administrative service organization has failed to provide an adequate excess reserve corrective action plan or is not complying with an approved plan, the authority must reduce payments to the entity in accordance with remedial actions provisions included in the contract. These reductions in payments must continue until the authority determines that the entity has come into substantial compliance with an approved excess reserve corrective action plan. The authority must submit to the office of financial management and the appropriate committees of the legislature, each December of the biennium, the minimum and maximum reserve levels established in contract for each of the behavioral health administrative service organizations for the prior fiscal year and the actual reserve levels reported at the end of the fiscal year.(b) In contracts effective during the fiscal biennium, the authority must allow behavioral health administrative services organizations flexibility in utilizing reserve funding received pursuant to a specific legislative proviso in a prior contract period. Funding repurposed under this subsection must be used to support the duties of the administrative services organization under RCW 71.24.045 through programs serving individuals with severe and persistent behavioral health conditions and behavioral health services that promote stability and recovery within their regional service area. Repurposed funds shall prioritize the core mandated functions that behavioral health administrative services organizations must provide for all residents who need the service or, for residents who are not medicaid enrollees, as described in the authority's model contract for behavioral health administrative services organizations. A behavioral health administrative services organization that wishes to repurpose reserve funding must notify the authority in advance and the authority may require modification of the plan if it determines that the behavioral health administrative services organization has not made a good faith effort to implement prior funding for the purpose for which it was originally provided. The authority must capture information related to behavioral health administrative services organization repurposing of funds under this subsection, including identification of which specific legislative provisos it repurposed funding under this subsection and for what purpose those funds were used, through the revenue and expenditure reporting process. These reports shall describe by how much the state's appropriated funding for core mandated functions fell short of need as determined by the behavioral health administrative services organization. The authority must update the revenue and expenditure reporting template and reporting instructions to behavioral health administrative service organizations by September 1, 2025.(14) Within the amounts provided in this section, behavioral health entities must provide outpatient chemical dependency treatment for offenders enrolled in the medicaid program who are supervised by the department of corrections pursuant to a term of community supervision. Contracts with behavioral health entities must require that behavioral health entities include in their provider network specialized expertise in the provision of manualized, evidence-based chemical dependency treatment services for offenders. The department of corrections and the authority must develop a memorandum of understanding for department of corrections offenders on active supervision who are medicaid eligible and meet medical necessity for outpatient substance use disorder treatment. The agreement will ensure that treatment services provided are coordinated, do not result in duplication of services, and maintain access and quality of care for the individuals being served. The authority must provide all necessary data, access, and reports to the department of corrections for all department of corrections offenders that receive medicaid paid services.(15) The criminal justice treatment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for treatment and treatment support services for offenders with a substance use disorder pursuant to RCW 71.24.580. The authority must offer counties the option to administer their share of the distributions provided for under RCW 71.24.580(5)(a). If a county is not interested in administering the funds, the authority shall contract with behavioral health entities to administer these funds consistent with the plans approved by local panels pursuant to RCW 71.24.580(5)(b).(16)(a) $11,590,000 of the dedicated cannabis accountâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $11,590,000 of the dedicated cannabis accountâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for:(i) A memorandum of understanding with the department of children, youth, and families to provide substance abuse treatment programs;(ii) A contract with the Washington state institute for public policy to conduct a cost-benefit evaluation of the implementations of chapter 3, Laws of 2013 (Initiative Measure No. 502);(iii) Designing and administering the Washington state healthy youth survey and the Washington state young adult behavioral health survey;(iv) Maintaining increased services to pregnant and parenting women provided through the parent child assistance program;(v) Maintaining increased prevention and treatment service provided by tribes and federally recognized American Indian organization to children and youth;(vi) Maintaining increased residential treatment services for children and youth;(vii) Training and technical assistance for the implementation of evidence-based, research based, and promising programs which prevent or reduce substance use disorder;(viii) Expenditures into the home visiting services account; and(ix) Grants to community-based programs that provide prevention services or activities to youth.(b) The authority must allocate the amounts provided in (a) of this subsection amongst the specific activities proportionate to the fiscal year 2021 allocation.(17)(a) $1,125,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $1,125,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 is provided solely for Spokane behavioral health entities to implement services to reduce utilization and the census at eastern state hospital. Such services must include:(i) High intensity treatment team for persons who are high utilizers of psychiatric inpatient services, including those with co-occurring disorders and other special needs;(ii) Crisis outreach and diversion services to stabilize in the community individuals in crisis who are at risk of requiring inpatient care or jail services;(iii) Mental health services provided in nursing facilities to individuals with dementia, and consultation to facility staff treating those individuals; and(iv) Services at the 16-bed evaluation and treatment facility.(b) At least annually, the Spokane county behavioral health entities shall assess the effectiveness of these services in reducing utilization at eastern state hospital, identify services that are not optimally effective, and modify those services to improve their effectiveness.(18) $1,850,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026, $1,850,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027, and $13,312,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely for substance use disorder peer support services included in behavioral health capitation rates in accordance with section 213(5)(ss), chapter 299, Laws of 2018. The authority shall require managed care organizations to provide access to peer support services for individuals with substance use disorders transitioning from emergency departments, inpatient facilities, or receiving treatment as part of hub and spoke networks.(19) $23,900,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026, $23,900,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027, $1,000,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation, and $8,100,000 of the opioid abatement settlement accountâstate appropriation are provided solely to maintain activities to improve outcomes for individuals with behavioral health issues interacting with law enforcement. Of these amounts:(a) $850,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026, $850,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027, $1,000,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation, and $3,600,000 of the opioid abatement settlement accountâstate appropriation are provided solely for the authority to maintain a memorandum of understanding with the criminal justice training commission to provide funding for community grants pursuant to RCW 36.28A.450.(b) $19,600,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $19,600,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for the authority to contract with behavioral health administrative service organizations to implement the statewide recovery navigator program established in chapter 311, Laws of 2021 (ESB 5476) and for related technical assistance to support this implementation. This includes funding for recovery navigator teams to provide community-based outreach and case management services based on the law enforcement assisted diversion model and for technical assistance support from the law enforcement assisted diversion national support bureau. The authority and technical assistance contractor must encourage recovery navigator programs to provide educational information and outreach regarding recovery navigator program services to local retailers that have high levels of retail theft. Of the amounts provided in this subsection (19)(b):(i) $1,600,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $1,600,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 must be allocated to maintain recovery navigator services in King, Pierce, and Snohomish counties. These amounts must be in addition to the proportion of the allocation of the remaining funds in this subsection the regional behavioral health administrative services organizations serving those counties were allocated pursuant to section 22(1), chapter 311, Laws of 2021.(ii) $2,000,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $2,000,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for expanding recovery navigator program services in regions where fiscal year 2026 projected expenditures will exceed revenues provided under this subsection. In allocating these amounts, the authority must prioritize regions where the combined fiscal year recovery navigator program allocations and recovery navigator program reserve balances are inadequate to cover estimated fiscal year expenditures.(c) $700,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $700,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for behavioral health administrative service organizations to develop regional recovery navigator program plans pursuant to chapter 311, Laws of 2021 (ESB 5476), and to establish positions focusing on regional planning to improve access to and quality of regional behavioral health services with a focus on integrated care.(d) $2,250,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026, $2,250,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027, and $4,500,000 of the opioid abatement settlement accountâstate appropriation are provided solely for the authority to maintain funding for ongoing grants to law enforcement assisted diversion programs under RCW 71.24.589.(e) $500,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $500,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for the authority to contract with the University of Washington addictions, drug, and alcohol institute. This funding must be used for advanced, evidence-based training for law enforcement to improve interactions with individuals who use drugs. The training must be developed so it can be adapted and used statewide to decrease stigmatizing beliefs among law enforcement through positive contact with people who use drugs and improve officer well-being and effectiveness by providing skills and techniques to address the drug overdose epidemic. The institute must develop and refine this training, leveraging prior work, and in partnership with a steering committee that includes people with lived or living experience of substance use disorder and criminal legal involvement, researchers, clinicians, law enforcement officers, and others. The training must complement, but not duplicate, existing curricula already provided by the criminal justice training commission. The institute must pilot the advanced training in a subset of regional law enforcement agencies and evaluate its acceptability and feasibility through participant interviews and pretraining and posttraining ratings of stigmatizing beliefs. The institute must incorporate feedback from the pilot training sessions into a final training program that it must make available to law enforcement agencies across the state.(20) $1,875,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026, $1,875,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027, $350,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation, and $5,400,000 of the opioid abatement settlement accountâstate appropriation are provided solely for the authority to continue to provide support for recovery residences. Of these amounts:(a) $75,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026, $75,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027, and $350,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely to contract with a nationally recognized recovery residence organization and to provide technical assistance to operators of recovery residences seeking certification in accordance with chapter 264, Laws of 2019 (2SHB 1528).(b) $1,800,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026, $1,800,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027, and $5,400,000 of the opioid abatement settlement accountâstate appropriation are provided solely for the authority to provide grants for the operational costs of new staffed recovery residences which serve individuals with substance use disorders who require more support than a level 1 recovery residence.(21) $6,510,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026, $6,510,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027, $21,602,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation, and $3,500,000 of the opioid abatement settlement accountâstate appropriation are provided solely for support of clubhouse programs across the state. The authority shall work with the centers for medicare and medicaid services to review opportunities to include clubhouse services as an optional "in lieu of" service in managed care organization contracts in order to maximize federal participation.(22) $708,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026, $708,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027, and $1,598,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely for implementing mental health peer respite centers and a pilot project to implement a mental health drop-in center in accordance with chapter 324, Laws of 2019 (2SHB 1394).(23) $446,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026, $446,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027, and $178,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely for the University of Washington's evidence-based practice institute which supports the identification, evaluation, and implementation of evidence-based or promising practices. The institute must work with the authority to develop a plan to seek private, federal, or other grant funding in order to reduce the need for state general funds.(24) As an element of contractual network adequacy requirements and reporting, the authority shall direct managed care organizations to make all reasonable efforts to develop or maintain contracts with provider networks that leverage local, federal, or philanthropic funding to enhance effectiveness of medicaid-funded integrated care services. These networks must promote medicaid clients' access to a system of services that addresses additional social support services and social determinants of health as defined in RCW 43.20.025 in a manner that is integrated with the delivery of behavioral health and medical treatment services.(25) In establishing, re-basing, enhancing, or otherwise updating medicaid rates for behavioral health services, the authority and contracted actuaries shall use a transparent process that provides an opportunity for medicaid managed care organizations, behavioral health administrative service organizations, and behavioral health provider agencies, and their representatives, to review and provide data and feedback on proposed rate changes within their region or regions of service operation. The authority and contracted actuaries shall transparently incorporate the information gained from this process and make adjustments allowable under federal law when appropriate.(26) The authority shall seek input from representatives of the managed care organizations (MCOs), licensed community behavioral health agencies, and behavioral health administrative service organizations to develop specific metrics related to behavioral health outcomes under integrated managed care. These metrics must include, but are not limited to: (a) Revenues and expenditures for community behavioral health programs, including medicaid and nonmedicaid funding; (b) access to services, service denials, and utilization by state plan modality; (c) claims denials and record of timely payment to providers; (d) client demographics; and (e) social and recovery measures and managed care organization performance measures. The authority must work with managed care organizations and behavioral health administrative service organizations to integrate these metrics into an annual reporting structure designed to evaluate the performance of the behavioral health system in the state over time. The authority must submit a report to the office of financial management and the appropriate committees of the legislature, before December 30th of each year during the fiscal biennium, that details the implemented metrics and relevant performance outcomes for the prior calendar year.(27) The authority must pursue opportunities for shifting state costs to the state's unused allocation of federal institutions for mental disease disproportionate share hospital funding.(28) $1,250,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $1,250,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for the authority to contract with the King county behavioral health administrative services organization to maintain children's crisis outreach response system services that were previously funded through the department of children, youth, and families. The authority, in consultation with the behavioral health administrative services organization, medicaid managed care organizations, and the actuaries responsible for developing medicaid managed care rates, must work to maximize federal funding provided for the children's crisis outreach response system program.(29) $12,435,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026, $13,015,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027, and $25,450,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely for the community children's long-term inpatient program. The number of beds is increased on a phased in basis to 62 beds by the end of fiscal year 2026 at a bed day rate of $1,121 per day.(30) $51,103,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026, $52,933,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027, and $90,434,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely for the authority to contract with community hospitals or freestanding evaluation and treatment centers to provide long-term inpatient care beds as defined in RCW 71.24.025. Within these amounts, the authority must meet the requirements for reimbursing counties for the judicial services for patients being served in these settings in accordance with RCW 71.05.730. The authority must coordinate with the department of social and health services in developing the contract requirements, selecting contractors, and establishing processes for identifying patients that will be admitted to these facilities. Of the amounts in this subsection, sufficient amounts are provided for the authority to reimburse community hospitals and nonhospital residential treatment centers serving clients in long-term inpatient care beds as defined in RCW 71.24.025 as follows:(a) For a hospital licensed under chapter 70.41 RCW that requires a hospital specific medicaid inpatient psychiatric per diem payment rate for long-term civil commitment patients because the hospital has completed a medicare cost report, the authority shall analyze the most recent medicare cost report of the hospital after a minimum of 200 medicaid inpatient psychiatric days. The authority shall establish the inpatient psychiatric per diem payment rate for long-term civil commitment patients for the hospital at 100 percent of the allowable cost of care, based on the most recent medicare cost report of the hospital.(b) For a hospital licensed under chapter 70.41 RCW that has not completed a medicare cost report with more than 200 medicaid inpatient psychiatric days, the authority shall establish the medicaid inpatient psychiatric per diem payment rate for long-term civil commitment patients for the hospital at the higher of the hospital's current medicaid inpatient psychiatric rate; or the annually updated statewide average of the medicaid inpatient psychiatric per diem payment rate of all acute care hospitals licensed under chapter 70.41 RCW providing long-term civil commitment services.(c) For a hospital licensed under chapter 71.12 RCW and currently providing long-term civil commitment services, the authority shall establish the medicaid inpatient psychiatric per diem payment rate at $1,250 plus adjustments that may be needed to capture costs associated with long-term psychiatric patients that are not allowable on the medicare cost report or reimbursed separately. The hospital may provide the authority with supplemental data to be considered and used to make appropriate adjustments to the medicaid inpatient psychiatric per diem payment rate of the hospital. Adjustment of costs may include:(i) Costs associated with professional services and fees not accounted for in the hospital's medicare cost report or reimbursed separately;(ii) Costs associated with the hospital providing the long-term psychiatric patient access to involuntary treatment court services that are not reimbursed separately; and(iii) Other costs associated with caring for long-term psychiatric patients that are not reimbursed separately.(d) For a hospital licensed under chapter 71.12 RCW that requires an initial medicaid inpatient psychiatric per diem payment rate for long-term civil commitment services because it has not yet completed a medicare cost report, the authority shall establish the medicaid inpatient psychiatric per diem payment rate at the higher of:(i) The hospital's current medicaid inpatient psychiatric rate; or(ii) The annually updated statewide average of the medicaid long-term inpatient psychiatric per diem payment rate of all freestanding psychiatric hospitals licensed under chapter 71.12 RCW providing long-term civil commitment services.(e) For nonhospital residential treatment centers certified to provide long-term inpatient care beds as defined in RCW 71.24.025, the authority shall establish the medicaid psychiatric per diem payment rate at $1,250 per bed.(f) The authority shall pay a rate enhancement of $500 per day for patients committed pursuant to the dismissal of criminal charges and a civil evaluation ordered under RCW 10.77.086 or 10.77.088. The enhancement shall be available to all hospital and nonhospital facilities providing services under this subsection except those whose rates are set at 100 percent of their most recent medicare cost report.(g) The authority may pay a rate enhancement of $500 per day for individuals with complex medical needs, challenging behaviors often diagnosed with co-occurring intellectual or developmental disability, traumatic brain injury, dementia, or significant medical issues requiring personal care. The rate enhancement shall be available to providers contracting directly with the authority.(h) Provider payments for vacant bed days shall not exceed six percent of their annual contracted bed days.(31) $150,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $150,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for a one-time grant to Island county to maintain support for a pilot program to improve behavioral health outcomes for young people in rural communities. In administering the pilot program, Island county shall coordinate with school districts, community groups, and health care providers to increase access to behavioral health programs for children and youth aged birth to 24 years of age. The grant funds shall be used to coordinate and expand behavioral health services. The grant funding must not be used to supplant funding from existing programs. No more than 10 percent of the funds may be used for administrative costs incurred by Island county in administering the program. Services that may be provided with the grant funding include, but are not limited to:(a) Support for children and youth with significant behavioral health needs to address learning loss caused by COVID-19 and remote learning;(b) School based behavioral health education, assessment, and brief treatment;(c) Screening and referral of children and youth to long-term treatment services;(d) Behavioral health supports provided by community agencies serving youth year-round;(e) Expansion of mental health first aid, a program designed to prepare adults who regularly interact with youth for how to help people in both crisis and noncrisis mental health situations;(f) Peer support services; and(g) Compensation for the incurred costs of clinical supervisors and internships.(32) $494,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026, $494,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027, and $988,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely for the authority to contract with the University of Washington's project extension for community health outcomes (ECHO) and the systemic, therapeutic, assessment, resources, and treatment (START) programs for specialized training and consultation for physicians and professionals to support:(a) Children with developmental disabilities and behavioral health needs;(b) Applied behavior analysis provider training, education, and consultation; and(c) The screening and diagnosis of autism spectrum disorder.(33) $2,366,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation and $2,366,000 of the general fundâlocal appropriation are provided solely for supported housing and employment services described in initiative 3a and 3b of the 1115 demonstration waiver and this is the maximum amount that may be expended for this purpose. Within these amounts, funding is provided for the authority to support community discharge efforts for patients at the state hospitals. Under this initiative, the authority and the department of social and health services shall ensure that allowable and necessary services are provided to eligible clients as identified by the authority or its providers or third party administrator. The department and the authority in consultation with the medicaid forecast work group, shall ensure that reasonable reimbursements are established for services deemed necessary within an identified limit per individual. The authority shall not increase general fundâstate expenditures above appropriated levels for this specific purpose. The secretary in collaboration with the director of the authority shall report to the joint select committee on health care oversight no less than quarterly on financial and health outcomes. The secretary in cooperation with the director shall also report to the fiscal committees of the legislature the expenditures of this subsection and shall provide such fiscal data in the time, manner, and form requested by the legislative fiscal committees.(34) Within the amounts provided in this section, sufficient funding is provided for the authority to maintain and increase the capabilities of a tool to track medication assisted treatment provider capacity.(35) $4,087,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026, $4,087,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027, and $3,000,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely for alternative response and coresponse services. Of the amounts provided in this subsection:(a) $2,000,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation is provided solely for grants to law enforcement and other first responders to include a mental health professional on the team of personnel responding to emergencies.(b) $1,500,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026, $1,500,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027, and $1,000,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely to support the provision of behavioral health coresponder services on nonlaw enforcement emergency medical response teams.(c) $2,587,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $2,587,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for the authority to support efforts by counties and cities to implement local response teams. Of these amounts:(i) $2,000,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $2,000,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for the authority to provide a grant to the association of Washington cities to assist cities with the costs of implementing alternative response teams. This funding must be used to reimburse cities for documented costs associated with creating coresponder teams within different alternative diversion models including law enforcement assisted diversion programs, community assistance referral and education programs, and as part of mobile crisis teams. Cities are encouraged to partner with each other to create a regional response model. In awarding these funds, the association must prioritize applicants with demonstrated capacity for facility-based crisis triage and stabilization services. The association and authority must collect information regarding the number of facility-based crisis stabilization and triage beds available in the locations receiving funding through this subsection.(ii) $587,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $587,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely to support the Whatcom county alternative response team.(36) $2,404,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026, $2,637,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027, and $6,815,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely for the authority to contract for long-term involuntary treatment services in a 16-bed residential treatment facility developed by the Tulalip tribe in Stanwood.(37) $956,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $956,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for wraparound with intensive services for youth ineligible for medicaid as outlined in the settlement agreement under AGC v. Washington State Health Care Authority, Thurston county superior court no. 21-2-00479-34.(38) $16,004,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $16,004,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for claims for services rendered to medicaid eligible clients admitted to institutions of mental disease that were determined to be unallowable for federal reimbursement due to medicaid's institutions for mental disease exclusion rules.(39) $6,010,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026, $6,010,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027, and $1,980,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely for the authority, in coordination with the department of health, to deploy an opioid awareness campaign and to contract with syringe service programs and other service settings assisting people with substance use disorders to: Prevent and respond to overdoses; provide other harm reduction services and supplies, including but not limited to distributing naloxone; fentanyl testing and other drug testing supplies; and for expanding contingency management services. The authority is encouraged to use these funds to leverage federal funding for this purpose to expand buying power when possible. The authority should prioritize funds for naloxone in coordination with the department of health, to expand the distribution of naloxone through the department's overdose education and naloxone distribution program. Funding must be prioritized to fill naloxone access gaps in community behavioral health and other community settings, including providing naloxone for agency staff in organizations such as syringe service programs, housing providers, and street outreach programs. Of the amounts provided in this subsection, $1,000,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $1,000,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for the authority to deploy an opioid awareness campaign targeted at youth to increase the awareness of the dangers of fentanyl.(40) $2,148,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $2,148,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely to support individuals enrolled in the foundational community supports initiative who are transitioning from benefits under RCW 74.04.805 due to increased income or other changes in eligibility. The authority, department of social and health services, and department of commerce shall collaborate on this effort.(41) $24,684,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026, $24,559,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027, $4,464,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation, $3,500,000 of the criminal justice treatment accountâstate appropriation, and $4,000,000 of the opioid abatement settlement accountâstate appropriation are provided solely to support the housing needs of individuals with behavioral health disorders. Of the amounts provided in this subsection:(a) $998,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026, $998,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027, and $618,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely for the authority to contract for three regional behavioral health mobile crisis response teams focused on supported housing to prevent individuals with behavioral health conditions at high risk of losing housing from becoming homeless, identify and prioritize serving the most vulnerable people experiencing homelessness, and increase alternative housing options to include short-term alternatives which may temporarily deescalate situations where there is high risk of a household from becoming homeless.(b) $5,623,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026, $5,623,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027, and $3,748,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely to maintain and expand access to no barrier, and low-barrier programs using a housing first model designed to assist and stabilize housing supports for adults with behavioral health conditions. Housing supports and services shall be made available with no requirement for treatment for their behavioral health condition and must be individualized to the needs of the individual. The authority and department of commerce shall collaborate on this effort.(c) $337,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $337,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for a rental voucher and bridge program and to implement strategies to reduce instances where an individual leaves a state operated behavioral or private behavioral health facility directly into homelessness. The authority must prioritize this funding for individuals being discharged from state operated behavioral health facilities.(d) $2,487,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $2,487,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for short-term rental subsidies for individuals with mental health or substance use disorders. This funding may be used for individuals enrolled in the foundational community support program while waiting for a longer term resource for rental support or for individuals transitioning from behavioral health treatment facilities or local jails. Individuals who would otherwise be eligible for the foundational community support program but are not eligible because of their citizenship status may also be served. Each December of the fiscal biennium, the authority must submit a report identifying the expenditures and number of individuals receiving short-term rental supports through the agency budget during the prior fiscal year broken out by region, treatment need, and the demographics of those served, including but not limited to age, country of origin within racial/ethnic categories, gender, and immigration status.(e) $4,211,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $4,211,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for a targeted grant program to three behavioral health administrative services organizations to transition persons who are either being diverted from criminal prosecution to behavioral health treatment services or are in need of housing upon discharge from crisis stabilization services.(f) $1,250,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026, $1,250,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027, $3,500,000 of the criminal justice treatment accountâstate appropriation, and $4,000,000 of the opioid abatement settlement accountâstate appropriation are provided solely for the authority to provide short-term housing vouchers for individuals with substance use disorders.(g) $7,500,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $7,500,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for the authority to implement homeless outreach stabilization teams pursuant to chapter 311, Laws of 2021 (ESB 5476).(h) $2,278,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026, $2,153,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027, and $98,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely for implementing a postinpatient housing program designed for young adults in accordance with the provisions of chapter 175, Laws of 2024 (2SHB 1929). Contracts with the postinpatient housing providers are exempt from the competitive procurement requirements in chapter 39.26 RCW.(42) $361,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026, $361,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027, and $482,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely for the authority, in collaboration with the department of social and health services research and data analysis division, to implement community behavioral health service data into the existing executive management information system. Of these amounts, $288,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026, $288,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027, and $384,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely for the authority to reimburse the research and data analysis division for staff costs associated with this project. The data elements shall be incorporated into the monthly executive management information system reports on a phased-in basis, allowing for elements which are readily available to be incorporated in the initial phase, and elements which require further definition and data collection changes to be incorporated in a later phase. The authority must collaborate with the research and data analysis division to ensure data elements are clearly defined and must include requirements in medicaid managed care organization and behavioral health administrative services organization contracts to provide the data in a consistent and timely manner for inclusion into the system. The community behavioral health executive management system information data elements must include, but are not limited to: Psychiatric inpatient bed days; evaluation and treatment center bed days; long-term involuntary community psychiatric inpatient bed days; children's long-term inpatient bed days; substance use disorder inpatient, residential, withdrawal evaluation and management, and secure withdrawal evaluation and management bed days; crisis triage and stabilization services bed days; mental health residential bed days; mental health and substance use disorder outpatient treatment services; opioid substitution and medication assisted treatment services; program of assertive treatment team services; wraparound with intensive services; mobile outreach crisis services; recovery navigator team services; foundational community supports housing and employment services; projects for assistance in transition from homelessness services; housing and recovery through peer services; other housing services administered by the authority; mental health and substance use disorder peer services; designated crisis responder investigations and outcomes; involuntary commitment hearings and outcomes; pregnant and parenting women case management services; and single bed certifications and no available bed reports. Wherever possible and practical, the data must include historical monthly counts and shall be broken out to distinguish services to medicaid and nonmedicaid individuals and children and adults. The authority and the research and data analysis division must consult with the office of financial management and staff from the fiscal committees of the legislature on the development and implementation of the community behavioral health data elements.(43) $178,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026, $58,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027, and $650,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely for the authority to continue development and implementation of the certified community behavioral health clinic model for comprehensive behavioral health services. Funding must be used to secure actuarial expertise, conduct research into national data and other state models, including obtaining resources and expertise from the national council for mental well-being certified community behavioral health clinic success center; and engage stakeholders, including representatives of licensed community behavioral health agencies and medicaid managed care organizations, in the process. The authority must conduct a study built on the preliminary report submitted to the legislature in December 2024 that includes:(a) Overviews of options and considerations for implementing the certified community behavioral health clinic model within Washington state, including participation as a certified community behavioral health clinic demonstration state or for independent statewide implementation;(b) An analysis of the impact of expanding the certified community behavioral health clinic model on the state's behavioral health systems;(c) Relevant federal regulations and options to implement the certified community behavioral health clinic model under those regulations;(d) Options for implementing a prospective payment system methodology;(e) An analysis of the benefits and potential challenges for integrating the certified community behavioral health clinic reimbursement model within an integrated care environment;(f) Actuarial analysis on the costs for implementing the certified community behavioral health clinic model, including opportunities for leveraging federal funding; and(g) Recommendations to the legislature on a pathway for statewide implementation including a plan for implementation no later than fiscal year 2027 that must include the following:(i) Implementation of the certified community behavioral health clinic model with clinics that adhere to the program standards under the federal substance abuse and mental health services administration demonstration program established under section 223 of the federal protecting access to medicare act of 2014 (42 U.S.C. Sec. 1396a note), as amended by the bipartisan safer communities act (P.L. 117-159);(ii) Incorporation in the planned funding model of at least one of the prospective payment system methodologies approved by the centers for medicare and medicaid services;(iii) The plan may allow for the certified community behavioral health clinic funding model to be implemented either by applying for and joining the federal demonstration program referenced in (g)(i) of this subsection, applying to the centers for medicare and medicaid services for a medicaid state plan waiver or amendment, or both;(iv) Continued consultation with the national council for mental wellbeing's certified community behavioral health clinic success center for technical assistance and meaningful opportunities for community behavioral health agencies to participate and offer feedback throughout the implementation process; and(v) Inclusion of services to children, youth, and families through the certified community behavioral health clinic funding model through providers that serve individuals of all ages as well as specialty providers that serve children, youth, and families.(44) $150,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $150,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for the authority to renew a contract with a Seattle based nonprofit organization with experience matching voluntary specialty care providers with patients in need of care to continue established pro bono counseling and behavioral health services to uninsured and underinsured individuals with incomes below 300 percent of the federal poverty line. The authority must provide the funding pursuant to a contract for documented capacity-building to continue pro bono counseling and behavioral health services. The agreement may require the contracted organization to seek, document, and report to the authority on efforts to leverage local, federal, or philanthropic funding to provide sustained operational support for the program.(45) $219,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $219,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely to continue to support the children and youth behavioral health work group to consider and develop longer term strategies and recommendations regarding the delivery of behavioral health services for children, transitioning youth, and their caregivers pursuant to chapter 76, Laws of 2022 (2SHB 1890).(46) $250,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $250,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for the authority to continue a contract to provide information and support related to safe housing and support services for youth exiting inpatient mental health and/or substance use disorder facilities to stakeholders, inpatient treatment facilities, young people, and other community providers that serve unaccompanied youth and young adults.(47) $3,322,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026, $3,322,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027, $1,814,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation, and $5,248,000 of the opioid abatement settlement accountâstate appropriation are provided solely for the authority to contract with opioid treatment providers to operate mobile methadone units to address treatment gaps statewide. Within the amounts provided, the authority must provide service support subsidies to all mobile methadone units including those that began operations prior to fiscal year 2024. The authority must work with the actuaries responsible for setting medicaid managed care rates to explore options for creating a specific rate for mobile medication units that reflects the unique costs of these programs.(48)(a) $5,753,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $5,753,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for the authority to continue a program with coverage comparable to the amount, duration, and scope of care provided in the categorically needy medicaid program for adult individuals who:(i) Have an immigration status making them ineligible for federal medicaid or federal subsidies through the health benefit exchange;(ii) Are age 19 and older, including over age 65, and have countable income of up to 138 percent of the federal poverty level; and(iii) Are not eligible for another full scope federally funded medical assistance program, including any expansion of medicaid coverage for deferred action for childhood arrivals recipients.(b) Within the amount provided in this subsection, the authority shall use the same eligibility, enrollment, redetermination and renewal, and appeals procedures as categorically needy medicaid, except where flexibility is necessary to maintain privacy or minimize burden to applicants or enrollees.(c) The authority in collaboration with the health benefit exchange, the department of social and health services, and community organizations must develop and implement an outreach and education campaign.(d) The authority must provide the following information to the governor's office and appropriate committees of the legislature by February 1st and November 1st of each year:(i) Actual and forecasted expenditures;(ii) Actual and forecasted data from the caseload forecast council; and(iii) The availability and impact of any federal program or proposed rule that expands access to health care for the population described in this subsection, such as the expansion of medicaid coverage for deferred action for childhood arrivals recipients.(e) The amount provided in this subsection is the maximum amount that may be expended for the purposes of this program.(49)(a) $125,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $125,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for the authority to reimburse the department of social and health services for staffing costs related to tracking behavioral health community capacity through the community behavioral health executive management information system and providing annual reports on the implementation of new behavioral health community capacity.(b) The department of commerce, the department of health, and the authority must cooperate with the department of social and health services in collecting and providing the data necessary to incorporate tracking of behavioral health beds into the behavioral health executive management information system and to prepare the required reports. The agencies must work to ensure they are using consistent definitions in classifying behavioral health bed types for the purpose of reporting capacity and utilization.(c) The authority and the department of social and health services must continue tracking behavioral health bed utilization for medicaid and state funded clients by type of bed in the executive management information system. The department of commerce shall identify to the department of social and health services all providers that have received funding through their capital grant program since the 2013-2015 fiscal biennium. The department of social and health services must incorporate tracking of services by provider including an element to identify providers that have received funding through the capital budget so that reports can be provided related to the average daily client counts for medicaid and state funded clients being served by provider and by facility type.(d) The department of social and health services, in coordination with the department of commerce, the department of health, and the authority, must submit an annual report each November of the fiscal biennium to the office of financial management and the appropriate committees of the legislature that provides the following information for each facility that has received funding through the capital budget: (i) The amount received by the state and the total project cost; (ii) the facility address; (iii) the number of new beds or additional bed capacity by the service type being provided; (iv) the utilization of the additional beds by medicaid or state funded clients by service type; and (v) a comparison of capacity to demand by service type by geographical region of the state.(50) $3,045,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026, $83,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027, $172,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation, $2,000,000 of the criminal justice treatment accountâstate appropriation, and $5,041,000 of the opioid abatement settlement accountâstate appropriation are provided solely for the authority to expand efforts to provide opioid use disorder and alcohol use disorder medication in city, county, regional, and tribal jails.(51) $55,988,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation is provided solely for the authority to contract with the University of Washington behavioral health teaching facility to provide long-term inpatient care beds as defined in RCW 71.24.025. The authority must coordinate with the department of social and health services and the University of Washington to evaluate and determine criteria for the current population of state hospital patients, committed pursuant to the dismissal of criminal charges and a civil evaluation ordered under RCW 10.77.086 or 10.77.088, who can be effectively treated at the University of Washington behavioral health teaching facility.(52) $95,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026, $95,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027, and $264,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely for implementation of Substitute House Bill No. 1272 (children in crisis program). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2025, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.(53) $36,306,000 of the statewide 988 behavioral health crisis response line accountâstate appropriation and $21,410,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely for the authority to continue to implement the provisions of chapter 454, Laws of 2023 (E2SHB 1134). Within these amounts, sufficient funding is provided for the authority to:(a) Provide grants to new or existing mobile rapid response teams and to community-based crisis teams to support efforts for meeting the standards and criteria for receiving an endorsement pursuant to provisions of the bill. In awarding grants under this subsection, the authority must prioritize funding for proposals that demonstrate experience and strategies that prioritize culturally relevant services to community members with the least access to behavioral health services;(b) Expand and enhance regional crisis services provided by mobile crisis teams and community-based crisis teams either endorsed or seeking endorsement pursuant to standards adopted by the authority; and(c) Provide performance payments to mobile rapid response teams and community-based crisis teams that receive endorsements pursuant to chapter 454, Laws of 2023 (E2SHB 1134).(54) $500,000 of the opioid abatement settlement accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for Spanish language opioid prevention services.(55) $16,814,000 of the tribal opioid prevention and treatment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the authority to pass through to tribes and urban Indian health programs for opioid and overdose response activities. The funding must be used for prevention, outreach, treatment, recovery support services, and other strategies to address and mitigate the effects of the misuse and abuse of opioid related products. The authority must provide the tribes and urban Indian health programs the latitude to use the funding as they see fit to benefit their communities, provided the activities are allowable under the terms of the opioid settlement agreements.(56) Within existing resources, the authority shall collaborate with the department of social and health services to develop a new program for individuals admitted to a state hospital for purposes of civil commitment under RCW 10.77.086. The program must prioritize the use of assisted outpatient treatment resources for eligible individuals and draw upon existing programs, including the program of assertive community treatment and the governor's opportunity for supportive housing program to provide wraparound services for individuals who may be ready to quickly return to the community following an admission.(57) $6,700,000 of the opioid abatement settlement accountâstate appropriation and $700,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely for the authority to contract for the support of an opioid recovery and care access center in Seattle. The contractor must be an established Seattle based behavioral health provider that has developed a partnership for the project and has leveraged additional operations and research funding from other sources. The contract is exempt from the competitive procurement requirements in chapter 39.26 RCW.(58) $2,000,000 of the opioid abatement settlement accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the authority to increase access to long-acting injectable buprenorphine products. The authority must use these funds to cover the cost and administration of the drug for uninsured individuals that do not qualify for other state or federal health insurance programs.(59) $4,500,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 is provided solely for bridge funding grants to community behavioral health agencies participating in federal certified community behavioral health clinic expansion grant programs to sustain their continued level of operations following expiration of federal grant funding during the planning process for adoption of the certified community behavioral health clinic model statewide.(60) $3,066,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026, $5,446,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027, and $3,457,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely for the authority to contract for community behavioral health services to be provided at the Olympic heritage behavioral health facility.(61) $15,398,000 of the statewide 988 behavioral health crisis response line accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for startup, implementation, and operational funding for three crisis relief centers. The authority must undergo a competitive solicitation process for this funding that takes into account geographic needs, regional capacity, and operational readiness, and must prioritize providers with limited access to other funding sources and who are projected to have the shortest timelines to utilize funding and begin operations. Of the amounts provided in this subsection:(a) $8,536,000 is provided solely for startup grants for hiring, facility improvements, and other costs necessary to begin providing services to clients.(b) $4,925,000 is provided solely for six-month operational subsidies for crisis centers that have begun operations as a bridge to providing services at full capacity.(c) $1,937,000 is provided for reimbursement for crisis relief center services provided to individuals not covered by the state medicaid program.(d) The authority must ensure that managed care organizations adhere to contract provisions regarding required services and behavioral health network adequacy standards. The authority must submit a report to the office of financial management and the appropriate committees of the legislature by December 1, 2025, with a plan and recommendations for a sustainable funding model for these services that collects appropriate amounts from medicaid managed care organizations and other insurance carriers and identifies the need for ongoing behavioral health administrative services organization funding needed for individuals who do not have medicaid or other insurance coverage.(62) $150,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $150,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for a one-time grant to a nonprofit organization for start-up costs and to provide services to medicaid clients and uninsured clients in a crisis stabilization facility located in Skagit county.(63) $9,500,000 of the opioid abatement settlement accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for health engagement hub pilot program sites in accordance with the provisions of chapter 1, Laws of 2023 sp. sess. (2E2SSB 5536). The authority may use funding within this subsection to contract for technical assistance and evaluation activities associated with the pilot program.(64) $328,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026, $328,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027, and $656,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely for the authority to implement chapter 360, Laws of 2024 (2SHB 2320).(65) $2,650,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $2,650,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for the authority to continue contracts with King county, Kitsap county, Tacoma, Everett, and Spokane for street medicine teams that rapidly assess and address the acute and chronic physical and behavioral health needs of homeless people. The teams must offer integrated, team-based medical, mental health, substance use, and infectious disease treatment and prevention, and navigation and case management services.(66)(a) $250,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026, $250,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027, and $500,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely for the authority to continue work on the behavioral health comparison rate project, including:(i) Developing phase 3 comparison rates for all major medicaid managed care behavioral health services not addressed in phase 1 or phase 2 of the behavioral health comparison rates project or through other work streams; and(ii) Preparing to implement a minimum fee schedule for behavioral health services, including developing solutions to resolve any current data and systems limitations.(b) By October 1, 2025, the authority must provide a final report to the office of financial management and appropriate committees of the legislature that:(i) Summarizes the new comparison rates developed as part of phase 3;(ii) Updates comparison rates developed in phase 1 and phase 2 for new salary and wage information based on most current bureau of labor statistics data;(iii) Estimates the cost and other impacts to fee-for-service and managed care of incorporating additional behavioral health services developed as part of phase 3 of the behavioral health comparison rates project into a minimum fee schedule effective January 1, 2027;(iv) Identifies planned actions and funding needs, if any, to resolve any remaining limitations to implement the phase 3 minimum fee schedule by January 1, 2027;(v) Provides additional analysis of variation between the comparison rates developed as part of phase 3 and current payment levels at a service and regional level; and(vi) Describes how the authority plans to propose to the legislature implementation of the phase 3 minimum fee schedule by January 1, 2027, to better match medicaid payments to the cost of care.(67) $300,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 is provided solely for the authority to fund the second year of workforce grants to behavioral health agencies contracted with the authority to establish occupational therapy services for behavioral health clients. This funding must be used for establishing and integrating occupational therapy into behavioral health agency programs and operations. Funding may be used for occupational therapist and occupational therapy assistant services, recruitment, training, technical assistance, fieldwork opportunities, and for other approved activities targeted to increase access to occupational therapy services within behavioral health agency settings. The authority must submit a final report to the legislature on the number of patients receiving occupational therapy through this initiative, the programs in which services were provided, and the number and type of fieldwork students trained in each participating behavioral health agency program by January 1, 2027.(68)(a) $81,542,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026, $81,729,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027, and $167,792,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely for supportive supervision and oversight services pursuant to a 1915(i) state plan amendment. For medicaid clients enrolled in managed care, the authority must contract for these services through managed care organizations utilizing an actuarially sound rate structure as established by the authority and approved by the centers for medicare and medicaid services. The authority may not implement a skills development and restoration benefit until funding is provided for that specific purpose. Within these amounts, funding is provided for:(i) Implementing supportive supervision and oversight services in adult family home settings in accordance with and contingent upon execution of the collective bargaining agreement negotiated between the state and the adult family homes and referenced in part IX of this act;(ii) Implementing supportive supervision and oversight services in assisted living and enhanced services facilities settings;(iii) Providing reimbursement for the state share of exceptional behavioral health personal care services for individuals who have not transitioned into the new 1915(i) state plan services; and(iv) Administrative costs associated with implementation of the new 1915(i) state plan.(b) Within the amounts provided in this subsection, the authority must assure that managed care organizations reimburse the department of social and health services aging and long term support administration for the general fundâstate cost of exceptional behavioral health personal care services for medicaid enrolled individuals who require these services because of a psychiatric disability.(c)(i) Within the amounts provided in this subsection, the authority will convene a task force composed of representatives from the authority, the department of social and health services, and the office of financial management; representatives of adult family home, assisted living, and enhanced services facility providers that serve individuals through the community behavioral health support program; behavioral health advocates; and other key stakeholders. The task force will conduct a comprehensive review of services offered through the community behavioral health support program and the residential services waiver program with the goal of improving system-wide efficiencies, data driven outcomes, and cost effectiveness. The review shall include but not be limited to:(A) Exploration of opportunities for aligning requirements between the community behavioral health support program and the residential service waiver programs to reduce provider administrative burden and conflicting requirements with specific attention provided to value-based patient-centered purchasing models;(B) Establishment of uniform oversight and clear expectations when community behavioral health support program and residential service waiver program services overlap;(C) Creation of a centralized framework for matching participants with complex behavioral health conditions to the most appropriate setting or level of care;(D) Development of outcome metrics and a practical process for gathering outcomes data such as reductions in hospital readmissions, improved quality of life, and other metrics reflective of community stability;(E) Identification of opportunities for streamlining or consolidation of programs to reduce overlap, ensure simpler referral pathways, and deliver more consistent services across the state's behavioral health continuum; and(F) Cost estimates for options developed by the task force which examine potential costs impacts for both the authority and the department of social and health services and include identification of cost savings and offsets associated with the options presented.(ii) By December 1, 2025, the authority must provide a report to the office of financial management and the appropriate committees of the legislature which includes but is not limited to:(A) A matrix of the community behavioral health support program and other programs at the department of social and health services that provide overlapping services to community behavioral health support program clients which includes identification of the number of individuals being served, the average monthly expenditures at each agency, and the differential eligibility and service requirements for the programs;(B) A summary of the findings and recommendations of the task force;(C) If an amendment of the community behavioral health support state plan amendment is recommended by the task force, specific options identified by the work group for the amendment to reduce provider administrative burden and improve cost effectiveness and client outcomes; and(D) Identification of the estimated costs, risks, benefits, and timeline of implementing the identified recommendations and options.(69) $1,000,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $1,000,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for grants to tribes to implement the Icelandic model of prevention in their communities.(70) $3,200,000 of the opioid abatement settlement accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for a tribal opioid prevention campaign to inform and educate tribal communities about opioid misuse prevention, overdose response, and treatment.(71) $5,242,000 of the opioid abatement settlement accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the authority to provide grants to providers of employment and educational services to individuals with substance use disorder.(72) $3,768,000 of the opioid abatement settlement accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the authority to provide opioid treatment services through new opioid treatment providers that were funded through grants pursuant to chapter 1, Laws of 2023 sp. sess. (controlled substances).(73) $297,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026, $97,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027, and $140,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 1813 (medical assistance reprocurement). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2025, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.(74) $438,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026, $438,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027, and $284,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely for implementation of sections 2 and 3 of Second Substitute House Bill No. 1427 (peer support specialists). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2025, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.(75) $2,132,000 of the opioid abatement settlement accountâstate appropriation and $570,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely for the authority to contract for a program that provides Washington state emergency departments with real-time medications for opioid use disorder clinical guidance and follow-up appointment scheduling.(76) $1,000,000 of the statewide 988 behavioral health crisis response line accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the purchase of electric vans for 988 behavioral health crisis response and suicide prevention mobile rapid response crisis teams and community-based crisis teams endorsed under RCW 71.24.903. Of the amounts provided in this subsection:(a) $700,000 of this amount is for mobile rapid response crisis teams and community-based crisis teams endorsed under RCW 71.24.903; and(b) $300,000 of this amount is for mobile rapid response crisis teams and community-based crisis teams endorsed under RCW 71.24.903 that are affiliated with a tribe in Washington state.(77) Within amounts appropriated in this section, the authority and the governor's Indian health advisory council must convene tribal representatives to identify the actual local costs for tribes in their provision of substance use disorder services to non-American Indian/Alaska Native medicaid enrollees receiving services in tribal facilities. The authority must submit a report to the office of financial management and the appropriate committees of the legislature by December 1, 2025, that outlines options and a plan for compensating tribes that is developed through this consultation process that fully compensates tribes for their actual costs of serving non-American Indian/Alaska Native medicaid enrollees receiving services in tribal facilities, and must consider and address state and tribal budget impacts.(78) $2,000,000 of the opioid abatement settlement accountâstate appropriation is provided on a one-time basis solely for the authority to contract for continued operations of the pilot program originally funded in section 215(117), chapter 475, Laws of 2023 (ESSB 5187) to reimburse a licensed pediatric transitional care facility in Spokane county to provide neonatal abstinence syndrome services to infants who have prenatal substance exposure.(79) $100,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $100,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for the authority to provide a grant to a program in south Seattle providing supportive housing and clinical services for mothers recovering from substance use disorders, and their children. The program must serve pregnant women or mothers, regardless of age, race, religion, or sexual orientation, who are exiting inpatient substance use disorder treatment facilities and must serve individuals with co-occurring disorders. The program must provide on-site support through a dedicated team that offers daily assistance to help women become as independent as possible while focusing on their recovery and stability.(80) $91,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $91,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5745 (invol. treatment counsel). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2025, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.(81) Within amounts appropriated in this section, effective January 1, 2026, the authority shall reduce medicaid managed care rates by one percent. Notwithstanding any other proviso in the appropriations act for the current biennium, the authority may adjust existing state directed payments, published fee schedules, or make other administrative changes needed to comply with this subsection.(82) Sufficient amounts are appropriated in this section to maintain increases to medicaid reimbursement for community behavioral health providers contracted through managed care organizations to the extent that they align with subsection (81) of this section. The authority may adjust rates and existing state directed payments to ensure compliance with subsection (81) of this section.(83) The authority shall continue to work with a provider working to reopen a youth behavioral health facility in Clark county to identify a licensing and service delivery pathway that best reflects services delivered through an enhanced model of care for youth residential substance use disorder treatment services. In collaboration with the provider and medicaid managed care organizations, the authority shall work toward developing an enhanced rate for residential substance use disorders services that concurrently provide for the diagnosis, treatment, and medication management of co-occurring mental health conditions as part of the substance use disorder treatment plan. The authority shall submit the new rate and cost impact to the office of financial management and the appropriate committees of the legislature no later than December 1, 2025, for consideration of funding in the 2026 legislative session.(84) $250,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $250,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for the authority to contract with a statewide mental health nonprofit organization that provides free community and school-based mental health education and support programs for consumers and families. The contractor must use this funding to provide access to programs tailored to peers living with mental illness as well as family members of people with mental illness and the community at large. Services provided by the contracted program shall include education, support, and assistance to reduce isolation and help consumers and families understand the services available in their communities.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 215. FOR THE HUMAN RIGHTS COMMISSIONGeneral FundâState Appropriation (FY 2026). . . .$5,057,000General FundâState Appropriation (FY 2027). . . .$5,079,000General FundâFederal Appropriation. . . .$3,036,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$13,172,000The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) $2,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $3,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5104 (immigration status coercion). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2025, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.(2) $1,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $3,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5486 (motion picture captioning). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2025, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 216. FOR THE BOARD OF INDUSTRIAL INSURANCE APPEALSWorker and Community Right to Know FundâStateAppropriation. . . .$10,000Accident AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$28,144,000Medical Aid AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$28,141,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$56,295,000The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: $100,000 of the accident accountâstate appropriation and $102,000 of the medical aid accountâstate appropriation are provided solely for implementation of Senate Bill No. 5463 (industrial insurance/duties). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2025, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 217. FOR THE CRIMINAL JUSTICE TRAINING COMMISSIONGeneral FundâState Appropriation (FY 2026). . . .$58,806,000General FundâState Appropriation (FY 2027). . . .$58,222,000General FundâPrivate/Local Appropriation. . . .$12,977,000Death Investigations AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$1,720,000Municipal Criminal Justice Assistance AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$460,000Supplemental Criminal Justice AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$100,000,000Washington Auto Theft Prevention Authority AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$7,167,000Washington Internet Crimes Against Children AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$2,270,00024/7 Sobriety AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$20,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$241,642,000The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) The criminal justice training commission may not run a basic law enforcement academy class of fewer than 30 students.(2) Funding in this section is sufficient for 75 percent of the costs of providing 23 statewide basic law enforcement trainings in each fiscal year 2026 and fiscal year 2027. The criminal justice training commission must schedule its funded classes to minimize wait times throughout each fiscal year and meet statutory wait time requirements. The criminal justice training commission must track and report the average wait time for students at the beginning of each class and provide the findings in an annual report to the legislature due in December of each year. Each year, at least two classes must be held in Spokane, two classes must be held in Vancouver, two classes must be held in Arlington, and two classes must be held in Pasco.(3) $1,312,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026, $1,306,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027, and $870,000 of the general fundâprivate/local appropriation are provided solely for the commission to conduct four additional corrections officer academy classes. These classes may be conducted at the corrections officer academy in Burien or at one of the regional training academies, located in Spokane, Pasco, Vancouver, or Arlington.(4) $290,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $290,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for academy training for limited authority Washington peace officers employed by the Washington state gambling commission, Washington state liquor and cannabis board, Washington state parks and recreation commission, department of natural resources, and the office of the insurance commissioner.(a) Up to 30 officers must be admitted to attend the basic law enforcement academy and up to 30 officers must be admitted to attend basic law enforcement equivalency academy.(b) Allocation of the training slots amongst the agencies must be based on the earliest application date to the commission. Training does not need to commence within six months of employment.(c) The state agencies must reimburse the commission for the actual cost of training.(5) $1,598,000 of the death investigations accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the commission to provide 240 hours of medicolegal forensic investigation training to coroners and medical examiners to meet the recommendations of the national commission on forensic science for certification and accreditation.(6) $346,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 is provided solely for implementation of chapter 321, Laws of 2021 (officer duty to intervene).(7) $30,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $30,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for additional grants to local jurisdictions to investigate instances where a purchase or transfer of a firearm was attempted by an individual who is prohibited from owning or possessing a firearm.(8) $2,500,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $2,500,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for the criminal justice training commission to provide grant funding to local law enforcement agencies to support law enforcement wellness programs. Of the amount provided in this subsection:(a) $1,500,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $1,500,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for the commission to provide grants to local law enforcement and corrections agencies for the purpose of establishing officer wellness programs. Grants provided under this subsection may be used for, but not limited to building resilience, injury prevention, peer support programs, physical fitness, proper nutrition, stress management, suicide prevention, and physical or behavioral health services. The commission must consult with a representative from the Washington association of sheriffs and police chiefs and a representative of the Washington state fraternal order of police and the Washington council of police and sheriffs in the development of the grant program.(b) $1,000,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $1,000,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for the Washington association of sheriffs and police chiefs to establish and coordinate an online or mobile-based application for any Washington law enforcement officer; 911 operator or dispatcher; and any other current or retired employee of a Washington law enforcement agency, and their families, to anonymously access on-demand wellness techniques, suicide prevention, resilience, physical fitness, nutrition, and other behavioral health and wellness supports.(9) $2,270,000 of the Washington internet crimes against children accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of chapter 84, Laws of 2015.(10) $5,000,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $5,000,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided to the Washington association of sheriffs and police chiefs solely to verify the address and residency of registered sex offenders and kidnapping offenders under RCW 9A.44.130.(11) $4,000,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $4,000,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for the mental health field response team program administered by the Washington association of sheriffs and police chiefs. The association must distribute $7,000,000 in grants to the phase one, phase two, and phase three regions as outlined in the settlement agreement under Trueblood, et. al. v. Department of Social and Health Services, et. al., U.S. District Court-Western District, Cause No. 14-cv-01178-MJP. The association must submit an annual report to the Governor and appropriate committees of the legislature by September 1st of each year of the biennium. The report shall include best practice recommendations on law enforcement and behavioral health field response and include outcome measures on all grants awarded.(12) $899,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $899,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for crisis intervention training for the phase one, phase two, and phase three regions as outlined in the settlement agreement under Trueblood, et. al. v. Department of Social and Health Services, et. al., U.S. District Court-Western District, Cause No. 14-cv-01178-MJP.(13) $300,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $300,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for the administration of the firearms certificate program. The commission will raise the fees for the program so that revenues collected by the program match these expenditures.(14) $401,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $378,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for additional staff to improve the delays in review and investigation of officer certification complaint cases.(15) $50,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $60,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5356 (criminal justice training). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2025, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.(16) Within existing resources, the commission must produce a report detailing the expenditures of each agency that receives allocations from the Washington auto theft prevention authority account for fiscal year 2023, 2024, and 2025. The report must include documentation of how expenditures were used in accordance with RCW 46.66.080 and recommendations based on outcomes from prior years' expenditures for how funds from the account can be used to most effectively prevent auto theft. The report must be submitted to the office of financial management, the governor, and the legislature by October 1, 2025.(17) $330,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026, $305,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027, and $100,000,000 of the supplemental criminal justice accountâstate appropriation are provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Substitute House Bill No. 2015 (public safety funding). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2025, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 218. FOR THE OFFICE OF INDEPENDENT INVESTIGATIONSGeneral FundâState Appropriation (FY 2026). . . .$14,663,000General FundâState Appropriation (FY 2027). . . .$14,801,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$29,464,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 219. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF LABOR AND INDUSTRIESGeneral FundâState Appropriation (FY 2026). . . .$22,076,000General FundâState Appropriation (FY 2027). . . .$18,363,000General FundâFederal Appropriation. . . .$13,271,000Asbestos AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$641,000Electrical License AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$80,496,000Farm Labor Contractor AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$28,000Opioid Abatement Settlement AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$250,000Worker and Community Right to Know FundâStateAppropriation. . . .$1,164,000Construction Registration Inspection AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$32,435,000Public Works Administration AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$16,462,000Manufactured Home Installation Training AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$470,000Accident AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$471,876,000Accident AccountâFederal Appropriation. . . .$20,183,000Medical Aid AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$441,793,000Medical Aid AccountâFederal Appropriation. . . .$3,960,000Plumbing Certificate AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$3,694,000Pressure Systems Safety AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$5,202,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$1,132,364,000The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) $8,952,000 of the accident accountâstate appropriation and $8,952,000 of the medical aid accountâstate appropriation are provided solely for the labor and industries workers' compensation information system replacement project and is subject to the conditions, limitations, and review provided in section 701 of this act. The department must:(a) Submit quarterly data within 30 calendar days of the end of each quarter on:(i) The quantifiable deliverables accomplished and the amount spent by each deliverable in each of the following subprojects:(A) Business readiness;(B) Change readiness;(C) Commercial off the shelf procurement;(D) Customer access;(E) Program foundations;(F) Independent assessment; and(G) In total by fiscal year;(ii) All of the quantifiable deliverables accomplished by subprojects identified in (a)(i)(A) through (F) of this subsection and in total and the associated expenditures by each deliverable by fiscal month;(iii) The contract full time equivalent charged by subprojects identified in (a)(i)(A) through (F) of this subsection, and in total, compared to the budget spending plan by month for each contracted vendor and what the ensuing contract equivalent budget spending plan by subprojects identified in (a)(i)(A) through (F) of this subsection, and in total, assumes by fiscal month;(iv) The performance metrics by subprojects identified in (a)(i)(A) through (F) of this subsection, and in total, that are currently used, including monthly performance data; and(v) The risks identified independently by at least the quality assurance vendor and Washington technology solutions, and how the project:(A) Has mitigated each risk; and(B) Is working to mitigate each risk, and when it will be mitigated; and(b) Submit the report in (a) of this subsection to fiscal and policy committees of the legislature.(2) $258,000 of the accident accountâstate appropriation and $258,000 of the medical aid accountâstate appropriation are provided solely for the department of labor and industries safety and health assessment research for prevention program to conduct research to prevent the types of work-related injuries that require immediate hospitalization. The department will develop and maintain a tracking system to identify and respond to all immediate in-patient hospitalizations and will examine incidents in defined high-priority areas, as determined from historical data and public priorities. The research must identify and characterize hazardous situations and contributing factors using epidemiological, safety-engineering, and human factors/ergonomics methods. The research must also identify common factors in certain types of workplace injuries that lead to hospitalization. The department must submit a report to the governor and appropriate legislative committees no later than August 30th of each year of the fiscal biennium summarizing work-related immediate hospitalizations and prevention opportunities, actions that employers and workers can take to make workplaces safer, and ways to avoid severe injuries.(3)(a) $1,700,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $1,700,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for grants to promote workforce development in aerospace and aerospace related supply chain industries by: Expanding the number of registered apprenticeships, preapprenticeships, and aerospace-related programs; and providing support for registered apprenticeships or programs in aerospace and aerospace-related supply chain industries.(b) Grants awarded under this section may be used for:(i) Equipment upgrades or new equipment purchases for training purposes;(ii) New training space and lab locations to support capacity needs and expansion of training to veterans and veteran spouses, and underserved populations;(iii) Curriculum development and instructor training for industry experts;(iv) Tuition assistance for degrees in engineering and high-demand degrees that support the aerospace industry; and(v) Funding to increase capacity and availability of child care options for shift work schedules.(c) An entity is eligible to receive a grant under this subsection if it is a nonprofit, nongovernmental, or institution of higher education that provides training opportunities, including apprenticeships, preapprenticeships, preemployment training, aerospace-related degree programs, or incumbent worker training to prepare workers for the aerospace and aerospace-related supply chain industries.(d) The department may use up to 5 percent of these funds for administration of these grants.(4) $500,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $500,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for the crime victims' compensation program to pay for medical exams for suspected victims of domestic violence. Neither the hospital, medical facility, nor victim is to pay for the cost of the medical exam. This funding must not supplant existing funding for sexual assault medical exams. If the cost of medical exams exceeds the funding provided in this subsection, the program shall not reduce the reimbursement rates for medical providers seeking reimbursement for other claimants, and instead the program shall return to paying for domestic violence medical exams after insurance.(5) $250,000 of the opioid abatement settlement accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the department to analyze patients who are maintained on chronic opioids. The department must submit an annual report of its findings to the governor and the appropriate committees of the legislature no later than October 1st of each year of the fiscal biennium. The report shall include analysis of patient data, describing the characteristics of patients who are maintained on chronic opioids and their clinical needs, and a preliminary evaluation of potential interventions to improve care and reduce harms in this population.(6) $1,406,000 of the public works administration accountâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 is provided solely for the final year of system improvements to the prevailing wage program information technology system. This project is subject to the conditions, limitations, and review provided in section 701 of this act.(7) $205,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 is provided solely to continue conducting a four-year retention study of state registered apprentices as provided in chapter 156, Laws of 2022 (apprenticeship programs). The study shall include the collection of data from all apprentices three months into their apprenticeship to understand challenges and barriers they face towards program participation. The aggregate data by trade must be displayed on a publicly available dashboard. Study data must be provided with apprenticeship coordinators to implement an early response to connect apprentices with needed supports. The department shall submit an annual report to the governor and appropriate legislative committees on June 30, 2026, and June 30, 2027.(8) $2,879,000 of the accident accountâstate appropriation and $2,309,000 of the medical aid accountâstate appropriation are provided solely to expand access to worker rights and safety information for workers with limited English proficiency (LEP) through outreach and translation of safety-related information, training, and other materials. $2,000,000 of the amount provided in this subsection is provided solely for grants to community-based organizations to provide workplace rights and safety outreach to underserved workers.(9) $946,000 of the public works administration accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of chapter 342, Laws of 2023 (apprenticeship utilization).(10) $1,072,000 of the accident accountâstate appropriation and $187,000 of the medical aid accountâstate appropriation are provided solely to create an effective information technology solution necessary for the implementation of chapter 145, Laws of 2023 (fire-resistant materials).(11) $200,000 of the medical aid accountâstate appropriation and $200,000 of the accident accountâstate appropriation are provided solely for the staffing of a resolution process for complaints regarding light duty work under Title 51 RCW.(12) $1,044,000 of the accident accountâstate appropriation and $183,000 of the medical accountâstate appropriation are provided solely for implementation of chapter 250, Laws of 2024 (adult entertainment workers).(13) $1,840,000 of the accident accountâstate appropriation and $1,838,000 of the medical aid accountâstate appropriation are provided solely for claims management staffing to expand capacity to reduce claims caseload, effective July 1, 2025.(14) $3,477,000 of the accident accountâstate appropriation and $614,000 of the medical aid accountâstate appropriation are provided solely for wage payment act, retaliation, child labor, and determinations, and fiscal units staffing to expand capacity to conduct timely worker complaint investigations, effective July 1, 2025.(15) $1,495,000 of the construction registration inspection accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of chapter 213, Laws of 2023 (contractor consumer protection).(16) $1,203,000 of the accident accountâstate appropriation and $217,000 of the medical aid accountâstate appropriation are provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5023 (domestic workers). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2025, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.(17) $126,000 of the accident accountâstate appropriation and $24,000 of the medical aid accountâstate appropriation are provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5101 (worker leave/hate crimes). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2025, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.(18) $636,000 of the accident accountâstate appropriation and $113,000 of the medical aid accountâstate appropriation are provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5104 (immigration status coercion). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2025, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.(19) $4,000 of the accident accountâstate appropriation and $1,000 of the medical aid accountâstate appropriation are provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5408 (wage and salary disclosures). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2025, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.(20) $608,000 of the accident accountâstate appropriation and $605,000 of the medical aid accountâstate appropriation are provided solely for implementation of Senate Bill No. 5463 (industrial insurance/duties). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2025, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.(21) $818,000 of the accident accountâstate appropriation and $144,000 of the medical aid accountâstate appropriation are provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5501 (employee driving requirement). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2025, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.(22) $50,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $50,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for a grant to an organization in Pierce county experienced in providing peer-to-peer training to continue implementation of a program aimed at reducing workplace sexual harassment in the agricultural sector. The department may use up to five percent of the amount provided in this subsection for administration of this grant. The organization receiving the grant must:(a) Continue peer-to-peer trainings for farmworkers in Yakima county and expand to provide peer-to-peer trainings for farmworkers in Grant and Benton counties;(b) Support an established network of peer trainings as farmworker leaders, whose primary purpose is to prevent workplace sexual harassment and assault through leadership, education, and other tools; and(c) Share best practices from the peer-to-peer model at a statewide conference for farmworkers, industry representatives, and advocates.(23) $1,213,000 of the accident accountâstate appropriation and $213,000 of the medical aid accountâstate appropriation are provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5217 (pregnancy accommodations). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2025, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.(24) $350,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 is provided solely to support the underground economy task force created in section 906, chapter 376, Laws of 2024.(25) $4,420,000 of the accident accountâstate appropriation and $780,000 of the medical aid accountâstate appropriation are provided solely for the department, in coordination with the Washington state apprenticeship council, to administer, amend, or extend current or new grants to continue the growth of behavioral health apprenticeship programs. Grants may be awarded for provider implementation costs, apprentice tuition and stipend costs, curriculum development, and program administration. Grant awardees must use a minimum of one-half of amounts provided to compensate behavioral health providers for employer implementation costs including mentor wage differentials, related instruction wages, and administrative costs. In awarding this funding, special preference must be given to entities with experience in implementation of behavioral health sector apprenticeships and labor-management partnerships. By June 30, 2027, and June 30, 2028, grantees must report to the department on the number of individuals that were recruited and upskilled in the preceding fiscal year. The department may use up to five percent of the amount provided in this subsection for administration of these grants.(26) $850,000 of the accident accountâstate appropriation and $150,000 of the medical aid accountâstate appropriation are provided solely for the department, in coordination with the Washington state apprenticeship training council, to administer, amend, or extend current or new grants to address the behavioral health workforce shortage through behavioral health preapprenticeship and behavioral health entry level training, including nursing assistant certified programs. Grants may cover program costs including, but not limited to, provider implementation costs, apprentice tuition and stipend costs, curriculum development, and program administration. In awarding this funding, special preference must be given to entities with experience in implementation of behavioral health sector apprenticeships and labor-management partnerships. By June 30, 2026, and June 30, 2027, grantees must report to the department on the number of individuals that were recruited and upskilled in the preceding fiscal year. The department may use up to five percent of the amount provided in this subsection for administration of these grants.(27) $56,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $59,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for implementation of chapter 298, Laws of 2024 (supporting victims of human trafficking and sexual abuse).(28) $250,000 of the medical aid accountâstate appropriation and $250,000 of the accident accountâstate appropriation are provided solely for the department of labor and industries safety and health assessment and research for prevention program to conduct research to address the high injury rates of the janitorial workforce. The research must quantify the physical demands of common janitorial work tasks and assess the safety and health needs of janitorial workers. The research must also identify potential risk factors associated with increased risk of injury in the janitorial workforce and measure workload based on the strain janitorial work tasks place on janitors' bodies. The department must conduct interviews with janitors and their employers to collect information on risk factors, identify the tools, technologies, and methodologies used to complete work, and understand the safety culture and climate of the industry. The department must produce annual progress reports through the year 2025 or until the tools are fully developed and deployed. The annual progress report must be submitted to the governor and legislature by December 1st of each year such report is due.(29) The department shall promptly notify the office of the attorney general upon the receipt of a request from or on behalf of a federal agency or a federal, state, or local law enforcement authority for health care information, as defined in RCW 70.02.010, program eligibility information for individuals, information that may identify a health care provider's or facility's delivery of health care services to noncitizens, or the delivery of protected health care services as defined in RCW 7.115.010 where the request may impact expenditures for such services. The department of labor and industries shall require contracted entities to notify the department of labor and industries promptly upon receipt of a request from a federal agency or law enforcement authority as described in this subsection.(30) $3,774,000 of the accident accountâstate appropriation and $890,000 of the medical aid accountâstate appropriation are provided solely for the creation of an agriculture compliance unit within the division of occupational safety and health. The compliance unit will perform compliance inspections and provide bilingual outreach to agricultural workers and employers.(31) $1,642,000 of the medical aid accountâstate appropriation is provided solely to cover the overhead rent costs to increase the number of labor and industry vocational specialists embedded in WorkSource offices and to implement a comprehensive quality-assurance team to ensure the continuous improvement of vocational services for injured workers through the workers' compensation program.(32) $639,000 of the accident accountâstate appropriation and $157,000 of the medical aid accountâstate appropriation are provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute House Bill No. 1524 (isolated employees). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2025, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.(33) $85,000 of the accident accountâstate appropriation and $15,000 of the medical aid accountâstate appropriation are provided solely for implementation of Substitute House Bill No. 1879 (hospital worker breaks). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2025, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.(34) $1,251,000 of the public works administration accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 1549 (responsible bidder criteria). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2025, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.(35) $197,000 of the electrical license accountâstate appropriation, $136,000 of the accident accountâstate appropriation, and $24,000 of the medical aid accountâstate appropriation are provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Substitute House Bill No. 1533 (specialty electricians). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2025, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.(36) $255,000 of the accident accountâstate appropriation and $254,000 of the medical aid accountâstate appropriation are provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute House Bill No. 1788 (worker's compensation). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2025, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.(37) $1,031,000 of the accident accountâstate appropriation and $180,000 of the medical aid accountâstate appropriation are provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Substitute House Bill No. 1644 (working minor). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2025, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.(38) $269,000 of the accident accountâstate appropriation and $46,000 of the medical aid accountâstate appropriation are provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Substitute House Bill No. 1875 (sick leave/immigration). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2025, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 220. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF VETERANS AFFAIRS(1) The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(a) The department of veterans affairs shall not initiate any services that will require expenditure of state general fund moneys unless expressly authorized in this act or other law. The department may seek, receive, and spend, under RCW 43.79.260 through 43.79.282, federal moneys that are unrelated to the coronavirus response and not anticipated in this act as long as the federal funding does not require expenditure of state moneys for the program in excess of amounts anticipated in this act. If the department receives unanticipated unrestricted federal moneys that are unrelated to the coronavirus response, those moneys must be spent for services authorized in this act or in any other legislation that provides appropriation authority, and an equal amount of appropriated state moneys shall lapse. Upon the lapsing of any moneys under this subsection, the office of financial management shall notify the legislative fiscal committees. As used in this subsection, "unrestricted federal moneys" includes block grants and other funds that federal law does not require to be spent on specifically defined projects or matched on a formula basis by state funds.(b) Each year, there is fluctuation in the revenue collected to support the operation of the state veteran homes. When the department has foreknowledge that revenue will decrease, such as from a loss of census or from the elimination of a program, the legislature expects the department to make reasonable efforts to reduce expenditures in a commensurate manner and to demonstrate that it has made such efforts. In response to any request by the department for general fundâstate appropriation to backfill a loss of revenue, the legislature shall consider the department's efforts in reducing its expenditures in light of known or anticipated decreases to revenues.(2) HEADQUARTERSGeneral FundâState Appropriation (FY 2026). . . .$5,001,000General FundâState Appropriation (FY 2027). . . .$5,031,000Charitable, Educational, Penal, and ReformatoryInstitutions AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$10,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$10,042,000(3) FIELD SERVICESGeneral FundâState Appropriation (FY 2026). . . .$10,759,000General FundâState Appropriation (FY 2027). . . .$11,204,000General FundâFederal Appropriation. . . .$8,834,000General FundâPrivate/Local Appropriation. . . .$6,547,000Veteran Estate Management AccountâPrivate/LocalAppropriation. . . .$719,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$38,063,000The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(a) $1,020,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $900,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for the department to contract for veteran service officers.(i) Of the amounts provided in this subsection (3)(a), $750,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $750,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely to support one veteran service officer position in each of the following counties: Walla Walla, Clallam, Stevens, Asotin, and Skamania.(ii) Of the amounts provided in this subsection (3)(a), $270,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $150,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely to support two veteran service officer positions in Island county.(4) STATE VETERANS HOMES PROGRAMGeneral FundâState Appropriation (FY 2026). . . .$16,710,000General FundâState Appropriation (FY 2027). . . .$17,786,000General FundâFederal Appropriation. . . .$159,652,000General FundâPrivate/Local Appropriation. . . .$21,757,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$215,905,000The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(a) If the department receives additional unanticipated federal resources that are unrelated to the coronavirus response at any point during the remainder of the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium, an equal amount of general fundâstate must be placed in unallotted status so as not to exceed the total appropriation level specified in this subsection. The department may submit as part of the policy level budget submittal documentation required by RCW 43.88.030 a request to maintain the general fundâstate resources that were unallotted as required by this subsection.(b) Appropriations have been adjusted in this section to reflect anticipated changes in state, federal, and local resources as a result of census changes. The department shall incorporate these adjustments in the governor's projected maintenance level budget required in RCW 43.88.030.(5) CEMETERY SERVICESGeneral FundâState Appropriation (FY 2026). . . .$188,000General FundâState Appropriation (FY 2027). . . .$207,000General FundâFederal Appropriation. . . .$1,042,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$1,437,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 221. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH(1) The appropriations to the department of health in this act shall be expended for the programs and in the amounts specified in this act. Appropriations made in this act to the department of health shall initially be allotted as required by this act. Subsequent allotment modifications shall not include transfers of moneys between sections of this act except as expressly provided in this act, nor shall allotment modifications permit moneys that are provided solely for a specified purpose to be used for other than that purpose.(2)(a) The appropriations to the department of health in this act must be expended for the programs and in the amounts specified in this act, except as provided in (i) and (ii) of this subsection (2)(a):(i) After May 1, 2026, unless prohibited by this act, the department may transfer general fundâstate appropriations for fiscal year 2026 among programs and subprograms after approval by the director of the office of financial management. However, the department may not transfer state appropriations that are provided solely for a specified purpose except as expressly provided in (b) of this subsection.(ii) After May 1, 2027, unless prohibited by this act, the department may transfer general fundâstate appropriations for fiscal year 2027 and appropriations for the 2025â2027 fiscal biennium among programs and subprograms after approval by the director of the office of financial management. However, the department may not transfer appropriations that are provided solely for a specified purpose except as expressly provided in (b) of this subsection.(b) To the extent that transfers under (a) of this subsection are insufficient to fund actual expenditures, the department may transfer appropriations that are provided solely for a specified purpose. The department may not transfer funds, and the director of the office of financial management may not approve the transfer, unless the transfer is consistent with the objective of conserving, to the maximum extent possible, the expenditure of state funds. The director of the office of financial management shall notify the appropriate fiscal committees of the legislature in writing seven days prior to approving any allotment modifications or transfers under this subsection. The written notification shall include a narrative explanation and justification of the changes, along with expenditures and allotments by budget unit and appropriation, both before and after any allotment modifications or transfers.(c) Within 30 days after the close of fiscal year 2026, the department must provide the office of financial management and the fiscal committees of the legislature with an accounting of any transfers under this subsection. The accounting shall include a narrative explanation and justification of the changes, along with expenditures and allotments by subprogram and appropriation, both before and after any allotment modifications or transfers. The department must also provide recommendations for revisions to appropriations to better align funding with the new budget structure for the department in this act and to eliminate the need for the transfer authority in future budgets.(3) The department of health shall not initiate any services that will require expenditure of state general fund moneys unless expressly authorized in this act or other law. The department of health and the state board of health shall not implement any new or amended rules pertaining to primary and secondary school facilities until the rules and a final cost estimate have been presented to the legislature, and the legislature has formally funded implementation of the rules through the omnibus appropriations act or by statute. The department may seek, receive, and spend, under RCW 43.79.260 through 43.79.282, federal moneys not anticipated in this act as long as the federal funding does not require expenditure of state moneys for the program in excess of amounts anticipated in this act. If the department receives unanticipated unrestricted federal moneys, those moneys shall be spent for services authorized in this act or in any other legislation that provides appropriation authority, and an equal amount of appropriated state moneys shall lapse. Upon the lapsing of any moneys under this subsection, the office of financial management shall notify the legislative fiscal committees. As used in this subsection, "unrestricted federal moneys" includes block grants and other funds that federal law does not require to be spent on specifically defined projects or matched on a formula basis by state funds.(4) In accordance with RCW 43.70.110 and 71.24.037, the department is authorized to adopt license and certification fees in fiscal years 2026 and 2027 to support the costs of the regulatory program. The department's fee schedule shall have differential rates for providers with proof of accreditation from organizations that the department has determined to have substantially equivalent standards to those of the department, including but not limited to the joint commission on accreditation of health care organizations, the commission on accreditation of rehabilitation facilities, and the council on accreditation. To reflect the reduced costs associated with regulation of accredited programs, the department's fees for organizations with such proof of accreditation must reflect the lower costs of licensing for these programs than for other organizations which are not accredited.(5) Within the amounts appropriated in this act, and in accordance with RCW 70.41.100, the department shall set fees to include the full costs of the performance of inspections pursuant to RCW 70.41.080.(6) In accordance with RCW 43.70.110 and 71.24.037, the department is authorized to adopt fees for the review and approval of mental health and substance use disorder treatment programs in fiscal years 2026 and 2027 as necessary to support the costs of the regulatory program. The department's fee schedule must have differential rates for providers with proof of accreditation from organizations that the department has determined to have substantially equivalent standards to those of the department, including but not limited to the joint commission on accreditation of health care organizations, the commission on accreditation of rehabilitation facilities, and the council on accreditation. To reflect the reduced costs associated with regulation of accredited programs, the department's fees for organizations with such proof of accreditation must reflect the lower cost of licensing for these programs than for other organizations which are not accredited.(7) The health care authority, the health benefit exchange, the department of social and health services, the department of health, the department of corrections, and the department of children, youth, and families shall work together within existing resources to establish the health and human services enterprise coalition (the coalition). The coalition, led by the health care authority, must be a multi-organization collaborative that provides strategic direction and federal funding guidance for projects that have cross-organizational or enterprise impact, including information technology projects that affect organizations within the coalition. Washington technology solutions shall maintain a statewide perspective when collaborating with the coalition to ensure that projects are planned for in a manner that ensures the efficient use of state resources, supports the adoption of a cohesive technology and data architecture, and maximizes federal financial participation. The work of the coalition and any project identified as a coalition project is subject to the conditions, limitations, and review provided in section 701 of this act.(8) Within the amounts appropriated in this act, and in accordance with RCW 43.70.110 and 71.12.470, the department shall set fees to include the full costs of the performance of inspections pursuant to RCW 71.12.485.(9) The department must report to and coordinate with the department of ecology to track expenditures from climate commitment act accounts, as defined and described in RCW 70A.65.300 and chapter 173-446B WAC.(10) The department shall promptly notify the office of the attorney general upon the receipt of a request from or on behalf of a federal agency or a federal, state, or local law enforcement authority for health care information, as defined in RCW 70.02.010, program eligibility information for individuals, information that may identify a health care provider's or facility's delivery of health care services to noncitizens, or the delivery of protected health care services as defined in RCW 7.115.010 where the request may impact expenditures for such services. The department shall require contracted entities to notify the department promptly upon receipt of a request from a federal agency or law enforcement authority as described in this subsection.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 222. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF HEALTHâADMINISTRATIONGeneral FundâState Appropriation (FY 2026). . . .$24,861,000General FundâState Appropriation (FY 2027). . . .$23,978,000General FundâFederal Appropriation. . . .$56,636,000General FundâPrivate/Local Appropriation. . . .$19,121,000Dedicated Cannabis AccountâState Appropriation(FY 2026). . . .$442,000Dedicated Cannabis AccountâState Appropriation(FY 2027). . . .$478,000Climate Commitment AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$587,000Climate Investment AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$137,000Hospital Data Collection AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$103,000Health Professions AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$36,706,000Aquatic Lands Enhancement AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$101,000Emergency Medical Services and Trauma Care SystemsTrust AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$1,623,000Medicaid Fraud Penalty AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$124,000Natural Climate Solutions AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$17,000Safe Drinking Water AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$2,171,000Drinking Water Assistance AccountâFederalAppropriation. . . .$4,637,000Waterworks Operator Certification AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$499,000Drinking Water Assistance Administrative AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$525,000Site Closure AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$33,000Biotoxin AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$290,000Model Toxics Control Operating AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$1,541,000Medical Test Site Licensure AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$869,000Secure Drug Take-Back Program AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$241,000Youth Tobacco and Vapor Products Prevention AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$518,000Public Health Supplemental AccountâPrivate/LocalAppropriation. . . .$512,000Accident AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$65,000Medical Aid AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$8,000Statewide 988 Behavioral Health Crisis Response LineAccountâState Appropriation. . . .$4,646,000Opioid Abatement Settlement AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$6,962,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$188,431,000The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) $1,164,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $1,164,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for the child profile health promotion notification system.(2) $296,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $296,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for the department to maintain the master person index as part of the health and human services coalition master person index initiative.(3) $127,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $127,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for the department to coordinate work related to dementia, including but not limited to:(a) Coordinating dementia-related activities with the department of social and health services, the health care authority, and other state agencies as needed;(b) Implementing recommendations from the dementia action collaborative in the updated state Alzheimer's plan within the department; and(c) Other dementia-related activities as determined by the secretary.(4) $166,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $166,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for community compensation stipends for low-income individuals who participate in priority engagements across the department.(5) $130,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $130,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for staffing to support an office of tribal policy at the department.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 223. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF HEALTHâHEALTH SCIENCESGeneral FundâState Appropriation (FY 2026). . . .$25,569,000General FundâState Appropriation (FY 2027). . . .$26,432,000General FundâFederal Appropriation. . . .$73,411,000General FundâPrivate/Local Appropriation. . . .$44,311,000Drinking Water Assistance AccountâFederalAppropriation. . . .$12,000Biotoxin AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$573,000Model Toxics Control Operating AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$501,000Foundational Public Health Services AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$60,000Opioid Abatement Settlement AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$6,836,000Public Health Supplemental AccountâPrivate/LocalAppropriation. . . .$83,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$177,788,000The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) $85,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $85,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for the department to pass-through to a nonprofit Washington-based organization with expertise in end-of-life care and in chapter 70.245 RCW (death with dignity act), to provide training, outreach, and education to medical professionals, hospice teams, and other Washingtonians, to support the provision of care under chapter 70.245 RCW.(2) $36,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $36,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5163 (child fatalities). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2025, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.(3) $80,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $18,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5093 (pregnancy loss). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2025, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.(4) $76,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 is provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5030 (vital records access). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2025, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 224. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF HEALTHâENVIRONMENTAL PUBLIC HEALTHGeneral FundâState Appropriation (FY 2026). . . .$9,579,000General FundâState Appropriation (FY 2027). . . .$9,707,000General FundâFederal Appropriation. . . .$31,114,000General FundâPrivate/Local Appropriation. . . .$26,883,000Aquatic Lands Enhancement AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$544,000Opioid Abatement Settlement AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$9,000Safe Drinking Water AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$11,212,000Drinking Water Assistance AccountâFederalAppropriation. . . .$22,281,000Waterworks Operator Certification AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$2,432,000Drinking Water Assistance Administrative AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$1,988,000Site Closure AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$167,000Biotoxin AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$976,000Model Toxics Control Operating AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$9,522,000Climate Investment AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$561,000Climate Commitment AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$16,745,000Natural Climate Solutions AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$60,000Accident AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$327,000Medical Aid AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$52,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$144,159,000The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) $416,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $416,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for the department to coordinate with local health jurisdictions to establish and maintain comprehensive group B programs to ensure safe drinking water. These funds shall be used for implementation costs, including continued development and adoption of rules, policies, and procedures; technical assistance; and training.(2) $157,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $157,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for the department to test for lead in child care facilities to prevent child lead exposure and to research, identify, and connect facilities to financial resources available for remediation costs.(3)(a) $4,000,000 of the climate commitment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely to support and administer a workplace health and safety program for workers who are affected by climate impacts, including but not limited to, extreme heat and cold, wildfire smoke, drought, and flooding. This program will focus on workplace health and safety for farmworkers, construction workers, and other workers who face the most risk from climate-related impacts. This amount shall be limited to supporting vulnerable populations in overburdened communities under the climate commitment act as defined in RCW 70A.65.010. Funding shall be provided for:(i) Pass through grants to community-based organizations, tribal governments, and tribal organizations to support workplace health and safety for workers who are burdened by the intersection of their work and climate impacts; and(ii) Procurement and distribution of equipment and resources for workers who are burdened by the intersection of their work and climate impacts directly by the department of health, or through pass-through grants to community-based organizations, tribal governments, and tribal organizations. Equipment and resources may include but are not limited to: Personal protective equipment, other protective or safety clothing for cold and heat, air purifiers for the workplace or worker housing, protection from ticks and mosquitoes, and heating and cooling devices.(b) The department of health, in consultation with the environmental justice council, community groups, and the department of labor and industries, shall evaluate mechanisms to provide workers with financial assistance to cover lost wages or other financial hardships caused by extreme weather events and climate threats.(c) No more than five percent of this funding may be used to administer this grant program.(4) $5,264,000 of the drinking water assistance accountâfederal appropriation is provided solely for the office of drinking water to provide technical assistance, direct engineering support, and construction management to small water systems.(5) $685,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $685,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for the department to assist with access to safe drinking water for homes and businesses with individual wells or small water systems that are contaminated.(6) $1,690,000 of the model toxics control operating accountâstate appropriation is provided solely to implement actions provided in the nitrate water hazard mitigation plan to support safe drinking water in the lower Yakima valley. Implementation of this plan includes, but is not limited to, education and outreach, well testing, and provision of alternate water supplies. The department may contract with local governments, local health jurisdictions, and nonprofit organizations to administer the plan.(7) $362,000 of the model toxics control operating accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for continued implementation of chapter 156, Laws of 2021 (risk-based water standards), to create standards for developers seeking to reuse wastewater in buildings.(8) $7,924,000 of the climate commitment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the department to implement the healthy environment for all act under chapter 70A.02 RCW, including additional staff and support for the environmental justice council and implementation of a community engagement plan.(9)(a) $4,000,000 of the climate commitment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the department to administer capacity grants to tribes and tribal organizations and to overburdened communities and vulnerable populations to provide guidance and input:(i) To agencies and to the environmental justice council on implementation of the healthy environment for all act; and(ii) To the department on updates to the environmental health disparities map.(b) At least 50 percent of the total amount distributed for capacity grants in this subsection must be reserved for grants to tribes and tribal organizations.(c) Funding provided in this subsection may be used for tribes and tribal organizations to hire staff or to contract with consultants to engage in updating the environmental health disparities map or on implementing the healthy environment for all act.(d) The department may use a reasonable amount of funding provided in this subsection to administer the grants.(10) $382,000 of the climate commitment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for one staff to lead cross agency coordination for wildfire and extreme heat emergency management.(11) $1,124,000 of the climate commitment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely to migrate, maintain, and continue community engagement to update the health disparities map and increase operating staff to complete environmental assessments.(12) $160,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $157,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 1232 (private detention facilities). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2025, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.(13) $300,000 of the climate commitment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for grants to King county to address the disproportionate rates of asthma among children who reside within 10 miles of the Seattle-Tacoma international airport by increasing access to community health worker asthma interventions.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 225. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF HEALTHâHEALTH SYSTEMS QUALITY ASSURANCEGeneral FundâState Appropriation (FY 2026). . . .$17,222,000General FundâState Appropriation (FY 2027). . . .$16,432,000General FundâFederal Appropriation. . . .$13,994,000General FundâPrivate/Local Appropriation. . . .$38,997,000Dedicated Cannabis AccountâState Appropriation(FY 2026). . . .$1,038,000Dedicated Cannabis AccountâState Appropriation(FY 2027). . . .$1,062,000Hospital Data Collection AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$502,000Health Professions AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$167,775,000Emergency Medical Services and Trauma Care SystemsTrust AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$8,603,000Medicaid Fraud Penalty AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$23,000Medical Test Site Licensure AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$4,446,000Opioid Abatement Settlement AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$41,000Secure Drug Take-Back Program AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$1,117,000Public Health Supplemental AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$288,000Public Health Supplemental AccountâPrivate/LocalAppropriation. . . .$197,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$271,737,000The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) Within amounts appropriated in this section, the Washington board of nursing must hire sufficient staff to process applications for nursing licenses so that the time required for processing does not exceed seven days.(2) $1,793,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $1,793,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for the ongoing operations and maintenance of the prescription monitoring program maintained by the department.(3) $1,908,000 of the health professions accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the Washington board of nursing for nursing licensure and other regulatory activities.(4) $2,107,000 of the health professions accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementing improvements to licensure processes. Improvements may include, but are not limited to, updating internal policies and procedures, creating web-based tutorials for applicants, updating existing web content for applicants, and researching the feasibility of live chat technology for applicants. In identifying and implementing improvements, the department shall document and incorporate feedback from licensed professionals and utilize continuous quality improvement methodologies.(5) $127,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $127,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for the midwifery licensure and regulatory program to supplement revenue from fees. The department shall charge no more than $525 annually for new or renewed licenses for the midwifery program.(6) $493,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $493,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for three full-time emergency medical technicians and other resources necessary for the Franklin county public hospital district #1 to provide health services as part of medical transport operations services, including services to the Coyote Ridge corrections center.(7)(a) $1,260,000 of the health professions accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the Washington board of nursing to continue to implement virtual nursing assistant training and testing modalities, create an apprenticeship pathway into nursing for nursing assistants, implement rule changes to support a career path for nursing assistants, and collaborate with the workforce training and education coordinating board on a pilot project to transform the culture and practice in long term care settings. The goal of these activities is to expand the nursing workforce for long term care settings.(b) The department must submit a preliminary report regarding the pilot project by September 1, 2025, to the fiscal committees of the legislature regarding:(i) The pilot project, including:(A) Performance metrics and baseline data;(B) Targeted areas for change;(C) Current and planned efforts to address targeted areas;(D) An implementation plan, barriers to implementation, and strategies to address barriers;(E) Nurse participant data; and(F) Anticipated impacts to culture and practices in long term care settings; and(ii) Apprenticeship pathways, including:(A) Performance metrics and baseline data;(B) Targeted areas for change;(C) Current and planned efforts to address targeted areas;(D) An implementation plan, barriers to implementation, and strategies to address barriers;(E) Recruitment strategies; and(F) Nurse participation data, including nurse assistants recruited, participating, and advancing to apprenticeship programs.(c) By September 1, 2026, the department must submit a report to the fiscal committees of the legislature detailing:(i) Progress towards meeting performance metrics;(ii) Completed efforts to address targeted areas;(iii) The work conducted to meet the outlined objectives in this subsection;(iv) The rules that have been updated and amended to support a career path for nursing assistants;(v) The number of participating nurses in the apprenticeship program and current recruiting practices;(vi) A status update on the implementation of the virtual training and testing modalities; and(vii) Any changes to the nursing workforce for long term care settings.(8) $646,000 of the health professions accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for ongoing maintenance of the HEALWA web portal to provide access to health information for health care providers.(9) $219,000 of the health professions accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of House Bill No. 1114 (respiratory care compact). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2025, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.(10) $25,000 of the health professions accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Substitute House Bill No. 1142 (in-home care training). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2025, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.(11) $155,000 of the health professions accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of House Bill No. 1190 (UW health sciences library). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2025, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.(12) $25,000 of the health professions accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Substitute House Bill No. 1720 (community care/Rx assistance). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2025, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.(13) $25,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 is provided solely for implementation of House Bill No. 1722 (secondary career education). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2025, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.(14) $25,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $14,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for implementation of Substitute House Bill No. 1824 (accredited birthing centers). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2025, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.(15) $161,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $159,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 1686 (health care entity registry). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2025, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.(16) $2,955,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $2,955,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for the Washington board of nursing to manage a grant process to incentivize nurses to supervise nursing students in health care settings. The goal of the grant program is to create more clinical placements for nursing students to complete required clinical hours to earn their nursing degree and related licensure.(17) $42,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 is provided solely for the music therapist licensure and regulatory program to supplement revenue from fees.(18) $25,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 is provided solely for the doula licensure and regulatory program to supplement revenue from fees.(19) $515,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $507,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5388 (DOC behavioral health cert.). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2025, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.(20) $25,000 of the health professions accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Senate Bill No. 5672 (home care aide certification). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2025, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.(21) $25,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $67,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5493 (hospital price transparency). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2025, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.(22) $25,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5557 (pregnancy/emerg. treatment). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2025, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.(23) $52,000 of the general fundâprivate/local appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5568 (state health plan). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2025, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.(24) $191,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026, $188,000 of the general fundâprivate/local appropriation, and $214,000 of the health professions accountâstate appropriation are provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5579 (health/contract terminations). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2025, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.(25) For the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium, the department shall exempt a hospital located in Burien, Washington that serves 23 percent medicaid patients from the certificate of need requirement under chapter 70.38 RCW for elective percutaneous coronary interventions.(26) $42,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $42,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for continuation of the rural nursing education program to allow students to remain in rural environments while working towards nursing credentials for the purposes of increasing the nursing workforce in rural critical access hospitals. With the amounts provided, the department shall provide support services to an eight student cohort, which may include tuition vouchers and travel assistance.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 226. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF HEALTHâPREVENTION AND COMMUNITY HEALTHGeneral FundâState Appropriation (FY 2026). . . .$45,021,000General FundâState Appropriation (FY 2027). . . .$44,830,000General FundâFederal Appropriation. . . .$395,004,000General FundâPrivate/Local Appropriation. . . .$63,257,000Dedicated Cannabis AccountâState Appropriation(FY 2026). . . .$11,268,000Dedicated Cannabis AccountâState Appropriation(FY 2027). . . .$11,629,000Youth Tobacco and Vapor Products Prevention AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$2,767,000Statewide 988 Behavioral Health Crisis Response LineAccountâState Appropriation. . . .$51,907,000Opioid Abatement Settlement AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$3,639,000Public Health Supplemental AccountâPrivate/LocalAppropriation. . . .$3,087,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$632,409,000The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) $1,914,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $1,914,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for:(a) Staffing by the department, the department of veterans affairs, and the department of corrections to expand statewide suicide prevention efforts, which efforts include suicide prevention efforts for military service members and veterans and incarcerated persons;(b) A suicide prevention public awareness campaign to provide education regarding the signs of suicide, interventions, and resources for support;(c) Staffing for call centers to support the increased volume of calls to suicide hotlines;(d) Training for first responders to identify and respond to individuals experiencing suicidal ideation;(e) Support for tribal suicide prevention efforts;(f) Strengthening behavioral health and suicide prevention efforts in the agricultural sector;(g) Support for the three priority areas of the governor's challenge regarding identifying suicide risk among service members and their families, increasing the awareness of resources available to service members and their families, and lethal means safety planning;(h) Training for community health workers to include culturally informed training for suicide prevention;(i) Coordination with the office of the superintendent of public instruction;(j) Support for the suicide prevention initiative housed in the University of Washington; and(k) By December 1, 2025, an updated suicide prevention plan, to include a report on completed activities, planned activities, and outcomes from implementation, which shall include, but not be limited to:(i) Trends in suicide among service members, agricultural workers, youth, and incarcerated persons;(ii) Outcomes of implemented public awareness campaigns; and(iii) Outcomes of trainings with first responders, including the number of trainings.(2) $1,477,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $1,477,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for the fruit and vegetable incentives program.(3) $3,834,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $3,834,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for the department to provide grants to support school-based health centers and behavioral health services. The department must develop a plan for the school-based health centers to become financially self-sufficient.(4) $1,098,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $1,098,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for the department to coordinate and lead a multi-agency approach to youth suicide prevention and intervention.(5) $1,690,000 of the opioid abatement settlement accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for prevention, treatment, and recovery support services to remediate the impacts of the opioid epidemic. This funding must be used consistent with conditions of the opioid settlement agreements that direct how funds deposited into the opioid abatement settlement account created in RCW 43.79.483 must be used.(6) $3,500,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $3,500,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for programs and grants to maintain access to abortion care, including but not limited to staffing at the department and grants to providers of abortion care to fund abortion care, workforce retention and recruitment initiatives to ensure continuity of care, training, outreach, and security investments.(7) $513,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $513,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for the early hearing detection, diagnosis, and intervention program.(8) $972,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $972,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for the department to expand the birth equity project with the goal of reducing prenatal and perinatal health disparities.(9) $2,112,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $2,112,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for tobacco, vapor product, and nicotine control, cessation, treatment, and prevention, and other substance use prevention and education, with an emphasis on community-based strategies. These strategies must include programs that consider the disparate impacts of nicotine, specifically flavored nicotine products, addiction on specific populations, including youth, and racial or other disparities.(10) $257,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $257,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely to support health equity zones, as defined in RCW 43.70.595, in identification and implementation of targeted interventions to have a significant impact on health outcomes and health disparities.(11) $3,579,000 of the statewide 988 behavioral health crisis response line accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for behavioral crisis coordination.(12) $369,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 is provided solely as pass-through funding to an organization that specializes in culturally relevant sports programs for indigenous children and adolescents, with the goal of keeping at-risk youth out of the juvenile justice system.(13) $2,662,000 of the opioid abatement settlement accountâstate appropriation is provided solely to launch a tele-buprenorphine hotline that facilitates access to medications for opioid use disorder. This funding must be used consistent with conditions of the opioid settlement agreements that direct how funds deposited into the opioid abatement settlement account created in RCW 43.79.483 must be used.(14) $346,000 of the opioid abatement settlement accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for perinatal opioid use disorder information and services. This funding must be used consistent with conditions of the opioid settlement agreements that direct how funds deposited into the opioid abatement settlement account created in RCW 43.79.483 must be used.(15) $266,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $266,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for the department to operate the universal development screening system.(16)(a) $350,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 is provided solely for the department to establish a stipend program to defray the out-of-pocket expenses incurred by registered nurses completing the training necessary to become adult/adolescent or pediatric sexual assault nurse examiners.(b) Any individual nurse may receive one stipend, the total of which may not exceed $2,500.(c) For purposes of this subsection, "out-of-pocket expenses" include:(i) Fees, tuition, educational materials, or other charges imposed by the entity providing training;(ii) Reasonable travel expenses, including air travel, rental car costs, mileage on a personal vehicle, lodging, and meals; and(iii) Any other expenses deemed appropriate by the department.(17) $1,035,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $1,035,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for the Washington poison center. This funding is provided in addition to funding pursuant to RCW 69.50.540.(18) $72,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $72,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for maintenance of the community health worker platform and continued implementation of the community health worker trainings in the pediatric setting for children with behavioral health needs.(19) $211,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $211,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely to implement the recommendations from the community health workers task force to provide statewide leadership, training, and integration of community health workers with insurers, health care providers, and public health systems.(20) $6,895,000 of the opioid abatement settlement accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the department to expand the distribution of naloxone through the department's overdose education and naloxone distribution program. Funding must be prioritized to fill naloxone access gaps in community behavioral health and other community settings, including providing naloxone to first responders and agency staff in organizations such as syringe service programs, house providers, and street outreach programs.(21)(a) $1,042,000 of the statewide 988 behavioral health crisis response line accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the planning phase of the 988 technology platform implementation project.(b) The department must actively collaborate with Washington technology solutions and the health care authority so that the statewide 988 technology solutions will be coordinated and interoperable.(c) By October 1, 2025, the department must provide an update to legislative fiscal committees with the following details:(i) An identified technology solution, with a list of functionalities and the statutory requirement met by each functionality;(ii) Software, processes, and methods currently used by call centers and designated 988 contact hubs that the proposed technology platform would replace;(iii) The number of call centers and designated 988 contact hubs planning to transition all work processes to the proposed technology platform; and(iv) Identified risks and changes to the schedule and scope of the project.(d) These amounts are subject to the conditions, limitations, and review requirements provided in section 701 of this act.(22) $26,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $26,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5163 (child fatalities). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2025, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.(23) $55,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 is provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5214 (mobile markets). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2025, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.(24) $689,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $689,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for the Snohomish county health department to:(a) Maintain sexually transmitted infection clinical services at the Snohomish county health department and identify opportunities to expand sexual health services provided outside of clinical settings;(b) Conduct research on opportunities to expand jail-based sexual health services;(c) Maintain an epidemiology and technical team;(d) Provide field-based treatment for syphilis; and(e) Maintain an in-house comprehensive, culturally responsive sexual health clinic at the Snohomish county health department.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 227. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF HEALTHâSTATE BOARD OF HEALTHGeneral FundâState Appropriation (FY 2026). . . .$1,711,000General FundâState Appropriation (FY 2027). . . .$1,604,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$3,315,000The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: $124,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Substitute House Bill No. 1946 (local board of health/tribes). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2025, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 228. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF HEALTHâRESILIENCY AND HEALTH SECURITYGeneral FundâState Appropriation (FY 2026). . . .$4,916,000General FundâState Appropriation (FY 2027). . . .$4,873,000General FundâFederal Appropriation. . . .$35,149,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$44,938,000The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: $4,916,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $4,873,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for operation of the statewide medical logistics center. Within these amounts, the department must coordinate with the department of social and health services to develop processes that will minimize the disposal and destruction of personal protective equipment and for interagency distribution of personal protective equipment.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 229. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF HEALTHâHEALTH DATA AND PLANNINGGeneral FundâState Appropriation (FY 2026). . . .$3,473,000General FundâState Appropriation (FY 2027). . . .$3,913,000General FundâFederal Appropriation. . . .$7,148,000General FundâPrivate/Local Appropriation. . . .$947,000Biotoxin AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$5,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$15,486,000The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) $2,786,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $3,156,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely to maintain public health information technology infrastructure in a cloud-based environment.(2) $686,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $757,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely to maintain the WA Health bed tracking and supply database.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 230. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONSThe health care authority, the health benefit exchange, the department of social and health services, the department of health, the department of corrections, and the department of children, youth, and families shall work together within existing resources to establish the health and human services enterprise coalition (the coalition). The coalition, led by the health care authority, must be a multiorganization collaborative that provides strategic direction and federal funding guidance for projects that have cross-organizational or enterprise impact, including information technology projects that affect organizations within the coalition. Washington technology solutions shall maintain a statewide perspective when collaborating with the coalition to ensure that the development of projects identified in this report are planned for in a manner that ensures the efficient use of state resources and maximizes federal financial participation. The work of the coalition and any project identified as a coalition project is subject to the conditions, limitations, and review provided in section 701 of this act.(1) ADMINISTRATION AND SUPPORT SERVICESGeneral FundâState Appropriation (FY 2026). . . .$159,476,000General FundâState Appropriation (FY 2027). . . .$162,022,000General FundâFederal Appropriation. . . .$400,000General FundâPrivate/Local Appropriation. . . .$168,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$322,066,000The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(a) $438,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $438,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for restrictive housing to reduce the use of solitary confinement by increasing correctional staffing, incorporating mental health training, and implementing change to restrictive housing environments.(b) $2,326,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $2,326,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for reentry investments to include reentry and discharge services and staffing to support the iCOACH supervision model. The staffing and resources must provide expanded reentry and discharge services to include, but not limited to, transition services, preemployment testing, enhanced discharge planning, housing voucher assistance, cognitive behavioral interventions, educational programming, health care discharge teams, and community partnership programs.(c) $371,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $371,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for maintenance and operation of the sentencing calculation module for the offender management network information system. Implementation of the sentencing calculation module must result in a reduction of tolling staff within six months of the project implementation date of July 1, 2025, and the department must report this result. In addition, the report must include the budgeted and actual tolling staffing levels by fiscal month beginning with fiscal year 2023 and the count of tolling staff reduced by fiscal month from date of implementation through six months post implementation. The report must be submitted to the senate ways and means and house appropriations committees within 30 calendar days after six months have passed since implementation.(d) $761,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $758,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for the AMEND collaboration and training statewide program administration team and contract.(e) $320,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $324,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for staffing and operational costs to operate the sixth avenue reentry center in Tacoma as a state-run facility.(f) $219,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $227,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for staffing and operational costs to operate the Eleanor Chase reentry center in Spokane as a state-run facility.(g) $319,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $333,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for staffing and operational costs to operate the Brownstone reentry center in Spokane as a state-run facility.(h) Within existing resources, the department must collaborate with the department of children, youth, and families to help them as they develop a juvenile rehabilitation capacity needs assessment model (CNAM) for secure facilities, community residential facilities, and community transition services, as required in section 235(18) of this act, comparable in detail to the capacity needs assessment model that the department of corrections research and analytics team maintains for capacity.(i) $48,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 is provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5093 (pregnancy loss). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2025, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.(j) $19,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 is provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5323 (theft from first responders). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2025, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.(k) $83,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $90,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5388 (DOC behavioral health cert.). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2025, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.(l) $222,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $228,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for implementation of House Bill No. 1068 (DOC WMS employee arbitration). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2025, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.(m) Within existing resources, and based on the budget structure changes in policy transfers included in the 2025-27 biennial omnibus operating budget, the department of corrections must submit the following to the office of financial management and the legislative accountability and evaluation program, by December 31, 2025:(i) A narrative description of changes to include how these changes will affect the availability and understanding of budget and accounting information for policy makers and the public;(ii) A crosswalk that displays details within the affected programs in the existing structure compared to the revised transferred structure;(iii) A comparison of the current structure to the revised transferred structure that must compare the current total estimated biennial expenditures and FTEs for all programs, before and after the changes; and(iv) A comprehensive 10-year restructure of historical data.(2) CORRECTIONAL OPERATIONSGeneral FundâState Appropriation (FY 2026). . . .$785,488,000General FundâState Appropriation (FY 2027). . . .$812,962,000General FundâFederal Appropriation. . . .$4,326,000General FundâPrivate/Local Appropriation. . . .$334,000Climate Commitment AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$577,000Institutional Welfare/Betterment AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$12,000,000Opioid Abatement Settlement AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$469,000Washington Auto Theft Prevention Authority AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$5,214,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$1,621,370,000The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(a) The department may contract for local jail beds statewide to the extent that it is at no net cost to the department. The department shall calculate and report the average cost per offender per day, inclusive of all services, on an annual basis for a facility that is representative of average medium or lower offender costs. The department shall not pay a rate greater than $85 per day per offender excluding the costs of department of corrections provided services, including evidence-based substance abuse programming, dedicated department of corrections classification staff on-site for individualized case management, transportation of offenders to and from department of corrections facilities, and gender responsive training for jail staff. The capacity provided at local correctional facilities must be for offenders whom the department of corrections defines as close medium or lower security offenders. Programming provided for offenders held in local jurisdictions is included in the rate, and details regarding the type and amount of programming, and any conditions regarding transferring offenders must be negotiated with the department as part of any contract. Local jurisdictions must provide health care to offenders that meets standards set by the department. The local jail must provide all medical care including unexpected emergent care. The department must utilize a screening process to ensure that offenders with existing extraordinary medical/mental health needs are not transferred to local jail facilities. If extraordinary medical conditions develop for an inmate while at a jail facility, the jail may transfer the offender back to the department, subject to terms of the negotiated agreement. Health care costs incurred prior to transfer are the responsibility of the jail.(b) $3,500,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $3,500,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for the department of corrections to provide wages and gratuities of no less than $1.00 per hour to incarcerated persons working in class III correctional industries.(c) Within the appropriated amounts in this subsection, the department of corrections must provide a minimum of one dedicated prison rape elimination act compliance specialist at each institution.(d) $284,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $284,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for maintenance and operation of the sentencing calculation module for the offender management network information system. Implementation of the sentencing calculation module must result in a reduction of tolling staff within six months of the project implementation date of July 1, 2025, and the department must report this result. In addition, the report must include the budgeted and actual tolling staffing levels by fiscal month beginning with fiscal year 2023 and the count of tolling staff reduced by fiscal month from date of implementation through six months post implementation. The report must be submitted to the senate ways and means and house appropriations committees within 30 calendar days after six months have passed since implementation.(e) $5,316,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $5,316,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for restrictive housing to reduce the use of solitary confinement by increasing correctional staffing, incorporating mental health training, and implementing change to restrictive housing environments.(f) $2,802,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $2,805,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for the AMEND collaboration and training program.(g) $1,411,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $1,411,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for reentry investments to include state identification cards, reentry and discharge services and staffing to support the iCOACH supervision model. The staffing and resources must provide expanded reentry and discharge services to include, but not limited to, transition services, preemployment testing, enhanced discharge planning, housing voucher assistance, cognitive behavioral interventions, educational programming, health care discharge teams, and community partnership programs.(h) $1,200,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 is provided solely for one-time costs necessary to close Mission Creek corrections center for women.(i) $172,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $230,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for direct variable costs at Washington corrections center for women.(j) $646,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $861,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for the department to maintain the facility, property, and assets at the Mission Creek corrections center for women.(k) $2,262,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $2,949,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for the department to reopen and operate living unit L at the Washington corrections center for women.(l) $195,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 is provided solely for one-time staff relocation costs given the closure of the Mission Creek corrections center for women.(m) The department must report to and coordinate with the department of ecology to track expenditures from climate commitment act accounts, as defined and described in RCW 70A.65.300 and chapter 173-446B WAC.(n) $3,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $3,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5139 (reentry council members). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2025, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.(o) $2,871,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $2,871,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for the department to operate body scanner programs to conduct security screenings for employees, contractors, visitors, volunteers, incarcerated individuals, and other persons entering the secure perimeters at the Washington corrections center for women and the Washington corrections center.(p) $33,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5219 (partial confinement). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2025, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.(3) COMMUNITY SUPERVISIONGeneral FundâState Appropriation (FY 2026). . . .$237,463,000General FundâState Appropriation (FY 2027). . . .$252,309,000General FundâFederal Appropriation. . . .$4,142,000General FundâPrivate/Local Appropriation. . . .$10,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$493,924,000The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(a) The department of corrections shall contract with local and tribal governments for jail capacity to house offenders who violate the terms of their community supervision. A contract rate increase may not exceed five percent each year. The department may negotiate to include medical care of offenders in the contract rate if medical payments conform to the department's offender health plan and pharmacy formulary, and all off-site medical expenses are preapproved by department utilization management staff. If medical care of offender is included in the contract rate, the contract rate may exceed five percent to include the cost of that service. The department shall pay the bed rate for the day of release.(b) The department shall engage in ongoing mitigation strategies to reduce the costs associated with community supervision violators, including improvements in data collection and reporting and alternatives to short-term confinement for low-level violators.(c) $480,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $480,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for maintenance and operation of the sentencing calculation module for the offender management network information system. Implementation of the sentencing calculation module must result in a reduction of tolling staff within six months of the project implementation date of July 1, 2025, and the department must report this result. In addition, the report must include the budgeted and actual tolling staffing levels by fiscal month beginning with fiscal year 2023 and the count of tolling staff reduced by fiscal month from date of implementation through six months post implementation. The report must be submitted to the senate ways and means and house appropriations committees within 30 calendar days after six months have passed since implementation.(d) $110,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $110,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for the AMEND collaboration and training program.(e) $19,027,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $19,027,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for reentry investments to include reentry and discharge services and staffing to support the iCOACH supervision model. The staffing and resources must provide expanded reentry and discharge services to include, but not limited to, transition services, preemployment testing, enhanced discharge planning, housing voucher assistance, cognitive behavioral interventions, educational programming, health care discharge teams, and community partnership programs.(f) $4,011,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $4,057,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for staffing and operational costs to operate the sixth avenue reentry center in Tacoma as a state-run facility.(g) $2,735,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $3,255,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for staffing and operational costs to operate the Eleanor Chase reentry center in Spokane as a state-run facility.(h) $3,465,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $4,257,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for staffing and operational costs to operate the Brownstone reentry center in Spokane as a state-run facility.(i) $385,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $577,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for the department to maintain the facility, property, and assets at the Ahtanum view reentry center in Yakima.(j) $238,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $357,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for the department to maintain the facility, property, and assets at the Peninsula reentry center in Port Orchard.(k) $238,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $357,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for the department to maintain the facility, property, and assets at the Tri-Cities reentry center in Kennewick.(l) $252,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5219 (partial confinement). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2025, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.(4) CORRECTIONAL INDUSTRIESGeneral FundâState Appropriation (FY 2026). . . .$4,653,000General FundâState Appropriation (FY 2027). . . .$9,696,000General FundâFederal Appropriation. . . .$600,000General FundâPrivate/Local Appropriation. . . .$1,034,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$15,983,000(5) INTERAGENCY PAYMENTSGeneral FundâState Appropriation (FY 2026). . . .$72,125,000General FundâState Appropriation (FY 2027). . . .$63,129,000Opioid Abatement Settlement AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$50,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$135,304,000The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following conditions and limitations: $10,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $10,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5388 (DOC behavioral health cert.). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2025, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.(6) OFFENDER CHANGEGeneral FundâState Appropriation (FY 2026). . . .$89,407,000General FundâState Appropriation (FY 2027). . . .$91,651,000General FundâFederal Appropriation. . . .$1,436,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$182,494,000The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(a) The department of corrections shall use funds appropriated in this subsection (6) for programming for incarcerated individuals. The department shall develop and implement a written comprehensive plan for programming for incarcerated individuals that prioritizes programs which follow the risk-needs-responsivity model, are evidence-based, and have measurable outcomes. The department is authorized to discontinue ineffective programs and to repurpose underspent funds according to the priorities in the written plan.(b) The department of corrections shall collaborate with the state health care authority to explore ways to utilize federal medicaid funds as a match to fund residential substance use disorder treatment-based alternative beds under RCW 9.94A.664 under the drug offender sentencing alternative program and residential substance use disorder treatment beds that serve individuals on community custody.(c) $11,629,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $11,629,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for expanded reentry investments to include, but not be limited to, transition services, preemployment testing, enhanced discharge planning, housing voucher assistance, cognitive behavioral interventions, educational programming, health care discharge teams, and community partnership programs.(d) Within existing resources, the department of corrections may provide reentry support items such as disposable cell phones, prepaid phone cards, hygiene kits, housing vouchers, and release medications associated with individuals resentenced or ordered released from confinement as a result of policies or court decisions including, but not limited to, the State v. Blake decision.(e) $122,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $122,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for work on reentry 2030, continued internal and cross agency reentry collaboration, and work on the state's medicaid 1115 transformation waiver impacts to the department.(f) $268,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $357,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for education services for incarcerated individuals in living unit L of the Washington corrections center for women.(g) $450,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $601,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for substance use staffing and treatment for incarcerated individuals in living unit L at the Washington corrections center for women.(h) $176,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $180,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5388 (DOC behavioral health cert.). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2025, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.(i) $424,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $424,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for the department to operate body scanner programs to conduct security screenings for employees, contractors, visitors, volunteers, incarcerated individuals, and other persons entering the secure perimeters at the Washington corrections center for women and the Washington corrections center.(7) HEALTH CARE SERVICESGeneral FundâState Appropriation (FY 2026). . . .$270,784,000General FundâState Appropriation (FY 2027). . . .$275,569,000General FundâFederal Appropriation. . . .$6,720,000General FundâPrivate/Local Appropriation. . . .$2,000Opioid Abatement Settlement AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$8,916,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$561,991,000The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(a) The state prison medical facilities may use funds appropriated in this subsection to purchase goods, supplies, and services through hospital or other group purchasing organizations when it is cost effective to do so.(b) $13,605,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $13,605,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for medical staffing in prisons for patient centered care and behavioral health care. Funding must be used to increase access to care, addiction care, and expanded screening of individuals in prison facilities to include chronic illnesses, infectious disease, diabetes, heart disease, serious mental health, and behavioral health services.(c) $2,238,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $2,238,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for restrictive housing to reduce the use of solitary confinement by increasing correctional staffing, incorporating mental health training, and implementing change to restrictive housing environments.(d) $441,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $441,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for the AMEND collaboration and training program.(e) $3,308,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $3,326,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for reentry investments to include reentry and discharge services and staffing to support the iCOACH supervision model. The staffing and resources must provide expanded reentry and discharge services to include, but not limited to, transition services, enhanced health care discharge planning, case management, health care discharge teams, and evaluation of physical health and behavioral health.(f) $8,916,000 of the opioid abatement settlement accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for opioid treatment for individuals in the department of corrections' custody on full confinement. This funding is provided:(i) Solely for medication for the treatment of opioid use disorder of incarcerated individuals; and(ii) To ensure each and every single individual transferring into the department of corrections' custody on full confinement is provided medications for opioid use disorder if they were on medications for opioid use disorder in jail or out of custody prior to their transfer to the department of corrections.(g) $1,784,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $1,784,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for medication for the treatment of opioid use disorder to ensure each and every single individual transferring into the department of corrections' custody on full confinement is provided medications for opioid use disorder if they were on medications for opioid use disorder in jail or out of custody prior to their transfer to the department of corrections.(h)(i) $2,505,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 is provided solely for the statewide electronic health records solution and is subject to the conditions, limitations, and review requirements of section 701 of this act. The federal match for the department is appropriated to the health care authority, see section 211(60) of this act.(ii) The statewide electronic health records solution must use an agile development model holding live demonstrations of functioning software, developed using incremental user research, held at the end of two-week sprints.(iii) The statewide electronic health records solution must be capable of being continually updated, as necessary.(iv)(A) The department must collaborate with the department of social and health services and the health care authority and, as a team, must work to successfully meet budget, scope, and schedule for the statewide electronic health records solution.(B) Beginning July 1, 2025, the department of corrections agency project team shall provide necessary updates to the health care authority foundational project team for the statewide electronic health records solution within 15 calendar days of the end of each fiscal quarter.(C) The information provided to the health care authority shall include how funding was spent compared to the budget spending plan for the prior quarter by fiscal month and what the next quarter budget will be by fiscal month.(D) The requirements of the quarterly report are listed in section 211(58) of this act.(i) $159,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $212,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for direct variable costs at Washington corrections center for women.(j) $247,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $329,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for the department to reopen and operate living unit L at the Washington corrections center for women.(k) $1,612,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $1,612,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for the department to operate body scanner programs to conduct security screenings for employees, contractors, visitors, volunteers, incarcerated individuals, and other persons entering the secure perimeters at the Washington corrections center for women and the Washington corrections center.(l) The department of corrections shall promptly notify the office of the attorney general upon the receipt of a request from or on behalf of a federal agency or a federal, state, or local law enforcement authority for health care information, as defined in RCW 70.02.010, program eligibility information for individuals, information that may identify a health care provider's or facility's delivery of health care services to noncitizens, or the delivery of protected health care services as defined in RCW 7.115.010 where the request may impact expenditures for such services. The department of corrections shall require contracted entities to notify the department of corrections promptly upon receipt of a request from a federal agency or law enforcement authority as described in this subsection.(m) $451,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $468,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5388 (DOC behavioral health cert.). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2025, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 231. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SERVICES FOR THE BLINDGeneral FundâState Appropriation (FY 2026). . . .$5,820,000General FundâState Appropriation (FY 2027). . . .$6,060,000General FundâFederal Appropriation. . . .$29,824,000General FundâPrivate/Local Appropriation. . . .$68,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$41,772,000The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: $99,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $99,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for grants to federally recognized tribes of Washington to support culturally appropriate vocational rehabilitation services, independent living, youth supports, and adaptive technologies for tribal members who are blind, low-visioned, or deaf-blind.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 232. FOR THE EMPLOYMENT SECURITY DEPARTMENTGeneral FundâState Appropriation (FY 2026). . . .$18,000General FundâFederal Appropriation. . . .$180,070,000General FundâPrivate/Local Appropriation. . . .$38,716,000Unemployment Compensation Administration AccountâFederal Appropriation. . . .$307,077,000Administrative Contingency AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$44,230,000Employment Service Administrative AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$126,348,000Family and Medical Leave Insurance AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$192,400,000Long-Term Services and Supports Trust AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$49,760,000Workforce Education Investment AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$26,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$938,645,000The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) The department is directed to maximize the use of federal funds. The department must update its budget annually to align expenditures with anticipated changes in projected revenues.(2) $6,397,000 of the long-term services and supports trust accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of the long-term services and support trust program information technology project and is subject to the conditions, limitations, and review provided in section 701 of this act.(3) Within existing resources, the department must reassess its ongoing staffing and funding needs for the paid family medical leave program and submit documentation of the updated need to the governor and appropriate committees of the legislature by October 1st of each fiscal year.(4) Within existing resources, the department shall report the following to the legislature and the governor by October 15th of each fiscal year:(a) An inventory of the department's programs, services, and activities, identifying federal, state, and other funding sources for each;(b) Federal grants received by the department, segregated by line of business or activity, for the most recent five fiscal years, and the applicable rules;(c) State funding available to the department, segregated by line of business or activity, for the most recent five fiscal years;(d) A history of staffing levels by line of business or activity, identifying sources of state or federal funding, for the most recent five fiscal years;(e) A projected spending plan for the employment services administrative account and the administrative contingency account. The spending plan must include forecasted revenues and estimated expenditures under various economic scenarios.(5) $4,684,000 of the administrative contingency accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for career connected learning grants as provided in RCW 28C.30.050, including sector intermediary grants, technical assistance and support grants, and administrative expenses associated with grant administration.(6)(a) $9,154,000 of the employment service administrative accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the replacement of the WorkSource integrated technology platform. The replacement system must support the workforce administration statewide to ensure adoption of the United States department of labor's integrated service delivery model and program performance requirements for the state's workforce innovation and opportunity act and other federal grants. This subsection is subject to the conditions, limitations, and review provided in section 701 of this act.(b) $5,938,000 of the employment service administrative accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the maintenance and operations of the WorkSource integrated technology project.(7) $12,338,000 of the employment services administrative accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of the economic services for all programs as defined in chapter 92, Laws of 2024. The department must collect quarterly data on the number of participants that participate in the economic security for all program, the costs associated with career, training, and other support services provided by category, including, but not limited to, child care, housing, transportation, and car repair, and progress made towards self-sufficiency. The department must provide a report to the governor and the legislature by December 1, 2026, that includes an analysis of the program, a detailed summary of the quarterly data collected, and associated recommendations for program delivery.(8) $3,826,000 of the employment services administration accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the continuation of the office of agricultural and seasonal workforce services.(9) $280,000 of the administrative contingency accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for one full-time employee to provide casework on behalf of constituents who contact their legislators to escalate unresolved claims.(10)(a) $7,792,000 of the administrative contingency accountâstate appropriation and $14,470,000 of the employment service administrative accountâstate appropriation are provided solely to address a projected shortfall of federal revenue that supports the administration of the unemployment insurance program.(b) The department must submit a report no later than November 1st of each year in the fiscal biennium to the governor and the appropriate committees of the legislature outlining how the funding in (a) of this subsection is being utilized and recommendations for long-term solutions to address future decreases in federal funding.(11) $10,823,000 of the family and medical leave insurance accountâstate appropriation is provided solely to increase staffing for the paid family and medical leave program to process claims and respond to customer and employer inquiries in a timely manner.(12) $8,966,000 of the family and medical leave insurance accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for information technology staffing to complete system enhancements for any remaining statutorily required components of the paid family and medical leave program, including, but not limited to, the establishment and collection of overpayments, crossmatching eligibility with other programs, and elective coverage for tribes. This subsection is subject to the conditions, limitations, and review provided in section 701 of this act.(13) $5,074,000 of the long-term services and supports trust accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of chapter 120, Laws of 2024 (LTSS trust access). This subsection is subject to the conditions, limitations, and review provided in section 701 of this act.(14) $500,000 of the unemployment compensation administration accountâfederal appropriation is provided solely for the department to contract with a vendor to evaluate current unemployment insurance technology systems and to produce a comprehensive roadmap that addresses system challenges, makes recommendations for future enhancements, and identifies costs associated with the recommendations. If the department does not receive adequate funding form the United States department of labor to cover these costs, the department may use funding made available to the state through section 903 (d), (f), and (g) of the social security act (Reed act) in an amount not to exceed the amount provided in this subsection. This subsection is subject to the conditions, limitations, and review provided in section 701 of this act.(15) Within existing resources, the department must submit a report to the legislature and the governor by September 12, 2026, that provides an analysis of unemployment insurance fraud, strategies deployed to address fraud including those that reduce the false-positive rate, percentage of fraudulent issues identified to claims filed and the average number of days to resolve, alternative approaches that the department could consider along with potential benefits, risks, and costs, and the necessary staffing levels to address fraudulent claims.(16) $11,156,000 of the employment services administrative accountâstate appropriation is provided solely to increase staffing for the unemployment insurance program to process claims and respond to customer inquiries in a timely manner and to maintain unemployment insurance ambassadors.(17) $852,000 of the employment services administrative accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5041 (unemp ins/strikes & lockouts). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2025, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.(18) $30,000 of the family and medical leave insurance accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5191 (dockworkers/PFML premiums). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2025, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.(19) $9,606,000 of the long-term services and supports trust accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5291 (long-term services trust). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2025, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.(20) $556,000 of the employment services administrative accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5525 (business closures & layoffs). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2025, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.(21) $51,000 of the employment service administrative accountâstate appropriation is provided solely to support the underground economy task force created in section 906, chapter 376, Laws of 2024.(22) $4,936,000 of the family and medical leave insurance accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 1213 (paid family & medical leave). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2025, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.(23) $1,000,000 of the administrative contingency accountâstate appropriation is provided solely to improve access to the unemployment insurance program to underserved communities by expanding the use of navigators within community-based organizations. At a minimum, $684,000 of the amount shall be used to contract with community-based organizations to raise awareness of the unemployment insurance program and help individuals navigate the application process.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 233. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CHILDREN, YOUTH, AND FAMILIESâGENERAL(1) The appropriations to the department of children, youth, and families in this act shall be expended for the programs and in the amounts specified in this act. Appropriations made in this act to the department of children, youth, and families shall initially be allotted as required by this act. The department shall seek approval from the office of financial management prior to transferring moneys between sections of this act except as expressly provided in this act. Subsequent allotment modifications shall not include transfers of moneys between sections of this act except as expressly provided in this act, nor shall allotment modifications permit moneys that are provided solely for a specified purpose to be used for other than that purpose.(2) The health care authority, the health benefit exchange, the department of social and health services, the department of health, the department of corrections, and the department of children, youth, and families shall work together within existing resources to establish the health and human services enterprise coalition (the coalition). The coalition, led by the health care authority, must be a multi-organization collaborative that provides strategic direction and federal funding guidance for projects that have cross-organizational or enterprise impact, including information technology projects that affect organizations within the coalition. Washington technology solutions shall maintain a statewide perspective when collaborating with the coalition to ensure that projects are planned for in a manner that ensures the efficient use of state resources, supports the adoption of a cohesive technology and data architecture, and maximizes federal financial participation.(3) Information technology projects or investments and proposed projects or investments impacting time capture, payroll and payment processes and systems, eligibility, case management, and authorization systems within the department are subject to technical oversight by Washington technology solutions.(4) The department of children, youth, and families shall promptly notify the office of the attorney general upon the receipt of a request from or on behalf of a federal agency or a federal, state, or local law enforcement authority for health care information, as defined in RCW 70.02.010, program eligibility information for individuals, information that may identify a health care provider's or facility's delivery of health care services to noncitizens, or the delivery of protected health care services as defined in RCW 7.115.010 where the request may impact expenditures for such services. The department shall require contracted entities to notify the department promptly upon receipt of a request from a federal agency or law enforcement authority as described in this subsection.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 234. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CHILDREN, YOUTH, AND FAMILIESâCHILDREN AND FAMILIES SERVICES PROGRAMGeneral FundâState Appropriation (FY 2026). . . .$539,542,000General FundâState Appropriation (FY 2027). . . .$547,301,000General FundâFederal Appropriation. . . .$519,549,000General FundâPrivate/Local Appropriation. . . .$2,824,000Opioid Abatement Settlement AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$3,888,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$1,613,104,000The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) $579,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026, $579,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027, and $110,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely for a receiving care center east of the Cascade mountains.(2) $453,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $453,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for the costs of hub home foster and kinship families that provide a foster care delivery model that includes a hub home. Use of the hub home model is intended to support foster parent retention, provide support to biological families, improve child outcomes, and encourage the least restrictive community placements for children in out-of-home care.(3) $1,620,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $1,620,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for services provided through children's advocacy centers.(4) In each fiscal year, the department shall provide a tracking report for social service specialists and corresponding social services support staff to the office of financial management, and the appropriate policy and fiscal committees of the legislature. The report shall detail continued implementation of the targeted 1:18 caseload ratio standard for child and family welfare services caseload-carrying staff and targeted 1:8 caseload ratio standard for child protection services caseload carrying staff. To the extent to which the information is available, the report shall include the following information identified separately for social service specialists doing case management work, supervisory work, and administrative support staff, and identified separately by job duty or program, including but not limited to intake, child protective services investigations, child protective services family assessment response, and child and family welfare services:(a) Total full-time equivalent employee authority, allotments and expenditures by region, office, classification, and band, and job duty or program;(b) Vacancy rates by region, office, and classification and band; and(c) Average length of employment with the department, and when applicable, the date of exit for staff exiting employment with the department by region, office, classification and band, and job duty or program.(5) $94,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $94,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for a contract with a child advocacy center in Spokane to provide continuum of care services for children who have experienced abuse or neglect and their families.(6)(a) $539,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026, $540,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027, $656,000 of the general fundâprivate/local appropriation, and $252,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely for a contract with an educational advocacy provider with expertise in foster care educational outreach. The amounts in this subsection are provided solely for contracted education coordinators to assist foster children in succeeding in K-12 and higher education systems and to assure a focus on education during the department's transition to performance-based contracts. Funding must be prioritized to regions with high numbers of foster care youth, regions where backlogs of youth that have formerly requested educational outreach services exist, or youth with high educational needs. The department is encouraged to use private matching funds to maintain educational advocacy services.(b) The department shall contract with the office of the superintendent of public instruction, which in turn shall contract with a nongovernmental entity or entities to provide educational advocacy services pursuant to RCW 28A.300.590.(7) For purposes of meeting the state's maintenance of effort for the state supplemental payment program, the department of children, youth, and families shall track and report to the department of social and health services the monthly state supplemental payment amounts attributable to foster care children who meet eligibility requirements specified in the state supplemental payment state plan. Such expenditures must equal at least $3,100,000 annually and may not be claimed toward any other federal maintenance of effort requirement. Annual state supplemental payment expenditure targets must continue to be established by the department of social and health services. Attributable amounts must be communicated by the department of children, youth, and families to the department of social and health services on a monthly basis.(8) $197,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $197,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for the department to conduct biennial inspections and certifications of facilities, both overnight and day shelters, that serve those who are under 18 years old and are homeless.(9)(a) $7,106,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026, $7,106,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027, and $1,188,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely for the department to operate emergent placement and enhanced emergent placement contracts.(b) The department shall not include the costs to operate emergent placement contracts in the calculations for family foster home maintenance payments and shall submit as part of the budget submittal documentation required by RCW 43.88.030 any costs associated with increases in the number of emergent placement contract beds after the effective date of this section that cannot be sustained within existing appropriations.(10) The department must provide semiannual reports to the governor and appropriate legislative committees that includes the number of in-state behavioral rehabilitation services providers and licensed beds, the number of out-of-state behavioral rehabilitation services placements, and a comparison of these numbers to the same metrics expressed as an average over the prior six months. The report shall identify separately beds with the enhanced behavioral rehabilitation services rate. To the extent the information is available, the report shall include the same information for emergency placement services beds and enhanced emergency placement services beds.(11) $250,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $250,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for implementing the supportive visitation model that utilizes trained visit navigators to provide a structured and positive visitation experience for children and their parents.(12) $600,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $600,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for enhanced adoption placement services for legally free children in state custody, through a partnership with a national nonprofit organization with private matching funds. These funds must supplement, but not supplant, the work of the department to secure permanent adoptive homes for children with high needs.(13) The department of children, youth, and families shall make foster care maintenance payments to programs where children are placed with a parent in a residential program for substance abuse treatment. These maintenance payments are considered foster care maintenance payments for purposes of forecasting and budgeting at maintenance level as required by RCW 43.88.058.(14) If the department receives an allocation of federal funding through an unanticipated receipt, the department shall not expend more than what was approved or for another purpose than what was approved by the governor through the unanticipated receipt process pursuant to RCW 43.79.280.(15) $2,000,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $2,000,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for the department to contract with one or more nonprofit, nongovernmental organizations to purchase and deliver concrete goods to low-income families.(16) $2,400,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $2,400,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for implementation of performance-based contracts for family support and related services pursuant to RCW 74.13B.020.(17) The department will only refer child welfare cases to the department of social and health services division of child support enforcement when the court has found a child to have been abandoned by their parent or guardian as defined in RCW 13.34.030.(18) The department shall collaborate with the department of social and health services to identify, place, and assist in the voluntary transition of adolescents aged 13 and older who have complex developmental disabilities, intellectual disabilities, or autism spectrum disorder, alongside potential mental health or substance use diagnoses, into a leased facility for specialized residential treatment at Lake Burien operated by the department of social and health services. The partnership is dedicated to transitioning individuals to community-based settings in a seamless and voluntary manner that emphasizes care in less restrictive community-based environments.(19) $9,376,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026, $8,709,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027, and $512,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely for the phase-in of the settlement agreement under D.S. et al. v. Department of Children, Youth, and Families et al., United States district court for the western district of Washington, cause no. 2:21-cv-00113-BJR. The department must implement the provisions of the settlement agreement pursuant to the timeline and implementation plan provided for under the settlement agreement. This includes implementing provisions related to the emerging adulthood housing program, statewide hub home model, emergent facility-based receiving care resources, and exceptional placement costs. To comply with the settlement agreement, funding in this subsection is provided as follows:(a) $1,576,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $1,576,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for the emerging adulthood housing program.(b) $245,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 is provided solely for the statewide hub home model. The department shall develop and adapt the existing hub home model to serve youth as described in the settlement agreement.(c) $5,959,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $7,016,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for emergent facility-based receiving care resources.(d) $1,474,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $428,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely for exceptional placement costs.(e) $122,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026, $117,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027, and $84,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely for continuous quality improvement.(20) $6,696,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026, $6,696,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027, and $2,940,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely for contracted visitation services for children in temporary out-of-home care. Funding is provided to reimburse providers for certain uncompensated services, which may include work associated with missed or canceled visits.(21) $375,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026, $375,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027, and $112,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely for the department to develop, implement, and expand strategies to improve the capacity, reliability, and effectiveness of contracted visitation services for children in temporary out-of-home care and their parents and siblings. Strategies may include, but are not limited to, increasing mileage reimbursement for providers, offering transportation-only contract options, and mechanisms to reduce the level of parent-child supervision when doing so is in the best interest of the child. The department shall report to the office of financial management and the relevant fiscal and policy committees of the legislature regarding these strategies by September 1, 2025. The report shall include the number and percentage of parents requiring supervised visitation and the number and percentage of parents with unsupervised visitation, prior to reunification.(22) $2,351,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $2,351,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for a grant to a nonprofit organization in Spokane that has experience administering a family-centered drug treatment and housing program for families experiencing substance use disorder. As a requirement for receiving this funding, the nonprofit organization must provide an annual report to the governor and the department that includes, but is not limited to, the following information: Number of children and families served each month, number of families that entered and exited the program each month, and a comprehensive budget for all costs incurred by the program.(23) $300,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $300,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for implementation of Substitute House Bill No. 1509 (family reconciliation). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2025, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.(24) Funding in this section is sufficient to maintain rates paid to family preservation services providers.(25) $412,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026, $365,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027, and $112,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely for an evidence-based program that is used to help tribal families reunite with their children.(26) $50,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 is provided solely for the department to convene a work group for the purpose of examining the rights of foster youth, methods of communicating these rights to foster youth, and providing recommendations to the legislature regarding these rights, by December 1, 2025, and in compliance with RCW 43.01.036. Members of the work group shall, at a minimum, include current or former foster youth, and organizations representing current or former foster youth.(27) $100,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $100,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely to contract for the operation of one pediatric interim care center. The center shall provide residential care for up to 13 children through two years of age. Seventy-five percent of the children served by the center must be in need of special care as a result of substance abuse by their mothers. The center shall also provide onsite training to biological, adoptive, or foster parents. The center shall provide at least three months of consultation and support to the parents accepting placement of children from the center. The center may recruit new and current foster and adoptive parents for infants served by the center. The department shall not require case management as a condition of the contract.(28) $124,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026, $124,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027, and $60,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely for implementation of Substitute House Bill No. 1272 (children in crisis program). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2025, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 235. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CHILDREN, YOUTH, AND FAMILIESâJUVENILE REHABILITATION PROGRAMGeneral FundâState Appropriation (FY 2026). . . .$183,158,000General FundâState Appropriation (FY 2027). . . .$180,765,000General FundâFederal Appropriation. . . .$720,000General FundâPrivate/Local Appropriation. . . .$28,000Opioid Abatement Settlement AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$652,000Washington Auto Theft Prevention Authority AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$196,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$365,519,000The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) $2,841,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $2,841,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for grants to county juvenile courts for effective, community-based programs that are culturally relevant, research-informed, and focused on supporting positive youth development, not just reducing recidivism. Additional funding for this purpose is provided through an interagency agreement with the health care authority. County juvenile courts shall apply to the department of children, youth, and families for funding for program-specific participation and the department shall provide grants to the courts consistent with the per-participant treatment costs identified by the institute. The block grant oversight committee, in consultation with the Washington state institute for public policy, shall identify effective, community-based programs that are culturally relevant, research-informed, and focused on supporting positive youth development to receive funding.(2) $1,537,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $1,537,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for expansion of the juvenile justice treatments and therapies in the department of children, youth, and families. The juvenile rehabilitation evidence-based expansion committee, in consultation with the Washington state institute for public policy, will work with community expert partners to identify culturally relevant and research-informed programs for prevention and intervention services. These programs will include principles of positive youth development, healing centered engagement, or peer centered approaches that holistically benefit young people, or all three principles. The department may concentrate delivery of these treatments and therapies at a limited number of programs to deliver the treatments in a cost-effective manner.(3)(a) $8,198,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $8,198,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely to implement evidence- and research-based programs through community juvenile accountability grants, administration of the grants, and evaluations of programs funded by the grants. In addition to funding provided in this subsection, funding to implement alcohol and substance abuse treatment programs for locally committed offenders is provided through an interagency agreement with the health care authority.(b) The department of children, youth, and families shall administer a block grant to county juvenile courts for the purpose of serving youth as defined in RCW 13.40.510(4)(a) in the county juvenile justice system. Funds dedicated to the block grant include: Consolidated juvenile service funds, community juvenile accountability act grants, chemical dependency/mental health disposition alternative, and suspended disposition alternative. The department of children, youth, and families shall follow the following formula and must prioritize evidence-based programs and disposition alternatives and take into account juvenile courts program-eligible youth in conjunction with the number of youth served in each approved evidence-based program or disposition alternative: (i) Thirty-seven and one-half percent for the at-risk population of youth ten to seventeen years old; (ii) fifteen percent for the assessment of low, moderate, and high-risk youth; (iii) twenty-five percent for evidence-based program participation; (iv) seventeen and one-half percent for minority populations; (v) three percent for the chemical dependency and mental health disposition alternative; and (vi) two percent for the suspended dispositional alternatives. Funding for the special sex offender disposition alternative shall not be included in the block grant, but allocated on the average daily population in juvenile courts. Funding for the evidence-based expansion grants shall be excluded from the block grant formula. Funds may be used for promising practices when approved by the department of children, youth, and families and juvenile courts, through the community juvenile accountability act committee, based on the criteria established in consultation with Washington state institute for public policy and the juvenile courts.(c) The department of children, youth, and families and the juvenile courts shall establish a block grant funding formula oversight committee with equal representation from the department of children, youth, and families and the juvenile courts. The purpose of this committee is to assess the ongoing implementation of the block grant funding formula, utilizing data-driven decision making and the most current available information. The committee will be co-chaired by the department of children, youth, and families and the juvenile courts, who will also have the ability to change members of the committee as needed to achieve its purpose. The committee may make changes to the formula categories in (b) of this subsection if it determines the changes will increase statewide service delivery or effectiveness of evidence-based program or disposition alternative resulting in increased cost/benefit savings to the state, including long-term cost/benefit savings. The committee must also consider these outcomes in determining when evidence-based expansion or special sex offender disposition alternative funds should be included in the block grant or left separate.(d) The juvenile courts and administrative office of the courts must collect and distribute information and provide access to the data systems to the department of children, youth, and families and the Washington state institute for public policy related to program and outcome data. The department of children, youth, and families and the juvenile courts must work collaboratively to develop program outcomes that reinforce the greatest cost/benefit to the state in the implementation of evidence-based practices and disposition alternatives.(4) $808,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $808,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for funding of the teamchild project.(5) $500,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $500,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for a grant program focused on criminal street gang prevention and intervention. The department of children, youth, and families may award grants under this subsection. The department of children, youth, and families shall give priority to applicants who have demonstrated the greatest problems with criminal street gangs. Applicants composed of, at a minimum, one or more local governmental entities and one or more nonprofit, nongovernmental organizations that have a documented history of creating and administering effective criminal street gang prevention and intervention programs may apply for funding under this subsection. Each entity receiving funds must report to the department of children, youth, and families on the number and types of youth served, the services provided, and the impact of those services on the youth and the community.(6) The juvenile rehabilitation institutions may use funding appropriated in this subsection to purchase goods, supplies, and services through hospital group purchasing organizations when it is cost-effective to do so.(7) $50,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $50,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for grants to county juvenile courts to establish alternative detention facilities similar to the proctor house model in Jefferson county, Washington, that will provide less restrictive confinement alternatives to youth in their local communities. County juvenile courts shall apply to the department of children, youth, and families for funding and each entity receiving funds must report to the department on the number and types of youth serviced, the services provided, and the impact of those services on the youth and the community.(8) $432,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $432,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for the department to provide housing services to clients releasing from incarceration into the community.(9)(a) $878,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $879,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for implementation of chapter 206, Laws of 2021 (concerning juvenile rehabilitation community transition services).(b) Of the amounts provided in (a) of this subsection, $105,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $105,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for housing vouchers.(10)(a) $140,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $140,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for implementation of chapter 150, Laws of 2023 (sexual offenses by youth).(b) The department of children, youth, and familiesâjuvenile rehabilitation shall develop and implement a grant program that allows defense attorneys and counties to apply for funding for sex offender evaluation and treatment programs. The department shall provide funding to counties for: (a) Process mapping, site assessment, and training for additional sex offender treatment modalities such as multisystemic therapy-problem sexual behavior or problematic sexual behavior-cognitive behavioral therapy; and (b) for any evaluation and preadjudication treatment costs which are not covered by the court.(11) $505,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $505,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for contracted services for housing for youth exiting juvenile rehabilitation facilities.(12) $1,182,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $1,182,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for a dedicated institutional educational oversight and accountability team and staff at Green Hill and Echo Glen secure facilities that will serve as an educational engagement team at the facility and will also coordinate and engage with community enrichment programs and community organizations to afford more successful transitions.(13) $1,048,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $1,048,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for a contract to provide opioid use disorder post-release education and intervention services.(14) $652,000 of the opioid abatement settlement accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for medical personnel to provide medications for opioid use disorder (MOUD) education and treatment.(15) $12,500,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $12,500,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for the department to open and operate a 48-bed living unit, a modular building, and recreation area at the Stafford Creek corrections center in Aberdeen.(16) $406,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026, $392,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027, and $16,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely for dedicated classification specialists to create and operate a formal classification process to provide more frequent individualized security-level reviews at each full and partial confinement facility operated by the department of children, youth, and familiesâjuvenile rehabilitation program. The classification specialists must also review and update the policies for assigning security classification levels for juvenile rehabilitation youth to provide more frequent individualized security-level reviews at each full and partial confinement facility operated by the department. The department shall update any rules necessary to implement the updated policies. This review and update must include: (a) The consideration of incorporating evidence-based criteria for assigning security classification; (b) the frequency for the review of each person's classification; (c) if deemed necessary, the development of additional security classifications to better reflect the population and available institutional settings; and (d) criteria for the override of a security classification by the superintendent or other authorized person. The classification specialists are encouraged to consult with experts in trauma-informed juvenile rehabilitation policy, experts with experience in noninstitutional approaches to juvenile justice, experts in child psychology and development, individuals with lived experience in juvenile rehabilitation institutions, and experts that may be able to provide a culturally relevant perspective to policies and programs offered in juvenile rehabilitation institutions. The department shall report to the appropriate committees of the legislature any statutory barriers to incorporating evidence-based best practices into the updated policies.(17) $266,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026, $252,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027, and $10,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely for dedicated infraction specialists to create and implement an infractions policy to respond to incidents of violence, harmful behaviors, and safety issues at each full and partial confinement facility operated by the department. The department shall, in consultation with organizations focused on juvenile justice policy and reform, review every six months the infraction data to identify disparities and implement any necessary changes to the system to address such disparities. This review shall also include an assessment of factors that lead to the most common infractions, including staffing, facility population, and availability of programming.(18)(a) $133,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $126,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for the department of children, youth, and familiesâjuvenile rehabilitation to develop an Excel spreadsheet capacity needs assessment model (CNAM) for all secure residential facilities, community residential facilities, and community transition services for which the juvenile rehabilitation is responsible or that are operated, managed, or administered by the juvenile rehabilitation. The capacity needs assessment model must provide a level of detail comparable to that provided by the capacity needs assessment model maintained by the department of corrections research and analytics team for bed capacity. This capacity needs assessment model shall provide the department with a predictive tool that shows the current number of beds available and the forecasted number of beds that are needed, by security level, by fiscal year, over a 10 fiscal-year period. Similar to the department of corrections' capacity needs assessment model, the model developed by juvenile rehabilitation must specify current and forecasted needed beds based on crime of conviction and assigned custody level over 10 fiscal years, by gender, age, custody level, and fiscal year.(b) The Excel spreadsheet capacity needs assessment model must be updated after each caseload forecast council's adopted caseload forecast for the juvenile rehabilitation. No later than 30 calendar days after each adopted caseload forecast, the model shall be electronically transmitted to the appropriate chairs of the fiscal committees for the house of representatives and senate or posted on the department of juvenile rehabilitation's external-facing website.(19) $1,418,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 is provided solely for the department to maintain the facility, property, and assets at the Naselle youth camp in Naselle.(20) Within existing resources, the department shall develop a proposal for future capacity growth. This proposal must evaluate the feasibility of using existing state-owned facilities, including, but not limited to, the property and facilities of Mission Creek corrections center for women, Larch corrections center, Ahtanum View reentry center, Peninsula reentry center, Tri-Cities reentry center, and facilities owned by the department of social and health services and the department of children, youth, and familiesâjuvenile rehabilitation. The proposal must also specifically consider facilities located in eastern Washington among the possible options. The department must submit a report to the office of financial management and the appropriate committees of the legislature by September 15, 2025. The report must include:(a) The planned bed capacity, by fiscal year, which aligns with the total forecasted bed needs. The planned capacity must address both a short-term solution for immediate relief of overcrowding and a long-term plan to implement best practices related to the size and bed capacity of juvenile rehabilitation secure institutions. The planned bed capacity must display the total number of forecasted beds needed and a breakout that displays the bed needs and juvenile population by risk classification, gender, age, and in total;(b) An assessment of the impact of expanded use of the community transition services program or other alternatives to total confinement, on bed capacity needs;(c) An assessment of the impact of expanded use of the community residential facilities or other alternatives to total confinement, on bed capacity needs;(d) Fiscal estimates for all operational aspects of the bed capacity plan by fiscal year and by fund, for each option evaluated. The operational components must include a prioritized full assessment of necessary capital improvements and staffing needs for custody and juvenile rehabilitation programming which includes education, vocational, recreational, and therapeutic services, including but not limited to any culturally relevant programming and activities that may be offered to incarcerated individuals in juvenile rehabilitation facilities;(e) An analysis of workforce needs and availability for all locations included in the plan;(f) An assessment of the physical capacity of each individual site for appropriate programming to support the goals of juvenile rehabilitation; and(g) The identification of any statutory barriers to increasing the use of less restrictive settings.(21) The department shall promptly notify the office of the attorney general upon the receipt of a request from or on behalf of a federal agency or a federal, state, or local law enforcement authority for health care information, as defined in RCW 70.02.010, program eligibility information for individuals, information that may identify a health care provider's or facility's delivery of health care services to noncitizens, or the delivery of protected health care services as defined in RCW 7.115.010 where the request may impact expenditures for such services. The juvenile rehabilitation program shall require contracted entities to notify the juvenile rehabilitation program promptly upon receipt of a request from a federal agency or law enforcement authority as described in this subsection.(22) $183,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $172,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for implementation of Senate Bill No. 5032 (juvenile rehab. ombuds). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2025, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.(23) $770,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $770,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for the department to implement a secure communication technology system to provide enhanced communication services that allows access to education, rehabilitation services, and entertainment activities to be used by individuals incarcerated in juvenile rehabilitation facilities.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 236. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CHILDREN, YOUTH, AND FAMILIESâEARLY LEARNING PROGRAMGeneral FundâState Appropriation (FY 2026). . . .$934,956,000General FundâState Appropriation (FY 2027). . . .$1,140,922,000General FundâFederal Appropriation. . . .$462,759,000General FundâPrivate/Local Appropriation. . . .$579,000Education Legacy Trust AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$410,875,000Home Visiting Services AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$34,500,000Home Visiting Services AccountâFederal Appropriation. . . .$37,059,000Washington Opportunity Pathways AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$80,000,000Workforce Education Investment AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$13,166,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$3,114,816,000The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1)(a) $127,001,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026, $133,386,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027, $91,810,000 of the education legacy trust accountâstate appropriation, and $80,000,000 of the opportunity pathways accountâstate appropriation are provided solely for the early childhood education and assistance program. These amounts shall support at least 14,278 slots in fiscal year 2026 and 14,528 slots in fiscal year 2027. Of the total slots in each fiscal year, 100 slots must be reserved for foster children to receive school-year-round enrollment.(b) Funding provided in (a) of this subsection is sufficient to:(i) Provide a slot rate increase of five percent on full day slots beginning in fiscal year 2026; and(ii) Increase 250 full day slots beginning in fiscal year 2027.(c) The department of children, youth, and families must develop a methodology to identify, at the school district level, the geographic locations of where early childhood education and assistance program slots are needed to meet the entitlement specified in RCW 43.216.556. This methodology must be linked to the caseload forecast produced by the caseload forecast council and must include estimates of the number of slots needed at each school district and the corresponding facility needs required to meet the entitlement in accordance with RCW 43.216.556. This methodology must be included as part of the budget submittal documentation required by RCW 43.88.030.(2) The department is the lead agency for and recipient of the federal child care and development fund grant. Amounts within this grant shall be used to fund child care licensing, quality initiatives, agency administration, and other costs associated with child care subsidies.(3) The department of children, youth, and families shall work in collaboration with the department of social and health services to determine the appropriate amount of state expenditures for the working connections child care program to claim towards the state's maintenance of effort for the temporary assistance for needy families program. The departments will also collaborate to track the average monthly child care subsidy caseload and expenditures by fund type, including child care development fund, general fundâstate appropriation, and temporary assistance for needy families for the purpose of estimating the annual temporary assistance for needy families reimbursement from the department of social and health services to the department of children, youth, and families. Effective December 1, 2025, and annually thereafter, the department of children, youth, and families must report to the governor and the appropriate fiscal and policy committees of the legislature the total state contribution for the working connections child care program claimed the previous fiscal year towards the state's maintenance of effort for the temporary assistance for needy families program and the total temporary assistance for needy families reimbursement from the department of social and health services for the previous fiscal year.(4)(a) $185,996,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026, $321,821,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027, and $900,000 of the education legacy trust accountâstate appropriation are provided solely for enhancements to the working connections child care program.(b) Of the amounts provided in (a) of this subsection:(i) $126,974,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 is provided solely to increase subsidy base rates to the 85th percentile of market based on the 2024 market rate survey for child care centers, beginning July 1, 2026.(ii) $185,996,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026, $194,847,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027, and $900,000 of the education legacy trust accountâstate appropriation are provided solely to implement the 2025-2027 collective bargaining agreement covering family child care providers as provided in section 907 of this act. Of the amounts provided in this subsection:(A) $5,342,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $5,784,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are for a 50 cent per hour per child rate increase for family, friends, and neighbor providers (FFNs) beginning July 1, 2025.(B) $2,785,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $3,343,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are for a health care contribution increase.(C) $81,367,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $84,919,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are for a cost of care rate enhancement.(D) $96,502,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $100,801,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided to increase subsidy base rates to the 85th percentile of market based on the 2024 market rate survey for licensed family homes.(E) $900,000 of the education legacy trust accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for trauma informed care supports.(c) Funding in this subsection must be expended with internal controls that provide child-level detail for all transactions.(d) On July 1st of each fiscal year, the department, in collaboration with the department of social and health services, must report to the governor and the appropriate fiscal and policy committees of the legislature on the status of overpayments in the working connections child care program. The report must include the following information for the previous fiscal year:(i) A summary of the number of overpayments that occurred;(ii) The reason for each overpayment;(iii) The total cost of overpayments;(iv) A comparison to overpayments that occurred in the past two preceding fiscal years; and(v) Any planned modifications to internal processes that will take place in the coming fiscal year to further reduce the occurrence of overpayments.(e) Within available amounts, the department in consultation with the office of financial management shall report enrollments and active caseload for the working connections child care program to the governor and the legislative fiscal committees and the legislative-executive WorkFirst poverty reduction oversight task force on an agreed upon schedule. The report shall also identify the number of cases participating in both temporary assistance for needy families and working connections child care. The department must also report on the number of children served through contracted slots.(5) $10,754,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation is provided solely for the department to comply with new federal requirements of the child care development fund grant, including implementing enrollment-based pay, prospective pay, and to not pursue overpayments in certain cases.(6) $13,166,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the working connections child care program under RCW 43.216.806(1)(a).(7) $353,402,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation is reimbursed by the department of social and health services to the department of children, youth, and families for qualifying expenditures of the working connections child care program under RCW 43.216.135.(8) $3,313,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026, $3,323,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027, and $9,303,000 of the education legacy trust accountâstate appropriation are provided solely for the early childhood intervention prevention services (ECLIPSE) program. The department shall contract for ECLIPSE services to provide therapeutic child care and other specialized treatment services to abused, neglected, at-risk, and/or drug-affected children. The department shall pursue opportunities to leverage other funding to continue and expand ECLIPSE services. Priority for services shall be given to children referred from the department.(9) The department shall place a ten percent administrative overhead cap on any contract entered into with the University of Washington. In a bi-annual report to the governor and the legislature, the department shall report the total amount of funds spent on the quality rating and improvements system and the total amount of funds spent on degree incentives, scholarships, and tuition reimbursements.(10) $1,728,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $1,728,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for reducing barriers for low-income providers to participate in the early achievers program.(11) $4,000,000 of the education legacy trust accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for early intervention assessment and services.(12) $265,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $265,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for a statewide family resource and referral linkage system, with coordinated access point of resource navigators who will connect families with children prenatal through age five with services, programs, and community resources through a facilitated referral and linkage process.(13)(a) The department must provide to the education research and data center, housed at the office of financial management, data on all state-funded early childhood programs. These programs include the early support for infants and toddlers, early childhood education and assistance program (ECEAP), and the working connections and seasonal subsidized childcare programs including license-exempt facilities or family, friend, and neighbor care. The data provided by the department to the education research data center must include information on children who participate in these programs, including their name and date of birth, and dates the child received services at a particular facility.(b) ECEAP early learning professionals must enter any new qualifications into the department's professional development registry each school year. By October of each fiscal year, the department must provide updated ECEAP early learning professional data to the education research data center.(c) The department must request federally funded head start programs to voluntarily provide data to the department and the education research data center that is equivalent to what is being provided for state-funded programs.(d) The education research and data center must provide an updated report on early childhood program participation and K-12 outcomes to the house of representatives appropriations committee and the senate ways and means committee using available data every March for the previous school year.(e) The department, in consultation with the department of social and health services, must withhold payment for services to early childhood programs that do not report on the name, date of birth, and the dates a child received services at a particular facility.(14) $100,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $100,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for the department to continue implementation of an infant and early childhood mental health consultation initiative to support tribal child care and early learning programs. Funding may be used to provide culturally congruent infant and early childhood mental health supports for tribal child care, the tribal early childhood education and assistance program, and tribal head start providers. The department must consult with federally recognized tribes which may include round tables through the Indian policy early learning committee.(15) Within existing resources, the department, in consultation with the office of tribal relations, must prioritize complex needs funds and equity grants to tribal early learning providers.(16) $8,144,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $9,264,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5263 (special education funding). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2025, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.(17) Sufficient funding is provided in this section for implementation of Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5752 (child care & early dev.).(18) $63,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 is provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5030 (vital records access). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2025, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.(19) $1,000,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 is provided solely for the department of children, youth, and families to contract with a countywide nonprofit organization with early childhood expertise in Pierce county for a project to prevent child abuse and neglect using nationally recognized models.(a) The nonprofit organization must continue to implement a countywide resource and referral linkage system for families of children who are prenatal through age five.(b) The nonprofit organization must offer a voluntary brief newborn home visiting program. The program must meet the diverse needs of Pierce county residents and, therefore, it must be flexible, culturally appropriate, and culturally responsive.(20) $1,000,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $1,000,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for the department to contract with Washington communities for children to maintain a community-based early childhood network.(21) $150,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $150,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for the department to contract with a licensed child care center with an existing child care mental health pilot program in order to implement a holistic and trauma-informed approach that ensures early learning environments are psychologically safe, culturally affirming, and emotionally supportive. The center must be located in Spokane and have a pilot child care mental health program that serves preschool-aged children who face high adverse childhood experiences scores, mental and behavioral health disorders, and are at increased risk of suspension and expulsion due to systemic disparities.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 237. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CHILDREN, YOUTH, AND FAMILIESâPROGRAM SUPPORTGeneral FundâState Appropriation (FY 2026). . . .$291,756,000General FundâState Appropriation (FY 2027). . . .$293,247,000General FundâFederal Appropriation. . . .$224,909,000General FundâPrivate/Local Appropriation. . . .$713,000Education Legacy Trust AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$1,374,000Home Visiting Services AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$484,000Home Visiting Services AccountâFederal Appropriation. . . .$380,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$812,863,000The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) $275,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $275,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for a Washington state mentoring organization to continue its public-private partnerships providing technical assistance and training to mentoring programs that serve at-risk youth.(2) $25,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026, $29,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027, and $47,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely for the implementation of an agreement reached between the governor and the Washington federation of state employees for the language access providers under the provisions of chapter 41.56 RCW for the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium, as provided in section 907 of this act.(3) $100,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $100,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for a full-time employee to coordinate policies and programs to support pregnant and parenting individuals receiving chemical dependency or substance use disorder treatment.(4) $2,640,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026, $2,640,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027, and $181,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely for the phase-in of the settlement agreement under D.S. et al. v. Department of Children, Youth, and Families et al., United States district court for the western district of Washington, cause no. 2:21-cv-00113-BJR. The department must implement the provisions of the settlement agreement pursuant to the timeline and implementation plan provided for under the settlement agreement. This includes implementing provisions related to plaintiff's fees, the emerging adulthood housing program, professional therapeutic foster care, statewide hub home model, revised licensing standards, family group planning, referrals and transition, qualified residential treatment program, exceptional placement costs, and monitoring and implementation.(5) $1,494,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation is provided solely for continued implementation of the family first prevention services act requirements, including technology enhancements to support the automated assessments, data quality, and reporting requirements. Funding provided in this subsection is subject to the conditions, limitations, and review provided in section 701 of this act.(6) $1,248,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $1,248,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for the continuation of the emergency adolescent housing pilot program. The housing pilot will serve hard-to-place foster youth who are at least 16 years old with housing and intensive case management.(7) $700,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $700,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for funding of the teamchild project.(8) $13,990,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026, $17,903,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027, and $31,893,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely to begin design, development, and implementation of the comprehensive child welfare information system. The funding in this section is subject to the conditions, limitations, and review requirements of section 701 of this act.(9) The department must report to and coordinate with the department of ecology to track expenditures from climate commitment act accounts, as defined and described in RCW 70A.65.300 and chapter 173-446B WAC.(10) $750,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $750,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for the department to maintain rates for independent living service providers.(11) $88,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026, $82,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027, and $29,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5163 (child fatalities). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2025, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.(12) $9,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026, $11,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027, and $2,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5149 (early childhood court prg.). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2025, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.(13) $250,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $250,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for implementation of Substitute House Bill No. 1177 (child welfare housing assist.). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2025, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.(14) $25,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026, $50,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027, and $38,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided for the department to:(a) Provide information and support to parents and caregivers on how to become the representative payee for a child or youth receiving social security benefits and maintain eligibility for those benefits when the department is the representative payee and the child is exiting the department's care;(b) Provide information and support to youth turning 18 on how to become the payee for social security benefits and maintain eligibility for those benefits when the department is the representative payee, unless the youth requires a representative payee to manage the funds;(c) Adopt rules to notify caregivers and parties to the dependency proceeding when the department applies for social security or other benefits on behalf of a child and establish procedures for children and caregivers to request and for the department to approve the disbursement of social security and other public benefits to meet the unmet personal needs of a child when the department is the representative payee for such benefits. The department shall adopt rules by January 1, 2026; and(d) Submit a report to the legislature by November 1, 2025, that includes:(i) An updated implementation plan to discontinue the practice of using any benefits paid to or on behalf of a child or youth to reimburse itself for the cost of care and conserve benefits for the future needs of the child by the earliest date feasible;(ii) A description of costs and recommendations for statutory changes necessary to conserve benefits in a manner in which the funds will not count against eligibility for federal or state means-tested programs;(iii) Data on the number of children or youth receiving social security and other public benefits, by age;(iv) The average amount of federal benefits collected per child or youth in fiscal year 2025; and(v) Recommendations for additional supports for families and youth to maintain benefits after reunification or exit from care.(15) $29,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026, $29,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027, and $8,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely for implementation of Senate Bill No. 5032 (juvenile rehab. ombuds). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2025, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.(End of part)PART IIINATURAL RESOURCESNEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 301. FOR THE COLUMBIA RIVER GORGE COMMISSIONGeneral FundâState Appropriation (FY 2026). . . .$693,000General FundâState Appropriation (FY 2027). . . .$730,000General FundâFederal Appropriation. . . .$32,000General FundâPrivate/Local Appropriation. . . .$1,699,000Climate Commitment AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$138,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$3,292,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 302. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGYGeneral FundâState Appropriation (FY 2026). . . .$32,456,000General FundâState Appropriation (FY 2027). . . .$35,602,000General FundâFederal Appropriation. . . .$245,110,000General FundâPrivate/Local Appropriation. . . .$39,590,000Climate Commitment AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$15,805,000Emergency Drought Response AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$6,000,000Natural Climate Solutions AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$12,851,000Reclamation AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$4,907,000Flood Control Assistance AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$4,826,000Aquatic Lands Enhancement AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$692,000Refrigerant Emission Management AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$4,385,000State Emergency Water Projects Revolving AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$40,000Waste Reduction, Recycling, and Litter ControlAccountâState Appropriation. . . .$44,132,000State Drought Preparedness AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$219,000State and Local Improvements Revolving AccountâWaterSupply FacilitiesâState Appropriation. . . .$186,000Water Rights Tracking System AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$48,000Site Closure AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$582,000Wood Stove Education and Enforcement AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$618,000Worker and Community Right to Know FundâStateAppropriation. . . .$2,258,000Water Rights Processing AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$39,000Water Quality Permit AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$74,491,000Underground Storage Tank AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$5,115,000Biosolids Permit AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$3,118,000Hazardous Waste Assistance AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$11,589,000Radioactive Mixed Waste AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$27,611,000Air Pollution Control AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$5,929,000Oil Spill Prevention AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$10,382,000Air Operating Permit AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$5,995,000Wastewater Treatment Plant Operator CertificationAccountâState Appropriation. . . .$831,000Oil Spill Response AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$7,076,000Model Toxics Control Operating AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$361,962,000Model Toxics Control Operating AccountâLocalAppropriation. . . .$499,000Model Toxics Control Stormwater AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$17,323,000Voluntary Cleanup AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$373,000Paint Product Stewardship AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$152,000Water Pollution Control Revolving AdministrationAccountâState Appropriation. . . .$9,517,000Clean Fuels Program AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$6,850,000Climate Investment AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$71,424,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$1,070,583,000The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) $455,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $455,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for the department to grant to the northwest straits commission to provide funding, technical assistance, and/or coordination support equally to the seven Puget Sound marine resources committees.(2) $600,000 of the oil spill prevention accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for a contract with the University of Washington's sea grant program to continue an educational program targeted to small spills from commercial fishing vessels, ferries, cruise ships, ports, and marinas.(3) $102,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $102,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for implementation of Executive Order No. 12-07, Washington's response to ocean acidification.(4) $24,000,000 of the model toxics control operating accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the department to provide grants to local governments for the purpose of supporting local solid waste and financial assistance programs.(5) $150,000 of the aquatic lands enhancement accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of the state marine management plan and ongoing costs of the Washington coastal marine advisory council to serve as a forum and provide recommendations on coastal management issues.(6) $2,000,000 of the model toxics control operating accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the department to convene a stakeholder group, including representatives from overburdened communities, to assist with developing a water quality implementation plan for polychlorinated biphenyls and to address other emerging contaminants in the Spokane river. The department must also consult with the Spokane tribe of Indians and other interested tribes when developing and implementing actions to address water quality in the Spokane river.(7) $4,002,000 of the natural climate solutions accountâstate appropriation is provided solely to address flood prevention in the Nooksack basin and Sumas prairie. Of this amount:(a) $2,000,000 is provided solely to expand and sustain Whatcom county's floodplain integrated planning (FLIP) team planning process, including supporting communication, community participation, coordination, technical studies and analysis, and development of local solutions.(b) $900,000 is provided solely for the department to support transboundary coordination, including facilitation and technical support to develop and evaluate alternatives for managing transboundary flooding in Whatcom county and British Columbia.(c) $1,102,000 is provided solely to support dedicated local and department capacity for floodplain planning and technical support. Of the amount in this subsection (7)(c), $738,000 is solely for a grant to Whatcom county. The remaining amount is for the department to provide ongoing staff technical assistance and support to flood prevention efforts in this area.(8) $24,536,000 of the climate investment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for capacity grants to federally recognized tribes for: (a) Consultation on spending decisions on grants in accordance with RCW 70A.65.305; (b) consultation on clean energy siting projects; (c) activities supporting climate resilience and adaptation; (d) developing tribal clean energy projects; (e) applying for state or federal grant funding; (f) participation on a science advisory panel and other associated work on offshore wind; and (g) other related work. In order to meet the requirements of RCW 70A.65.230(1)(b), tribal applicants are encouraged to include a tribal resolution supporting their request with their grant application. Of this amount, $3,000,000 is reserved solely to ensure completion of grants awarded or amended between January 1, 2025, and June 30, 2025.(9) $1,375,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $1,375,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for preparation and filing of adjudications of state water rights in water resource inventory area 1 (Nooksack).(10) $2,468,000 of the climate investment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for addressing air quality in overburdened communities highly impacted by air pollution under RCW 70A.65.020.(11) $2,256,000 of the model toxics control operating accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the department to provide technical assistance to landowners and local governments to promote voluntary compliance, implement best management practices, and support implementation of water quality clean-up plans in shellfish growing areas, agricultural areas, forestlands, and other types of land uses, including technical assistance focused on protection and restoration of critical riparian management areas important for salmon recovery.(12) $1,914,000 of the natural climate solutions accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for activities related to coastal hazards, including expanding the coastal monitoring and analysis program, operating a coastal hazard organizational resilience team, and operating a coastal hazards grant program to help local communities design projects and apply for funding opportunities. At least 25 percent of the funding in this subsection must be used for the benefit of tribes.(13) $276,000 of the model toxics control operating accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for a grant to San Juan county for the enhancement of ongoing oil spill response preparedness staff hiring, spill response equipment acquisition, and spill response training and operational expenses.(14) $750,000 of the model toxics control operating accountâstate appropriation is provided solely to:(a) Identify additional priority consumer products containing PFAS for potential regulatory action; and(b) Issue orders to manufacturers under RCW 70A.350.040 and 70A.350.030 to obtain ingredient information, including for chemical ingredients used to replace priority chemicals.(15)(a) $816,000 of the climate commitment accountâstate appropriation is provided to the department of ecology to report on the state's authority relevant to the potential siting and permitting of floating offshore wind energy projects in federal waters off Washington's Pacific Ocean coast. In coordination with the departments of fish and wildlife, natural resources, and parks, the energy facility site evaluation council, and the utilities and transportation commission, the department shall:(i) Study and report on how and when state laws, regulations, and enforceable policies apply during a federal process for floating offshore wind energy projects, including the siting of associated onshore and nearshore transmission infrastructure;(ii) Identify the state's regulatory decisions in the federal process for which a state agency would be required to undergo consultation with federally recognized tribes and solicit public comment; and(iii) Evaluate and recommend whether additional regulatory actions are needed to improve the state's readiness for a federal leasing process, including but not limited to:(A) Modification and/or addition to the state's enforceable policies under the federal coastal zone management act in 16 U.S.C Sec. 1456 and articulated in the state's marine spatial plan adopted under chapter 43.372 RCW; and(B) Designation of a geographic location description under 16 U.S.C. Sec. 1465.(b) In developing the report, the department shall consult with federally recognized tribes and seek input from interested and affected parties, including the Washington coastal marine advisory council established in RCW 43.143.050. The department, in coordination with other state agencies, shall also host a minimum of two scenario planning exercises where agencies test run how their authority would be applied in the event of a federal leasing for offshore wind projects. The department shall incorporate the lessons it learns from these exercises into the report.(c) The department shall submit a report summarizing its findings and recommendations to the governor and the appropriate committees of the legislature by November 1, 2026.(16)(a) $731,000 of the climate commitment accountâstate appropriation is provided to convene a tribal-state science advisory panel to guide the advancement of our scientific understanding of potential ecological impacts of floating offshore wind projects. Considering current research, the advisory panel should develop a prioritized science agenda to increase understanding of how floating offshore wind projects sited off of Washington's coast could impact Washington's marine and coastal environment and resources, with an emphasis on potential impacts to treaty-protected tribal resources. The advisory panel should also consider and advance understanding of how offshore projects could be designed and sited to avoid or minimize identified impacts and maximize co-use with other ocean uses. The department shall invite representatives from coastal tribes, inter-tribal organizations, and relevant state agencies to participate on the advisory panel. In coordination with the advisory panel, the department shall:(i) Identify and catalog the potentially significant ecological impacts that floating offshore wind projects sited off of Washington's coastline may have on Washington's marine and coastal environment, including consideration of potential impacts to upwelling and the California current ecosystem;(ii) Contract with a third-party science organization to conduct a literature review of scientific studies on the identified potentially significant ecological impacts and summarize impacts that are not substantiated by literature, impacts for which the literature find successful avoidance or mitigation measures, and impacts needing additional study;(iii) After considering the findings from the literature review, develop a prioritized scientific agenda to increase understanding of how offshore wind could impact Washington's marine and coastal environment and resources, with an emphasis on potential impacts to treaty-protected tribal resources; and(iv) Coordinate with other states to identify and leverage joint opportunities for advancing research.(b) In conducting its work, the department and advisory panel must seek input from scientific experts and may seek input from federal agencies, coastal stakeholders including fishing representatives, and representatives from the offshore wind industry.(c) By November 1, 2026, the department shall submit a report to the governor and appropriate committees of the legislature summarizing its findings and the prioritized scientific agenda.(17) $4,428,000 of the water quality permit accountâstate appropriation, $2,212,000 of the model toxics control operating accountâstate appropriation, and $1,864,000 of the hazardous waste assistance accountâstate appropriation are provided solely for the department to address and mitigate 6PPD. The department may provide funding from this subsection to the University of Washington and Washington State University for the purposes of this subsection. Of these amounts:(a) $1,094,000 of the model toxics control operating accountâstate appropriation is provided solely to conduct monitoring and analyze water and sediment for 6PPD.(b) $1,864,000 of the hazardous waste assistance accountâstate appropriation and $1,118,000 of the model toxics control operating accountâstate appropriation is provided solely to find safer alternatives to 6PPD in consumer products.(c) $4,428,000 of the water quality permit accountâstate appropriation is provided solely to identify effective best management practices to treat 6PPD in stormwater.(18) $1,317,000 of the natural climate solutions accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the department to assist local governments in building climate resilience by addressing emerging implementation challenges and updating guidance for local jurisdictions, including integration of updated climate policies through amendments to local shoreline master programs.(19) $331,000 of the natural climate solutions accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the department to coordinate implementation of the state's climate resilience strategy developed pursuant to chapter 70A.05 RCW. The department shall coordinate resilience activities among state agencies identified in the strategy, gather data from state agencies to support tracking and progress reporting, and conduct outreach and engagement. The department may also facilitate the establishment of the recommended durable governance structure and support implementation of key resilience activities, as resources allow.(20) $542,000 of the aquatic lands enhancement accountâstate appropriation is provided solely to support research to enhance understanding of European green crab behavior and dispersal in Washington's waters and inform the state's response to this invasive pest. The department shall hold technical assistance workshops for natural resource managers to implement larval identification monitoring programs.(21)(a) $3,908,000 of the model toxics control operating accountâstate appropriation and $100,000 of the water quality permit accountâstate appropriation are provided solely to:(i) Investigate and monitor the sources and impacts of per- and polyfluoroalkyl substances (PFAS) in the environment;(ii) Identify and reduce the risks posed by PFAS used in industry, manufacturing, and businesses through outreach activities and technical assistance to those that have or currently use PFAS;(iii) Support water quality source control and treatment of PFAS at municipal wastewater facilities and cleanup sites. The department will use the amount identified in this subsection from the water quality permit account to complete a study of state waste discharge permittees to inform how the state should best manage these discharges; and(iv) Increase cleanup capacity at PFAS contaminated sites.(b) When engaging in work benefiting specific communities, the department shall prioritize investments to benefit vulnerable populations in overburdened communities as defined in RCW 70A.02.010 with a goal of investing at least 40 percent of funds to this purpose.(22) $400,000 of the climate commitment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the department to develop a report that analyzes equity and accessibility considerations for environmental incident reporting and resolution, and to provide recommendations for changes and improvements. The department will consult with relevant government entities that manage environmental incident reporting for incidents that pollute and damage land, air, and water, such as the department of health, the office of the attorney general, regional air agencies, and relevant state and local agencies. The department will consult with Washington state community based and non-governmental organizations representing overburdened communities. The department may contract with a third party to prepare the report.(a) The report must include: (i) An overview of the existing environmental incident reporting systems in Washington state and a description of business objectives; (ii) challenges, barriers, and accessibility concerns with the current state environmental incident reporting systems; (iii) evaluation of possible service gaps in incident reporting in overburdened communities; and (iv) options and recommendations for improving environmental incident reporting, including improvements to reporting access, process transparency, and equitable service to overburdened communities and vulnerable populations.(b) By October 1, 2026, the department must submit its final report and recommendations to the governor and appropriate committees of the legislature.(23) $639,000 of the model toxics control operating accountâstate appropriation, $255,000 of the climate investment accountâstate appropriation, $128,000 of the water quality permit accountâstate appropriation, and $128,000 of the waste reduction, recycling, and litter control accountâstate appropriation are provided solely for the department to continue implementation of environmental justice requirements in the HEAL act, state and federal environmental justice and equity mandates, and embed expertise within specific environmental programs.(24) The department must report the department's expenditures from climate commitment act accounts, as defined and described in RCW 70A.65.300 and chapter 173-446B WAC.(25) $275,000 of the climate investment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 1912 (agricultural fuel/CCA exemption). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2025, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.(26) $2,816,000 of the climate investment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute House Bill No. 1975 (climate commitment act). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2025, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.(27) $1,115,000 of the clean fuels program accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute House Bill No. 1409 (clean fuels program). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2025, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.(28) $426,000 of the climate commitment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute House Bill No. 1462 (hydrofluorocarbons). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2025, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.(29) $196,000 of the model toxics control operating accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5033 (biosolids/PFAS chemicals). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2025, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.(30) $89,000 of the model toxics control operating accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Substitute House Bill No. 1670 (sewage-containing spills). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2025, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.(31) $493,000 of the model toxics control operating accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute House Bill No. 1154 (solid waste handling). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2025, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.(32) $1,656,000 of the waste, reduction, recycling, and litter control accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5284 (solid waste management). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2025, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.(33) $261,000 of the model toxics control operating accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute House Bill No. 1497 (waste material management). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2025, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.(34) During the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium, when determining the placement of air quality monitoring for the benefit of overburdened communities as required in RCW 70A.65.020(1)(b), the department must prioritize:(a) Placing air monitoring stations in locations that are physically within overburdened communities;(b) Engaging with local and tribal governments and community organizations; and(c) Funding and supporting, to the extent feasible, evidence-supported community-based air monitoring for PM 2.5 pollutants in overburdened communities.(35)(a) $100,000 of the model toxics control operating accountâ state appropriation is provided solely for the department to contract with property owners adjacent to the site designated by the department as cleanup site identification number 16913 for access to the owners' property in order for the department to perform remediation work. Such contracts may include reimbursement for access to the owners' property that occurred between July 1, 2025, and June 30, 2027.(b) Such contracts shall be for the fair market rental value of any space used, made inaccessible, or otherwise made unavailable to rent commercially as a result of the remediation work carried out by the department. The fair market value determination shall be based on market conditions prior to the point at which the department began its remediation activities and shall be based on comparable properties. The department shall provide the owner of any such property with a written statement of, and summary of the basis for, its assessment of the fair market rental value.(36) $200,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 is provided solely for a grant to Whatcom county to provide technical assistance that must be made available to all water users in WRIA 1 in filing adjudication claims under RCW 90.03.140. This assistance must be administered by Whatcom county and no portion of this funding may be used to contest the claims of any other claimant in the adjudication.(37) $200,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 is provided solely for the department's engagement with the federal government, Indian tribes, water users, and local governments on a process that could result in a federal Indian water rights settlement through the Nooksack adjudication. The department must report to the appropriate committees of the legislature regarding the status of the adjudication and any potential settlement structure by June 30, 2026, and by June 30, 2027.(38) $300,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 is provided solely for the department to provide a grant to Clark county for the purpose of developing and implementing a lake management plan to restore and maintain the health of Vancouver lake, a category 5 303(d) status impaired body of water. The department must work with the county to include involvement by property owners around the lake and within the watersheds that drain to the lake, the department of natural resources, other state agencies and local governments with proprietary or regulatory jurisdiction, tribes, and nonprofit organizations advocating for the health of the lake. The plan should incorporate work already completed by the county and other entities involved in development of the lake management strategy.(39) $670,000 of the model toxics control operating accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Senate Bill No. 5036 (statewide emissions data). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2025, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.(40) $262,000 of the model toxics control operating accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the department to participate in and contribute to a multiagency permitting team for the purpose of streamlining the review of environmental restoration projects that directly benefit fish or fish habitat.Â Projects for review by the multiagency permitting team must be submitted under a joint aquatic resources permit application and have had a project review completed by the department of archaeology and historic preservation regarding cultural resources protection requirements, including the requirements of executive order 21-02. In general, the multiagency permitting team is comprised of state agencies with jurisdictional responsibility for the project proposal, local governments in whose geographical jurisdiction the project would be located, and any other expertise that may be needed in review of the project.Â State agencies are responsible for carrying out their own permit review and approval process.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 303. FOR THE WASHINGTON POLLUTION LIABILITY INSURANCE PROGRAMGeneral FundâFederal Appropriation. . . .$1,139,000Pollution Liability Insurance Agency UndergroundStorage Tank Revolving AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$1,240,000Pollution Liability Insurance Program Trust AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$10,311,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$12,690,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 304. FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSIONGeneral FundâState Appropriation (FY 2026). . . .$32,851,000General FundâState Appropriation (FY 2027). . . .$33,007,000General FundâFederal Appropriation. . . .$7,289,000Climate Commitment AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$980,000Winter Recreation Program AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$4,943,000ORV and Nonhighway Vehicle AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$333,000Snowmobile AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$5,732,000Aquatic Lands Enhancement AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$375,000Parks Renewal and Stewardship AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$166,674,000Parks Renewal and Stewardship AccountâPrivate/LocalAppropriation. . . .$720,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$252,904,000The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) $129,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $129,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for a grant for the operation of the Northwest weather and avalanche center.(2) The commission must report to and coordinate with the department of ecology to track expenditures from climate commitment act accounts, as defined and described in RCW 70A.65.300 and chapter 173-446B WAC.(3) $500,000 of the climate commitment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for cultural resource vulnerability assessments.(4) $1,111,000 of the parks renewal and stewardship accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for maintenance and operation costs at the Fort Worden state park campus. The state parks and recreation commission shall develop a long-term management plan for the campus.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 305. FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION OFFICEGeneral FundâState Appropriation (FY 2026). . . .$4,354,000General FundâState Appropriation (FY 2027). . . .$3,717,000General FundâFederal Appropriation. . . .$6,332,000General FundâPrivate/Local Appropriation. . . .$24,000Aquatic Lands Enhancement AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$483,000Firearms Range AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$37,000Natural Climate Solutions AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$394,000Recreation Access Pass AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$150,000Recreation Resources AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$5,402,000NOVA Program AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$1,601,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$22,494,000The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) $37,000 of the firearms range accountâstate appropriation is provided solely to the recreation and conservation funding board for administration of the firearms range grant program as described in RCW 79A.25.210.(2) $5,402,000 of the recreation resources accountâstate appropriation is provided solely to the recreation and conservation funding board for administrative and coordinating costs of the recreation and conservation office and the board as described in RCW 79A.25.080(1).(3) $1,601,000 of the NOVA program accountâstate appropriation is provided solely to the recreation and conservation funding board for administration of the nonhighway and off-road vehicle activities program as described in chapter 46.09 RCW.(4) $1,704,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $1,704,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for operational and administrative support of lead entities and salmon recovery regions.(5) $100,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $100,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for a grant to a nonprofit organization with a mission for salmon and steelhead restoration to install and store near-term solutions to prevent steelhead mortality at the Hood canal bridge.(6) The office must report to and coordinate with the department of ecology to track expenditures from climate commitment act accounts, as defined and described in RCW 70A.65.300 and chapter 173-446B WAC.(7) $100,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 is provided solely for grants that promote outdoor recreation access for underrepresented communities impacted by environmental inequities.(8) $200,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 is provided solely for grants for water safety education to both motorized and nonmotorized water users of Lake Union.(9) $50,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5281 (vessel length/nonresident). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2025, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.(10) $150,000 of the recreation access pass accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5390 (discover pass). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2025, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.(11) $38,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $38,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for the department to participate in and contribute to a multiagency permitting team for the purpose of streamlining the review of environmental restoration projects that directly benefit fish or fish habitat. Projects for review by the multiagency permitting team must be submitted under a joint aquatic resources permit application and have had a project review completed by the department of archaeology and historic preservation regarding cultural resources protection requirements, including the requirements of executive order 21-02. In general, the multiagency permitting team is comprised of state agencies with jurisdictional responsibility for the project proposal, local governments in whose geographical jurisdiction the project would be located, and any other expertise that may be needed in review of the project. State agencies are responsible for carrying out their own permit review and approval process.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 306. FOR THE ENVIRONMENTAL AND LAND USE HEARINGS OFFICEGeneral FundâState Appropriation (FY 2026). . . .$3,997,000General FundâState Appropriation (FY 2027). . . .$4,118,000Climate Investment AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$100,000Model Toxics Control Operating AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$245,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$8,460,000The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) $379,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026, $379,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027, and $100,000 of the climate investment accountâstate appropriation are provided solely for the agency to hire staff to respond to increased caseloads, including appeals as a result of the climate commitment act, chapter 316, Laws of 2021.(2) The office must report to and coordinate with the department of ecology to track expenditures from climate commitment act accounts, as defined and described in RCW 70A.65.300 and chapter 173-446B WAC.(3) $37,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 is provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute House Bill No. 1409 (clean fuels program). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2025, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.(4) $9,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5284 (solid waste management). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2025, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.(5) $25,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $45,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for implementation of Senate Bill No. 5334 (DNR civil enforcement appeal). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2025, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 307. FOR THE CONSERVATION COMMISSIONGeneral FundâState Appropriation (FY 2026). . . .$14,114,000General FundâState Appropriation (FY 2027). . . .$14,101,000General FundâFederal Appropriation. . . .$2,482,000Natural Climate Solutions AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$6,506,000Public Works Assistance AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$10,719,000Model Toxics Control Operating AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$1,110,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$49,032,000The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) $2,500,000 of the natural climate solutions accountâstate appropriation is provided solely to the commission to work with conservation districts to implement priority forest health and community wildfire resilience projects.(2) $1,000,000 of the natural climate solutions accountâstate appropriation is provided solely to connect scientists, practitioners, and researchers and coordinate efforts to monitor and quantify benefits of best management practices on agricultural lands, and better understand values and motivations of landowners to implement voluntary incentive programs.(3) $10,719,000 of the public works assistance accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of the voluntary stewardship program. This amount may not be used to fund agency indirect and administrative expenses.(4) The commission must report to and coordinate with the department of ecology to track expenditures from climate commitment act accounts, as defined and described in RCW 70A.65.300 and chapter 173-446B WAC.(5) $1,000,000 of the natural climate solutions accountâstate appropriation are provided solely to increase native tree and shrub availability for riparian restoration projects under the governor's salmon strategy.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 308. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFEGeneral FundâState Appropriation (FY 2026). . . .$168,876,000General FundâState Appropriation (FY 2027). . . .$164,430,000General FundâFederal Appropriation. . . .$172,080,000General FundâPrivate/Local Appropriation. . . .$76,648,000Climate Commitment AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$3,560,000Natural Climate Solutions AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$4,394,000ORV and Nonhighway Vehicle AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$558,000Aquatic Lands Enhancement AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$14,651,000Recreational Fisheries Enhancement AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$3,999,000Warm Water Game Fish AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$3,116,000Eastern Washington Pheasant Enhancement AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$396,000Limited Fish and Wildlife AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$40,680,000Special Wildlife AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$2,945,000Special Wildlife AccountâFederal Appropriation. . . .$532,000Special Wildlife AccountâPrivate/Local Appropriation. . . .$3,864,000Wildlife Rehabilitation AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$361,000Ballast Water and Biofouling Management AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$10,000Regional Fisheries Enhancement Salmonid RecoveryAccountâFederal Appropriation. . . .$5,001,000Oil Spill Prevention AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$1,335,000Aquatic Invasive Species Management AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$1,038,000Model Toxics Control Operating AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$9,805,000Fish, Wildlife, and Conservation AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$105,030,000Oyster Reserve Land AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$524,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$783,833,000The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) $1,777,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $1,777,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely to grant to the northwest Indian fisheries commission for hatchery operations that are prioritized to increase prey abundance for southern resident orcas, including $200,000 per fiscal year for tagging and marking costs, and the remainder to grant to tribes in the following amounts per fiscal year: $150,000 for the Quinault Indian Nation, $199,000 for the Tulalip Tribes, $268,000 for the Quileute Tribe, $186,000 for the Puyallup Tribe, $122,000 for the Port Gamble S'Klallam Tribe, $25,000 for the Muckleshoot Indian Tribe, $207,000 for the Squaxin Island Tribe, $142,000 for the Skokomish Indian Tribe, and $278,000 for the Lummi Nation.(2) $330,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $330,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for the department to provide to the Yakama Nation for hatchery operations that are prioritized to increase prey abundance for southern resident orcas.(3) $175,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $175,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely to grant to public utility districts for additional hatchery production that is prioritized to increase prey abundance for southern resident orcas.(4) $467,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $467,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely to pay for emergency fire suppression costs. These amounts may not be used to fund agency indirect and administrative expenses.(5) $400,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $400,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for a state match to support the Puget Sound nearshore partnership between the department and the United States army corps of engineers.(6) $6,082,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $6,082,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for the department to implement eradication and control measures on European green crabs through coordination and grants with partner organizations. The department must provide annual progress reports on the success and challenges of the measures to the appropriate committees of the legislature by September 15th of each fiscal year.(7)(a) $390,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $390,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely to develop conflict mitigation strategies for wolf recovery and staff resources statewide for response to wolf-livestock conflicts. The department shall not hire contract range riders in northeast Washington unless there is a gap in coverage from entities funded through the northeast Washington wolf-livestock management grant program as provided in RCW 16.76.020. The department must focus on facilitating coordination with other entities providing conflict deterrence, including range riding, and technical assistance to livestock producers in order to minimize wolf-livestock issues. The department is discouraged from the use of firearms from helicopters for removing wolves.(b) Of the amounts provided in (a) of this subsection, $200,000 shall be used to implement a conflict mitigation pilot program in Southeast Washington in partnership with projects guarding the respective interests of predators and humans.(8) $639,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $639,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for the department to provide additional capacity to the attorney general's office to prosecute environmental crimes. The department must provide an annual report by December 1st of each year, to the appropriate committees of the legislature, on the progress made in prosecuting environmental crimes.(9) $560,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $560,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for management of pinniped populations on the lower Columbia river and its tributaries with the goal of increasing chinook salmon abundance and prey availability for southern resident orcas.(10) $6,042,000 of the model toxics control operating accountâstate appropriation is provided solely to continue and increase the capacity to analyze salmon contaminants of emerging concern (CEC), including substances such as 6PPD-quinone, per- and polyfluoroalkyl substances (PFAS), and polychlorinated biphenyls (PCB) in already collected tissue samples. This research will accelerate recovery and protection by identifying the location and sources of CEC exposure.(11) $130,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $130,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for an external facilitator to seek solutions through a collaborative process using the department's wolf advisory group.(12) $285,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $285,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely to manage electronic tracked crab fishery gear to avoid whale entanglements during their migration in accordance with the endangered species act incidental take permit.(13) $1,200,000 of the natural climate solutions accountâstate appropriation is provided solely to reduce severe wildfire risk and increase forest resiliency through fuels reduction, thinning, fuel break creation, and prescribed burning on agency lands. The amounts provided in this subsection may not be used to fund agency indirect and administrative expenses.(14) $14,000,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $14,000,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for the protection, recovery, and restoration of biodiversity, the recovery of threatened and endangered species, and a review of the department of fish and wildlife. Examples include habitat protection and restoration, technical assistance for growth management act planning, fish passage improvements, conservation education, scientific research for species and ecosystem protection, and similar activities. Funding in this subsection may include pass-throughs to public, nonprofit, academic, or tribal entities for the purposes of this subsection.(15) The department must report to and coordinate with the department of ecology to track expenditures from climate commitment act accounts, as defined and described in RCW 70A.65.300 and chapter 173-446B WAC.(16) $1,175,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $1,175,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for the department to continue to restore shrubsteppe habitat and associated wildlife on public lands as well as private lands by landowners who are willing to participate. The restoration effort must be coordinated with other natural resource agencies and interested stakeholders.(17) $3,750,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026, $3,750,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027, and $1,200,000 of the limited fish and wildlife accountâstate appropriation are provided solely to continue to address the maintenance backlog associated with providing recreation on lands managed by the department. Allowable uses include, but are not limited to, maintenance, repair, or replacement of trails, toilet facilities, roads, parking lots, campgrounds, picnic sites, water access areas, signs, kiosks, and gates. The department is encouraged to partner with nonprofit organizations in the maintenance of public lands.(18) $250,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $250,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for the department to increase the work of regional fisheries enhancement groups.(19) $1,000,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 is provided solely for habitat recovery and restoration work on agency owned and managed lands damaged from wildfires.(20) $1,866,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026, $584,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027, $1,219,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation, $513,000 of the general fundâprivate/local appropriation, $5,000 of the ORV and nonhighway vehicle accountâstate appropriation, $104,000 of the aquatic lands enhancement accountâstate appropriation, $22,000 of the warm water game fish accountâstate appropriation, $5,000 of the eastern Washington pheasant enhancement accountâstate appropriation, $271,000 of the limited fish and wildlife accountâstate appropriation, $21,000 of the special wildlife accountâstate appropriation, $9,000 of the oil spill prevention accountâstate appropriation, $56,000 of the model toxics control operating accountâstate appropriation, and $634,000 of the fish, wildlife, and conservation accountâstate appropriation, are provided solely to procure a human resource management system. The agency will evaluate and prioritize management systems that have the capability to track and manage volunteer safety training requirements. A letter must be sent to the director of the office of financial management explaining the rationale if the agency selects a technical solution that is not able to support management of volunteer training requirements. The project is subject to the conditions, limitations, and review requirements of section 701 of this act.(21) $1,810,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026, $1,810,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027, and $3,620,000 of the general fundâprivate/local appropriation are provided solely for monitoring and response efforts for invasive quagga mussels. Possible activities include coordination with tribal, federal, regional, state, and local entities, watercraft inspections and decontamination, equipment and training, monitoring of potential residential and commercial pathways, and public outreach.(22) $1,150,000 of the climate commitment accountâstate appropriation and $530,000 of the natural climate solutions accountâstate appropriation are provided solely for increasing management planning capacity for habitat connectivity and to achieve meaningful greenhouse gas emissions reduction through energy efficiency projects.(23) $900,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $489,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely to implement response efforts to chronic wasting disease in accordance with the chronic wasting disease management plan.(24) $375,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $375,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely to continue operations of the Toutle and Skamania hatcheries.(25) $79,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 is provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5076 (nonspot shrimp pot license). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2025, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.(26) $200,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 is provided solely for a conflict resolution process mediated by the federal mediation and conciliation service. This funding must be used by the department to facilitate meetings between Skagit tribes, drainage and irrigation districts, and state and federal resource agencies and support the technical work necessary to resolve conflict. Invited parties must include the national marine fisheries service, Washington state department of agriculture, Washington state department of fish and wildlife, Swinomish Indian tribal community, Upper Skagit Indian Tribe, Sauk-Suiattle Indian Tribe, and Skagit drainage and irrigation districts consortium LLC. A report documenting meeting notes, points of resolution, and recommendations must be provided to the legislature no later than June 30, 2026.(27) $273,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $273,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for the department to participate in and contribute to a multiagency permitting team for the purpose of streamlining the review of environmental restoration projects that directly benefit fish or fish habitat. Projects for review by the multiagency permitting team must be submitted under a joint aquatic resources permit application and have had a project review completed by the department of archaeology and historic preservation regarding cultural resources protection requirements, including the requirements of executive order 21-02. In general, the multiagency permitting team is comprised of state agencies with jurisdictional responsibility for the project proposal, local governments in whose geographical jurisdiction the project would be located, and any other expertise that may be needed in review of the project. State agencies are responsible for carrying out their own permit review and approval process.(28) Within amounts appropriated in this section, the department shall work with its wolf advisory group and the department of agriculture to explore the concept of a "pay for presence" program to defray some of the costs incurred by livestock producers who ranch in the presence of wolves. Such programs have been used in other parts of wolf range in the western United States and could serve as a replacement for the state's current indirect livestock compensation program. The department must report to the appropriate committees of the legislature by December 1, 2025, on potential alternatives, estimated costs, and feasibility, including the appropriate administering agency, of implementing such a program in Washington state.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 309. FOR THE PUGET SOUND PARTNERSHIPGeneral FundâState Appropriation (FY 2026). . . .$8,278,000General FundâState Appropriation (FY 2027). . . .$8,468,000General FundâFederal Appropriation. . . .$32,210,000Aquatic Lands Enhancement AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$1,514,000Model Toxics Control Operating AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$1,365,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$51,835,000The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) By October 15, 2026, the Puget Sound partnership shall provide the governor and appropriate legislative fiscal committees a single, prioritized list of state agency 2027-2029 capital and operating budget requests related to Puget Sound recovery and restoration.(2) $350,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $350,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for the partnership to implement shipping noise reduction initiatives and monitoring programs in the Puget Sound, in coordination with Canadian and United States authorities. The partnership must contract with Washington maritime blue in order to establish and administer the quiet sound program to better understand and reduce the cumulative effects of acoustic and physical disturbance from large commercial vessels on southern resident orcas throughout their range in Washington state. Washington maritime blue will support a quiet sound leadership committee and work groups that include relevant federal and state agencies, ports, industry, research institutions, and nongovernmental organizations and consult early and often with relevant federally recognized tribes.(3) $78,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $78,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for the department to participate in and contribute to a multiagency permitting team for the purpose of streamlining the review of environmental restoration projects that directly benefit fish or fish habitat. Projects for review by the multiagency permitting team must be submitted under a joint aquatic resources permit application and have had a project review completed by the department of archaeology and historic preservation regarding cultural resources protection requirements, including the requirements of executive order 21-02. In general, the multiagency permitting team is comprised of state agencies with jurisdictional responsibility for the project proposal, local governments in whose geographical jurisdiction the project would be located, and any other expertise that may be needed in review of the project. State agencies are responsible for carrying out their own permit review and approval process.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 310. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCESGeneral FundâState Appropriation (FY 2026). . . .$163,143,000General FundâState Appropriation (FY 2027). . . .$163,174,000General FundâFederal Appropriation. . . .$117,454,000General FundâPrivate/Local Appropriation. . . .$5,772,000Access Road Revolving Nonappropriated AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$1,248,000Climate Commitment AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$7,072,000Derelict Structure Removal AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$2,605,000Forest Development AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$58,281,000Forest Fire Protection Assessment NonappropriatedAccountâState Appropriation. . . .$492,000Forest Fire Protection Assessment NonappropriatedAccountâPrivate/Local Appropriation. . . .$500,000Forest Health Revolving Nonappropriated AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$578,000Natural Climate Solutions AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$11,734,000Natural Resources Federal Lands RevolvingNonappropriated AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$108,000NOVA Program AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$750,000ORV and Nonhighway Vehicle AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$8,094,000State Forest Nursery Revolving NonappropriatedAccountâState Appropriation. . . .$194,000Surveys and Maps AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$2,362,000Aquatic Lands Enhancement AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$21,801,000Resource Management Cost AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$124,332,000Surface Mining Reclamation AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$6,643,000Disaster Response AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$23,874,000Forest and Fish Support AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$11,564,000Aquatic Land Dredged Material Disposal Site AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$395,000Natural Resources Conservation Areas StewardshipAccountâState Appropriation. . . .$54,000Forest Practices Application AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$2,157,000Air Pollution Control AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$936,000Model Toxics Control Operating AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$959,000Wildfire Response, Forest Restoration, and CommunityResilience AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$117,658,000Derelict Vessel Removal AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$10,627,000Community Forest Trust AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$52,000Agricultural College Trust Management AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$3,543,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$868,156,000The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) $2,823,000 of the natural climate solutions accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the department to carry out the forest practices adaptive management program pursuant to RCW 76.09.370 and the May 24, 2012, settlement agreement entered into by the department and the department of ecology. Scientific research must be carried out according to the master project schedule and work plan of cooperative monitoring, evaluation, and research priorities adopted by the forest practices board.(2) $1,000,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $1,000,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for the small forest landowner office, in order to restore staffing capacity reduced during the great recession and to support small forest landowners, including assistance related to forest and fish act regulations.(3) $1,583,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $1,515,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for deposit into the agricultural college trust management account and are provided solely to manage approximately 70,700 acres of Washington State University's agricultural college trust lands.(4) $85,320,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026, $85,320,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027, and $16,050,000 of the disaster response accountâstate appropriation are provided solely for emergency response, including fire suppression. The department shall provide a monthly report to the office of financial management and the appropriate fiscal and policy committees of the legislature with an update of fire suppression costs incurred and the number and type of wildfires suppressed.(5) $8,470,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026, $8,470,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027, and $396,000 of the disaster response accountâstate appropriation are provided solely for indirect and administrative expenses related to fire suppression.(6) $5,500,000 of the forest and fish support accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for outcome-based performance contracts with tribes to participate in the implementation of the forest practices program. Contracts awarded may only contain indirect costs set at or below the rate in the contracting tribe's indirect cost agreement with the federal government. Of the amount provided in this subsection, $500,000 is contingent upon receipts under RCW 82.04.261 exceeding $8,000,000 per biennium. If receipts under RCW 82.04.261 are more than $8,000,000 but less than $8,500,000 for the biennium, an amount equivalent to the difference between actual receipts and $8,500,000 shall lapse.(7) Consistent with the recommendations of the Wildfire Suppression Funding and Costs (18-02) report of the joint legislative audit and review committee, the department shall submit a report to the governor and legislature by December 1, 2025, and December 1, 2026, describing the previous fire season. At a minimum, the report shall provide information for each wildfire in the state, including its location, impact by type of land ownership, the extent it involved timber or range lands, cause, size, costs, and cost-share with federal agencies and nonstate partners. The report must also be posted on the agency's website.(8) $4,206,000 of the aquatic land enhancement accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the removal of creosote pilings and debris from the marine environment and to continue monitoring zooplankton and eelgrass beds on state-owned aquatic lands managed by the department. Actions will address recommendations to recover the southern resident orca population and to monitor ocean acidification as well as help implement the Puget Sound action agenda.(9) $266,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $266,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for compensation to the trust beneficiaries and department for lost revenue from leases to amateur radio operators who use space on the department managed radio towers for their equipment. The department is authorized to lease sites at the rate of up to $100 per year, per site, per lessee. The legislature makes this appropriation to fulfill the remaining costs of the leases at market rate per RCW 79.13.510.(10) $12,000 of the aquatic lands enhancement accountâstate appropriation and $10,000 of the resource management cost accountâstate appropriation are provided solely for the department to participate in and contribute to a multiagency permitting team for the purpose of streamlining the review of environmental restoration projects that directly benefit fish or fish habitat. Projects for review by the multiagency permitting team must be submitted under a joint aquatic resources permit application and have had a project review completed by the department of archaeology and historic preservation regarding cultural resources protection requirements, including the requirements of executive order 21-02. In general, the multiagency permitting team is comprised of state agencies with jurisdictional responsibility for the project proposal, local governments in whose geographical jurisdiction the project would be located, and any other expertise that may be needed in review of the project. State agencies are responsible for carrying out their own permit review and approval process.(11) $3,000,000 of the natural climate solutions accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for investment in urban forestry to support reduction of negative environmental conditions such as heat, flooding, and pollution and helping communities become greener, cleaner, healthier, and more resilient.(12) $1,830,000 of the climate commitment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the department to make investments in education and training to bolster a statewide natural resources workforce to support the health and resilience of Washington's forests. Of this amount, $400,000 is provided solely to provide wildland fire management training to tribal communities and members.(13) The department must report to and coordinate with the department of ecology to track expenditures from climate commitment act accounts, as defined and described in RCW 70A.65.300 and chapter 173-446B WAC.(14) $500,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $500,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for the department to coordinate with the Olympic natural resources center to study emerging ecosystem threats such as Swiss needlecast disease, fully implement the T3 watershed experiments on state trust lands, continue field trials for long-term ecosystem productivity, and engage stakeholders through learning-based collaboration.(15) $3,750,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $3,750,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely to continue to address the maintenance backlog associated with providing recreation on lands managed by the department. Allowable uses include, but are not limited to, maintenance, repair, or replacement of trails, toilet facilities, roads, parking lots, campgrounds, picnic sites, water access areas, signs, kiosks, and gates. The department is encouraged to partner with nonprofit organizations in the maintenance of public lands.(16) $2,543,000 of the resource management cost accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the department to implement eradication and control measures on European green crabs on state-owned aquatic lands and adjacent lands as appropriate. The department must report to and coordinate with the department of fish and wildlife to support the department of fish and wildlife's quarterly progress reports to the legislature.(17) The department must enter into an interagency agreement with the department of fish and wildlife to complete biological survey work necessary to implement the wildstock geoduck commercial fishery. The department must compensate the department of fish and wildlife for direct costs, but not for agency overhead or indirect costs.(18) $440,000 of the natural climate solutions accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 1563 (prescribed fire claims). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2025, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.(19) $2,026,000 of the surface mining reclamation accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Senate Bill No. 5319 (surface mine reclamation). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2025, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.(20) $43,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $56,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for implementation of Senate Bill No. 5334 (DNR civil enforcement appeal). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2025, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 311. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF AGRICULTUREGeneral FundâState Appropriation (FY 2026). . . .$98,069,000General FundâState Appropriation (FY 2027). . . .$95,345,000General FundâFederal Appropriation. . . .$47,675,000General FundâPrivate/Local Appropriation. . . .$193,000Agricultural Pest and Disease Response AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$2,000,000Aquatic Lands Enhancement AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$2,894,000Climate Commitment AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$1,609,000Water Quality Permit AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$73,000Model Toxics Control Operating AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$14,432,000Northeast Washington Wolf-Livestock ManagementNonappropriated AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$911,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$263,201,000The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) $20,570,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $20,570,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely as base funding for the emergency food assistance program as provided in RCW 43.23.290.(2) $46,625,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $46,625,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely as additional funding for implementing the emergency food assistance program as defined in RCW 43.23.290.(3) $4,342,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $4,000,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for local food system infrastructure and market access grants.(4) $2,500,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $2,500,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely as base funding for the farm to school program established in RCW 15.64.060.(5) $2,380,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $2,380,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for implementing a Popillia japonica monitoring and eradication program in central Washington.(6) $912,000 of the northeast Washington wolf-livestock management nonappropriated accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the department to conduct the following:(a) Offer grants for the northeast Washington wolf-livestock management program as provided in RCW 16.76.020. Funds from the grant program must be used only for the deployment of nonlethal deterrence, specifically with the goal to reduce the likelihood of cattle being injured or killed by wolves by deploying proactive, preventative methods that have a high probability of producing effective results. Grant proposals will be assessed partially on this intent. Grantees who use funds for range riders or herd monitoring must deploy this tool in a manner so that targeted areas with cattle are visited daily or near daily. Grantees must collaborate with other grantees of the program and other entities providing prevention efforts resulting in coordinated wolf-livestock conflict deterrence efforts, both temporally and spatially, therefore providing well timed and placed preventative coverage on the landscape. Additionally, range riders must document their activities with GPS track logs and provide written description of their efforts to the department of fish and wildlife on a monthly basis. The department shall incorporate the requirements of this subsection into contract language with the grantees.(b) Within the amounts provided in this subsection, the department may provide up to $100,000 each fiscal year to the sheriffs offices of Ferry and Stevens counties for providing a local wildlife specialist to aid the department of fish and wildlife in the management of wolves in northeast Washington.(7) $424,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $425,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for implementation of chapter 135, Laws of 2022, which requires the department to establish and maintain cannabis testing lab quality standards by rule.(8) $1,490,000 of the model toxics control operating accountâstate appropriation is provided solely to increase capacity and support work to reduce nitrate pollution in groundwater from irrigated agriculture in the lower Yakima valley.(9) $462,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026, $462,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027, and $700,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely to match federal funding for eradication treatments and follow-up monitoring of invasive moths.(10) $200,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $200,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely to continue the early detection program for the spotted lanternfly and the associated invasive Ailanthus altissima, known colloquially as tree-of-heaven, survey and control programs.(11) The department must report to and coordinate with the department of ecology to track expenditures from climate commitment act accounts, as defined and described in RCW 70A.65.300 and chapter 173-446B WAC.(12) $170,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $170,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely to continue a shellfish coordinator position.(13) $318,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $317,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for compliance-based laboratory analysis of pesticides in cannabis.(14) $100,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 is provided solely for the department to contract with a nonprofit organization to administer a low-barrier grant program to support organic agriculture. Grants may not exceed $25,000 to each recipient.(15) $893,000 of the climate commitment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely to support planning and development of statewide livestock composting infrastructure to protect human health and reduce greenhouse gas emission.(16) $300,000 of the model toxics control operating accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Substitute House Bill No. 1309 (burrowing shrimp). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2025, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.(17) $118,000 of the model toxics control operating accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Substitute House Bill No. 1294 (pesticide application committee). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2025, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.(18) $150,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 is provided solely for the department to collaborate with local organizations and community leaders to provide agricultural and economic support, training, and services to those historically marginalized and underrepresented in agriculture and ranching across the state. Potential areas of focus include sustainable agricultural practices, engagement in agricultural activities for youth exposed to poverty and violence, growth of culturally relevant crops, and family strengthening.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 312. FOR THE ENERGY FACILITY SITE EVALUATION COUNCILGeneral FundâState Appropriation (FY 2026). . . .$1,639,000General FundâState Appropriation (FY 2027). . . .$1,633,000Climate Commitment AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$6,069,000Energy Facility Site Evaluation Council AccountâPrivate/Local Appropriation. . . .$28,231,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$37,572,000The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) $1,068,000 of the climate commitment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely to support agency operations and to hire additional environmental siting and compliance positions needed to support an anticipated workload increase from new clean energy projects.(2) $1,034,000 of the climate commitment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for preapplication development and clean energy manufacturing review, reimbursement to tribes for costs associated with clean energy project application reviews, and contracted services for green hydrogen and clean energy manufacturing programs.(3) The council must report to and coordinate with the department of ecology to track expenditures from climate commitment act accounts, as defined and described in RCW 70A.65.300 and chapter 173-446B WAC.(End of part)PART IVTRANSPORTATIONNEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 401. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF LICENSINGGeneral FundâState Appropriation (FY 2026). . . .$2,575,000General FundâState Appropriation (FY 2027). . . .$2,110,000Architects' License AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$298,000Funeral and Cemetery AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$1,000Real Estate Commission AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$17,639,000Uniform Commercial Code AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$4,358,000Real Estate Education Program AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$276,000Real Estate Appraiser Commission AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$395,000Business and Professions AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$37,266,000Real Estate Research AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$415,000Concealed Pistol License Renewal NotificationAccountâState Appropriation. . . .$224,000Derelict Vessel Removal AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$41,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$65,598,000The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) $146,000 of the business and professions accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5294 (professional accounts). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2025, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.(2) $26,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5281 (vessel length/nonresident). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2025, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.(3) $1,000 of the architects' license accountâstate appropriation, $4,000 of the real estate commission accountâstate appropriation, $24,000 of the business and professions accountâstate appropriation, and $1,000 of the funeral and cemetery accountâstate appropriation are provided solely for implementation of Senate Bill No. 5420 (veteran benefits access). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2025, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.(4) $16,000 of the business and professions accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5714 (bail bond agents/immigration). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2025, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.(5) $2,440,000 of the business and professions accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Substitute House Bill No. 1023 (cosmetology compact). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2025, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.(6) $400,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 is provided solely for the certified real estate appraiser licensure and regulatory program to supplement revenue from fees. The department shall adjust the annual fees for new or renewed licenses for certified real estate appraisers to no more than 33 percent over the fees in effect as of October 1, 2024. The department shall establish the adjusted fees no later than October 14, 2025.(7) $150,000 of the concealed pistol license renewal notification accountâstate appropriation is provided solely to implement chapter 74, Laws of 2017 (concealed pistol license).NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 402. FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE PATROLGeneral FundâState Appropriation (FY 2026). . . .$81,686,000General FundâState Appropriation (FY 2027). . . .$83,860,000General FundâFederal Appropriation. . . .$17,026,000General FundâPrivate/Local Appropriation. . . .$3,173,000Climate Commitment AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$1,804,000Death Investigations AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$9,710,000County Criminal Justice Assistance AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$4,916,000Municipal Criminal Justice Assistance AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$1,811,000Fire Service Trust AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$131,000Vehicle License Fraud AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$119,000Disaster Response AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$8,000,000Fire Service Training AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$14,289,000Model Toxics Control Operating AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$596,000Fingerprint Identification AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$15,490,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$242,611,000The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) $7,500,000 of the disaster response accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for Washington state fire service resource mobilization costs incurred in response to an emergency or disaster authorized under RCW 43.43.960 through 43.43.964. The state patrol shall submit a report quarterly to the office of financial management and the legislative fiscal committees detailing information on current and planned expenditures from this account. This work shall be done in coordination with the military department.(2) $500,000 of the disaster response accountâstate appropriation, is provided solely for the early deployment or prepositioning of Washington state fire service resources in advance of an expected mobilization event. Any authorization for the deployment of resources under this section must be authorized in accordance with section 6 of the Washington state fire services resource mobilization plan.(3) $1,000,000 of the fire service training accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the firefighter apprenticeship training program.(4) Any funds provided to the missing and exploited children task force shall ensure operations are adherent to federally established internet crimes against children standards.(5) $5,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 is provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5655 (child care centers/buildings). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2025, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.(6) $71,000 of the fingerprint identification accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 1163 (firearm purchasing). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2025, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.(7)(a) $150,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $150,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for the Washington state patrol to provide assistance to the forensic investigation council for the following:(i) Compliance with chapter 42.56 RCW (public records act), chapter 42.30 RCW (open public meetings act), records management requirements, general administrative support, and payment processing;(ii) In coordination with Washington technology solutions, the creation and maintenance of a website for the forensic investigation council; and(iii) In coordination with Washington technology solutions, state email addresses for the forensic investigation council.(b) To provide this assistance, the Washington state patrol may assist directly or may enter into interagency agreements as it deems appropriate.(End of part)PART VEDUCATIONNEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 501. FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTIONGeneral FundâState Appropriation (FY 2026). . . .$59,939,000General FundâState Appropriation (FY 2027). . . .$55,045,000General FundâFederal Appropriation. . . .$149,780,000General FundâPrivate/Local Appropriation. . . .$8,083,000Dedicated Cannabis AccountâState Appropriation(FY 2026). . . .$637,000Dedicated Cannabis AccountâState Appropriation(FY 2027). . . .$658,000Washington Opportunity Pathways AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$291,000Performance Audits of Government AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$213,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$274,646,000The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) BASE OPERATIONS AND EXPENSES OF THE OFFICE(a) $27,766,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $27,685,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for the operation and expenses of the office of the superintendent of public instruction. Funding in this subsection may only be used for the following purposes:(i) By October 31st of each year, the office of the superintendent of public instruction shall produce an annual status report on implementation of the budget provisos in this section and sections 515 and 523 of this act. The status report of each proviso shall include, but not be limited to, the following information: Purpose and objective, number of state staff funded by the proviso, number of contractors, status of proviso implementation, number of beneficiaries by year, list of beneficiaries, a comparison of budgeted funding and actual expenditures, other sources and amounts of funding, and proviso outcomes and achievements;(ii) Districts shall annually report to the office of the superintendent of public instruction on: (A) The annual number of graduating high school seniors within the district earning the Washington state seal of biliteracy provided in RCW 28A.300.575; and (B) the number of high school students earning competency-based high school credits for world languages by demonstrating proficiency in a language other than English. The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall provide a summary report to the office of the governor and the appropriate committees of the legislature by December 1st of each year;(iii) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall perform ongoing program reviews of alternative learning experience programs, dropout reengagement programs, and other high risk programs. Findings from the program reviews will be used to support and prioritize the office of the superintendent of public instruction outreach and education efforts that assist school districts in implementing the programs in accordance with statute and legislative intent, as well as to support financial and performance audit work conducted by the office of the state auditor;(iv) Districts shall report to the office the results of each collective bargaining agreement for certificated staff within their district using a uniform template as required by the superintendent, within 30 days of finalizing contracts. The data must include, but is not limited to: Minimum and maximum base salaries, supplemental salary information, and average percent increase for all certificated instructional staff. Within existing resources by December 1st of each year, the office shall produce a report for the legislative evaluation and accountability program committee summarizing the district level collective bargaining agreement data;(v) Ongoing work of the education opportunity gap oversight and accountability committee;(vi) Activities related to public schools other than common schools authorized under chapter 28A.710 RCW; and(vii) The office of native education to increase services to tribes, including but not limited to, providing assistance to tribes and school districts to implement Since Time Immemorial, applying to become tribal compact schools, convening the Washington state native American education advisory committee, and extending professional learning opportunities to provide instruction in tribal history, culture, and government. The professional development must be done in collaboration with school district administrators and school directors. Funding in this subsection is sufficient for the office, the Washington state school directors' association government-to-government task force, and the association of educational service districts to collaborate with the tribal leaders congress on education to develop a tribal consultation training and schedule.(b) $826,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $804,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for the implementation of chapter 240, Laws of 2010, including staffing the office of equity and civil rights.(c) $3,205,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $1,205,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for the financial education public-private partnership and for the implementation of chapter 238, Laws of 2022 (student financial literacy) which provides grants to school districts for integrating financial literacy education into professional development for certificated staff. Of the amounts provided within this subsection, up to $1,205,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation in each fiscal year may be used for the operational expenses of the financial education public private partnership.(d) $2,393,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $370,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for providing proactive and solutions-oriented regional and local technical and financial assistance to districts. Of the amounts provided in this subsection, $2,000,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 is provided solely for school districts that have been removed from their insurance risk pool due to district financial trouble for the difference between the previous cost of insurance provided through the Washington schools risk management pool and the cost of purchasing private insurance. Priority shall be given to the school district that has been in binding conditions for the longest period.(e) $60,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5004 (school emergency response). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2025, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.(f) $224,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $12,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5009 (vehicle types student transpo). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2025, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.(g) $41,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $33,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5025 (educational interpreters). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2025, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.(h) $20,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 is provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5030 (vital records access). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2025, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.(i) $747,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $611,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Substitute House Bill No. 1296 (public education system). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2025, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.(j) $6,400,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $6,400,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5263 (special education funding). The funding provided in this subsection is sufficient for 20 pilot schools to establish school-wide centers of excellence for inclusionary practices. If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2025, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.(k) $194,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $156,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for implementation of Senate Bill No. 5189 (competency-based education). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2025, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.(l) $50,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5192 (materials, supplies and op costs). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2025, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.(m) $25,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $24,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for implementation of Substitute House Bill No. 1079 (remote testing). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2025, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.(n) $29,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 is provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5253 (special education to 22). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2025, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.(o) $21,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 is provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5412 (interfund loans/schools). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2025, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.(p) $2,000,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $2,000,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for demonstration projects showcasing the processes and outcomes of building school-wide systems to support students in distress and prevent crisis escalation cycles that may result in restraint or isolation.(i) The office of the superintendent of public instruction must provide grants to school districts for:(A) Six demonstration sites to showcase best practices and serve as learning communities and examples that allow other school districts to observe positive practices in real-world settings; and(B) Increasing the number of pilot sites to engage in targeted professional development through learning experiences offered by the demonstration sites and contracted providers.(ii) The pilot sites must:(A) Build school-level and district-level systems that incorporate positive, trauma-informed behavior support practices to prevent crisis escalation and reduce the use of restraint and isolation; and(B) Improve data collection and reporting systems and complete other tasks to achieve the project goal.(iii) By November 15, 2026, and in accordance with RCW 43.01.036, the office of the superintendent of public instruction must provide the appropriate committees of the legislature with a report on the demonstration projects. The report must, to the extent possible, quantify the impact of the demonstration projects in terms of student outcomes, such as changes in disruptive student behavior, increases in the amount of time students with disabilities spend in the general education setting, or increases in assessment scores. The report must include an estimate of the fiscal impact that use of the practices identified in this subsection might have on school district budgets if adopted statewide. The report must also address key implementation challenges and findings, as well as include recommendations for statewide policy changes.(2) DATA SYSTEMS(a) $1,802,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $1,802,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for implementing a comprehensive data system to include financial, student, and educator data, including development and maintenance of the comprehensive education data and research system (CEDARS).(b) $281,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $281,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for K-20 telecommunications network technical support in the K-12 sector to prevent system failures and avoid interruptions in school utilization of the data processing and video-conferencing capabilities of the network. These funds may be used to purchase engineering and advanced technical support for the network.(c) $450,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $450,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for the superintendent of public instruction to develop and implement a statewide accountability system to address absenteeism and to improve student graduation rates. The system must use data to engage schools and districts in identifying successful strategies and systems that are based on federal and state accountability measures. Funding may also support the effort to provide assistance about successful strategies and systems to districts and schools that are underperforming in the targeted student subgroups.(3) WORK GROUPS(a) $68,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $68,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for implementation of chapter 128, Laws of 2023 (regional apprenticeship prgs).(b) $200,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $200,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for the office of the superintendent of public instruction to meet statutory obligations related to the provision of medically and scientifically accurate, age-appropriate, and inclusive sexual health education as authorized by chapter 206, Laws of 1988 (AIDS omnibus act) and chapter 265, Laws of 2007 (healthy youth act).(c) $200,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $200,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for implementation of chapter 386, Laws of 2019 (social emotional learning).(d) $107,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $107,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for the office to support the children and youth behavioral health work group created in chapter 130, Laws of 2020 (child. mental health wk. grp).(e) $125,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $51,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Substitute House Bill No. 1414 (CTE careers work group). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2025, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.(4) STATEWIDE PROGRAMS(a) $11,705,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026, $11,586,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027, $637,000 of the dedicated cannabis accountâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026, and $658,000 of the dedicated cannabis accountâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for the following statewide programs:(i) The Washington kindergarten inventory of developing skills. State funding shall support statewide administration and district implementation of the inventory under RCW 28A.655.080;(ii) The Washington reading corps. The superintendent shall allocate reading corps members to schools identified for comprehensive or targeted support and school districts that are implementing comprehensive, proven, research-based reading programs. Two or more schools may combine their Washington reading corps programs;(iii) School bullying and harassment prevention activities;(iv) Provide statewide support and coordination for the regional network of behavioral health, school safety, and threat assessment established in chapter 333, Laws of 2019 (school safety and well-being);(v) The school safety center within the office of the superintendent of public instruction;(vi) Youth suicide prevention activities;(vii) To support district implementation of comprehensive guidance and planning programs in support of high-quality high school and beyond plans consistent with RCW 28A.230.090;(viii) To provide statewide coordination towards multicultural, culturally responsive, and anti-racist education to support academically, socially, and culturally literate learners. The office must engage community members and key interested parties to:(A) Develop a clear definition and framework for African American studies to guide instruction in grades seven through twelve;(B) Develop a plan for aligning African American studies across all content areas; and(C) Identify professional development opportunities for educators and administrators to build capacity in creating high-quality learning environments centered in belonging and racial equity, anti-racist approaches, and asset-based methodologies that pull from all students' cultural funds of knowledge;(ix) To develop and implement a mathematics pathways pilot to modernize algebra II. The office should use research and engage stakeholders to develop a revised and expanded course;(x) To establish a media literacy and digital citizenship ambassador program to promote the integration of media literacy and digital citizenship instruction;(xi) The implementation of chapter 72, Laws of 2016 (educational opportunity gap), chapter 102, Laws of 2014 (biliteracy seal), chapter 202, Laws of 2024 (dual and tribal language edu.), chapter 233, Laws of 2020 (educational outcomes), chapter 353, Laws of 2020 (innovative learning pilot), chapter 164, Laws of 2021 (institutional ed./release), and chapter 107, Laws of 2022 (language access in schools); and(xii) Dropout prevention, intervention, and reengagement programs, dropout prevention programs that provide student mentoring, and the building bridges statewide program. The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall convene staff representatives from high schools to meet and share best practices for dropout prevention. Of these amounts, the entire dedicated cannabis accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the building bridges statewide program and for grants to districts for life skills training for children and youth in K-12.(5) CAREER CONNECTED LEARNING$1,000,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $1,000,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for the Marysville school district to collaborate with Arlington school district, Everett Community College, other local school districts, local labor unions, local Washington state apprenticeship and training council registered apprenticeship programs, and local industry groups to continue the regional apprenticeship pathways program.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 502. FOR THE STATE BOARD OF EDUCATIONGeneral FundâState Appropriation (FY 2026). . . .$3,104,000General FundâState Appropriation (FY 2027). . . .$2,921,000Washington Opportunity Pathways AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$361,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$6,386,000The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) $1,890,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $1,911,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are for the operation and expenses of the state board of education. Of the amounts provided in this subsection, $23,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $23,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for the state board of education to be a member in the education commission of the states.(2) $1,000,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $1,000,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely to the state board of education for implementation of mastery-based learning in school district demonstration sites. The state board of education shall require grant recipients to report on impacts and participate in a collaborative to share best practices. The funds must be used for grants to school districts, charter schools, or state-tribal education compact schools established under chapter 28A.715 RCW; professional development of educatorsÍ¾ development of a resource suite for school districts statewideÍ¾ evaluation of the demonstration projectÍ¾ and implementation and policy support provided by the state board of education and other partners. Grants for mastery-based learning may be made in partnership with private matching funds.(3) $214,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $10,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for implementation of Senate Bill No. 5189 (competency-based education). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2025, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 503. FOR THE PROFESSIONAL EDUCATOR STANDARDS BOARDGeneral FundâState Appropriation (FY 2026). . . .$17,230,000General FundâState Appropriation (FY 2027). . . .$17,171,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$34,401,000The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1)(a) $2,518,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $2,523,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are for the operation and expenses of the Washington professional educator standards board including implementation of chapter 172, Laws of 2017 (educator prep. data/PESB).(b) Within the amounts provided in this subsection (1), the professional educator standards board must initiate the development of standards for two specialty endorsements, one in elementary ethnic studies and one in secondary ethnic studies. The professional educator standards board must consult with teacher education faculty and ethnic studies faculty to confirm the endorsements reflect the appropriate content necessary for the discipline at developmentally appropriate levels. The ethnic studies specialty endorsements must be available to all certificated teachers who hold a valid teaching license and who demonstrate content and pedagogical knowledge in ethnic studies.(2)(a) $600,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $600,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for grants to improve preservice teacher training and funding of alternate routes to certification programs administered by the professional educator standards board.(b) Within the amounts provided in this subsection (2), up to $496,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and up to $496,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for grants to public or private colleges of education in Washington state to develop models and share best practices for increasing the classroom teaching experience of preservice training programs.(3) $1,001,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $997,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for the recruiting Washington teachers program with priority given to programs that support bilingual teachers, teachers from populations that are underrepresented, and English language learners. Of the amounts provided in this subsection (3), $500,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $500,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for implementation and expansion of the bilingual educator initiative pilot project established under RCW 28A.180.120.(4)(a) $13,035,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $13,035,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for implementation of chapter 237, Laws of 2017 (paraeducators).(b) Of the amounts provided in (a) of this subsection, $12,250,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $12,373,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are for grants to districts to provide two days of training per school year in the paraeducator certificate program to all paraeducators. Funds in this subsection are provided solely for reimbursement to school districts that provide paraeducators with two days of training in the paraeducator certificate program in each of the 2024-25 and 2025-26 school years. Funding provided in this subsection is sufficient for new paraeducators to receive four days of training in the paraeducator certificate program during their first year. School districts receiving grants under this subsection must prioritize funding toward compensation for paraeducators who complete the required hours of instruction per school year. Of the amounts provided within this subsection (4)(b), up to $750,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for each fiscal year may be used to further develop, update, and maintain the paraeducator training program and professional learning materials, increase paraeducator access across the full spectrum of training curriculum, and remove barriers for paraeducators who are unable to afford the cost of assessments.(5) $48,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $16,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5025 (educational interpreters). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2025, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.(6) $28,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Substitute House Bill No. 1651 (teacher residency & apprent.). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2025, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 504. FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTIONâFOR GENERAL APPORTIONMENTGeneral FundâState Appropriation (FY 2026). . . .$9,956,991,000General FundâState Appropriation (FY 2027). . . .$10,303,630,000Education Legacy Trust AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$2,357,730,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$22,618,351,000The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1)(a) Each general fund fiscal year appropriation includes such funds as are necessary to complete the school year ending in the fiscal year and for prior fiscal year adjustments.(b) For the 2025-26 and 2026-27 school years, the superintendent shall allocate general apportionment funding to school districts as provided in the funding formulas and salary allocations in sections 504 and 505 of this act, excluding (c) of this subsection.(c) From July 1, 2025, to August 31, 2025, the superintendent shall allocate general apportionment funding to school districts programs as provided in sections 504 and 505, chapter 376, Laws of 2024, as amended.(d) The enrollment of any district shall be the annual average number of full-time equivalent students and part-time students as provided in RCW 28A.150.350, enrolled on the fourth day of school in September and on the first school day of each month October through June, including students who are in attendance pursuant to RCW 28A.335.160 and 28A.225.250 who do not reside within the servicing school district. Any school district concluding its basic education program in May must report the enrollment of the last school day held in May in lieu of a June enrollment.(e) Funding provided in part V of this act is sufficient to provide each full-time equivalent student with the minimum hours of instruction required under RCW 28A.150.220.(f) The superintendent shall adopt rules requiring school districts to report full-time equivalent student enrollment as provided in RCW 28A.655.210.(2) CERTIFICATED INSTRUCTIONAL STAFF ALLOCATIONSAllocations for certificated instructional staff salaries for the 2025-26 and 2026-27 school years are determined using formula-generated staff units calculated pursuant to this subsection.(a) Certificated instructional staff units, as defined in RCW 28A.150.410, shall be allocated to reflect the minimum class size allocations, requirements, and school prototypes assumptions as provided in RCW 28A.150.260. The superintendent shall make allocations to school districts based on the district's annual average full-time equivalent student enrollment in each grade.(b) Additional certificated instructional staff units provided in this subsection (2) that exceed the minimum requirements in RCW 28A.150.260 are enhancements outside the program of basic education, except as otherwise provided in this section.(c)(i) The superintendent shall base allocations for each level of prototypical school, including those at which more than 50 percent of the students were eligible for free and reduced-price meals in the prior school year, on the following regular education average class size of full-time equivalent students per teacher, except as provided in (c)(ii) of this subsection:General education class size:Â Â Â GradeRCW 28A.150.2602025-26School Year2026-27School YearGrade KÂ 17.0017.00Grade 1Â 17.0017.00Grade 2Â 17.0017.00Grade 3Â 17.0017.00Grade 4Â 27.0027.00Grades 5-6Â 27.0027.00Grades 7-8Â 28.5328.53Grades 9-12Â 28.7428.74The superintendent shall base allocations for: Laboratory science average class size as provided in RCW 28A.150.260; career and technical education (CTE) class size of 23.0; and skill center program class size of 19. Certificated instructional staff units provided for skills centers that exceed the minimum requirements of RCW 28A.150.260 achieve class size reductions under RCW 28A.400.007 and are part of the state's program of basic education.(ii) Pursuant to RCW 28A.150.260(4)(a), the assumed teacher planning period, expressed as a percentage of a teacher work day, is 13.42 percent in grades K-6, and 16.67 percent in grades 7-12.(iii) Advanced placement and international baccalaureate courses are funded at the same class size assumptions as general education schools in the same grade.(d)(i) Funding for teacher librarians, school nurses, social workers, school psychologists, and guidance counselors is allocated based on the school prototypes as provided in RCW 28A.150.260, and is considered certificated instructional staff.(ii) Students in approved career and technical education and skill center programs generate certificated instructional staff units to provide for the services of teacher librarians, school nurses, social workers, school psychologists, and guidance counselors at the following combined rate per 1000 student full-time equivalent enrollment:Â 2025-26School Year2026-27School YearCareer and Technical Education3.913.91Skill Center4.254.25(3) ADMINISTRATIVE STAFF ALLOCATIONS(a) Allocations for school building-level certificated administrative staff salaries for the 2025-26 and 2026-27 school years for general education students are determined using the formula generated staff units calculated pursuant to this subsection. The superintendent shall make allocations to school districts based on the district's annual average full-time equivalent enrollment in each grade. The following prototypical school values shall determine the allocation for principals, assistant principals, and other certificated building level administrators:Prototypical School Building:Â Â Elementary SchoolÂ 1.253Middle SchoolÂ 1.353High SchoolÂ 1.880(b) Students in approved career and technical education and skill center programs generate certificated school building-level administrator staff units at per student rates that are a multiple of the general education rate in (a) of this subsection by the following factors:Career and Technical Education students. . . .1.025Skill Center students. . . .1.198(4) CLASSIFIED STAFF ALLOCATIONSAllocations for classified staff units providing school building-level and district-wide support services for the 2025-26 and 2026-27 school years are determined using the formula-generated staff units provided in RCW 28A.150.260 and pursuant to this subsection, and adjusted based on each district's annual average full-time equivalent student enrollment in each grade.(5) CENTRAL OFFICE ALLOCATIONSIn addition to classified and administrative staff units allocated in subsections (3) and (4) of this section, classified and administrative staff units are provided for the 2025-26 and 2026-27 school years for the central office administrative costs of operating a school district, at the following rates:(a) The total central office staff units provided in this subsection (5) are calculated by first multiplying the total number of eligible certificated instructional, certificated administrative, and classified staff units providing school-based or district-wide support services, as identified in RCW 28A.150.260(6)(b) and the increased allocations provided pursuant to subsections (2) and (4) of this section, by 5.3 percent.(b) Of the central office staff units calculated in (a) of this subsection, 74.53 percent are allocated as classified staff units, as generated in subsection (4) of this section, and 25.48 percent shall be allocated as administrative staff units, as generated in subsection (3) of this section.(c) Staff units generated as enhancements outside the program of basic education to the minimum requirements of RCW 28A.150.260, and staff units generated by skill center and career-technical students, are excluded from the total central office staff units calculation in (a) of this subsection.(d) For students in approved career-technical and skill center programs, central office classified units are allocated at the same staff unit per student rate as those generated for general education students of the same grade in this subsection (5), and central office administrative staff units are allocated at staff unit per student rates that exceed the general education rate established for students in the same grade in this subsection (5) by 12.46 percent in the 2025-26 school year and 12.46 percent in the 2026-27 school year for career and technical education students, and 17.79 percent in the 2025-26 school year and 17.79 percent in the 2026-27 school year for skill center students.(6) FRINGE BENEFIT ALLOCATIONSFringe benefit allocations shall be calculated at a rate of 16.02 percent in the 2025-26 school year and 16.02 percent in the 2026-27 school year for certificated salary allocations provided under subsections (2), (3), and (5) of this section, and a rate of 18.07 percent in the 2025-26 school year and 18.07 percent in the 2026-27 school year for classified salary allocations provided under subsections (4) and (5) of this section.(7) INSURANCE BENEFIT ALLOCATIONSInsurance benefit allocations shall be calculated at the rates specified in section 506 of this act, based on the number of benefit units determined as follows: Except for nonrepresented employees of educational service districts, the number of calculated benefit units determined below. Calculated benefit units are staff units multiplied by the benefit allocation factors established in the collective bargaining agreement referenced in section 910 of this act. These factors are intended to adjust allocations so that, for the purpose of distributing insurance benefits, full-time equivalent employees may be calculated on the basis of 630 hours of work per year, with no individual employee counted as more than one full-time equivalent. The number of benefit units is determined as follows:(a) The number of certificated staff units determined in subsections (2), (3), and (5) of this section multiplied by 1.02; and(b) The number of classified staff units determined in subsections (4) and (5) of this section multiplied by 1.43.(8) MATERIALS, SUPPLIES, AND OPERATING COSTS (MSOC) ALLOCATIONSFunding is allocated per annual average full-time equivalent student for the materials, supplies, and operating costs (MSOC) incurred by school districts, consistent with the requirements of RCW 28A.150.260.(a)(i) Subject to (a)(ii) of this subsection, general education students generate per student FTE MSOC allocations of $1,614.28 for the 2025-26 school year and $1,656.25 for the 2026-27 school year.(ii) Of the amounts allocated in (a)(i) of this subsection, $35.27 per student FTE for the 2025-26 school year and $37.76 per student FTE for the 2026-27 school year are provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5192 (school district materials). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2025, these amounts shall lapse.(iii) For the 2025-26 school year and 2026-27 school year, as part of the budget development, hearing, and review process required by chapter 28A.505 RCW, each school district must disclose: (A) The amount of state funding to be received by the district under (a) and (d) of this subsection (8); (B) the amount the district proposes to spend for materials, supplies, and operating costs; (C) the difference between these two amounts; and (D) if (a)(ii)(A) of this subsection (8) exceeds (a)(ii)(B) of this subsection (8), any proposed use of this difference and how this use will improve student achievement.(b) Students in approved skill center programs generate per student FTE MSOC allocations of $1,810.11 for the 2025-26 school year and $1,857.17 for the 2026-27 school year.(c) Students in approved exploratory and preparatory career and technical education programs generate per student FTE MSOC allocations of $1,810.11 for the 2025-26 school year and $1,857.17 for the 2026-27 school year.(d)(i) Subject to (d)(ii) of this subsection, students in grades 9-12 generate per student FTE MSOC allocations in addition to the allocations provided in (a) through (c) of this subsection at $214.84 for the 2025-26 school year and $220.43 for the 2026-27 school year.(ii) Of the amounts allocated in (d)(i) of this subsection, $4.69 per student FTE for the 2025-26 school year and $5.03 per student FTE for the 2026-27 school year are provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5192 (school district materials). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2025, these amounts shall lapse.(9) SUBSTITUTE TEACHER ALLOCATIONSFor the 2025-26 and 2026-27 school years, funding for substitute costs for classroom teachers is based on four (4) funded substitute days per classroom teacher unit generated under subsection (2) of this section, at a daily substitute rate of $151.86.(10) ALTERNATIVE LEARNING EXPERIENCE PROGRAM FUNDING(a) Amounts provided in this section from July 1, 2025, to August 31, 2025, are adjusted to reflect provisions of chapter 376, Laws of 2024, as amended (allocation of funding for students enrolled in alternative learning experiences).(b) The superintendent of public instruction shall require all districts receiving general apportionment funding for alternative learning experience (ALE) programs as defined in WAC 392-121-182 to provide separate financial accounting of expenditures for the ALE programs offered in district or with a provider, including but not limited to private companies and multidistrict cooperatives, as well as accurate, monthly headcount and FTE enrollment claimed for basic education, including separate counts of resident and nonresident students.(11) DROPOUT REENGAGEMENT PROGRAMThe superintendent shall adopt rules to require students claimed for general apportionment funding based on enrollment in dropout reengagement programs authorized under RCW 28A.175.100 through 28A.175.115 to meet requirements for at least weekly minimum instructional contact, academic counseling, career counseling, or case management contact. Districts must also provide separate financial accounting of expenditures for the programs offered by the district or under contract with a provider, as well as accurate monthly headcount and full-time equivalent enrollment claimed for basic education, including separate enrollment counts of resident and nonresident students.(12) ADDITIONAL FUNDING FOR SMALL SCHOOL DISTRICTS AND REMOTE AND NECESSARY PLANTSFor small school districts and remote and necessary school plants within any district which have been judged to be remote and necessary by the superintendent of public instruction, additional staff units are provided to ensure a minimum level of staffing support. Additional administrative and certificated instructional staff units provided to districts in this subsection shall be reduced by the general education staff units, excluding career and technical education and skills center enhancement units, otherwise provided in subsections (2) through (5) of this section on a per district basis.(a) For districts enrolling not more than twenty-five average annual full-time equivalent students in grades K-8, and for small school plants within any school district which have been judged to be remote and necessary by the superintendent of public instruction and enroll not more than twenty-five average annual full-time equivalent students in grades K-8:(i) For those enrolling no students in grades 7 and 8, 1.76 certificated instructional staff units and 0.24 certificated administrative staff units for enrollment of not more than five students, plus one-twentieth of a certificated instructional staff unit for each additional student enrolled; and(ii) For those enrolling students in grades 7 or 8, 1.68 certificated instructional staff units and 0.32 certificated administrative staff units for enrollment of not more than five students, plus one-tenth of a certificated instructional staff unit for each additional student enrolled;(b) For specified enrollments in districts enrolling more than twenty-five but not more than one hundred average annual full-time equivalent students in grades K-8, and for small school plants within any school district which enroll more than twenty-five average annual full-time equivalent students in grades K-8 and have been judged to be remote and necessary by the superintendent of public instruction:(i) For enrollment of up to sixty annual average full-time equivalent students in grades K-6, 2.76 certificated instructional staff units and 0.24 certificated administrative staff units; and(ii) For enrollment of up to twenty annual average full-time equivalent students in grades 7 and 8, 0.92 certificated instructional staff units and 0.08 certificated administrative staff units;(c) For districts operating no more than two high schools with enrollments of less than three hundred average annual full-time equivalent students, for enrollment in grades 9-12 in each such school, other than alternative schools, except as noted in this subsection:(i) For remote and necessary schools enrolling students in any grades 9-12 but no more than twenty-five average annual full-time equivalent students in grades K-12, four and one-half certificated instructional staff units and one-quarter of a certificated administrative staff unit;(ii) For all other small high schools under this subsection, nine certificated instructional staff units and one-half of a certificated administrative staff unit for the first sixty average annual full-time equivalent students, and additional staff units based on a ratio of 0.8732 certificated instructional staff units and 0.1268 certificated administrative staff units per each additional forty-three and one-half average annual full-time equivalent students;(iii) Districts receiving staff units under this subsection shall add students enrolled in a district alternative high school and any grades nine through twelve alternative learning experience programs with the small high school enrollment for calculations under this subsection;(d) For each nonhigh school district having an enrollment of more than seventy annual average full-time equivalent students and less than one hundred eighty students, operating a grades K-8 program or a grades 1-8 program, an additional one-half of a certificated instructional staff unit;(e) For each nonhigh school district having an enrollment of more than fifty annual average full-time equivalent students and less than one hundred eighty students, operating a grades K-6 program or a grades 1-6 program, an additional one-half of a certificated instructional staff unit;(f)(i) For enrollments generating certificated staff unit allocations under (a) through (e) of this subsection, one classified staff unit for each 2.94 certificated staff units allocated under such subsections;(ii) For each nonhigh school district with an enrollment of more than fifty annual average full-time equivalent students and less than one hundred eighty students, an additional one-half of a classified staff unit; and(g) School districts receiving additional staff units to support small student enrollments and remote and necessary plants under this subsection (12) shall generate additional MSOC allocations consistent with the nonemployee related costs (NERC) allocation formula in place for the 2010-11 school year as provided section 502, chapter 37, Laws of 2010 1st sp. sess. (2010 supplemental budget), adjusted annually for inflation.(13) Any school district board of directors may petition the superintendent of public instruction by submission of a resolution adopted in a public meeting to reduce or delay any portion of its basic education allocation for any school year. The superintendent of public instruction shall approve such reduction or delay if it does not impair the district's financial condition. Any delay shall not be for more than two school years. Any reduction or delay shall have no impact on levy authority pursuant to RCW 84.52.0531 and local effort assistance pursuant to chapter 28A.500 RCW.(14) The superintendent may distribute funding for the following programs outside the basic education formula during fiscal years 2026 and 2027 as follows:(a) $650,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $650,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for fire protection for school districts located in a fire protection district as now or hereafter established pursuant to chapter 52.04 RCW.(b) $436,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $436,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for programs providing skills training for secondary students who are enrolled in extended day school-to-work programs, as approved by the superintendent of public instruction. The funds shall be allocated at a rate not to exceed $500 per full-time equivalent student enrolled in those programs.(15) Funding in this section is sufficient to fund a maximum of 1.6 FTE enrollment for skills center students pursuant to chapter 463, Laws of 2007.(16) Funding in this section is sufficient to fund a maximum of 1.2 FTE enrollment for career launch students pursuant to RCW 28A.700.130. Expenditures for this purpose must come first from the appropriations provided in section 501(5) of this act; funding for career launch enrollment exceeding those appropriations is provided in this section. The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall provide a summary report to the office of the governor and the appropriate committees of the legislature by January 1, 2026. The report must include the total FTE enrollment for career launch students, the FTE enrollment for career launch students that exceeded the appropriations provided in section 501(5) of this act, and the amount expended from this section for those students.(17)(a) Students participating in running start programs may be funded up to a combined maximum enrollment of 1.4 FTE including school district and institution of higher education enrollment consistent with the running start course requirements provided in chapter 202, Laws of 2015 (dual credit education opportunities). In calculating the combined 1.4 FTE, the office of the superintendent of public instruction:(i) Must adopt rules to fund the participating student's enrollment in running start courses provided by the institution of higher education during the summer academic term; and(ii) May average the participating student's September through June enrollment to account for differences in the start and end dates for courses provided by the high school and the institution of higher education.(b) In consultation with the state board for community and technical colleges, the participating institutions of higher education, the student achievement council, and the education data center, must annually track and report to the fiscal committees of the legislature on the combined FTE experience of students participating in the running start program, including course load analyses at both the high school and community and technical college system.(18) If two or more school districts consolidate and each district was receiving additional basic education formula staff units pursuant to subsection (12) of this section, the following apply:(a) For three school years following consolidation, the number of basic education formula staff units shall not be less than the number of basic education formula staff units received by the districts in the school year prior to the consolidation; and(b) For the fourth through eighth school years following consolidation, the difference between the basic education formula staff units received by the districts for the school year prior to consolidation and the basic education formula staff units after consolidation pursuant to subsection (12) of this section shall be reduced in increments of twenty percent per year.(19)(a) Indirect cost charges by a school district to approved career and technical education middle and secondary programs shall not exceed the lesser of five percent or the cap established in federal law of the combined basic education and career and technical education program enhancement allocations of state funds. Middle and secondary career and technical education programs are considered separate programs for funding and financial reporting purposes under this section.(b) Career and technical education program full-time equivalent enrollment shall be reported on the same monthly basis as the enrollment for students eligible for basic support, and payments shall be adjusted for reported career and technical education program enrollments on the same monthly basis as those adjustments for enrollment for students eligible for basic support.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 505. FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTIONâBASIC EDUCATION EMPLOYEE COMPENSATION(1) The following calculations determine the salaries used in the state allocations for certificated instructional, certificated administrative, and classified staff units as provided in RCW 28A.150.260, and under section 504 of this act: For the 2025-26 school year and the 2026-27 school year salary allocations for certificated instructional staff, certificated administrative staff, and classified staff units are determined for each school district by multiplying the statewide minimum salary allocation for each staff type by the school district's regionalization factor shown in LEAP Document 3.Statewide Minimum Salary AllocationÂ Staff Type2025-26School Year2026-27School YearÂ Â Â Certificated Instructional$80,164$82,248Certificated Administrative$118,994$122,088Classified$57,507$59,002(2) For the purposes of this section, "LEAP Document 3" means the school district regionalization factors for certificated instructional, certificated administrative, and classified staff, as developed by the legislative evaluation and accountability program committee on March 3, 2024, at 11:16 hours and adopted in the 2024 operating budget.(3) Incremental fringe benefit factors are applied to salary adjustments at the rates specified in section 506 of this act.(4) The salary allocations established in this section are for allocation purposes only except as provided in this subsection, and do not entitle an individual staff position to a particular paid salary except as provided in RCW 28A.400.200, as amended by chapter 13, Laws of 2017 3rd sp. sess. (fully funding the program of basic education).NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 506. FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTIONâFOR SCHOOL EMPLOYEE COMPENSATION ADJUSTMENTSGeneral FundâState Appropriation (FY 2026). . . .$593,474,000General FundâState Appropriation (FY 2027). . . .$738,666,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$1,332,140,000The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) The salary increases provided in this section are 2.5 percent for the 2025-26 school year, and 2.6 percent for the 2026-27 school year, the annual inflationary adjustments pursuant to RCW 28A.400.205.(2)(a) In addition to salary allocations, the appropriations in this section include funding for professional learning as defined in RCW 28A.415.430, 28A.415.432, and 28A.415.434. Funding for this purpose is calculated as the equivalent of three days of salary and benefits for each of the funded full-time equivalent certificated instructional staff units. Nothing in this section entitles an individual certificated instructional staff to any particular number of professional learning days.(b) Of the funding provided for professional learning in this section, the equivalent of one day of salary and benefits for each of the funded full-time equivalent certificated instructional staff units in the 2025-26 school year must be used to train school district staff on cultural competency, diversity, equity, or inclusion, as required in chapter 197, Laws of 2021.(3)(a) The appropriations in this section include associated incremental fringe benefit allocations at 15.39 percent for the 2025-26 school year and 15.39 percent for the 2026-27 school year for certificated instructional and certificated administrative staff and 14.72 percent for the 2025-26 school year and 14.72 percent for the 2026-27 school year for classified staff.(b) The appropriations in this section include the increased or decreased portion of salaries and incremental fringe benefits for all relevant state-funded school programs in part V of this act. Changes for general apportionment (basic education) are based on the salary allocations and methodology in sections 504 and 505 of this act. Changes for special education result from changes in each district's basic education allocation per student. Changes for educational service districts and institutional education programs are determined by the superintendent of public instruction using the methodology for general apportionment salaries and benefits in sections 504 and 505 of this act. Changes for pupil transportation are determined by the superintendent of public instruction pursuant to RCW 28A.160.192, and impact compensation factors in sections 504, 505, and 506 of this act.(c) The appropriations in this section include no salary adjustments for substitute teachers.(4) The appropriations in this section are sufficient to fund the collective bargaining agreement referenced in part IX of this act and reflect the incremental change in cost of allocating rates as follows: For the 2025-26 school year, $1,307 per month and for the 2026-27 school year, $1,341 per month.(5) The rates specified in this section are subject to revision each year by the legislature.(6) $3,554,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $7,185,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for changes to the special education multiplier and enrollment limit as specified in Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5263 (special education funding). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2025, these amounts shall lapse.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 507. FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTIONâFOR PUPIL TRANSPORTATIONGeneral FundâState Appropriation (FY 2026). . . .$856,979,000General FundâState Appropriation (FY 2027). . . .$868,449,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$1,725,428,000The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) Each general fund fiscal year appropriation includes such funds as are necessary to complete the school year ending in the fiscal year and for prior fiscal year adjustments.(2)(a) For the 2025-26 and 2026-27 school years, the superintendent shall allocate funding to school district programs for the transportation of eligible students as provided in RCW 28A.160.192. Funding in this section constitutes full implementation of RCW 28A.160.192, which enhancement is within the program of basic education. Students are considered eligible only if meeting the definitions provided in RCW 28A.160.160.(b) From July 1, 2025, to August 31, 2025, the superintendent shall allocate funding to school districts programs for the transportation of students as provided in section 507, chapter 376, Laws of 2024, as amended.(3) Within amounts appropriated in this section, up to $10,000,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and up to $10,000,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are for a transportation alternate funding grant program based on the alternate funding process established in RCW 28A.160.191. The superintendent of public instruction must include a review of school district efficiency rating, key performance indicators and local school district characteristics such as unique geographic constraints in the grant award process.(4) A maximum of $939,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and a maximum of $939,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 may be expended for regional transportation coordinators and related activities. The transportation coordinators shall ensure that data submitted by school districts for state transportation funding shall, to the greatest extent practical, reflect the actual transportation activity of each district.(5) Subject to available funds under this section, school districts may provide student transportation for summer skills center programs.(6) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall provide reimbursement funding to a school district for school bus purchases only after the superintendent of public instruction determines that the school bus was purchased from the list established pursuant to RCW 28A.160.195(2) or a comparable competitive bid process based on the lowest price quote based on similar bus categories to those used to establish the list pursuant to RCW 28A.160.195.(7) The superintendent of public instruction shall base depreciation payments for school district buses on the presales tax five-year average of lowest bids in the appropriate category of bus. In the final year on the depreciation schedule, the depreciation payment shall be based on the lowest bid in the appropriate bus category for that school year.(8) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall annually disburse payments for bus depreciation in August.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 508. FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTIONâSCHOOL FOOD SERVICESGeneral FundâState Appropriation (FY 2026). . . .$120,073,000General FundâState Appropriation (FY 2027). . . .$120,062,000General FundâFederal Appropriation. . . .$891,898,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$1,132,033,000The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) $11,703,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $11,692,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for state matching money for federal child nutrition programs, and may support the meals for kids program through the following allowable uses:(a) Elimination of breakfast copays for eligible public school students and lunch copays for eligible public school students in grades pre-kindergarten through twelfth grades who are eligible for reduced-price lunch as required in chapter 74, Laws of 2021 (reduced-price lunch copays);(b) Assistance to school districts and authorized public and private nonprofit organizations for supporting summer food service programs including the summer electronic benefit transfer program, and initiating new summer food service programs in low-income areas;(c) Reimbursements to school districts for school breakfasts served to students eligible for free and reduced-price lunch, pursuant to chapter 287, Laws of 2005; and(d) Assistance to school districts in initiating and expanding school breakfast programs.(2) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall report annually to the fiscal committees of the legislature on annual expenditures in subsection (1)(a) through (c) of this section.(3) The superintendent of public instruction shall provide the department of health with the following data, where available, for all nutrition assistance programs that are funded by the United States department of agriculture and administered by the office of the superintendent of public instruction. The superintendent must provide the report for the preceding federal fiscal year by February 1, 2026, and February 1, 2027. The report must provide:(a) The number of people in Washington who are eligible for the program;(b) The number of people in Washington who participated in the program;(c) The average annual participation rate in the program;(d) Participation rates by geographic distribution; and(e) The annual federal funding of the program in Washington.(4) $83,617,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $83,617,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for reimbursements to school districts for schools and groups of schools required to participate in the federal community eligibility program under section 1, chapter 7, Laws of 2022 (schools/comm. eligibility) for meals not reimbursed at the federal free meal rate.(5) $24,634,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $24,634,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for implementation of chapter 379, Laws of 2023 (free school meals).NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 509. FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTIONâFOR SPECIAL EDUCATION PROGRAMSGeneral FundâState Appropriation (FY 2026). . . .$2,247,317,000General FundâState Appropriation (FY 2027). . . .$2,381,953,000General FundâFederal Appropriation. . . .$646,520,000Education Legacy Trust AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$54,694,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$5,330,484,000The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1)(a) Funding for special education programs is provided on an excess cost basis, pursuant to RCW 28A.150.390. School districts shall ensure that special education students as a class receive their full share of the general apportionment allocation accruing through sections 504 and 506 of this act. To the extent a school district cannot provide an appropriate education for special education students under chapter 28A.155 RCW through the general apportionment allocation, it shall provide services through the special education excess cost allocation funded in this section.(b) Funding provided within this section is sufficient for districts to provide school principals and lead special education teachers annual professional development on the best-practices for special education instruction and strategies for implementation. Districts shall annually provide a summary of professional development activities to the office of the superintendent of public instruction.(2)(a) The superintendent of public instruction shall ensure that:(i) Special education students are basic education students first;(ii) As a class, special education students are entitled to the full basic education allocation; and(iii) Special education students are basic education students for the entire school day.(b)(i) The superintendent of public instruction shall continue to implement the full cost method of excess cost accounting, as designed by the committee and recommended by the superintendent, pursuant to section 501(1)(k), chapter 372, Laws of 2006, except as provided in (b)(ii) of this subsection.(ii) The superintendent of public instruction shall implement any changes to excess cost accounting methods required under chapter 417, Laws of 2023 (special education funding).(3) Each fiscal year appropriation includes such funds as are necessary to complete the school year ending in the fiscal year and for prior fiscal year adjustments.(4)(a) For the 2025-26 and 2026-27 school years, the superintendent shall allocate funding to school district programs for special education students as provided in RCW 28A.150.390, except that the calculation of the base allocation also includes allocations provided under section 504 (2) and (4) of this act and RCW 28A.150.415, which enhancement is within the program of basic education.(b) From July 1, 2025, to August 31, 2025, the superintendent shall allocate funding to school district programs for special education students as provided in section 509, chapter 376, Laws of 2024, as amended.(5) At the request of any interdistrict cooperative of at least 15 districts in which all excess cost services for special education students of the districts are provided by the cooperative, the maximum enrollment percent shall be calculated in accordance with RCW 28A.150.390(3) (c) and (d), and shall be calculated in the aggregate rather than individual district units. For purposes of this subsection, the average basic education allocation per full-time equivalent student shall be calculated in the aggregate rather than individual district units.(6) $205,458,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026, $205,458,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027, and $29,574,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely for safety net awards for districts with demonstrated needs for special education funding beyond the amounts provided in subsection (4) of this section. If the federal safety net awards based on the federal eligibility threshold exceed the federal appropriation in this subsection (6) in any fiscal year, the superintendent shall expend all available federal discretionary funds necessary to meet this need. At the conclusion of each school year, the superintendent shall recover safety net funds that were distributed prospectively but for which districts were not subsequently eligible.(a) For the 2025-26 and 2026-27 school years, safety net funds shall be awarded by the state safety net oversight committee as provided in section 109(1) chapter 548, Laws of 2009 (education).(b) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall make award determinations for state safety net funding in August of each school year, except that the superintendent of public instruction shall make award determinations for state safety net funding in July of each school year for the Washington state school for the blind and for the center for childhood deafness and hearing loss. Determinations on school district eligibility for state safety net awards shall be based on analysis of actual expenditure data from the current school year.(7) A maximum of $1,250,000 may be expended from the general fundâstate appropriations to fund teachers and aides at Seattle children's hospital. This amount is in lieu of money provided through the home and hospital allocation and the special education program.(8) The superintendent shall maintain the percentage of federal flow-through to school districts at 85 percent. In addition to other purposes, school districts may use increased federal funds for high-cost students, for purchasing regional special education services from educational service districts, and for staff development activities particularly relating to inclusion issues.(9) A school district may carry over from one year to the next year up to 10 percent of the general fundâstate funds allocated under this program; however, carryover funds shall be expended in the special education program.(10) $87,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026, $87,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027, and $214,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely for a special education family liaison position within the office of the superintendent of public instruction.(11) $660,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 is provided solely for litigation costs for N.D. v. Reykdal, United States District Court for the Western District of Washington.(12) $114,271,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $195,418,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for changes to the special education multiplier, enrollment limit, and safety net payments as specified in Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5263 (special education funding). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2025, these amounts shall lapse.(13) $5,356,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $7,339,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5192 (school district materials). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2025, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.(14) $5,123,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $7,275,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5253 (special education services). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2025, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 510. FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTIONâFOR EDUCATIONAL SERVICE DISTRICTSGeneral FundâState Appropriation (FY 2026). . . .$35,244,000General FundâState Appropriation (FY 2027). . . .$35,113,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$70,357,000The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) The educational service districts shall continue to furnish financial services required by the superintendent of public instruction and RCW 28A.310.190 (3) and (4).(2) Funding within this section is provided for regional professional development related to mathematics and science curriculum and instructional strategies aligned with common core state standards and next generation science standards. Funding shall be distributed among the educational service districts in the same proportion as distributions in the 2007-2009 biennium. Each educational service district shall use this funding solely for salary and benefits for a certificated instructional staff with expertise in the appropriate subject matter and in professional development delivery, and for travel, materials, and other expenditures related to providing regional professional development support.(3) Funding in this section is provided for regional professional development related to English language arts curriculum and instructional strategies aligned with common core state standards. Each educational service district shall use this funding solely for salary and benefits for certificated instructional staff with expertise in the appropriate subject matter and in professional development delivery, and for travel, materials, and other expenditures related to providing regional professional development support.(4) Funding in this section is provided for regional technical support for the K-20 telecommunications network to prevent system failures and avoid interruptions in school utilization of the data processing and video-conferencing capabilities of the network. These funds may be used to purchase engineering and advanced technical support for the network.(5) Funding in this section is provided for a corps of nurses located at the educational service districts, to be dispatched in coordination with the office of the superintendent of public instruction, to provide direct care to students, health education, and training for school staff. In fiscal years 2026 and 2027, allocations for the corps of nurses is sufficient to provide one day per week of nursing services for all second-class school districts.(6) Funding in this section is provided for staff and support at the nine educational service districts to provide a network of support for school districts to develop and implement comprehensive suicide prevention and behavioral health supports for students.(7) Funding in this section is provided for staff and support at the nine educational service districts to provide assistance to school districts with comprehensive safe schools planning, conducting needs assessments, school safety and security trainings, coordinating appropriate crisis and emergency response and recovery, and developing threat assessment and crisis intervention teams. In fiscal years 2026 and 2027, allocations for staff and support for regional safety centers are increased to 3 full-time equivalent certificated instructional staff for each regional safety center.(8) Funding in this section is provided for regional English language arts coordinators to provide professional development of teachers and principals around the new early screening for dyslexia requirements.(9) The educational service districts, at the request of the state board of education pursuant to RCW 28A.310.010 and 28A.305.130, may receive and screen applications for school accreditation, conduct school accreditation site visits pursuant to state board of education rules, and submit to the state board of education post-site visit recommendations for school accreditation. The educational service districts may assess a cooperative service fee to recover actual plus reasonable indirect costs for the purposes of this subsection.(10) $2,169,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $2,169,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for each educational service district to provide technology consultation, procurement, and training required under chapter 301, Laws of 2021 (schools/computers & devices).(11) $2,180,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $2,237,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for implementation of chapter 87, Laws of 2022 (ed. service district funding).(12) $500,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $500,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for educational service districts to provide students attending school in rural areas with access to a mental health professional using telemedicine. Funding must be prioritized to districts where mental health services are inadequate or nonexistent due to geographic constraints. Funding may be used for schools or school districts for technology upgrades to provide secure access for students, for contracted services, or to pay applicable copays or fees for telemedicine visits if not covered by a student's public or private insurance.(13) $4,000,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $4,000,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely to continue behavioral health regional services grants to support school districts with the least access to behavioral health services.(14) $200,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 is provided solely for the Puget Sound educational service district 121 to contract with a Washington-based Muslim educational organization, with expertise in curriculum about Muslim and Arab history, to develop curriculum that supports Washington teachers in implementing and incorporating lessons on Islamophobia. If a Washington-based organization cannot be found, the office may seek proposals from organizations incorporated outside of Washington. Of the amounts provided in this subsection, $5,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 is provided for the Puget Sound educational service district to administer the contract.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 511. FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTIONâFOR LOCAL EFFORT ASSISTANCEGeneral FundâState Appropriation (FY 2026). . . .$202,536,000General FundâState Appropriation (FY 2027). . . .$252,636,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$455,172,000The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: $31,627,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $105,389,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for an inflation enhancement in addition to the state local effort assistance threshold under RCW 28A.500.015 of $150 per pupil in the 2026 calendar year and $250 per pupil in the 2027 calendar year.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 512. FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTIONâFOR INSTITUTIONAL EDUCATION PROGRAMSGeneral FundâState Appropriation (FY 2026). . . .$19,276,000General FundâState Appropriation (FY 2027). . . .$19,361,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$38,637,000The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) Each general fundâstate fiscal year appropriation includes such funds as are necessary to complete the school year ending in the fiscal year and for prior fiscal year adjustments.(2) State funding provided under this section is based on salaries and other expenditures for a 220-day school year. The superintendent of public instruction shall monitor school district expenditure plans for institutional education programs to ensure that districts plan for a full-time summer program.(3) State funding for each institutional education program shall be based on the institution's annual average full-time equivalent student enrollment. Staffing ratios for each category of institution shall remain the same as those funded in the 1995-97 biennium.(4) The funded staffing ratios for education programs for juveniles age 18 or less in department of corrections facilities shall be the same as those provided in the 1997-99 biennium.(5) Funding in this section is sufficient to maintain at least one certificated instructional staff and related support services at an institution whenever the K-12 enrollment is not sufficient to support one full-time equivalent certificated instructional staff to furnish the educational program. The following types of institutions are included: Residential programs under the department of social and health services for developmentally disabled juveniles, programs for juveniles under the department of corrections, programs for juveniles under the juvenile rehabilitation administration, and programs for juveniles operated by city and county jails.(6) Within the amounts provided in this section, funding is provided to increase the capacity of institutional education programs to differentiate instruction to meet students' unique educational needs, including students with individualized educational plans. Those needs may include but are not limited to one-on-one instruction, enhanced access to counseling for social emotional needs of the student, and services to identify the proper level of instruction at the time of student entry into the facility. Allocations of amounts for this purpose in a school year must be based on 45 percent of full-time enrollment in institutional education receiving a differentiated instruction amount per pupil equal to the total statewide allocation generated by the distribution formula under RCW 28A.150.260 (4)(a), (5), (6), and (8) and the allocation under RCW 28A.150.415, per the statewide full-time equivalent enrollment in common schools.(7) $200,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $200,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely to support two student records coordinators to manage the transmission of academic records for each of the long-term juvenile institutions. One coordinator is provided for each of the following: The Issaquah school district for the Echo Glen children's center and for the Chehalis school district for Green Hill academic school.(8) Ten percent of the funds allocated for the institution may be carried over from one year to the next.(9) $742,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $743,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for one educational advocate to each institution with enrollments above 40 full-time equivalent students in addition to any educational advocates supported by federal funding. Educational advocates will provide the following supports to students enrolled in or just released from institutional education programs:(a) Advocacy for institutional education students to eliminate barriers to educational access and success;(b) Consultation with juvenile rehabilitation staff to develop educational plans for and with participating youth;(c) Monitoring educational progress of participating students;(d) Providing participating students with school and local resources that may assist in educational access and success upon release from institutional education facilities; and(e) Coaching students and caregivers to advocate for educational needs to be addressed at the school district upon return to the community.(10) Within the amounts provided in this section, funding is provided to increase materials, supplies, and operating costs by $85 per pupil for technology supports for institutional education programs. This funding is in addition to general education materials, supplies, and operating costs provided to institutional education programs, which exclude formula costs supported by the institutional facilities.(11) $400,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $400,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely to support instruction in cohorts of students grouped by similar age and academic levels.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 513. FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTIONâFOR PROGRAMS FOR HIGHLY CAPABLE STUDENTSGeneral FundâState Appropriation (FY 2026). . . .$34,718,000General FundâState Appropriation (FY 2027). . . .$34,955,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$69,673,000The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) Each general fund fiscal year appropriation includes such funds as are necessary to complete the school year ending in the fiscal year and for prior fiscal year adjustments.(2)(a) For the 2025-26 and 2026-27 school years, the superintendent shall allocate funding to school district programs for highly capable students as provided in RCW 28A.150.260(10)(c) except that allocations must be based on 5.0 percent of each school district's full-time equivalent enrollment. In calculating the allocations, the superintendent shall assume the following: (i) Additional instruction of 2.1590 hours per week per funded highly capable program student; (ii) fifteen highly capable program students per teacher; (iii) 36 instructional weeks per year; (iv) 900 instructional hours per teacher; and (v) the compensation rates as provided in sections 505 and 506 of this act.(b) From July 1, 2025, to August 31, 2025, the superintendent shall allocate funding to school districts programs for highly capable students as provided in section 513, chapter 376, Laws of 2024, as amended.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 514. FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTIONâFOR MISCELLANEOUSâEVERY STUDENT SUCCEEDS ACTGeneral FundâFederal Appropriation. . . .$11,416,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$11,416,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 515. FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTIONâEDUCATION REFORM PROGRAMSGeneral FundâState Appropriation (FY 2026). . . .$119,573,000General FundâState Appropriation (FY 2027). . . .$122,469,000General FundâFederal Appropriation. . . .$97,685,000General FundâPrivate/Local Appropriation. . . .$1,454,000Education Legacy Trust AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$1,671,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$342,852,000The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) ACCOUNTABILITY$26,975,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026, $26,975,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027, $1,350,000 of the education legacy trust accountâstate appropriation, and $15,868,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely for development and implementation of the Washington state assessment system.(2) EDUCATOR CONTINUUM(a) $71,642,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $74,508,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for the following bonuses for teachers who hold valid, unexpired certification from the national board for professional teaching standards and who are teaching in a Washington public school, subject to the following conditions and limitations:(i) For national board certified teachers, a bonus of $6,514 per teacher in the 2025-26 school year and a bonus of $6,677 per teacher in the 2026-27 school year;(ii) An additional $5,000 annual bonus shall be paid to national board certified teachers who teach in either: (A) High schools where at least 50 percent of student headcount enrollment is eligible for federal free or reduced-price lunch, (B) middle schools where at least 60 percent of student headcount enrollment is eligible for federal free or reduced-price lunch, or (C) elementary schools where at least 70 percent of student headcount enrollment is eligible for federal free or reduced-price lunch;(iii) The superintendent of public instruction shall adopt rules to ensure that national board certified teachers meet the qualifications for bonuses under (b) of this subsection for less than one full school year receive bonuses in a prorated manner. All bonuses in this subsection will be paid in July of each school year. Bonuses in this subsection shall be reduced by a factor of 40 percent for first year NBPTS certified teachers, to reflect the portion of the instructional school year they are certified; and(iv) During the 2025-26 and 2026-27 school years, and within available funds, certificated instructional staff who have met the eligibility requirements and have applied for certification from the national board for professional teaching standards may receive a conditional loan of two thousand dollars or the amount set by the office of the superintendent of public instruction to contribute toward the current assessment fee, not including the initial up-front candidacy payment. The fee shall be an advance on the first annual bonus under RCW 28A.405.415. The conditional loan is provided in addition to compensation received under a district's salary allocation and shall not be included in calculations of a district's average salary and associated salary limitation under RCW 28A.400.200. Recipients who fail to receive certification after fully exhausting all years of candidacy as set by the national board for professional teaching standards are required to repay the conditional loan. The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall adopt rules to define the terms for initial grant of the assessment fee and repayment, including applicable fees. To the extent necessary, the superintendent may use revenues from the repayment of conditional loan scholarships to ensure payment of all national board bonus payments required by this section in each school year.(b) $3,418,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $3,418,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for implementation of a new performance-based evaluation for certificated educators and other activities as provided in chapter 235, Laws of 2010 (education reform) and chapter 35, Laws of 2012 (certificated employee evaluations).(c) $477,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $477,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for the leadership internship program for superintendents, principals, and program administrators.(d) $810,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $810,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for the development of a leadership academy for school principals and administrators. The superintendent of public instruction shall contract with an independent organization to operate a state-of-the-art education leadership academy that will be accessible throughout the state. Semiannually the independent organization shall report on amounts committed by foundations and others to support the development and implementation of this program. Leadership academy partners shall include the state level organizations for school administrators and principals, the superintendent of public instruction, the professional educator standards board, and others as the independent organization shall identify.(e) $11,500,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $11,500,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for a beginning educator support program (BEST). The program shall prioritize first year educators in the mentoring program. School districts and/or regional consortia may apply for grant funding. The program provided by a district and/or regional consortia shall include: A paid orientation; assignment of a qualified mentor; development of a professional growth plan for each beginning educator aligned with professional certification; release time for mentors and new educators to work together; and educator observation time with accomplished peers. Funding may be used to provide statewide professional development opportunities for mentors and beginning educators. Of the amounts provided in this subsection, $1,000,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $1,000,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely to support first year educators in the mentoring program.(f) $2,000,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $2,000,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for the provision of training for teachers, principals, and principal evaluators in the performance-based teacher principal evaluation program.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 516. FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTIONâFOR TRANSITIONAL BILINGUAL PROGRAMSGeneral FundâState Appropriation (FY 2026). . . .$293,614,000General FundâState Appropriation (FY 2027). . . .$302,318,000General FundâFederal Appropriation. . . .$137,159,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$733,091,000The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) Each general fund fiscal year appropriation includes such funds as are necessary to complete the school year ending in the fiscal year and for prior fiscal year adjustments.(2)(a) For the 2025-26 and 2026-27 school years, the superintendent shall allocate funding to school districts for transitional bilingual programs under RCW 28A.180.010 through 28A.180.080, including programs for exited students, as provided in RCW 28A.150.260(10)(b) and the provisions of this section. In calculating the allocations, the superintendent shall assume the following averages: (i) Additional instruction of 4.7780 hours per week per transitional bilingual program student in grades kindergarten through six and 6.7780 hours per week per transitional bilingual program student in grades seven through twelve in school years 2025-26 and 2026-27; (ii) additional instruction of 3.0000 hours per week in school years 2025-26 and 2026-27 for the head count number of students who have exited the transitional bilingual instruction program within the previous two years based on their performance on the English proficiency assessment; (iii) fifteen transitional bilingual program students per teacher; (iv) 36 instructional weeks per year; (v) 900 instructional hours per teacher; and (vi) the compensation rates as provided in sections 505 and 506 of this act. Pursuant to RCW 28A.180.040(1)(g), the instructional hours specified in (a)(ii) of this subsection (2) are within the program of basic education.(b) From July 1, 2025, to August 31, 2025, the superintendent shall allocate funding to school districts for transitional bilingual instruction programs as provided in section 516, chapter 376, Laws of 2024, as amended.(3) The superintendent may withhold allocations to school districts in subsection (2) of this section solely for the central provision of assessments as provided in RCW 28A.180.090 (1) and (2) up to the following amounts: 1.38 percent for school year 2025-26 and 1.36 percent for school year 2026-27.(4) The general fundâfederal appropriation in this section is for migrant education under Title I Part C and English language acquisition, and language enhancement grants under Title III of the elementary and secondary education act.(5) $35,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $35,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely to track current and former transitional bilingual program students.(6) $1,916,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation in fiscal year 2026 and $1,916,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation in fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for the central provision of assessments as provided in RCW 28A.180.090, and is in addition to the withholding amounts specified in subsection (3) of this section.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 517. FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTIONâFOR THE LEARNING ASSISTANCE PROGRAMGeneral FundâState Appropriation (FY 2026). . . .$515,259,000General FundâState Appropriation (FY 2027). . . .$522,631,000General FundâFederal Appropriation. . . .$636,542,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$1,674,432,000The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) The general fundâstate appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(a) The appropriations include such funds as are necessary to complete the school year ending in the fiscal year and for prior fiscal year adjustments.(b)(i) For the 2025-26 and 2026-27 school years, the superintendent shall allocate funding to school districts for learning assistance programs as provided in RCW 28A.150.260(10)(a). In calculating the allocations, the superintendent shall assume the following averages: (A) Additional instruction of 2.3975 hours per week per funded learning assistance program student for the 2025-26 and 2026-27 school years; (B) additional instruction of 1.1 hours per week per funded learning assistance program student for the 2025-26 and 2026-27 school years in qualifying high-poverty school building; (C) 15 learning assistance program students per teacher; (D) 36 instructional weeks per year; (E) 900 instructional hours per teacher; and (F) the compensation rates as provided in sections 505 and 506 of this act.(ii) From July 1, 2025, to August 31, 2025, the superintendent shall allocate funding to school districts for learning assistance programs as provided in section 517, chapter 376, Laws of 2024, as amended.(c) A school district's funded students for the learning assistance program shall be the sum of the district's full-time equivalent enrollment in grades K-12 multiplied by the district's percentage of October headcount enrollment in grades K-12 eligible for free or reduced-price lunch in the school year period defined under RCW 28A.150.260(10)(a). A school year's October headcount enrollment for free and reduced-price lunch shall be as reported in the comprehensive education data and research system.(2) Allocations made pursuant to subsection (1) of this section shall be adjusted to reflect ineligible applications identified through the annual income verification process required by the national school lunch program, as recommended in the report of the state auditor on the learning assistance program dated February, 2010.(3) The general fundâfederal appropriation in this section is provided for Title I Part A allocations of the every student succeeds act of 2016.(4) A school district may carry over from one year to the next up to 10 percent of the general fundâstate funds allocated under this program; however, carryover funds shall be expended for the learning assistance program.(5) Within existing resources, during the 2025-26 and 2026-27 school years, school districts are authorized to use funds allocated for the learning assistance program to also provide assistance to high school students who have not passed the state assessment in science.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 518. FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTIONâPER PUPIL ALLOCATIONSStatewide Average AllocationsPer Annual Average Full-Time Equivalent StudentBasic Education Program2025-26School Year2026-27School YearGeneral Apportionment$11,024$11,302Pupil Transportation$835$856Special Education Programs$13,928$14,514Institutional Education Programs$27,712$28,355Programs for Highly Capable Students$684$701Transitional Bilingual Programs$1,686$1,729Learning Assistance Program$1,075$1,103NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 519. FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION(1) Amounts distributed to districts by the superintendent through part V of this act are for allocation purposes only, unless specified by part V of this act, and do not entitle a particular district, district employee, or student to a specific service, beyond what has been expressly provided in statute. Part V of this act restates the requirements of various sections of Title 28A RCW. If any conflict exists, the provisions of Title 28A RCW control unless this act explicitly states that it is providing an enhancement. Any amounts provided in part V of this act in excess of the amounts required by Title 28A RCW provided in statute, are not within the program of basic education unless clearly stated by this act.(2) When adopting new or revised rules or policies relating to the administration of allocations in part V of this act that result in fiscal impact, the office of the superintendent of public instruction shall seek legislative approval through the budget request process.(3) Appropriations made in this act to the office of the superintendent of public instruction shall initially be allotted as required by this act. Subsequent allotment modifications shall not include transfers of moneys between sections of this act.(4) Appropriations in sections 504 and 506 of this act for insurance benefits under chapter 41.05 RCW are provided solely for the superintendent to allocate to districts for employee health benefits as provided in section 910 of this act. The superintendent may not allocate, and districts may not expend, these amounts for any other purpose beyond those authorized in section 910 of this act.(5) As required by RCW 28A.710.110, the office of the superintendent of public instruction shall transmit the charter school authorizer oversight fee for the charter school commission to the charter school oversight account.(6) The appropriations to the office of the superintendent of public instruction in this act shall be expended for the programs and amounts specified in this act.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 520. FOR THE OFFICE OF THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTIONâFOR CHARTER SCHOOLSWashington Opportunity Pathways AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$201,773,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$201,773,000The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) The superintendent shall distribute funding appropriated in this section to charter schools under chapter 28A.710 RCW. Within amounts provided in this section the superintendent may distribute funding for safety net awards for charter schools with demonstrated needs for special education funding beyond the amounts provided under chapter 28A.710 RCW.(2) $1,012,000 of the opportunity pathways accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for changes to the special education multiplier as specified in Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5263 (special education funding). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2025, these amounts shall lapse.(3) $7,715,000 of the opportunity pathways accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for enrichment payments to charter schools.(4) $418,000 of the opportunity pathways accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for materials, supplies, and operating costs pursuant to Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5192 (school district materials). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2025, these amounts shall lapse.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 521. FOR THE OFFICE OF THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTIONâFOR THE WASHINGTON STATE CHARTER SCHOOL COMMISSIONWashington Opportunity Pathways AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$459,000Charter Schools Oversight AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$4,939,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$5,398,000The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The entire Washington opportunity pathways accountâstate appropriation in this section is provided to the superintendent of public instruction solely for the operations of the Washington state charter school commission under chapter 28A.710 RCW.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 522. FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTIONâFOR TRANSITION TO KINDERGARTEN PROGRAMSGeneral FundâState Appropriation (FY 2026). . . .$94,183,000General FundâState Appropriation (FY 2027). . . .$95,936,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$190,119,000The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: Funding in this section is sufficient for implementation of Engrossed Senate Bill No. 5769 (transition to kindergarten). Funding provided in this section is sufficient to support the enrollment of 7,266 annual average full-time equivalent eligible children per school year.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 523. FOR THE OFFICE OF THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTIONâFOR GRANTS AND PASS THROUGH FUNDINGGeneral FundâState Appropriation (FY 2026). . . .$7,079,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$7,079,000The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1)(a) $1,500,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 is provided solely for dual language grants to grow capacity for high quality dual language learning. Grant funding may be used for new and existing dual language programs, heritage language programs for immigrant and refugee students, and indigenous language programs for native students. Of the amounts provided in this subsection, $300,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 is provided solely for tribal language grants.(b) Each grant recipient must convene an advisory board to guide the development and continuous improvement of its dual language program, including but not limited to: Determining which schools and languages will be prioritized; conducting outreach to the community; and addressing enrollment considerations and the hiring of staff. At least half the members of the board must be parents of English learner students or current or former English learner students. The other members of the board must represent teachers, students, school leaders, governing board members, youth, and community-based organizations that support English learners.(2) $1,500,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 is provided solely for a statewide information technology academy program. This public-private partnership will provide educational software, as well as information technology certification and software training opportunities for students and staff in public schools.(3) $1,200,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 is provided solely for implementation of chapter 157, Laws of 2016 (homeless students).(4) $200,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 is provided solely for the office to contract with a nonprofit organization to develop and provide a Latino youth-on-youth gang violence prevention program for students and may offer a parent coaching program. The program must target Latino students ages 11 through 17 who are either involved in or at risk of becoming involved in a gang or in gang activities, and parents of the students. The nonprofit organization must have at least 15 years of experience serving Latino communities and promoting advocacy and must provide kindergarten through 12th grade social emotional learning, mental health wraparound services, and parent engagement programs in Washington.(5) $500,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 is provided solely for a grant to the pacific science center to increase hands-on learning opportunities for Title I K-5 students statewide by increasing access to science on wheels and virtual field trips.(6) $500,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 is provided solely for the office of the superintendent of public instruction to contract with a nonprofit organization that supports Washington teachers in implementing lessons on the Holocaust for the expansion of comprehensive Holocaust and genocide education.(7) $1,500,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 is provided solely for grants to school districts for ninth grade success. Within the amounts in this subsection, funding is provided for the office to contract with an evaluator to conduct a yearly evaluation of the program's success.(8) $179,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 is provided solely for the Peninsula school district aviation academy to prepare students for diverse careers in the aviation industry.(End of part)PART VIHIGHER EDUCATIONNEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 601. The appropriations in sections 605 through 611 of this act are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) "Institutions" means the institutions of higher education receiving appropriations under sections 605 through 611 of this act.(2) In addition to waivers granted under the authority of RCW 28B.15.910, the governing boards and the state board may waive all or a portion of operating fees for any student. State general fund appropriations shall not be provided to replace tuition and fee revenue foregone as a result of waivers granted under this subsection.(3) Teacher preparation programs shall meet the requirements of RCW 28B.10.710 to incorporate information on the culture, history, and government of American Indian people in this state by integrating the curriculum developed and made available free of charge by the office of the superintendent of public instruction into existing programs or courses and may modify that curriculum in order to incorporate elements that have a regionally specific focus.(4) Institutions must include the phone number of a campus, local, state, or national suicide, crisis, or counseling hotline on the back of newly issued student and faculty identification cards.(5) Institutions of higher education shall not use appropriated funds to support intercollegiate athletics programs.(6)(a) The student achievement council and institutions as defined in RCW 28B.92.030 and eligible for state financial aid programs under chapters 28B.92 and 28B.118 RCW shall ensure that data needed to analyze and evaluate the effectiveness of state financial aid programs are promptly transmitted to the education data center so that it is available and easily accessible. The data to be reported must include but not be limited to:(i) The number of Washington college grant and college bound recipients;(ii) Persistence and completion rates of Washington college grant recipients and college bound recipients, disaggregated by institution of higher education;(iii) Washington college grant recipient grade point averages; and(iv) Washington college grant and college bound scholarship program costs.(b) The student achievement council shall submit student unit record data for state financial aid program applicants and recipients to the education data center.(7) The institutions shall promptly notify the office of the attorney general upon the receipt of a request from or on behalf of a federal agency or a federal, state, or local law enforcement authority for health care information, as defined in RCW 70.02.010, program eligibility information for individuals, information that may identify a health care provider's or facility's delivery of health care services to noncitizens, or the delivery of protected health care services as defined in RCW 7.115.010 where the request may impact expenditures for such services. The institutions shall require contracted entities to notify the institutions promptly upon receipt of a request from a federal agency or law enforcement authority as described in this subsection.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 602. (1) Within the amounts appropriated in this act, each institution of higher education shall seek to:(a) Maintain and to the extent possible increase enrollment opportunities at campuses, focusing on resident undergraduates;(b) Maintain and to the extent possible increase enrollment opportunities at university centers and other partnership programs that enable students to earn baccalaureate degrees on community college campuses; and(c) Eliminate and consolidate programs of study for which there is limited student or employer demand, or that are not areas of core academic strength for the institution, particularly when such programs duplicate offerings by other in-state institutions.(2) For purposes of monitoring and reporting statewide enrollment, the University of Washington and Washington State University shall notify the office of financial management of the number of full-time student equivalent enrollments for each of their campuses.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 603. PUBLIC BACCALAUREATE INSTITUTIONS(1) The state universities, the regional universities, and The Evergreen State College must accept the transfer of college-level courses taken by students under RCW 28A.600.290 or 28A.600.300 if a student seeking a transfer of the college-level courses has been admitted to the state university, the regional university, or The Evergreen State College, and if the college-level courses are recognized as transferrable by the admitting institution of higher education.(2) Within existing resources, the governing boards of the University of Washington and Washington State University may establish a pilot program to make available and pay the costs of insurance for certain individuals, as determined by the institution, who are current or former intercollegiate student athletes. The pilot program may provide:(a) Insurance for intercollegiate student athletes currently enrolled at the institution; and(b) Health and health care insurance for former intercollegiate student athletes at the institution, who by rule of the institution's athletic association, are entitled to a period of post-eligibility health care to address athletics-related injuries and conditions.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 604. HIGHER EDUCATION COMPENSATIONInstitutions of higher education receiving appropriations in this act are subject to the following terms and conditions:(1) The legislature, the office of financial management, and other state agencies need consistent and accurate personnel data from institutions of higher education for policy planning purposes. Institutions of higher education shall report personnel data to the office of financial management for inclusion in the agency's data warehouse. Uniform reporting procedures shall be established by the office of financial management's office of the state human resources director for use by the reporting institutions, including provisions for common job classifications and common definitions of full-time equivalent staff. Annual contract amounts, number of contract months, and funding sources shall be consistently reported for employees under contract.(2)(a) For employees under the jurisdiction of chapter 41.56 or 41.80 RCW, salary increases will be in accordance with the applicable collective bargaining agreement. However, an increase shall not be provided to any classified employee whose salary is above the approved salary range maximum for the class to which the employee's position is allocated.(b) For each institution of higher education receiving appropriations in this act:(i) The only allowable salary increases are those associated with normally occurring promotions and increases related to faculty and staff retention and as provided in part IX of this act.(ii) Institutions may provide salary increases from sources other than general fund appropriations and tuition revenues to instructional and research faculty, exempt professional staff, teaching and research assistants, as classified by the office of financial management, and all other nonclassified staff, but not including employees under chapter 41.80 RCW. It is the intent of the legislature that salary increases provided under this subsection (2)(b)(ii) not increase state general fund support or impact tuition expenditures by an institution unless the legislature so determines.(iii) Funding for salary increases provided under (b)(ii) of this subsection and RCW 41.76.035 and 28B.52.035 on or after July 1, 2019, must be excluded from the general fund and tuition salary base when calculating state funding for future general wage or other salary increases on or after July 1, 2019. In order to facilitate this funding policy, each institution shall report to the office of financial management on the details of locally authorized salary increases granted under (b)(ii) of this subsection and RCW 41.76.035 and 28B.52.035 with its biennial budget submittal. At a minimum, the report must include the total cost of locally authorized increases by fiscal year, a description of the locally authorized provision, and the long-term source of funds that is anticipated to cover the cost.(3) Appropriations in sections 605 through 611 of this act are sufficient to implement 2025-2027 collective bargaining agreements at institutions of higher education negotiated under chapter 41.80 RCW and as set forth in part IX of this act.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 605. FOR THE STATE BOARD FOR COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGESGeneral FundâState Appropriation (FY 2026). . . .$949,700,000General FundâState Appropriation (FY 2027). . . .$960,088,000Community/Technical College Capital ProjectsAccountâState Appropriation. . . .$21,368,000Education Legacy Trust AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$166,595,000Invest in Washington AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$174,000Workforce Education Investment AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$368,202,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$2,466,127,000The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) $33,261,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $33,261,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely as special funds for training and related support services, including financial aid, as specified in RCW 28C.04.390. Funding is provided to support at least 7,170 full-time equivalent students in fiscal year 2026 and at least 7,170 full-time equivalent students in fiscal year 2027.(2) $5,000,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026, $5,000,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027, and $5,450,000 of the education legacy trust accountâstate appropriation are provided solely for administration and customized training contracts through the job skills program. The state board shall make an annual report by January 1st of each year to the governor and to the appropriate policy and fiscal committees of the legislature under RCW 43.01.036 regarding implementation of this section, listing the scope of grant awards, the distribution of funds by educational sector and region of the state, and the results of the partnerships supported by these funds.(3) $425,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $425,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for Seattle Central College's allied health programs.(4) $5,250,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $5,250,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for the student achievement initiative.(5) $1,610,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026, $1,610,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027, and $904,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation are provided solely for the mathematics, engineering, and science achievement program.(6) $1,500,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $1,500,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for operating a fabrication composite wing incumbent worker training program to be housed at the Washington aerospace training and research center.(7) $100,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $100,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for the aerospace center of excellence currently hosted by Everett community college to:(a) Increase statewide communications and outreach between industry sectors, industry organizations, businesses, K-12 schools, colleges, and universities;(b) Enhance information technology to increase business and student accessibility and use of the center's web site; and(c) Act as the information entry point for prospective students and job seekers regarding education, training, and employment in the industry.(8) Community and technical colleges are not required to send mass mailings of course catalogs to residents of their districts. Community and technical colleges shall consider lower cost alternatives, such as mailing postcards or brochures that direct individuals to online information and other ways of acquiring print catalogs.(9) $157,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $157,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for the Wenatchee Valley college wildfire prevention program.(10) $150,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $150,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for the Puget Sound welcome back center at Highline College to continue a grant program for internationally trained individuals seeking employment in the behavioral health field in Washington state.(11) $750,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $750,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for enrollments in the integrated basic education and skills training program. Funding will support approximately 120 full-time equivalent enrollments annually.(12) $216,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $216,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for the opportunity center for employment and education at North Seattle College.(13) $500,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $500,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for Highline College to implement the Federal Way higher education initiative in partnership with the city of Federal Way and the University of Washington Tacoma campus.(14) $350,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $350,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for Peninsula College to maintain the annual cohorts of the specified programs as follows:(a) Medical assisting, 40 students;(b) Nursing assistant, 60 students; and(c) Registered nursing, 32 students.(15) $338,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $338,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for the Washington state labor education and research center at South Seattle College.(16) $150,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $150,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for the aerospace and advanced manufacturing center of excellence hosted by Everett Community College to continue a semiconductor and electronics manufacturing branch in Vancouver.(17) $2,000,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the state board for community and technical colleges to maintain high-demand enrollments, as provided under RCW 28C.30.020. These programs include, but are not limited to, allied health, computer and information science, manufacturing, and other fields identified by the state board for community and technical colleges.(18) $8,000,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the emergency assistance grant program in RCW 28B.50.295.(19) $1,119,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026, $1,119,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027, and $2,526,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation are provided solely for implementation of diversity, equity, inclusion, and antiracism provisions in chapter 28B.10 RCW.(20) $20,473,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of equity and access provisions in chapter 28B.50 RCW.(21) $3,200,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for costs associated with grants awarded in fiscal year 2023 for nursing programs to purchase or upgrade simulation laboratory equipment.(22) $4,668,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely to support cybersecurity academic enrollments of 250 FTE students.(23) $408,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for a center for excellence in cybersecurity.(24) $1,648,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $1,648,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for legal services related to litigation by employees within the community and technical college system challenging the denial of retirement and sick leave benefits. The cases include Wolf v. State and SBCTC, Rush v. State and SBCTC (retirement), and Rush v. State and SBCTC (sick leave).(25) $2,000,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $2,000,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for the opportunity grant program to provide health care workforce grants for students.(26) $7,456,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for programming to accommodate refugees and immigrants who have arrived in Washington state on or after July 1, 2021, including those from Afghanistan and Ukraine.(27) $2,160,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026, $2,160,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027, and $4,800,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation are provided solely for nursing education.(28) $200,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the Bellingham Technical College maritime apprenticeship program.(29) $2,200,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the Skagit Valley College dental therapy education program.(30)(a) $854,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the Seattle Central College for partnership with the Seattle maritime academy. Seattle Central College must enter into a memorandum of agreement with Washington state ferries. Funding may not be expended until Seattle Central College certifies to the office of financial management that a memorandum of agreement with Washington state ferries has been executed. The memorandum of agreement must address:(i) The shared use of training and other facilities and implementation of joint training opportunities where practicable;(ii) Development of a joint recruitment plan aimed at increasing enrollment of women and people of color, with specific strategies to recruit existing community and technical college students, maritime skills center students, high school students from maritime programs, foster care graduates, and former juvenile rehabilitation and adult incarcerated individuals; and(iii) Development of a training program and recruitment plan and a five-year operational plan.(b) The joint training program and recruitment plan and the five-year operational plan must be submitted to the appropriate policy and fiscal committees of the legislature by December 1, 2025.(31) $331,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026, $331,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027, and $110,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation are provided solely for implementation of state registered apprenticeship provisions in chapter 28B.124 RCW.(32) $4,276,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of chapter 421, Laws of 2023 (postsecondary student needs).(33) $7,436,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of chapter 339, Laws of 2023 (student homelessness pilot).(34) $7,278,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of chapter 314, Laws of 2023 (college in high school fees).(35) $1,024,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of chapter 126, Laws of 2023 (nurse supply).(36) $1,602,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for community college staff to recruit, advise, and support early achievers scholars completing their early childhood qualifications. The state board shall prioritize colleges with longer wait lists for early achievers scholars. The state board for community and technical colleges shall collaborate with the department of children, youth, and families to submit a report, pursuant to RCW 43.01.036, by September 30, 2025, to the governor and appropriate committees of the legislature on early achievers grant participation data, including data on enrollment and waitlists for the grant program.(37) $408,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for Olympic College health care pathways.(38) $2,280,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the bachelor of science computer science programs.(39) $408,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the continuation of a hospitality center of excellence hosted at Columbia basin college.(40) $150,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for Edmonds College to provide support to students who are military veterans, focusing on counseling services, financial assistance, and reentry services.(41) $616,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute House Bill No. 1273 (dual credit program access). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2025, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.(42) $7,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Senate Bill No. 5189 (competency-based education). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2025, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.(43) $1,190,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely to expand the student aid outreach and completion initiative pilot program in RCW 28B.50.940. Within the amounts provided in this subsection (43):(a) $850,000 of the amounts in this subsection (43) are provided to participating community and technical colleges located within capital region educational service district 113.(b) $340,000 of the amounts provided in this subsection (43) are provided to participating community and technical colleges located within north central educational service district 171.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 606. FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTONGeneral FundâState Appropriation (FY 2026). . . .$442,276,000General FundâState Appropriation (FY 2027). . . .$41,821,000Dedicated Cannabis AccountâState Appropriation(FY 2026). . . .$377,000Dedicated Cannabis AccountâState Appropriation(FY 2027). . . .$390,000Aquatic Lands Enhancement AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$1,671,000Climate Commitment AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$2,526,000Natural Climate Solutions AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$840,000University of Washington Building AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$1,546,000Education Legacy Trust AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$40,637,000Economic Development Strategic Reserve AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$3,149,000Biotoxin AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$635,000Accident AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$9,015,000Medical Aid AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$8,378,000Workforce Education Investment AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$544,868,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$1,098,129,000The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) $200,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $200,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for one head archivist for the labor archives of Washington and reserved solely for labor archives activities, staffing, supplies, and equipment. The head archivist will determine budget priorities and oversee expenditures on the budget. Budget funds will be reserved solely for the labor archives and shall not be used to supplant or supplement other activities of the University of Washington libraries unrelated to the collections and activities of the labor archives. The university and the head archivist shall work in collaboration with the friends of the labor archives community advisory board.(2) $10,000,000 of the education legacy trust accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the family medicine residency network at the university to maintain and expand the number of residency slots available in Washington.(3) The university must continue work with the education research and data center to demonstrate progress in computer science and engineering enrollments. By September 1st of each year, the university shall provide a report including but not limited to the cost per student, student completion rates, and the number of low-income students enrolled in each program, any process changes or best-practices implemented by the university, and how many students are enrolled in computer science and engineering programs above the prior academic year.(4) $14,000,000 of the education legacy trust accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the expansion of degrees in the department of computer science and engineering at the Seattle campus.(5) $3,062,000 of the economic development strategic reserve accountâstate appropriation is provided solely to support the joint center for aerospace innovation technology.(6) $7,345,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $7,345,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for the continued operations and expansion of the Washington, Wyoming, Alaska, Montana, Idaho medical school program.(7) $2,625,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $2,625,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for the institute for stem cell and regenerative medicine. Funds appropriated in this subsection must be dedicated to research utilizing pluripotent stem cells and related research methods.(8) $500,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $500,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided to support youth and young adults experiencing homelessness in the university district of Seattle. Funding is provided for the university to work with community service providers and university colleges and departments to plan for and implement a comprehensive one-stop center with navigation services for homeless youth; the university may contract with the department of commerce to expand services that serve homeless youth in the university district.(9) $1,800,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026, $1,800,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027, and $1,200,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation are provided solely for the adult psychiatry residency program at the University of Washington to offer additional residency positions that are approved by the accreditation council for graduate medical education.(10) $1,000,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $1,000,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for the psychiatry integrated care training program.(11) $640,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026, $640,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027, and $426,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation are provided solely for child and adolescent psychiatry residency positions that are approved by the accreditation council for graduate medical education, as provided in RCW 28B.20.445.(12) $1,000,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $1,000,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for the School of Dentistry to support its role as a major oral health provider to individuals covered by medicaid and the uninsured.(13) $200,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $200,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for the pre-law pipeline and social justice program at the University of Washington-Tacoma.(14) $226,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $226,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for the university's neurology department to implement a telemedicine program to disseminate dementia care best practices to primary care practitioners using the project ECHO model. The program shall provide a virtual connection for providers and content experts and include didactics, case conferences, and an emphasis on practice transformation and systems-level issues that affect care delivery. The initial users of this program shall include referral sources in health care systems and clinics, such as the university's neighborhood clinics and Virginia Mason Memorial in Yakima with a goal of adding 15 to 20 providers from smaller clinics and practices per year.(15) $102,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $102,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for the university's center for international trade in forest products.(16) $500,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026, $500,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027, and $300,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation are provided solely for the Latino center for health.(17) $500,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $500,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for a firearm policy research program. The program will:(a) Support investigations of firearm death and injury risk factors;(b) Evaluate the effectiveness of state firearm laws and policies;(c) Assess the consequences of firearm violence; and(d) Develop strategies to reduce the toll of firearm violence to citizens of the state.(18) $400,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $400,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for the climate impacts group in the college of the environment.(19) $300,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $300,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for the college of education to collaborate with teacher preparation programs and the office of the superintendent of public instruction to develop open access climate science educational curriculum for use in teacher preparation programs.(20) $300,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026, $300,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027, and $300,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation are provided solely for the Harry Bridges center for labor studies. The center shall work in collaboration with the state board for community and technical colleges.(21) $2,700,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely to maintain degree capacity and undergraduate enrollments in engineering, mathematics, and science programs to support the biomedical innovation partnership zone at the Bothell campus.(22) $150,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026, $150,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027, and $700,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation are provided solely for Washington mathematics, engineering, science achievement programs to provide enrichment opportunities in mathematics, engineering, science, and technology to students who are traditionally underrepresented in these programs. Of the amounts provided in this subsection, $500,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation is for Washington State University to implement expansion of MESA activities at the Everett campus to facilitate increased attendance and degree completion by students who are underrepresented in science, technology, engineering, and mathematics degrees.(23) $75,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $75,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for a community care coordinator for transitional-age youth for the doorway project in partnership with the Seattle campus.(24) $16,000,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the expansion of the Paul G. Allen school of computer science and engineering in order to award an additional 200 degrees per year focusing on traditionally underrepresented students. A report on the program graduation rates, waitlist for entry into the program, time to degree completion, and degrees awarded must be submitted to the appropriate committees of the legislature, pursuant to RCW 43.01.036, by June 30, 2026, and June 30, 2027.(25) To ensure transparency and accountability, in the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium the University of Washington shall comply with any and all financial and accountability audits by the Washington state auditor including any and all audits of university services offered to the general public, including those offered through any public-private partnership, business venture, affiliation, or joint venture with a public or private entity, except the government of the United States. The university shall comply with all state auditor requests for the university's financial and business information including the university's governance and financial participation in these public-private partnerships, business ventures, affiliations, or joint ventures with a public or private entity. In any instance in which the university declines to produce the information to the state auditor, the university will provide the state auditor a brief summary of the documents withheld and a citation of the legal or contractual provision that prevents disclosure. The summaries must be compiled into a report by the state auditor and provided on a quarterly basis to the legislature.(26) $200,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026, $200,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027, and $160,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation are provided solely for the Burke museum of natural history and culture to make education programs offered by the museum accessible to more students across Washington, especially students in underserved schools and locations. The funding shall be used for:(a) Increasing the number of students who participate in Burke education programs at reduced or no cost, including virtual programs;(b) Providing bus reimbursement for students visiting the museum on field trips and to support travel to bring museum programs across the state;(c) Staff who will form partnerships with school districts to serve statewide communities more efficiently and equitably, including through the Burkemobile program; and(d) Support of tribal consultation work, including expanding Native programming, and digitization of Native collections.(27) $410,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $410,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for the university's center for human rights. The appropriation must be used to supplement, not supplant, other funding sources for the center for human rights.(28) $143,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $143,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely to the University of Washington for the establishment and operation of the state forensic anthropologist. The university shall work in conjunction with and provide the full funding directly to the King county medical examiner's office to support the statewide work of the state forensic anthropologist.(29) $64,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $64,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for one full-time mental health counselor licensed under chapter 18.225 RCW who has experience and training specifically related to working with active members of the military or military veterans.(30) $443,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $443,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for the operation of the center for environmental forensic science.(31) $2,000,000 of the climate commitment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for staffing and operational expenditures related to the battery fabrication testbed.(32) $505,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $505,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for pharmacy behavioral health. The University of Washington school of pharmacy/medicine pharmacy services shall retain two residency training positions and one behavioral health faculty to implement a residency program focused on behavioral health.(33) $1,242,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026, $1,242,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027, and $742,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation are provided solely for an increase in the number of nursing slots and graduates in the already established accelerated bachelor of science in nursing program. Of the amounts provided in this subsection, $273,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $273,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for the Tacoma school of nursing and healthcare leadership.(34) $100,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $100,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for the memory and brain wellness center to support the statewide expansion of the dementia friends program.(35) $250,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $250,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely to maintain a data repository to assist the state and all political subdivisions with evaluating whether and to what extent existing laws and practices with respect to voting and elections are consistent with public policy, implementing best practices in voting and elections, and to investigate potential infringements upon the right to vote.(a) The operation of the database shall be the responsibility of the director of the database, who shall be employed by the University of Washington with training and experience in demography, statistical analysis, and electoral systems. The director shall appoint necessary staff to implement and maintain the database.(b) The database shall maintain in electronic format at least the following data and records, where available, for at least the previous 12-year period:(i) Estimates of the total population, voting age population, and citizen voting age population by race, ethnicity, and language-minority groups, broken down to the election district and precinct level on a year-by-year basis for every political subdivision in the state, based on data from the United States census bureau, American community survey, or data of comparable quality collected by a public office;(ii) Election results at the precinct level for every statewide election and every election in every political subdivision;(iii) Regularly updated voter registration lists, voter history files, voting center locations, ballot drop box locations, and student engagement hub locations for every election in every political subdivision;(iv) Contemporaneous maps, descriptions of boundaries, and shapefiles for election districts and precincts;(v) The following records for every election in every political subdivision:(A) Records of all voters issued a ballot and all voters who returned a ballot; and(B) Records of all ballots with missing and mismatched signatures, including the date on which the voter was contacted or the notice was mailed, as well as the date on which the voter submitted updated information;(vi) Apportionment plans for every election in every political subdivision; and(vii) Any other data that the director deems advisable.(c) Upon the certification of election results and the completion of the voter history file after each general election, the secretary of state shall transmit copies of the following to the director of the database:(i) Election results at the precinct level, including information about rejected and cured ballots;(ii) Voter history files;(iii) Shapefiles for election districts; and(iv) Lists of voting centers, ballot drop boxes, and student engagement hubs.(d) The director and staff shall update election data in the database as soon as it is available from the office of the secretary of state, following certification of each election as required by RCW 29A.60.190 or 29A.60.250.(e) Except for any data, information, or estimates that identify individual voters, the data, information, and estimates maintained by the database shall be posted online and made available to the public at no cost.(f) The database shall prepare any estimates made pursuant to this section by applying scientifically rigorous and validated methodologies.(g) The database shall publish on its website and transmit to the state for dissemination to county auditors and the secretary of state a list of political subdivisions required, pursuant to section 203 of the federal voting rights act, 52 U.S.C. Sec. 10503, to provide assistance to members of language-minority groups and each language in which those political subdivisions are required to provide assistance. Each county auditor shall transmit the list described in this subsection to all political subdivisions within their jurisdiction.(h) The database will complete regular analysis of ballot rejections and cures, identifying population subgroups with higher than average ballot rejection rates. An annual report of ballot rejections will be posted online and made available to the public at no cost. Database staff may work with the secretary of state and county auditors to examine new practices and solutions for reducing ballot rejections and increasing ballot cure rates.(i) Staff at the database may provide nonpartisan technical assistance to political subdivisions, scholars, and the general public seeking to use the resources of the database.(36) $122,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $122,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for sexual assault nurse examiner training.(37) $5,010,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the expansion of the University of Washington school of dentistry regional initiatives in dental education (RIDE) program.(38) Within existing resources, the institution must resume a mentoring, organization, and social support for autism inclusion on campus program. The program must focus on academic coaching, peer-mentoring, support for social interactions, and career preparation.(39) $1,000,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the center for indigenous health to increase the number of American Indian and Alaska Native physicians practicing in the state of Washington.(40) $4,000,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for increasing enrollments in computing and engineering programs at the Tacoma campus.(41) $520,000 of the natural climate solutions accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the biological response to ocean acidification to advance high-priority biological experiments to better understand the relationship between marine organisms and ocean acidification.(42) $300,000 of the natural climate solutions accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for monitoring assistance at the Washington ocean acidification center.(43) $104,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $104,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for the continued implementation of chapter 191, Laws of 2022 (veterans & military suicide).(44) $800,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the development and implementation of a program to support pathways from prison to the university's Tacoma campus. The university shall collaborate with formerly incarcerated women, Tacoma Community College, the freedom education project Puget Sound, the women's village, the state board for community and technical colleges, and the department of corrections, in development and implementation of the pathways program.(45) $910,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the Allen school scholars program.(46) $158,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026, $158,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027, and $798,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation are provided solely for continued implementation of diversity, equity, inclusion, and antiracism professional development for faculty and staff, student training, and campus climate assessments in chapter 28B.10 RCW.(47) The institution must report to and coordinate with the department of ecology to track expenditures from climate commitment act accounts, as defined and described in RCW 70A.65.300 and chapter 173-446B WAC.(48) $586,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of chapter 421, Laws of 2023 (postsecondary student needs).(49) $2,862,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of chapter 314, Laws of 2023 (college in high school fees).(50) $730,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of chapter 364, Laws of 2023 (psilocybin).(51) $288,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of chapter 232, Laws of 2023 (alternative jet fuel).(52) $526,000 of the climate commitment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for two grant writers to support the ongoing need for tribal and overburdened communities to access state and federal funding opportunities that advance environmental justice through the thriving communities technical assistance program.(53) $15,000,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the center for behavioral health learning.(54) $3,500,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely to the institution to address challenges and capacity with discharging patients from acute care settings into post-acute care community settings at Harborview medical center and the University of Washington medical center. Of the amount in this subsection, $600,000 shall be used to continue the complex discharge task force in order to conclude the work of the task force and the complex discharge pilot program based on Harborview's bed readiness program.(55) $1,500,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation is provided to continue behavioral health education and training opportunities at the behavioral health institute.(56) $615,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $615,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for legal services related to the behavioral health teaching facility.(57) $412,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026, $412,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027, and $72,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation are provided solely to develop and implement the Washington reproductive access alliance. The alliance shall provide a service coordination website and phone line, administrative support and coordination of the alliance, patient care coordination, and social support for patient travel.(58) $650,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for continued implementation of chapter 453, Laws of 2023 (E2SSB 5440).(59) $214,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $214,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for the implementation of chapter 366, Laws of 2024 (substance use treatment).(60) $300,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely to continue establishing Washpop, a statewide integrated data repository for population and policy research on topics including criminal justice and safety, economic prosperity and equity, and health and social well-being.(61) $24,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5528 (transportation electrification). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2025, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.(62) $10,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the University of Washington to conduct a prospective, randomized cohort study between July 1, 2025, and June 30, 2027, to determine the extent to which ibogaine-assisted therapy conducted through a licensed clinic in North America followed by structured therapeutic support presents advantages over treatment as usual for adults diagnosed with opioid use disorder compared to the current standard United States interventions of medication-assisted treatment and psychotherapy. The study must measure outcomes including, but not limited to, treatment engagement, reduction in opioid use, mortality, functional status, craving, motivation to change, and self-efficacy, using toxicology, standard scales, and other credible research techniques. The university may obtain and utilize private philanthropic funding to assist with the study required by this subsection.(63) $100,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for a grant to the University of Washington Friday Harbor labs for an ongoing project that focuses on restoration of a critically endangered species of starfish that could help stabilize foundational Washington state marine ecosystems including kelp forests and eelgrass.(64) $63,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely to support the housing mini-academy.(65) $300,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Substitute House Bill No. 1811 (crisis co-response). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2025, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 607. FOR WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITYGeneral FundâState Appropriation (FY 2026). . . .$280,947,000General FundâState Appropriation (FY 2027). . . .$282,113,000Dedicated Cannabis AccountâState Appropriation(FY 2026). . . .$203,000Dedicated Cannabis AccountâState Appropriation(FY 2027). . . .$210,000Climate Commitment AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$7,722,000Washington State University Building AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$792,000Education Legacy Trust AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$33,995,000Model Toxics Control Operating AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$2,076,000Workforce Education Investment AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$77,057,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$685,115,000The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) The university must continue work with the education research and data center to demonstrate progress in computer science and engineering enrollments. By September 1st of each year, the university shall provide a report including but not limited to the cost per student, student completion rates, and the number of low-income students enrolled in each program, any process changes or best-practices implemented by the university, and how many students are enrolled in computer science and engineering programs above the prior academic year.(2) $500,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $500,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for state match requirements related to the federal aviation administration grant.(3) $135,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $135,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for a honey bee biology research position.(4) $580,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $580,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for an organic agriculture systems degree program located at the university center in Everett.(5) $630,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $630,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for the continuation of an electrical engineering program located in Bremerton. At full implementation, the university is expected to increase degree production by 25 new bachelor's degrees per year. The university must identify these students separately when providing data to the education research data center as required in subsection (1) of this section.(6) $1,370,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $1,370,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for the operation of software engineering and data analytic programs at the university center in Everett. At full implementation, the university is expected to enroll 50 students per academic year. The university must identify these students separately when providing data to the education research data center as required in subsection (1) of this section.(7) General fundâstate appropriations in this section are reduced to reflect a reduction in state-supported tuition waivers for graduate students. When reducing tuition waivers, the university will not change its practices and procedures for providing eligible veterans with tuition waivers.(8) $1,154,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $1,154,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for RCW 82.16.120 and 82.16.165 (renewable energy, tax incentives).(9) $376,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $376,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for RCW 28B.30.357 (children's mental health).(10) $585,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $585,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for RCW 77.12.272 (elk hoof disease).(11) $2,076,000 of the model toxics control operating accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the university's soil health initiative and its network of long-term agroecological research and extension (LTARE) sites. The network must include a Mount Vernon REC site.(12) $42,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $42,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for one full-time mental health counselor licensed under chapter 18.225 RCW who has experience and training specifically related to working with active members of the military or military veterans.(13) $33,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $33,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 is provided solely for compensation funding for Western Washington University employees that work on the Washington State University Everett campus.(14) $327,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $327,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 is provided solely for pharmacy behavioral health. Washington State University college of pharmacy and pharmaceutical sciences shall retain two residency training positions and one behavioral health faculty to implement a residency program focused on behavioral health.(15) $608,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $608,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 is provided solely for the Washington state academy of sciences to provide support for core operations and to accomplish its mission of providing science in the service of Washington, pursuant to its memorandum of understanding with the university.(16) $188,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 is provided solely for stormwater research to study the long-term efficacy of green stormwater infrastructure that incorporates compost to remove pollutants.(17) $500,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $500,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for the joint center for deployment and research in earth abundant materials.(18) $7,722,000 of the climate commitment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the institute for northwest energy futures.(19) $568,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $568,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for implementation of chapter 212, Laws of 2022 (community solar projects).(20) $300,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $300,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for base funding for the William D. Ruckleshaus Center.(21) The institution must report to and coordinate with the department of ecology to track expenditures from climate commitment act accounts, as defined and described in RCW 70A.65.300 and chapter 173-446B WAC.(22) $3,910,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for increasing nursing salaries at the institution.(23) $4,112,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for a bachelor's degree in cybersecurity operations.(24) $3,470,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for a bachelor of science in public health degree at the Pullman, Spokane, and Vancouver campuses.(25) $2,014,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for a bachelor's and master's degree in social work at the Tri-Cities campus.(26) $1,529,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the development and operations of a journalism fellowship program focused on civic affairs.(27) $496,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of chapter 421, Laws of 2023 (postsecondary student needs).(28) $190,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $190,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for continued funding of the statewide broadband coordinator within the Washington State University extension program. This funding will support the salary and benefits of this position.(29) $706,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the complex social interactions lab.(30)(a) $2,200,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the native American scholarship to continue for the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium. Of the amounts in this subsection, no more than $200,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation may be spent on administration, support services for students, outreach regarding the program, and technical support for application.(b) "Eligible student" means a member of a federally recognized Indian tribe located within Washington who files a free application for federal student aid (FAFSA) and enrolls in an undergraduate degree program. Eligible students need to maintain satisfactory academic progress during the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium to remain eligible for the scholarship. The institution shall determine award priorities based on tribal consultation. Awards must be distributed to students no later than May of each fiscal year.(c) The institution must submit a report to the appropriate committees of the legislature, pursuant to RCW 43.01.036, by June 30, 2027. The report must include: The number of eligible students; the number of students who receive a scholarship; how recipients were determined; and how many members of federally recognized Indian tribes in Washington received scholarships versus members of federally recognized Indian tribes from other states.(31) $180,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed House Bill No. 1705 (large animal veterinarians). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2025, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 608. FOR EASTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITYGeneral FundâState Appropriation (FY 2026). . . .$66,544,000General FundâState Appropriation (FY 2027). . . .$66,663,000Education Legacy Trust AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$16,838,000Workforce Education Investment AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$32,328,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$182,373,000The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) At least $200,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and at least $200,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 must be expended on the Northwest autism center.(2) The university must continue work with the education research and data center to demonstrate progress in computer science and engineering enrollments. By September 1st of each year, the university shall provide a report including but not limited to the cost per student, student completion rates, and the number of low-income students enrolled in each program, any process changes or best-practices implemented by the university, and how many students are enrolled in computer science and engineering programs above the prior academic year.(3) Within amounts appropriated in this section, the university is encouraged to increase the number of tenure-track positions created and hired.(4) $45,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $45,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for one full-time mental health counselor licensed under chapter 18.225 RCW who has experience and training specifically related to working with active members of the military or military veterans.(5) $300,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for a center for inclusive excellence for faculty and staff.(6) $268,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for a professional masters of science cyber operations degree option.(7) $2,144,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the operation of a bachelor of science in cybersecurity degree option through the computer science program.(8) $4,598,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely to maintain a cohort of 80 students in the bachelor of nursing program.(9) $2,108,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the operation of a coordinated care network that will help to maximize the collaboration of various student support services to create wraparound care for students to address obstacles to degree completion. The amount provided in this subsection must be used to supplement, not supplant, other funding sources for the program.(10) $110,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $110,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for a summer bridge program.(11) $1,040,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the establishment and operating support of a university mathematics, engineering, and science achievement program.(12) $158,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of chapter 421, Laws of 2023 (postsecondary student needs).(13) $5,142,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of chapter 314, Laws of 2023 (college in high school fees).(14) $10,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5528 (transportation electrification). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2025, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 609. FOR CENTRAL WASHINGTON UNIVERSITYGeneral FundâState Appropriation (FY 2026). . . .$70,400,000General FundâState Appropriation (FY 2027). . . .$70,597,000Accident AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$692,000Central Washington University Capital ProjectsAccountâState Appropriation. . . .$76,000Education Legacy Trust AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$19,076,000Workforce Education Investment AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$25,115,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$185,956,000The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) The university must continue work with the education research and data center to demonstrate progress in engineering enrollments. By September 1st of each year, the university shall provide a report including but not limited to the cost per student, student completion rates, and the number of low-income students enrolled in each program, any process changes or best-practices implemented by the university, and how many students are enrolled in engineering programs above the prior academic year.(2) Within amounts appropriated in this section, the university is encouraged to increase the number of tenure-track positions created and hired.(3) $240,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $240,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for two counselor positions to increase access to mental health counseling for traditionally underrepresented students.(4) $52,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $52,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for one full-time mental health outreach and service coordination position who has knowledge of issues relevant to veterans.(5) $240,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for expanding cybersecurity capacity by adding additional faculty resources in the department of computer science.(6) $586,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for a peer mentoring program. The amount provided in this subsection must be used to supplement, not supplant, other funding sources for the program.(7) $286,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the operation of an extended orientation program to help promote retention of underserved students. The amount provided in this subsection must be used to supplement, not supplant, other funding sources for the program.(8) $1,396,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for student success. Students will receive discipline specific tutoring programs, peer assisted learning sessions, and academic success coaching.(9) $1,418,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for grow your own teacher residency programs in high need areas of elementary, bilingual, special education, and English language learners.(10) $1,074,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for dual language expansion programs in Yakima and Des Moines.(11) $168,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of chapter 421, Laws of 2023 (postsecondary student needs).(12) $7,938,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of chapter 314, Laws of 2023 (college in high school fees).(13) $766,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for student basic needs. This funding will support two financial aid coaching specialists, support a coordinator for the food pantry, support a director and advocate to assist students who have experienced sexual violence, and help with prevention initiatives.(14) $422,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for civil rights and risk mitigation staffing.(15) $692,000 of the accident accountâstate appropriation is provided solely to increase enrollment in the occupational safety and health programs.(16) $32,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5528 (transportation electrification). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2025, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 610. FOR THE EVERGREEN STATE COLLEGEGeneral FundâState Appropriation (FY 2026). . . .$37,883,000General FundâState Appropriation (FY 2027). . . .$34,053,000The Evergreen State College Capital ProjectsAccountâState Appropriation. . . .$80,000Education Legacy Trust AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$5,450,000Workforce Education Investment AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$14,789,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$92,255,000The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) Funding provided in this section is sufficient for The Evergreen State College to continue operations of the Longhouse Center and the Northwest Indian applied research institute.(2) Within amounts appropriated in this section, the college is encouraged to increase the number of tenure-track positions created and hired.(3) $2,090,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026, $2,035,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027, and $793,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation are provided solely for the Washington state institute for public policy to initiate, sponsor, conduct, and publish research that is directly useful to policymakers and manage reviews and evaluations of technical and scientific topics as they relate to major long-term issues facing the state. Within the amounts provided in this subsection (3):(a) $1,685,000 of the amounts in fiscal year 2026 and $1,685,000 of the amounts in fiscal year 2027 are provided for administration and core operations.(b) $546,000 of the amounts in fiscal year 2026 and $449,000 of the amounts in fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for ongoing and continuing studies on the Washington state institute for public policy's work plan.(c) $82,000 of the amounts in fiscal year 2026 are provided solely for implementation of Substitute House Bill No. 1606 (journal access/state employ). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2025, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.(d) $80,000 of the amounts in fiscal year 2026 are provided solely for a review of the funding mechanisms and policies adopted by other states to support the implementation of small modular reactors. The review shall be submitted to the legislature, pursuant to RCW 43.01.036, by December 31, 2025.(e) $146,000 of the amounts in fiscal year 2026 and $44,000 of the amounts in fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for the Washington state institute for public policy to conduct a study of the amount of savings to the state of Washington of allowing legally responsible individuals to become paid parental caregivers for their developmentally disabled children. The office of the state actuary, department of social and health services, health care authority, and department of children, youth, and families must cooperate with the institute to facilitate access to data or other resources necessary to complete this work. The institute shall provide an initial report to the appropriate committees of the legislature by December 31, 2025, and a final report by November 15, 2026. To the extent possible, the study shall:(i) Quantify cost savings from reductions of entitlement program usage by parental caregivers;(ii) Quantify cost savings from reduced hospital, foster care, and residential facility usage by developmentally disabled children due to having a parental caregiver; and(iii) Summarize any additional cost savings likely to occur due to allowing paid parental caregivers.(f) $144,000 of the amounts in fiscal year 2026 and $57,000 of the amounts in fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 1108 (housing cost task force). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2025, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.(g) Notwithstanding other provisions in this subsection, the board of directors for the Washington state institute for public policy may adjust due dates for projects included on the institute's 2025-27 work plan as necessary to efficiently manage workload.(4) $213,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $213,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for additional faculty to support Native American and indigenous programs.(5) $85,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $85,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely to the native pathways program for an assistant director.(6) $110,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $110,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for a tribal liaison position.(7) $39,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $39,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for one full-time mental health counselor licensed under chapter 18.225 RCW who has experience and training specifically related to working with active members of the military or military veterans.(8) $137,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $137,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for student mental health and wellness. The amount provided in this subsection must be used to supplement, not supplant, other funding sources for the program.(9) $600,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $600,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely to develop and expand current corrections education programs offered in department of corrections facilities. The college shall appoint a project implementation team, collaborate with stakeholders to plan student success programs and curriculum which lead to transferable credit, associate and bachelor's degrees, and other workforce credentials, and train faculty and staff on working with incarcerated populations.(10) $988,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for student enrollment and retention support. Funding is provided for hiring a student advisor and underserved student specialist to provide student support and administrative support for the native pathways program.(11) $142,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of chapter 421, Laws of 2023 (postsecondary student needs).(12) $1,347,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the Shelton promise pilot program.(13) $42,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $42,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for implementation of chapter 272, Laws of 2024 (incarcerated student grants).(14) $50,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for captioning, sign language interpreters, and other accessibility tools and services.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 611. FOR WESTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITYGeneral FundâState Appropriation (FY 2026). . . .$100,730,000General FundâState Appropriation (FY 2027). . . .$101,249,000Western Washington University Capital ProjectsAccountâState Appropriation. . . .$1,790,000Education Legacy Trust AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$13,837,000Workforce Education Investment AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$36,713,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$254,319,000The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) The university must continue work with the education research and data center to demonstrate progress in computer science and engineering enrollments. By September 1st of each year, the university shall provide a report including but not limited to the cost per student, student completion rates, and the number of low-income students enrolled in each program, any process changes or best-practices implemented by the university, and how many students are enrolled in computer science and engineering programs above the prior academic year.(2) $700,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $700,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for the creation and implementation of an early childhood education degree program at the western on the peninsulas campus. The university must collaborate with Olympic college. At full implementation, the university is expected to grant approximately 75 bachelor's degrees in early childhood education per year at the western on the peninsulas campus.(3) $1,306,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $1,306,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for the university to develop a new program in marine, coastal, and watershed sciences.(4) $886,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $886,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for the university to reduce tuition rates for four-year degree programs offered in partnership with Olympic collegeâBremerton, Olympic collegeâPoulsbo, and Peninsula collegeâPort Angeles that are above state-funded resident undergraduate tuition rates.(5) $150,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $150,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely to recruit and retain high quality and diverse graduate students.(6) $548,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $548,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for critical support services to ensure traditionally underrepresented students receive the same opportunities for academic success as their peers.(7) $48,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $48,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for one full-time mental health counselor licensed under chapter 18.225 RCW who has experience and training specifically related to working with active members of the military or military veterans.(8) $530,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $530,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for the operation of two bilingual educator programs in the south King county region, including a bilingual elementary education degree program and a secondary education degree program. At full implementation, each cohort shall support up to 25 students per year.(9) $361,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $361,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for a master of science program in nursing.(10) $433,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $433,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for the registered nurse to bachelors in nursing program.(11) Within amounts appropriated in this section, the university is encouraged to increase the number of tenure-track positions created and hired.(12) $908,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely to establish an academic curriculum in ethnic studies.(13) $400,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for upgrading cyber range equipment and software.(14) $2,520,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for student support services that include resources for outreach and financial aid support, retention initiatives including targeted support for underserved student populations, mental health support, and initiatives aimed at addressing learning disruption due to the global pandemic. The amount provided in this subsection must be used to supplement, not supplant, other funding sources for student support services.(15) $3,632,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the western on the peninsulas expansion. This includes new two plus two degrees programs such as industrial engineering, data science, and sociology.(16) $1,552,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for expanded remedial math and additional English 101 courses, as well as first year seminars, and disability accommodation counselors.(17) $100,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for mental health first aid training for faculty.(18) $150,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the small business development center to increase technical assistance to black, indigenous, and other people of color small business owners in Whatcom county.(19) $1,010,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation is provided to implement a master of social work program at western on the peninsulas.(20) $2,412,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for expansion of bilingual educators education.(21) $1,000,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation is provided for additional student support and outreach at western on the peninsulas.(22) $580,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely to convert the human services program at western on the peninsulas from self-sustaining to state-supported to reduce tuition rates for students in the program.(23) $158,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of chapter 421, Laws of 2023 (postsecondary student needs).(24) $2,612,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely to administer a teacher residency program focused on special education instruction. Amounts provided in this subsection are sufficient to support one cohort of 17 residents per school year, and must be prioritized to communities that are anticipated to be most positively impacted by teacher residents who fill teacher vacancies upon completing the teacher residency program and who remain in the communities in which they are mentored. The teacher residency program must meet the following requirements:(a) Residents receive compensation equivalent to first year paraeducators, as defined in RCW 28A.413.010;(b) Each resident is assigned a preservice mentor;(c) Preservice mentors receive a stipend of $2,500 per year;(d) Residents receive at least 900 hours of preservice clinical practice over the course of the school year;(e) At least half of the residency hours specified in (d) of this subsection are in a coteaching setting with the resident's preservice mentor and the other half of the residency hours are in a coteaching setting with another teacher;(f) Residents may not be assigned the lead or primary responsibility for student learning;(g) Coursework taught during the residency is codesigned by the teacher preparation program and the school district, state-tribal education compact school, or consortium, tightly integrated with residents' preservice clinical practice, and focused on developing culturally responsive teachers; and(h) The program must prepare residents to meet or exceed the knowledge, skills, performance, and competency standards described in RCW 28A.410.270(1).(25) $890,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely to continue the expansion of the undergraduate electrical and computer engineering program.(26) $36,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of chapter 314, Laws of 2023 (college in high school fees).(27) $300,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for planning student studios to assist cities and counties with planning projects.(28) $300,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the university to contract with a nonprofit organization in Kitsap county that performs no-cost cyber monitoring for small local governments using students at qualified colleges and universities as the cyber analysts to continue providing cyber security curriculum to students at postsecondary institutions, giving them operational experience as cyber analysts by protecting rural communities.(29) $55,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the department of urban and environmental planning and policy to conduct a series of projects and studies for Point Roberts, Washington.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 612. FOR THE STUDENT ACHIEVEMENT COUNCILâPOLICY COORDINATION AND ADMINISTRATIONGeneral FundâState Appropriation (FY 2026). . . .$9,565,000General FundâState Appropriation (FY 2027). . . .$8,807,000General FundâFederal Appropriation. . . .$5,055,000Workforce Education Investment AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$7,171,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$30,598,000The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) $126,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $126,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for the consumer protection unit.(2) The student achievement council must ensure that all institutions of higher education as defined in RCW 28B.92.030 and eligible for state financial aid programs under chapters 28B.92 and 28B.118 RCW provide the data needed to analyze and evaluate the effectiveness of state financial aid programs. This data must be promptly transmitted to the education data center so that it is available and easily accessible.(3) $575,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $575,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided to increase the number of high school seniors and college bound scholars that complete the free application for federal student aid and the Washington application for state financial aid through digital engagement tools, expanded training, and increased events for high school students.(4) $850,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $850,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for administrative support services to carry out duties and responsibilities necessary for recipients of the Washington college grant who are enrolled in a state registered apprenticeship program.(5) $179,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $179,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for the complete Washington program.(6) $46,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $46,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for the state of Washington's annual dues to the education commission of the state.(7) $650,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of chapter 421, Laws of 2023 (postsecondary student needs).(8) $1,388,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for distribution to four-year institutions of higher education participating in the students experiencing homelessness program without reduction by the Washington student achievement council, pursuant to chapter 339, Laws of 2023 (student homelessness pilot). Of the amounts included in this subsection, no more than $46,000 per fiscal year is for the administration of the program.(9) $356,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the Washington student achievement council to staff the workforce education investment accountability and oversight board as provided in chapter 282, Laws of 2023 (workforce investment board).(10) $204,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation is provided for students experiencing homelessness program. This funding will allow for the Northwest Indian College to be added to the program as provided in House Bill No. 1540 (homelessness/tribal colleges). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2025, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 613. FOR THE STUDENT ACHIEVEMENT COUNCILâOFFICE OF STUDENT FINANCIAL ASSISTANCEGeneral FundâState Appropriation (FY 2026). . . .$300,013,000General FundâState Appropriation (FY 2027). . . .$299,568,000General FundâFederal Appropriation. . . .$12,342,000General FundâPrivate/Local Appropriation. . . .$300,000Education Legacy Trust AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$85,488,000Washington Opportunity Pathways AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$107,193,000Aerospace Training Student Loan AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$222,000Workforce Education Investment AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$446,507,000Health Professionals Loan Repayment and ScholarshipProgram AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$1,724,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$1,253,357,000The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) $8,034,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $8,035,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for student financial aid payments under the state work study program, including up to four percent administrative allowance for the state work study program.(2) $276,416,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026, $276,416,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027, $458,742,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation, $69,639,000 of the education legacy trust fundâstate appropriation, and $67,654,000 of the Washington opportunity pathways accountâstate appropriation are provided solely for the Washington college grant program as provided in RCW 28B.92.200.(3) Changes made to the state work study program in the 2009-2011 and 2011-2013 fiscal biennia are continued in the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium including maintaining the increased required employer share of wages; adjusted employer match rates; discontinuation of nonresident student eligibility for the program; and revising distribution methods to institutions by taking into consideration other factors such as off-campus job development, historical utilization trends, and student need.(4) $1,165,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026, $1,165,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027, $1,000,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation, $15,849,000 of the education legacy trust accountâstate appropriation, and $39,720,000 of the Washington opportunity pathways accountâstate appropriation are provided solely for the college bound scholarship program and may support scholarships for summer session. The office of student financial assistance and the institutions of higher education shall not consider awards made by the opportunity scholarship program to be state-funded for the purpose of determining the value of an award amount under RCW 28B.118.010.(5) $6,999,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $6,999,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for the passport to college program. The maximum scholarship award is up to $5,000. The council shall contract with a nonprofit organization to provide support services to increase student completion in their postsecondary program and shall, under this contract, provide a minimum of $500,000 in fiscal years 2026 and 2027 for this purpose.(6) $250,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the national guard grant program.(7) $150,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of chapter 369, Laws of 2024 (behav. health scholarship).(8) $2,250,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of chapter 203, Laws of 2024 (Native American apprentices).(9) $200,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of chapter 240, Laws of 2024 (college in the HS fees).(10) Within amounts appropriated in the 2025-27 biennium for the behavioral health loan repayment and conditional scholarship account at least five percent must be dispersed for conditional scholarships. If demand is not met and no eligible applications are submitted for conditional scholarships, then funds may be used for loan repayment.(11) Within amounts appropriated in the 2025-27 biennium for the health professionals loan repayment and scholarship program account at least five percent must be dispersed for conditional scholarships. If demand is not met and no eligible applications are submitted for conditional scholarships, then funds may be used for loan repayment.(12) Within existing resources the council shall collaborate with the University of Washington to maximize skills training for Washington health corps and behavioral health corps conditional scholarship recipients.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 614. FOR THE WORKFORCE TRAINING AND EDUCATION COORDINATING BOARDGeneral FundâState Appropriation (FY 2026). . . .$2,793,000General FundâState Appropriation (FY 2027). . . .$2,415,000General FundâFederal Appropriation. . . .$56,409,000General FundâPrivate/Local Appropriation. . . .$212,000Climate Commitment AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$759,000Workforce Education Investment AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$3,032,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$65,620,000The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) $240,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $240,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for the health workforce council of the state workforce training and education coordinating board. In partnership with the office of the governor, the health workforce council shall continue to assess workforce shortages across behavioral health disciplines and incorporate the recommended action plan completed in 2020.(2) $564,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $564,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely to conduct health workforce surveys, in collaboration with the nursing care quality assurance commission, to collect and analyze data on the long-term care workforce, and to manage a stakeholder process to address retention and career pathways in long-term care facilities.(3) $2,000,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the workforce board to award grants for the purposes of providing apprenticeship, industry certifications and wraparound student supports to workers pursuing job advancement and enhancement through college readiness, apprenticeship, degree, certification, or professional development opportunities in the health care field. Grant recipients must be labor-management partnerships established under section 302 of the labor-management relations act, 29 U.S.C. Sec. 186 that demonstrate adequate funding match and competency in the provision of student supports, or employers who can demonstrate service serving greater than 50 percent medicaid populations who can demonstrate that they will use the grant to join or establish a labor-management partnership dedicated to the purposes of this section. Preference must be given to applications that demonstrate an ability to support students from racially diverse backgrounds, and that are focused on in-demand fields with career ladders to living wage jobs. Grant recipients must use the funds to provide services including, but not limited to, development and implementation of apprenticeship and industry certifications, benefits administration, tuition assistance, counseling and navigation, tutoring and test preparation, instructor/mentor training, materials and technology for students, childcare, and travel costs.(4) The workforce board must report to and coordinate with the department of ecology to track expenditures from climate commitment act accounts, as defined and described in RCW 70A.65.300 and chapter 173-446B WAC.(5) $20,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of chapter 126, Laws of 2023 (nurse supply).(6) $754,000 of the climate commitment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the clean energy technology workforce advisory committee, created in chapter 231, Laws of 2023 (climate-ready communities).(7) $504,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely to support the career bridge platform.(8) $20,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for reasonable accommodation requests.(9) $21,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Senate Bill No. 5189 (competency-based education). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2025, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 615. FOR THE STATE SCHOOL FOR THE BLINDGeneral FundâState Appropriation (FY 2026). . . .$11,462,000General FundâState Appropriation (FY 2027). . . .$11,551,000General FundâPrivate/Local Appropriation. . . .$34,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$23,047,000The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: Funding provided in this section is sufficient for the school to offer to students enrolled in grades six through twelve for full-time instructional services at the Vancouver campus or online with the opportunity to participate in a minimum of 1,080 hours of instruction and the opportunity to earn 24 high school credits.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 616. FOR THE WASHINGTON CENTER FOR DEAF AND HARD OF HEARING YOUTHGeneral FundâState Appropriation (FY 2026). . . .$19,190,000General FundâState Appropriation (FY 2027). . . .$19,329,000General FundâPrivate/Local Appropriation. . . .$4,119,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$42,638,000The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: Funding provided in this section is sufficient for the center to offer students ages three through 21 enrolled at the center the opportunity to participate in a minimum of 1,080 hours of instruction and the opportunity to earn 24 high school credits.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 617. FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE ARTS COMMISSIONGeneral FundâState Appropriation (FY 2026). . . .$6,585,000General FundâState Appropriation (FY 2027). . . .$6,011,000General FundâFederal Appropriation. . . .$2,854,000General FundâPrivate/Local Appropriation. . . .$184,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$15,634,000The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) $79,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $79,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for the creative districts program.(2) $868,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $867,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for the establishment of a tribal cultural affairs program. Of the amounts provided in this subsection, $500,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $500,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for grants to support tribal cultural, arts, and creative programs.(3) $708,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 is provided solely for implementation of chapter 387, Laws of 2023 (Billy Frank Jr. statue).NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 618. FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE HISTORICAL SOCIETYGeneral FundâState Appropriation (FY 2026). . . .$5,535,000General FundâState Appropriation (FY 2027). . . .$5,565,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$11,100,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 619. FOR THE EASTERN WASHINGTON STATE HISTORICAL SOCIETYGeneral FundâState Appropriation (FY 2026). . . .$4,705,000General FundâState Appropriation (FY 2027). . . .$4,667,000Local Museum AccountâEastern Washington StateHistorical SocietyâPrivate/Local Appropriation. . . .$229,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$9,601,000The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: $119,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $119,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided solely for a museum art curator.(End of part)PART VIISPECIAL APPROPRIATIONSNEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 701. FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENTâINFORMATION TECHNOLOGY INVESTMENT POOLGeneral FundâState Appropriation (FY 2026). . . .$12,049,000General FundâState Appropriation (FY 2027). . . .$6,242,000State Treasurer's Service AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$260,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$18,551,000The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) The appropriations are provided solely for expenditure into the information technology investment revolving account created in RCW 43.41.433. Amounts in the account are provided solely for the information technology projects shown in LEAP omnibus document IT-2025, dated April 26, 2025, which is hereby incorporated by reference. To facilitate the transfer of moneys from other funds and accounts that are associated with projects contained in LEAP omnibus document IT-2025, dated April 26, 2025, the state treasurer is directed to transfer moneys from other funds and accounts to the information technology investment revolving account in accordance with schedules provided by the office of financial management. Restricted federal funds may be transferred only to the extent permitted by law, and will otherwise remain outside the information technology investment account. The projects affected remain subject to the other provisions of this section.(2) Agencies must apply to Washington technology solutions for certification and release of funding for each gate of the project. When Washington technology solutions certifies the key deliverables of the gate have been met, a current technology budget is approved and includes updated milestone deliverables with start dates and estimated completion dates for each deliverable through each stage of the entire project investment through project implementation and close out; and if applicable to the stage or gate of the project, that the project is putting functioning software into production that addresses user needs, is in compliance with the quality assurance plan, and meets a defined set of industry best practices for code quality that Washington technology solutions will post to their website by July 1, 2025, it must notify the office of financial management and the fiscal committees of the legislature. The office of financial management may not approve funding for the certified project gate any earlier than 10 business days from the date of notification to the fiscal committees of the legislature.(3)(a) Allocations and allotments of information technology investment revolving account must be made for discrete stages of projects as determined by the technology budget approved by Washington technology solutions and the office of financial management.(b) Fifteen percent of total funding allocated by the office of financial management, or another amount as defined jointly by the office of financial management and Washington technology solutions, will be retained in the account, but remain allocated to that project. The retained funding will be released to the agency only after successful completion of that stage of the project and only after Washington technology solutions certifies the stage as required in subsection (2) of this section. For the one Washington project, the amount retained is increased to at least 20 percent of total funding allocated for any stage of that project. If there is no significant risk to the project, the holdback does not apply to the final gate during a biennial close.(4)(a) Each project must have a technology budget. The technology budget must have the detail by fiscal month for the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium. The technology budget must use a method similar to the state capital budget, identifying project costs, each fund source, and anticipated deliverables through each stage of the entire project investment and across fiscal periods and biennia from project onset through implementation and close out, as well as at least five years of maintenance and operations costs.(b) As part of the development of a technology budget, as key milestone deliverables change that impact scope, schedule, or budget, and at each request for funding, the agency shall submit an updated technology budget, if changes occurred, to include detailed financial information to the office of financial management and Washington technology solutions. The technology budget must describe the total cost of the project, as well as maintenance and operations costs, to include and identify at least:(i) Fund sources:(A) If the project is funded from the information technology revolving account, the technology budget must include a worksheet that provides the fund sources that were transferred into the account by fiscal year;(B) If the project managed is by a central service agency, and funds are driven out by the central service model, the technology budget must provide a statewide impact by agency by fund as a worksheet in the technology budget file;(ii) Full time equivalent staffing level to include job classification assumptions. This is to assure that the project has adequate state staffing and agency support to ensure success, ensure user acceptance, and adequately test the functionality being delivered in each sprint before it is accepted by the agency's contracting officer or their representative. Key project functions that are deemed "critical" must be retained by state personnel and not outsourced, to ensure that knowledge is retained within state government and that the state can self-sufficiently support the system and make improvements without long-term dependence on a vendor;(iii) Discrete financial budget codes to include at least the appropriation index and program index. If the subproject or project is appropriated funding at more than one agency, as is done with the statewide electronic health records solution where federal funding is appropriated to the health care authority, then:(A) The project technology budget and each impacted agency that receives appropriated funding must use the same program index across each agency;(B) Each appropriation index from each impacted agency must be identified on the technology budget input page; and(C) The technology budget must be compiled in the lead agency technology budget only, referencing any differences in appropriation index, as described in (b)(iii)(B) of this subsection;(iv) Object and subobject codes of expenditures;(v) Anticipated deliverables that must include a start date and estimated completion date for each deliverable to include, but not limited to, requests for proposals release dates, go-live dates, and software demonstration dates;(vi) Historical budget and expenditure detail by fiscal year; and(vii) Maintenance and operations costs by fiscal year for at least five years as a separate worksheet.(c) If a project technology budget changes and once a revised technology budget is completed, a comparison of the revised technology budget to the last approved technology budget must be posted to the dashboard, to include a narrative rationale on what changed, why, and how the changes impact the project scope, budget, and schedule.(5)(a) Each project must have a project charter. The charter must include:(i) An organizational chart of the project management team that identifies team members and their roles and responsibilities, and shows that the project is adequately staffed by state personnel in key functions to ensure success;(ii) The Washington technology solutions staff assigned to the project;(iii) A project roadmap that includes the problems the team is solving and the sequence in which the team intends to take on those problems, updated periodically to reflect what has been learned;(iv) Metrics to support the project strategy and vision, to determine that the project is incrementally meeting user needs;(v) An implementation schedule covering activities, critical milestones, and deliverables at each stage of the project for the life of the project at each agency affected by the project;(vi) Performance measures used to determine that the project is on time, within budget, and meeting expectations for quality of work product;(vii) Ongoing maintenance and operations cost of the project post implementation and close out delineated by agency staffing, contracted staffing, and service level agreements; and(viii) Financial budget coding to include at least discrete financial coding for the project.(b) If required by Washington technology solutions, a project may also need to have an investment plan. Washington technology solutions must:(i) Base the requirement of an agency needing to have an investment plan on the complexity and risk of the project;(ii) Establish requirements by project risk level in statewide technology policy, and publish the requirements by September 30, 2025; and(iii) In collaboration with the department of enterprise services, define the circumstances under which the vendor will be terminated or replaced and establish the process by which the agency will transition to a new vendor with a minimal reduction in project productivity.(6)(a) Projects with estimated costs greater than $100,000,000 from initiation to completion and implementation may be divided into discrete subprojects as determined by Washington technology solutions, except for the one Washington project which must be divided into the following discrete subprojects: Core financials, expanding financials and procurement, budget, and human resources. Each subproject must have a technology budget as provided in this section.(b) If the project affects more than one agency:(i) A separate technology budget and investment plan must be prepared by each agency; and(ii) There must be a budget roll up that includes each affected agency at the subproject level.(7) Washington technology solutions shall maintain a statewide information technology project dashboard that provides updated information each fiscal month on projects subject to this section. The statewide dashboard must meet the requirements in section 156 of this act.(8) For any project that exceeds $2,000,000 in total funds to complete, requires more than one biennium to complete, or is financed through financial contracts, bonds, or other indebtedness:(a) Independent quality assurance services for the project must report independently to Washington technology solutions;(b) Washington technology solutions, based on project risk assessments, may require additional quality assurance services and independent verification and validation services;(c) Washington technology solutions must review, and, if necessary, revise the proposed project to ensure it is flexible and adaptable to advances in technology;(d) The technology budget must specifically identify the uses of any financing proceeds. No more than thirty percent of the financing proceeds may be used for payroll-related costs for state employees assigned to project management, installation, testing, or training;(e) The agency must consult with the office of the state treasurer during the competitive procurement process to evaluate early in the process whether products and services to be solicited and the responsive bids from a solicitation may be financed;(f) The agency must consult with the contracting division of the department of enterprise services for a review of all contracts and agreements related to the project's information technology procurements;(g) The agency and project must use an agile development model holding live demonstrations of functioning software, developed using incremental user research, held at the end of every two-week sprint, except for:(i) Hardware or infrastructure projects; and(ii) Projects that have implemented all phases and are now in maintenance and operations;(h) The project solution must be capable of being continually updated, as necessary; and(i) The agency and project must deploy usable functionality into production for users within 180 days from the date of an executed procurement contract in response to a competitive request for proposal.(9) Washington technology solutions must evaluate the project at each stage and certify whether the project is putting functioning software into production that addresses user needs, is projected to be completed within budget, is in compliance with the quality assurance plan, and meets a defined set of industry best practices for code quality, and whether the project is planned, managed, meeting deliverable targets as defined in the project's approved technology budget and investment plan, and that the current technology budget reflects updated scope, schedule, and budget to include updated milestone deliverables with start dates and estimated completion dates through each stage of the entire project investment through project implementation and close out.(10) Washington technology solutions may suspend or terminate a project at any time if it determines that the project is not meeting or not expected to meet anticipated performance and technology outcomes. Once suspension or termination occurs, the agency shall unallot any unused funding and shall not make any expenditure for the project without the approval of the office of financial management. Washington technology solutions must report on December 1 each calendar year any suspension or termination of a project in the previous 12-month period to the legislative fiscal committees.(11) Washington technology solutions, in consultation with the office of financial management, may identify additional projects to be subject to this section, including projects that are not separately identified within an agency budget. Washington technology solutions must report on December 1 each calendar year any additional projects to be subjected to this section that were identified in the previous 12-month period to the legislative fiscal committees.(12) Any cost to administer or implement this section for projects listed in subsection (1) of this section, must be paid from the information technology investment revolving account. For any other information technology project subject to the conditions, limitations, and review of this section, the cost to implement this section must be paid from the funds for that project.(13) The following information technology projects are subject to the conditions, limitations, and review of this section: The resident portal of the Washington technology solutions agency.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 702. FOR THE STATE TREASURERâBOND RETIREMENT AND INTEREST, AND ONGOING BOND REGISTRATION AND TRANSFER CHARGES: FOR DEBT SUBJECT TO THE DEBT LIMITGeneral FundâState Appropriation (FY 2026). . . .$1,547,070,000General FundâState Appropriation (FY 2027). . . .$1,701,995,000State Building Construction AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$11,174,000Watershed Restoration and Enhancement Bond AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$84,000State Taxable Building Construction AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$293,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$3,260,616,000The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The general fund appropriations are for expenditure into the debt-limit general fund bond retirement account.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 703. FOR THE STATE TREASURERâBOND RETIREMENT AND INTEREST, AND ONGOING BOND REGISTRATION AND TRANSFER CHARGES: FOR GENERAL OBLIGATION DEBT TO BE REIMBURSED AS PRESCRIBED BY STATUTENondebt-Limit Reimbursable Bond Retirement AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$38,244,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$38,244,000The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The general fund appropriation is for expenditure into the nondebt limit general fund bond retirement account.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 704. FOR THE STATE TREASURERâBOND RETIREMENT AND INTEREST, AND ONGOING BOND REGISTRATION AND TRANSFER CHARGES: FOR BOND SALE EXPENSESGeneral FundâState Appropriation (FY 2026). . . .$1,400,000General FundâState Appropriation (FY 2027). . . .$1,400,000State Building Construction AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$4,567,000Watershed Restoration and Enhancement Bond AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$38,000State Taxable Building Construction AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$92,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$7,497,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 705. FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENTâGOVERNOR'S EMERGENCY FUNDINGGeneral FundâState Appropriation (FY 2026). . . .$3,500,000General FundâState Appropriation (FY 2027). . . .$3,500,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$7,000,000The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) $1,000,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $1,000,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided for the critically necessary work of any state agency in the event of an emergent or unforeseen circumstance. Prior to the allocation of funding from this subsection (1), the requesting agency and the office of financial management must comply with the provisions of RCW 43.88.250.(2) $2,500,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and $2,500,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2027 are provided for individual assistance consistent with RCW 38.52.030(9) during an emergency proclaimed by the governor, as defined in RCW 38.52.010. The office of financial management must notify the fiscal committees of the legislature of the receipt by the governor or adjutant general of each application, request, or allocation for individual assistance from the amounts provided in this subsection (2).NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 706. FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENTâEDUCATION TECHNOLOGY REVOLVING ACCOUNTGeneral FundâState Appropriation (FY 2026). . . .$9,000,000General FundâState Appropriation (FY 2027). . . .$9,000,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$18,000,000The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriations are provided solely for expenditure into the education technology revolving account for the purpose of covering ongoing operational and equipment replacement costs incurred by the K-20 educational network program in providing telecommunication services to network participants.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 707. FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENTâO'BRIEN BUILDING IMPROVEMENTGeneral FundâState Appropriation (FY 2026). . . .$2,578,000General FundâState Appropriation (FY 2027). . . .$2,578,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$5,156,000The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriations are provided solely for expenditure into the enterprise services account for payment of principal, interest, and financing expenses associated with the certificate of participation for the O'Brien building improvement, project number 20081007.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 708. FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENTâCHERBERG BUILDING REHABILITATIONGeneral FundâState Appropriation (FY 2026). . . .$552,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$552,000The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriation is provided solely for expenditure into the enterprise services account for payment of principal, interest, and financing expenses associated with the certificate of participation for the Cherberg building improvements, project number 2002-1-005.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 709. FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENTâSTATE HEALTH CARE AFFORDABILITY ACCOUNTGeneral FundâState Appropriation (FY 2026). . . .$55,000,000General FundâState Appropriation (FY 2027). . . .$30,000,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$85,000,000The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriations are provided solely for expenditure into the state health care affordability account created in RCW 43.71.130.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 710. FOR THE STATE TREASURERâCOUNTY PUBLIC HEALTH ASSISTANCEGeneral FundâState Appropriation (FY 2026). . . .$36,386,000General FundâState Appropriation (FY 2027). . . .$36,386,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$72,772,000The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The state treasurer shall distribute the appropriations to the following counties and health districts in the amounts designated to support public health services, including public health nursing:Health DistrictFY 2026FY 20272025-2027 BienniumAdams County Integrated Health Care Services$121,213$121,213$242,426Asotin County Health District$159,890$159,890$319,780Benton-Franklin Health District$1,614,337$1,614,337$3,228,674Chelan-Douglas Health District$399,634$399,634$799,268Clallam County Health and Human Services Department$291,401$291,401$582,802Clark County Public Health$1,767,341$1,767,341$3,534,682Skamania County Community Health$111,327$111,327$222,654Columbia County Health District$119,991$119,991$239,982Cowlitz County Health and Human Services$477,981$477,981$955,962Garfield County Health District$93,154$93,154$186,308Grant County Health District$297,761$297,761$595,522Grays Harbor Public Health and Social Services$335,666$335,666$671,332Island County Health Department$255,224$255,224$510,448Jefferson County Public Health$184,080$184,080$368,160Public Health - Seattle & King County$12,685,521$12,685,521$25,371,042Kitsap Public Health District$997,476$997,476$1,994,952Kittitas County Public Health$198,979$198,979$397,958Klickitat County Public Health$153,784$153,784$307,568Lewis County Public Health and Social Services$263,134$263,134$526,268Lincoln County Health Department$113,917$113,917$227,834Mason County Public Health and Human Services$227,448$227,448$454,896Okanogan County Public Health$169,882$169,882$339,764Pacific County Health and Human Services$169,075$169,075$338,150Tacoma-Pierce County Health Department$4,143,169$4,143,169$8,286,338San Juan County Health and Community Services$126,569$126,569$253,138Skagit County Health Department$449,745$449,745$899,490Snohomish Health District$3,433,291$3,433,291$6,866,582Spokane Regional Health District$2,877,318$2,877,318$5,754,636Northeast Tri-County Health District$249,303$249,303$498,606Thurston County Public Health and Social Services$1,046,897$1,046,897$2,093,794Wahkiakum County Health and Human Services$93,181$93,181$186,362Walla Walla County Department of Community Health$302,173$302,173$604,346Whatcom County Health Department$1,214,301$1,214,301$2,428,602Whitman County Health Department$189,355$189,355$378,710Yakima Health District$1,052,482$1,052,482$2,104,964TOTAL APPROPRIATIONS$36,386,000$36,386,000$72,772,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 711. FOR THE STATE TREASURERâCOUNTY CLERK LEGAL FINANCIAL OBLIGATION GRANTSGeneral FundâState Appropriation (FY 2026). . . .$1,000,000General FundâState Appropriation (FY 2027). . . .$800,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$1,800,000The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: By October 1st of each fiscal year, the state treasurer shall distribute the appropriations to the following county clerk offices in the amounts designated as grants for the collection of legal financial obligations pursuant to RCW 2.56.190:County ClerkFY 2026FY 2027Adams County Clerk$3,887$3,109Asotin County Clerk$5,425$4,339Benton County Clerk$33,699$26,953Chelan County Clerk$13,677$10,939Clallam County Clerk$10,780$8,622Clark County Clerk$60,323$48,249Columbia County Clerk$710$568Cowlitz County Clerk$31,281$25,020Douglas County Clerk$5,604$4,483Ferry County Clerk$780$624Franklin County Clerk$10,140$8,111Garfield County Clerk$449$359Grant County Clerk$18,682$14,942Grays Harbor County Clerk$16,006$12,802Island County Clerk$5,654$4,523Jefferson County Clerk$3,436$2,748King County Court Clerk$220,499$176,446Kitsap County Clerk$41,113$32,883Kittitas County Clerk$6,564$5,250Klickitat County Clerk$3,976$3,180Lewis County Clerk$19,113$15,287Lincoln County Clerk$1,338$1,070Mason County Clerk$9,512$7,608Okanogan County Clerk$7,353$5,881Pacific County Clerk$4,457$3,565Pend Oreille County Clerk$1,129$903Pierce County Clerk$142,518$113,990San Juan County Clerk$1,118$894Skagit County Clerk$20,442$16,350Skamania County Clerk$2,128$1,702Snohomish County Clerk$70,505$56,392Spokane County Clerk$82,856$66,355Stevens County Clerk$5,516$4,412Thurston County Clerk$41,043$32,827Wahkiakum County Clerk$739$591Walla Walla County Clerk$9,121$7,296Whatcom County Clerk$38,314$30,645Whitman County Clerk$3,786$3,028Yakima County Clerk$46,327$37,054TOTAL APPROPRIATIONS$1,000,000$800,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 712. BELATED CLAIMSThe agencies and institutions of the state may expend moneys appropriated in this act, upon approval of the office of financial management, for the payment of supplies and services furnished to the agency or institution in prior fiscal biennia.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 713. FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENTâFOUNDATIONAL PUBLIC HEALTH SERVICESGeneral FundâState Appropriation (FY 2026). . . .$129,091,000General FundâState Appropriation (FY 2027). . . .$129,091,000Foundational Public Health Services AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$42,048,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$300,230,000The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriations are provided solely for distribution as provided in RCW 43.70.515.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 714. FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENTâANDY HILL CANCER RESEARCH ENDOWMENT FUND MATCH TRANSFER ACCOUNTGeneral FundâState Appropriation (FY 2026). . . .$945,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$945,000The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriation is provided solely for expenditure into the Andy Hill cancer research endowment fund match transfer account per RCW 43.348.080 to fund the Andy Hill cancer research endowment program. Matching funds using the amounts appropriated in this section may not be used to fund new grants that exceed two years in duration.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 715. FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENTâNORTHEAST WASHINGTON WOLF-LIVESTOCK MANAGEMENT ACCOUNTGeneral FundâState Appropriation (FY 2026). . . .$456,000General FundâState Appropriation (FY 2027). . . .$456,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$912,000The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriations are provided solely for expenditure into the northeast Washington wolf-livestock management account for the deployment of nonlethal wolf deterrence resources as provided in chapter 16.76 RCW.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 716. FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENTâCOUNTY CRIMINAL JUSTICE ASSISTANCE ACCOUNT: JUVENILE CODE REVISIONSGeneral FundâState Appropriation (FY 2026). . . .$331,000General FundâState Appropriation (FY 2027). . . .$331,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$662,000The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriations are provided solely for expenditure into the county criminal justice assistance account for costs to the criminal justice system associated with the implementation of chapter 338, Laws of 1997 (juvenile code revisions). The amounts provided in this subsection are intended to provide funding for county adult court costs associated with the implementation of chapter 338, Laws of 1997 and shall be distributed in accordance with RCW 82.14.310.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 717. FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENTâCOUNTY CRIMINAL JUSTICE ASSISTANCE ACCOUNT: REPEAT OFFENDERSGeneral FundâState Appropriation (FY 2026). . . .$226,000General FundâState Appropriation (FY 2027). . . .$226,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$452,000The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriations, or so much thereof as may be necessary, are provided solely for expenditure into the county criminal justice assistance account. The treasurer shall make quarterly distributions from the county criminal justice assistance account of the amounts provided in this section in accordance with RCW 82.14.310 for the purposes of reimbursing local jurisdictions for increased costs incurred as a result of the mandatory arrest of repeat offenders pursuant to chapter 35, Laws of 2013 2nd sp. sess. The appropriations and distributions made under this section constitute appropriate reimbursement for costs for any new programs or increased level of services for the purposes of RCW 43.135.060.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 718. FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENTâMUNICIPAL CRIMINAL JUSTICE ASSISTANCE ACCOUNT: REPEAT OFFENDERSGeneral FundâState Appropriation (FY 2026). . . .$133,000General FundâState Appropriation (FY 2027). . . .$133,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$266,000The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriations, or so much thereof as may be necessary, are appropriated for expenditure into the municipal criminal justice assistance account. The treasurer shall make quarterly distributions from the municipal criminal justice assistance account of the amounts provided in this section in accordance with RCW 82.14.320 and 82.14.330, for the purposes of reimbursing local jurisdictions for increased costs incurred as a result of the mandatory arrest of repeat offenders pursuant to chapter 35, Laws of 2013 2nd sp. sess. The appropriations and distributions made under this section constitute appropriate reimbursement for costs for any new programs or increased level of services for the purposes of RCW 43.135.060.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 719. FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENTâINDIAN HEALTH IMPROVEMENT REINVESTMENT ACCOUNTGeneral FundâState Appropriation (FY 2026). . . .$8,208,000General FundâState Appropriation (FY 2027). . . .$708,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$8,916,000The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriations are provided solely for expenditure into the Indian health improvement reinvestment account created in RCW 43.71B.040.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 720. FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENTâWASHINGTON INTERNET CRIMES AGAINST CHILDREN ACCOUNTGeneral FundâState Appropriation (FY 2026). . . .$1,135,000General FundâState Appropriation (FY 2027). . . .$1,135,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$2,270,000The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriations are provided solely for expenditure into the Washington internet crimes against children account created in RCW 43.101.435.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 721. FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENTâLANDLORD MITIGATION PROGRAM ACCOUNTGeneral FundâState Appropriation (FY 2026). . . .$2,883,000General FundâState Appropriation (FY 2027). . . .$2,883,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$5,766,000The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriation is provided solely for expenditure into the landlord mitigation program account created in RCW 43.31.615 for costs to reimburse anticipated claims made under the landlord damage relief program, the landlord survivor relief program, and the tenancy preservation program as authorized in RCW 43.31.605.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 722. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF RETIREMENT SYSTEMSâCONTRIBUTIONS TO RETIREMENT SYSTEMS(1) The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriations for the law enforcement officers' and firefighters' retirement system shall be made on a monthly basis consistent with chapter 41.45 RCW, and the appropriations for the judges and judicial retirement systems shall be made on a quarterly basis consistent with chapters 2.10 and 2.12 RCW.(2) There is appropriated for state contributions to the law enforcement officers' and firefighters' retirement system:General FundâState Appropriation (FY 2026). . . .$102,000,000General FundâState Appropriation (FY 2027). . . .$106,300,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$208,300,000(3) There is appropriated for contributions to the judicial retirement system:General FundâState Appropriation (FY 2026). . . .$4,900,000General FundâState Appropriation (FY 2027). . . .$4,600,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$9,500,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 723. FOR THE BOARD FOR VOLUNTEER FIREFIGHTERS AND RESERVE OFFICERSâCONTRIBUTIONS TO RETIREMENT SYSTEMSThere is appropriated for state contributions to the volunteer firefighters' and reserve officers' relief and pension principal fund:Volunteer Firefighters' and Reserve Officers'Administrative AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$25,548,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$25,548,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 724. FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENTâBEHAVIORAL HEALTH LOAN REPAYMENT PROGRAM ACCOUNTGeneral FundâState Appropriation (FY 2026). . . .$1,000,000General FundâState Appropriation (FY 2027). . . .$1,000,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$2,000,000The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriations are provided solely for expenditure into the behavioral health loan repayment program account created in RCW 28B.115.135.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 725. FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENTâHEALTH PROFESSIONALS LOAN REPAYMENT AND SCHOLARSHIP PROGRAM ACCOUNTGeneral FundâState Appropriation (FY 2026). . . .$2,500,000General FundâState Appropriation (FY 2027). . . .$2,500,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$5,000,000The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) The appropriations are provided solely for expenditure into the health professionals loan repayment and scholarship program account created in RCW 28B.115.130.(2) These amounts must be used to increase the number of licensed primary care health professionals to serve in licensed primary care health professional critical shortage areas. Contracts between the office of student financial assistance and program recipients must guarantee at least three years of conditional loan repayments. The office of student financial assistance and the department of health shall prioritize a portion of any nonfederal balances in the health professional loan repayment and scholarship fund for conditional loan repayment contracts with psychiatrists and with advanced registered nurse practitioners for work at one of the state-operated psychiatric hospitals. The office and department shall designate the state hospitals as health professional shortage areas if necessary for this purpose. The office shall coordinate with the department of social and health services to effectively incorporate three conditional loan repayments into the department's advanced psychiatric professional recruitment and retention strategies. The office may use these targeted amounts for other program participants should there be any remaining amounts after eligible psychiatrists and advanced registered nurse practitioners have been served. The office shall also work to prioritize loan repayments to professionals working at health care delivery sites that demonstrate a commitment to serving uninsured clients. It is the intent of the legislature to provide funding to maintain the current number and amount of awards for the program in the 2027-2029 fiscal biennium on the basis of these contractual obligations.(3) Funding may be used for the forensic pathologist loan repayment program established in RCW 28B.115.030.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 726. FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENTâRURAL JOBS PROGRAM MATCH TRANSFER ACCOUNTWorkforce Education Investment AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$400,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$400,000The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriations are provided solely for expenditure into the rural jobs program match transfer account created in RCW 28B.145.120.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 727. FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENTâOPPORTUNITY SCHOLARSHIP MATCH TRANSFER ACCOUNTWorkforce Education Investment AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$11,471,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$11,471,000The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriations are provided solely for expenditure into the opportunity scholarship match transfer account created in RCW 28B.145.050.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 728. FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENTâEDUCATOR CONDITIONAL SCHOLARSHIP PROGRAMWorkforce Education Investment AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$2,000,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$2,000,000The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriation is provided solely for expenditure into the educator conditional scholarship account created in RCW 28B.102.080 for the teacher shortage conditional grant program.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 729. FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENTâHOME VISITING SERVICES ACCOUNTGeneral FundâState Appropriation (FY 2026). . . .$12,847,000General FundâState Appropriation (FY 2027). . . .$12,847,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$25,694,000The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriations are provided solely for expenditure into the home visiting services account created in RCW 43.216.130 for the home visiting program.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 730. FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENTâAFFORDABLE HOUSING FOR ALL ACCOUNTGeneral FundâState Appropriation (FY 2026). . . .$18,500,000General FundâState Appropriation (FY 2027). . . .$22,166,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$40,666,000The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriations are provided solely for expenditure into the affordable housing for all account created in RCW 43.185C.190 for operations, maintenance, and services for permanent supportive housing as defined in RCW 36.70A.030.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 731. FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENTâJUDICIAL INFORMATIONS SYSTEM ACCOUNTGeneral FundâState Appropriation (FY 2026). . . .$10,000,000General FundâState Appropriation (FY 2027). . . .$10,000,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$20,000,000The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriations are provided solely for expenditure into the judicial information systems account created in RCW 2.68.020.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 732. FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENTâWASHINGTON STATE LEADERSHIP BOARD ACCOUNTGeneral FundâState Appropriation (FY 2026). . . .$743,000General FundâState Appropriation (FY 2027). . . .$820,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$1,563,000The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriations are provided solely for expenditure into the Washington state leadership board account created in RCW 43.388.020.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 733. FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENTâCRIME VICTIM AND WITNESS ASSISTANCE ACCOUNTGeneral FundâState Appropriation (FY 2026). . . .$2,000,000General FundâState Appropriation (FY 2027). . . .$2,000,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$4,000,000The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriations are provided solely for expenditure into the state crime victim and witness assistance account created in RCW 7.68.047.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 734. FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENTâDNA DATABASE ACCOUNTGeneral FundâState Appropriation (FY 2026). . . .$482,000General FundâState Appropriation (FY 2027). . . .$482,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$964,000The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriations are provided solely for expenditure into the state DNA database account created in RCW 43.43.7532.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 735. FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENTâHEALTH PROFESSIONS ACCOUNTOpioid Abatement Settlement AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$1,486,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$1,486,000The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriation is provided solely for expenditure into the health professions account created in RCW 43.70.320 to implement chapter 366, Laws of 2024 (substance use treatment).NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 736. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCEâCOMMUNITY REINVESTMENT ACCOUNTGeneral FundâState Appropriation (FY 2026). . . .$25,000,000General FundâState Appropriation (FY 2027). . . .$25,000,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$50,000,000The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriations are provided solely for expenditure into the community reinvestment account created in RCW 43.79.567.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 737. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ENTERPRISE SERVICESâPRESCRIBED FIRE CLAIMS ACCOUNTNatural Climate Solutions AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$2,000,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$2,000,000The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriation is provided solely for expenditure into the prescribed fire claims account created in Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 1563 (prescribed fire claims). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2025, the amount provided in this section shall lapse.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 738. FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENTâOUTDOOR EDUCATION AND RECREATION PROGRAM ACCOUNTGeneral FundâState Appropriation (FY 2026). . . .$563,000General FundâState Appropriation (FY 2027). . . .$563,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$1,126,000The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriations are provided solely for expenditure into the outdoor education and recreation program account for the purposes identified in RCW 79A.05.351.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 739. FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE PATROLâSTATE FIREARMS BACKGROUND CHECK SYSTEM ACCOUNTGeneral FundâState Appropriation (FY 2027). . . .$8,728,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$8,728,000The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriation is provided solely for expenditure into the state firearms background check system account pursuant to Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 1163 (firearm purchase) for the initial establishment of the permit to purchase firearms program. If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2025, the amount provided in this section shall lapse.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 740. FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENTâEXTRAORDINARY CRIMINAL JUSTICE COSTSGeneral FundâState Appropriation (FY 2026). . . .$300,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$300,000The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The director of financial management shall distribute $300,000 to Kitsap county for extraordinary criminal justice costs pursuant to RCW 43.330.190.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 741. FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENTâPERSONNEL SERVICES FEE RATE REDUCTIONGeneral FundâState Appropriation (FY 2026). . . .($839,000)General FundâState Appropriation (FY 2027). . . .($839,000)TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .($1,678,000)The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriations in this section reflect a reduction in the amount charged to the operations appropriations of each agency pursuant to RCW 41.06.280. The office of financial management shall adjust allotments to agencies as necessary to achieve this reduction.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 742. FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENTâSUPPLEMENTAL CRIMINAL JUSTICE ACCOUNTGeneral FundâState Appropriation (FY 2026). . . .$100,000,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$100,000,000The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriation is provided solely for expenditures into the supplemental criminal justice account created in Engrossed Substitute House Bill No. 2015 (public safety funding). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2025, the amount provided in this section shall lapse.(End of part)PART VIIIOTHER TRANSFERS AND APPROPRIATIONSNEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 801. FOR THE STATE TREASURERâSTATE REVENUES FOR DISTRIBUTIONGeneral Fund Appropriation for fire insurancepremium distributions. . . .$16,905,000General Fund Appropriation for prosecuting attorneydistributions. . . .$9,778,000General Fund Appropriation for boating safety andeducation distributions. . . .$3,230,000General Fund Appropriation for public utilitydistrict excise tax distributions. . . .$72,286,000Death Investigations Account Appropriation fordistribution to counties for publicly fundedautopsies. . . .$6,329,000Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account Appropriation forharbor improvement revenue distributions. . . .$150,000Timber Tax Distribution Account Appropriation fordistribution to "timber" counties. . . .$81,852,000County Criminal Justice Assistance Appropriation. . . .$152,169,000Municipal Criminal Justice Assistance Appropriation. . . .$60,343,000City-County Assistance Appropriation. . . .$43,751,000Liquor Excise Tax Account Appropriation for liquorexcise tax distribution. . . .$87,960,000Columbia River Water Delivery Account Appropriationfor the Confederated Tribes of the ColvilleReservation. . . .$10,140,000Columbia River Water Delivery Account Appropriationfor the Spokane Tribe of Indians. . . .$7,489,000Liquor Revolving Account Appropriation for liquorprofits distribution. . . .$98,876,000General Fund Appropriation for other taxdistributions. . . .$104,000Dedicated Cannabis Account Appropriation forCannabis Excise Tax distributions pursuant tochapter 169, Laws of 2022 (cannabis revenue). . . .$44,177,000General Fund Appropriation for Habitat ConservationProgram distributions. . . .$3,596,000General Fund Appropriation for payment in lieu oftaxes to counties under Department of Fish andWildlife Program. . . .$3,882,000Puget Sound Taxpayer Accountability AccountAppropriation for distribution to counties inamounts not to exceed actual deposits into theaccount and attributable to those counties'share pursuant to RCW 43.79.520. . . .$25,430,000Manufacturing and Warehousing Job Centers AccountAppropriation for distribution to local taxingjurisdictions to mitigate the unintendedrevenue redistributions effect of sourcing lawchanges pursuant to chapter 83, Laws of 2021(warehousing & manufacturing jobs). . . .$2,770,000State Crime Victim and Witness Assistance AccountAppropriation for distribution to counties. . . .$4,000,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$735,217,000The total expenditures from the state treasury under the appropriations in this section shall not exceed the funds available under statutory distributions for the stated purposes.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 802. FOR THE STATE TREASURERâFOR THE COUNTY CRIMINAL JUSTICE ASSISTANCE ACCOUNTImpaired Driving Safety Appropriation. . . .$1,860,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$1,860,000The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The amount appropriated in this section shall be distributed quarterly during the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium in accordance with RCW 82.14.310. This funding is provided to counties for the costs of implementing criminal justice legislation including, but not limited to: Chapter 206, Laws of 1998 (drunk driving penalties); chapter 207, Laws of 1998 (DUI penalties); chapter 208, Laws of 1998 (deferred prosecution); chapter 209, Laws of 1998 (DUI/license suspension); chapter 210, Laws of 1998 (ignition interlock violations); chapter 211, Laws of 1998 (DUI penalties); chapter 212, Laws of 1998 (DUI penalties); chapter 213, Laws of 1998 (intoxication levels lowered); chapter 214, Laws of 1998 (DUI penalties); and chapter 215, Laws of 1998 (DUI provisions).NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 803. FOR THE STATE TREASURERâMUNICIPAL CRIMINAL JUSTICE ASSISTANCE ACCOUNTImpaired Driving Safety Appropriation. . . .$1,240,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$1,240,000The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The amount appropriated in this section shall be distributed quarterly during the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium to all cities ratably based on population as last determined by the office of financial management. The distributions to any city that substantially decriminalizes or repeals its criminal code after July 1, 1990, and that does not reimburse the county for costs associated with criminal cases under RCW 3.50.800 or 3.50.805(2), shall be made to the county in which the city is located. This funding is provided to cities for the costs of implementing criminal justice legislation including, but not limited to: Chapter 206, Laws of 1998 (drunk driving penalties); chapter 207, Laws of 1998 (DUI penalties); chapter 208, Laws of 1998 (deferred prosecution); chapter 209, Laws of 1998 (DUI/license suspension); chapter 210, Laws of 1998 (ignition interlock violations); chapter 211, Laws of 1998 (DUI penalties); chapter 212, Laws of 1998 (DUI penalties); chapter 213, Laws of 1998 (intoxication levels lowered); chapter 214, Laws of 1998 (DUI penalties); and chapter 215, Laws of 1998 (DUI provisions).NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 804. FOR THE STATE TREASURERâFEDERAL REVENUES FOR DISTRIBUTIONGeneral Fund Appropriation for federal flood controlfunds distribution. . . .$48,000General Fund Appropriation for federal grazing feesdistribution. . . .$54,000General Fund Appropriation for federal military feesdistribution. . . .$1,180,000Forest Reserve Fund Appropriation for federal forestreserve fund distribution. . . .$28,982,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$30,264,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 805. FOR THE STATE TREASURERâTRANSFERSAdministrative Hearings Revolving Account: Fortransfer to the state general fund,$6,000,000 for fiscal year 2026. . . .$6,000,000Apple Health and Homes Account: For transfer to thestate general fund, $7,500,000 for fiscal year2026 and $7,500,000 for fiscal year 2027. . . .$15,000,000Business and Professions Account: For transferto the state general fund, $5,000,000 forfiscal year 2026. . . .$5,000,000Certified Public Accountants' Account: Fortransfer to the state general fund,$1,060,000 for fiscal year 2026. . . .$1,060,000Climate Investment Account: For transfer to thecarbon emissions reduction account,$40,000,000 for fiscal year 2026. . . .$40,000,000Climate Investment Account: For transfer to thecarbon emissions reduction account,$154,153,000 for fiscal year 2027. . . .$154,153,000Climate Investment Account: For transfer to thecarbon emissions reduction account,$162,000,000 for fiscal year 2027. . . .$162,000,000Climate Investment Account: For transfer to thenatural climate solutions account,$33,000,000 for fiscal year 2026. . . .$33,000,000Construction Registration Inspection Account:For transfer to the state general fund,$2,000,000 for fiscal year 2026. . . .$2,000,000Dedicated Cannabis Account: For transfer to thebasic health plan trust account, the lesser ofthe amount determined pursuant to RCW 69.50.540or this amount for fiscal year 2026,$250,000,000 and this amount for fiscal year2027, $250,000,000. . . .$500,000,000Dedicated Cannabis Account: For transfer to thestate general fund, the lesser of the amountdetermined pursuant to RCW 69.50.540 or thisamount for fiscal year 2026, $155,000,000and this amount for fiscal year 2027,$155,000,000. . . .$310,000,000Department of Retirement Systems Expense Account:For transfer to the state general fund,$3,052,000 for fiscal year 2026 and $3,000,000for fiscal year 2027. . . .$6,052,000Economic Development Strategic Reserve Account:For transfer to the state general fund,$142,000 for fiscal year 2026 and$17,000,000 for fiscal year 2027. . . .$17,142,000Electrical License Account: For transfer to thestate general fund, $6,000,000 for fiscalyear 2026. . . .$6,000,000Enterprise Services Account: For transfer tothe state general fund, $35,000,000 forfiscal year 2026. . . .$35,000,000Financial Services Regulation Account: For transferto the state general fund, $6,880,000 forfiscal year 2026 and $3,500,000 for fiscal year2027. . . .$10,380,000From auction proceeds received under RCW70A.65.100(7)(b): For transfer to the airquality and health disparities improvementaccount, $2,600,000 for fiscal year 2026. . . .$2,600,000From auction proceeds received under RCW70A.65.100(7)(c): For transfer to the airquality and health disparities improvementaccount, $2,600,000 for fiscal year 2027. . . .$2,600,000Gambling Revolving Account: For transfer to thestate general fund, $2,200,000 for fiscal year2026. . . .$2,200,000General Fund: For transfer to the deathinvestigations account, $2,050,000 forfiscal year 2026 and $2,050,000 for fiscalyear 2027. . . .$4,100,000General Fund: For transfer to the disaster responseaccount, $30,000,000 for fiscal year 2027. . . .$30,000,000General Fund: For transfer to the fair fund underRCW 15.76.115, $2,250,000 for fiscal year 2026and $2,250,000 for fiscal year 2027. . . .$4,500,000General Fund: For transfer to the flood controlassistance account under RCW 86.26.007,$1,850,000 for fiscal year 2026 and$1,850,000 for fiscal year 2027. . . .$3,700,000General Fund: For transfer to the home securityfund, $20,227,000 for fiscal year 2026 and$49,868,000 for fiscal year 2027. . . .$70,095,000General Fund: For transfer to the manufacturing andwarehousing job centers account pursuant to RCW82.14.545 for distribution in section 801 ofthis act, $2,770,000 for fiscal year 2026. . . .$2,770,000General Fund: For transfer to the wildfire response,forest restoration, and community resilienceaccount, solely for the implementation ofchapter 298, Laws of 2021 (2SHB 1168)(long-term forest health), $20,000,000 forfiscal year 2026. . . .$20,000,000Higher Education Personnel Services Account: Fortransfer to the state general fund, $98,000for fiscal year 2026. . . .$98,000Horse Racing Commission Class C Purse FundAccount: For transfer to the horse racingcommission operating account, $340,000 forfiscal year 2026. . . .$340,000Limited Fish and Wildlife Account: For transferto the fish, wildlife, and conservationaccount, $3,950,000 for fiscal year 2026and $3,100,000 for fiscal year 2027. . . .$7,050,000Medical Student Loan Account: For transfer to thestate general fund, $1,751,000 for fiscalyear 2026. . . .$1,751,000Model Toxics Control Capital Account: Fortransfer to the state general fund,$60,000,000 for fiscal year 2026. . . .$60,000,000Model Toxics Control Operating Account: Fortransfer to the state general fund,$10,000,000 for fiscal year 2026. . . .$10,000,000Municipal Revolving Account: For transfer tothe state general fund, $5,000,000 forfiscal year 2026. . . .$5,000,000Natural Climate Solutions Account: For transferto the wildfire response, forest restoration,and community resilience account, solely forthe implementation of chapter 298, Laws of2021 (2SHB 1168) (long-term forest health),$20,000,000 for fiscal year 2026 and$20,000,000 for fiscal year 2027. . . .$40,000,000OFM Central Services Account: For transfer to thestate general fund, $1,000,000 for fiscalyear 2026 and $1,000,000 for fiscal year 2027. . . .$2,000,000Opioid Abatement Settlement Account: Fortransfer to the tribal opioid preventionand treatment account, the lesser of theamount determined pursuant to RCW 43.79.483or this amount for fiscal year 2026,$10,000,000 and this amount for fiscal year2027, $8,500,000. . . .$18,500,000Performance Audits of Government Account: Fortransfer to the state general fund,$2,536,000 for fiscal year 2026. . . .$2,536,000Personnel Service Account: For transfer to thestate general fund, $3,827,000 for fiscalyear 2026. . . .$3,827,000Pipeline Safety Account: For transfer to thestate general fund, $1,000,000 for fiscalyear 2026. . . .$1,000,000Pressure Systems Safety Account: For transfer tothe state general fund, $260,000 for fiscalyear 2026. . . .$260,000Professional Engineers' Account: For transfer tothe state general fund, $440,000 for fiscalyear 2026. . . .$440,000Public Employees' and Retirees' Insurance Account:For transfer to the state general fund,$18,187,000 for fiscal year 2026. . . .$18,187,000Public Service Revolving Account: For transfer tothe state general fund, $7,167,000 for fiscalyear 2026 and $2,167,000 for fiscal year 2027. . . .$9,334,000Public Works Administration Account: Fortransfer to the state general fund,$1,800,000 for fiscal year 2026. . . .$1,800,000Public Works Assistance Account: For transfer tothe state general fund on June 30, 2026,$288,000,000 for fiscal year 2026. . . .$288,000,000Real Estate Commission Account: For transfer tothe state general fund, $3,500,000 forfiscal year 2026. . . .$3,500,000Recreational Fisheries Enhancement Account: Fortransfer to the fish, wildlife, andconservation account, $300,000 for fiscalyear 2026. . . .$300,000School Employees' Insurance Account: For transfer tothe state general fund, $2,551,000 for fiscalyear 2026. . . .$2,551,000Shared Game Lottery Account: For transfer tothe education legacy trust account,$8,000,000 for fiscal year 2026. . . .$8,000,000State Drought Preparedness Account: For transferto the state general fund, $4,000,000 forfiscal year 2026. . . .$4,000,000State Financial Aid Account: For transfer to thestate general fund, $945,000 for fiscal year2026. . . .$945,000State Seizure Account: For transfer to thestate general fund, $500,000 for fiscalyear 2026. . . .$500,000State Treasurer's Service Account: For transfer tothe state general fund, $50,000,000 for fiscalyear 2026 and $60,000,000 for fiscal year2027. . . .$110,000,000Tobacco Settlement Account: For transfer to thestate general fund, in an amount not to exceedthe actual amount of the annual base payment tothe tobacco settlement account for fiscal year2026. . . .$92,000,000Tobacco Settlement Account: For transfer to thestate general fund, in an amount not to exceedthe actual amount of the annual base payment tothe tobacco settlement account for fiscal year2027. . . .$92,000,000Traumatic Brain Injury Account: For transfer tothe state general fund, $1,111,000 for fiscalyear 2026. . . .$1,111,000Warm Water Game Fish Account: For transfer tothe fish, wildlife, and conservationaccount, $930,000 for fiscal year 2026 and$380,000 for fiscal year 2027. . . .$1,310,000Washington Auto Theft Prevention AuthorityAccount: For transfer to the state generalfund, $900,000 for fiscal year 2026 and$900,000 for fiscal year 2027. . . .$1,800,000Washington State Library-Archives BuildingAccount: For transfer to the state generalfund, $18,000,000 for fiscal year 2026. . . .$18,000,000Washington Student Loan Account: For transfer tothe state general fund, $88,967,000 forfiscal year 2026. . . .$88,967,000Water Pollution Control Revolving AdministrationAccount: For transfer to the water pollutioncontrol revolving account, $3,000,000 forfiscal year 2026 and $3,000,000 for fiscalyear 2027. . . .$6,000,000(End of part)PART IXMISCELLANEOUSNEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 901. EXPENDITURE AUTHORIZATIONSThe appropriations contained in this act are maximum expenditure authorizations. Pursuant to RCW 43.88.037, moneys disbursed from the treasury on the basis of a formal loan agreement shall be recorded as loans receivable and not as expenditures for accounting purposes. To the extent that moneys are disbursed on a loan basis, the corresponding appropriation shall be reduced by the amount of loan moneys disbursed from the treasury during the 2023-2025 fiscal biennium.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 902. EMERGENCY FUND ALLOCATIONSWhenever allocations are made from the governor's emergency fund appropriation to an agency that is financed in whole or in part by other than general fund moneys, the director of financial management may direct the repayment of such allocated amount to the general fund from any balance in the fund or funds which finance the agency. An appropriation is not necessary to effect such repayment.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 903. STATUTORY APPROPRIATIONSIn addition to the amounts appropriated in this act for revenues for distribution, state contributions to the law enforcement officers' and firefighters' retirement system plan 2 and bond retirement and interest, including ongoing bond registration and transfer charges, transfers, interest on registered warrants, and certificates of indebtedness, there is also appropriated such further amounts as may be required or available for these purposes under any statutory formula or under chapters 39.94, 39.96, and 39.98 RCW or any proper bond covenant made under law.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 904. BOND EXPENSESIn addition to such other appropriations as are made by this act, there is hereby appropriated to the state finance committee from legally available bond proceeds in the applicable construction or building funds and accounts such amounts as are necessary to pay the expenses incurred in the issuance and sale of the subject bonds.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 905. VOLUNTARY RETIREMENT AND SEPARATION(1) As a management tool to reduce costs and make more effective use of resources, while improving employee productivity and morale, agencies may implement either a voluntary retirement or separation program, or both, that is cost neutral or results in cost savings, including costs to the state pension systems, over a two-year period following the commencement of the program, provided that such a program is approved by the director of financial management. Agencies participating in this authorization may offer voluntary retirement and/or separation incentives and options according to procedures and guidelines established by the office of financial management in consultation with the department of retirement systems. The options may include, but are not limited to, financial incentives for voluntary separation or retirement. An employee does not have a contractual right to a financial incentive offered under this section. The office of financial management and the department of retirement systems may review and monitor incentive offers. Agencies are required to submit a report by the date established by the office of financial management in the guidelines required in this section to the legislature and the office of financial management on the outcome of their approved incentive program. The report should include information on the details of the program, including the incentive payment amount for each participant, the total cost to the state, and the projected or actual net dollar savings over the two-year period.(2) The department of retirement systems may collect from employers the actuarial cost of any incentive provided under this program, or any other incentive to retire provided by employers to members of the state's pension systems, for deposit in the appropriate pension account.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 906. COLLECTIVE BARGAINING AGREEMENTS NOT IMPAIREDNothing in this act prohibits the expenditure of any funds by an agency or institution of the state for benefits guaranteed by any collective bargaining agreement in effect on the effective date of this section.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 907. COLLECTIVE BARGAINING AGREEMENTS(1) In accordance with chapters 41.80 and 41.56 RCW, agreements have been reached between the governor and organizations representing state employee bargaining units and nonstate employee bargaining units for the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium presented to the legislature during the 2025 legislative session. Funding is not provided for compensation and fringe benefit provisions not presented to the legislature by the end of the 2025 legislative session. Funding is approved for agreements and awards with the following organizations:(a) Washington federation of state employees, general government;(b) Teamsters local 117, department of corrections;(c) Service employees international union, healthcare 1199NW;(d) Professional and technical engineers, local 17;(e) Washington association of fish and wildlife professionals;(f) The coalition of unions;(g) Association of Washington assistant attorneys general;(h) Washington federation of state employees, administrative law judges;(i) Washington state patrol troopers association;(j) Washington state patrol lieutenants and captains association;(k) Fish and wildlife officers guild;(l) Teamsters 760, fish and wildlife sergeants;(m) Washington federation of state employees, higher education community college coalition;(n) Service employees international union local 925, family child care providers;(o) Adult family home council, adult family home providers; and(p) Washington federation of state employees, language access providers.(2) In accordance with chapters 41.80 and 41.56 RCW, agreements have been reached between institutions of higher education and employee organizations representing state employee bargaining units for the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium and funding is provided in Part VI of this act for agreements and awards with the following organizations:(a) University of Washington:(i) Washington federation of state employees;(ii) Service employees international union local 925;(iii) Teamsters local 117, police; and(iv) Washington federation of state employees, police management;(b) Washington State University:(i) Washington federation of state employees;(ii) Police guild; and(iii) International union of operating engineers;(c) Central Washington University:(i) Washington federation of state employees;(ii) Public school employees; and(iii) Teamsters local 760 police and sergeants;(d) The Evergreen State College:(i) Washington federation of state employees; and(ii) Washington federation of state employees, uniformed personnel;(e) Western Washington University:(i) Washington federation of state employees;(ii) Fraternal order of police, lodge no. 24; and(iii) Public school employees;(f) Eastern Washington University:(i) Washington federation of state employees;(ii) Washington federation of state employees, uniformed personnel; and(iii) Public school employees; and(g) Yakima Valley College: Public school employees.(3) Expenditures for agreements in subsections (1) and (2) of this section may also be funded from nonappropriated accounts. If positions are funded with lidded grants or dedicated fund sources with insufficient revenue, additional funding from other sources is not provided.(4) Collective bargaining agreements that are not required to be approved by the legislature under RCW 41.80.010(4)(c)(ii)(A) are not rejected but are left to the institutions delegated to manage those bargained relationships under state employee collective bargaining law. The following agreements are not rejected, but do not require legislative approval:(a) Service employees international union local 1199, research/hall health;(b) Service employees international union local 1199, Harborview medical center/airlift northwest;(c) Service employees international union local 1199, UW medical centerânorthwest;(d) Washington state nurses association, UW medical centerânorthwest; and(e) Washington state nurses association, UW medical centerâMontlake.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 908. LEGISLATIVE COLLECTIVE BARGAINING AGREEMENTSIn accordance with chapter 44.90 RCW, the first agreements have been reached between the employer and organizations representing legislative employee bargaining units for the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium and presented to the legislature during the 2025 legislative session. Funding is approved for agreements with the legislative professionals association and the Washington public employees association.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 909. COMPENSATIONâINSURANCE BENEFITS(1)(a) An agreement was reached for the 2025-2027 biennium between the governor and the health care coalition under the provisions of chapter 41.80 RCW. Appropriations in this act for state agencies, including institutions of higher education, are sufficient to implement the provisions of the 2025-2027 collective bargaining agreement, which maintains the provisions of the prior agreement.(b) Appropriations for state agencies in this act are sufficient for represented employees outside the coalition and for nonrepresented state employee health benefits.(2) The appropriations for state agencies in this act are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(a) The monthly employer funding rate for insurance benefit premiums, public employees' benefits board administration, and the uniform medical plan, shall not exceed $1,333 per eligible employee for fiscal year 2026.(b) For fiscal year 2027, the monthly employer funding rate shall not exceed $1,350 per eligible employee.(c) The health care authority, subject to the approval of the public employees' benefits board, shall provide subsidies for health benefit premiums to eligible retired or disabled public employees and school district employees who are eligible for medicare, pursuant to RCW 41.05.085. For calendar years 2026 and 2027, the subsidy shall be up to $183 per month. Funds from reserves accumulated for future adverse claims experience, from past favorable claims experience, or otherwise, may not be used to increase this retiree subsidy beyond what is authorized in this subsection.(d) The monthly employer funding rate paid by school districts and educational service districts to the health care authority includes $67.61 per month beginning September 1, 2025, and $77.56 beginning September 1, 2026, for deposit into the public employees' and retirees' insurance account established in RCW 41.05.120.(3) The funding rates in subsection (2) of this section are sufficient to cover, effective January 1, 2026, the following:(a) In the uniform medical plan, coverage for doula services;(b) In the uniform dental plan, the following:(i) Increasing the temporomandibular joint benefit to $1,000 annually and $5,000 per lifetime;(ii) Eliminating the deductible for children up to age 15; and(c) Implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5083 (hospital affordability); and(d) Elimination of the smart health program as provided in Senate Bill No. 5807 (health plan incentives).(4) The funding rates in subsection (2) of this section are not sufficient to continue offering an accountable care plan as of plan year 2026.(5) The rates are not sufficient to add coverage of prescription drugs for the treatment of obesity or weight loss. The authority shall not add coverage of prescription drugs for the treatment of obesity or weight loss without a specific appropriation from the legislature. Nothing in this section requires removal of any existing coverage of prescription drugs to treat diabetes.(6) Current funding allows for the public employees' benefits board to adjust the employer paid long term disability benefit to a maximum monthly benefit of $450 within the current funding resources.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 910. COMPENSATIONâSCHOOL EMPLOYEESâINSURANCE BENEFITSAn agreement was reached for the 2025-2027 biennium between the governor and the school employee coalition under the provisions of chapters 41.56 and 41.59 RCW. Appropriations in this act for allocations to school districts are sufficient to implement the provisions of the 2025-2027 collective bargaining agreement, which maintains the provisions of the prior agreement, and are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) The monthly employer funding rate for insurance benefit premiums, school employees' benefits board administration, retiree remittance, and the uniform medical plan, shall not exceed the rates identified in section 506(4) of this act.(a) These rates are sufficient to cover:(i) In the uniform medical plan, effective January 1, 2026, coverage for doula services;(ii) Implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5083 (hospital affordability); and(iii) Elimination of the smart health program as provided in Senate Bill No. 5807 (health plan incentives).(b) The funding rates in section 506(4) of this act are not sufficient to continue offering an accountable care plan as of plan year 2026.(2) Current funding allows for the school employees' benefits board to adjust the employer paid long term disability benefit to a maximum monthly benefit of $450 within the current funding resources.(3) Except as provided by the parties' health care agreement, in order to achieve the level of funding provided for health benefits, the school employees' benefits board shall require any or all of the following: Employee premium copayments, increases in point-of-service cost sharing, the implementation of managed competition, or other changes to benefits consistent with RCW 41.05.740.(4) The funding rates in section 506(4) of this act are not sufficient to add coverage of prescription drugs for the treatment of obesity or weight loss. The authority shall not add coverage of prescription drugs for the treatment of obesity or weight loss without a specific appropriation from the legislature. Nothing in this section requires removal of any existing coverage of prescription drugs to treat diabetes.(5) When bargaining for funding for school employees health benefits for subsequent fiscal biennia, any proposal agreed upon must assume the imposition of a $25 per month surcharge payment from members who use tobacco products and a surcharge payment of not less than $50 per month from members who cover a spouse or domestic partner where the spouse or domestic partner has chosen not to enroll in another employer-based group health insurance that has benefits and premiums with an actuarial value of not less than 95 percent of the actuarial value of the public employees' benefits board plan with the largest enrollment. The surcharge payments shall be collected in addition to the member premium payment.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 911. GENERAL WAGE INCREASES(1) Appropriations for state agency employee compensation in this act are sufficient to provide general wage increases to state agency employees and employees of institutions of higher education, who are not represented or who bargain under statutory authority other than chapter 41.80 or 47.64 RCW or RCW 41.56.473 or 41.56.475.(2) Funding is provided for a three percent general wage increase effective July 1, 2025, for all classified employees as specified in subsection (1) of this section, employees in the Washington management service, and exempt employees under the jurisdiction of the office of financial management. The appropriations are also sufficient to fund a three percent salary increase effective July 1, 2025, for executive, legislative, and judicial branch employees exempt from merit system rules whose maximum salaries are not set by the commission on salaries for elected officials.(3) Funding is provided for a two percent general wage increase effective July 1, 2026, for all classified employees as specified in subsection (1) of this section, employees in the Washington management service, and exempt employees under the jurisdiction of the office of financial management. The appropriations are also sufficient to fund a two percent salary increase effective July 1, 2026, for executive, legislative, and judicial branch employees exempt from merit system rules whose maximum salaries are not set by the commission on salaries for elected officials.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 912. COMPENSATIONâPENSION CONTRIBUTIONS(1) Except as otherwise provided in this section, appropriations in this act for school districts and state agencies, including institutions of higher education, are adjusted to reflect changes to agency appropriations to reflect pension contribution rates adopted by the pension funding council and the law enforcement officers' and firefighters' retirement system plan 2 board.(2) Appropriations for school districts and state agencies are adjusted to reflect savings resulting from changes to pension funding as provided in Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5357 (actuarial pension funding).NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 913. INITIATIVE 732 COST-OF-LIVING INCREASESPart VI of this act includes funding for the greater of the general wage increase identified in section 911 of this act or a cost of living adjustment for state employees pursuant to RCW 28B.50.465 and 28B.50.468, as amended by Senate Bill No. 5790 (CTC employee COLAs), for a total increase of 3.0 percent, effective July 1, 2025, and 2.7 percent, effective July 1, 2026.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 914. (1) During the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium, the health care authority, department of commerce, department of corrections, and department of children, youth, and families must revise their agreements and contracts with vendors to include a provision to require that each vendor agrees to equality among its workers by ensuring similarly employed individuals are compensated as equals as follows:(a) Employees are similarly employed if the individuals work for the same employer, the performance of the job requires comparable skill, effort, and responsibility, and the jobs are performed under similar working conditions. Job titles alone are not determinative of whether employees are similarly employed.(b) Vendors may allow differentials in compensation for their workers based in good faith on any of the following: A seniority system, a merit system, a system that measures earnings by quantity or quality of production, a bona fide job-related factor or factors, or a bona fide regional difference in compensation levels.(c) A bona fide job-related factor or factors may include, but is not limited to, education, training, or experience, that is consistent with business necessity, not based on or derived from a gender-based differential, and accounts for the entire differential.(d) A bona fide regional difference in compensation level must be consistent with business necessity, not based on or derived from a gender-based differential, and account for the entire differential.(2) The provision must allow for the termination of the contract if the agency or the department of enterprise services determines that the vendor is not in compliance with this agreement or contract term.(3) Agencies must implement this provision with any new contract and at the time of renewal of any existing contract.(4) The department of enterprise services must revise its master contracts with vendors, including cooperative purchasing agreements under RCW 39.26.060, in accordance with this section. Any cost incurred by the department of enterprise services to implement this section must be recouped from the fees charged to master contract vendors.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 915. (1) The jail modernization task force established in the 2023-2025 fiscal biennium continues to be composed of the following members:(a) One member from each of the two largest caucuses of the senate, appointed by the president of the senate;(b) One member from each of the two largest caucuses of the house of representatives, appointed by the speaker of the house of representatives;(c) A representative from the caseload forecast council, as an advisory member;(d) One member appointed by and representing each of the following:(i) The governor;(ii) The department of corrections;(iii) The sentencing guidelines commission;(iv) The department of social and health services, representing the behavioral health administration's state hospitals;(v) The health care authority;(vi) The criminal justice training commission;(vii) The superior court judges association;(viii) The district and municipal court judges association;(ix) The Washington association of criminal defense attorneys or the Washington defender association;(x) The Washington association of prosecuting attorneys;(xi) The Washington state minority and justice commission;(xii) Disability rights Washington;(xiii) A behavioral health administrative service organization; and(xiv) An individual with lived experience; and(e) Two members appointed by and representing each of the following:(i) The Washington state association of counties, with one representative from east of the crest of the Cascades and one representative from west of the crest of the Cascades; and(ii) The Washington association of sheriffs and police chiefs, with one representative from east of the crest of the Cascades and one representative from west of the crest of the Cascades.(2) Any additions or modifications to the membership provided in subsection (1) of this section will be informed by the analysis performed by the Washington state institute for public policy and the convening assessment performed by the William D. Ruckelshaus center.(3) The task force shall review the Washington state institute for public policy's report on jail characteristics, any resulting legislation from the criminal sentencing task force, and any resulting legislation from the Washington state joint legislative task force on jail standards. At a minimum, the task force shall also discuss the following:(a) Employee retention issues and potential solutions;(b) The impact of overtime, jail atmosphere, emergency response time, and inexperienced corrections officers, and how to overcome these challenges;(c) The type of facility needed to house those with behavioral health needs and associated costs of these facilities;(d) Available diversion programs and their costs;(e) Types of existing behavioral health facilities for those involved in the criminal justice system, the costs of building and running these facilities, how these facilities vary by location, the viability of offering facilities in every county, and potential system improvements to the types of services and supports offered and delivered to those with behavioral health needs;(f) The types of services and supports provided to those exiting the jail system; and(g) What reforms are necessary to create and enhance a seamless transition back to the community following jail confinement.(4) The task force shall develop a set of statewide jail modernization recommendations to include, at a minimum, identifying existing facilities in need of upgrades or remodel and any need for building new facilities, and potential funding sources or mechanisms to make the recommendations feasible.(5) Legislative members of the task force are reimbursed for travel expenses in accordance with RCWÂ  44.04.120. Nonlegislative members are not entitled to be reimbursed for travel expenses if they are elected officials or are participating on behalf of an employer, governmental entity, or other organization. Any reimbursement for other nonlegislative members is subject to chapterÂ  43.03Â RCW.(6) The task force shall submit an initial report, including findings and recommendations, to the governor and the appropriate committees of the legislature, pursuant to RCW 43.01.036, by July 1, 2025. The task force shall submit a final report by December 31, 2025.Sec. 916. 2023 c 475 s 912 (uncodified) is reenacted and amended to read as follows:The Washington state missing and murdered indigenous women and people task force is established.(1) The task force is composed of members as provided in this subsection.(a) The president of the senate shall appoint one member from each of the two largest caucuses of the senate.(b) The speaker of the house of representatives shall appoint one member from each of the two largest caucuses of the house of representatives.(c) The governor's office of Indian affairs shall appoint five representatives from federally recognized Indian tribes in Washington state.(d) The president of the senate and the speaker of the house of representatives jointly shall appoint the following:(i) One member representing the Seattle Indian health board;(ii) One member representing the NATIVE project;(iii) One member representing Northwest Portland area Indian health board;(iv) One member representing the American Indian health commission;(v) Two indigenous women or family members of indigenous women that have experienced violence;(vi) One member representing the governor's office of Indian affairs;(vii) The chief of the Washington state patrol or his or her representative;(viii) One member representing the Washington state office of the attorney general;(ix) One member representing the Washington association of sheriffs and police chiefs;(x) One member representing the Washington state association of counties;(xi) One member representing the association of Washington cities;(xii) One member representing the Washington association of prosecuting attorneys; and(xiii) One representative of the Washington association of criminal defense lawyers.(((e) Where feasible, the task force may invite and consult with any entity, agency, or individual deemed necessary.))(2) ((The legislative members shall convene the initial meeting of the task force no later than the end of 2023 and thereafter convene:(a) A minimum of two subsequent meetings annually. The membership shall select the task force's cochairs, which must include one legislator and one nonlegislative member; and(b) One summit annually.(3))) The task force shall review ((the))current laws and policies relating to missing and murdered American Indian and Alaska Native people((. The task force shall review current policies and develop recommendations)) for the purpose of:(a) Assessing systemic causes behind violence including patterns and underlying historical, social and economic, institutional, and cultural factors which may contribute to disproportionately high levels of violence that occur against American Indian and Alaska Native people and recommending changes to address these systemic causes;(b) Identifying ways to improve cross-border coordination between law enforcement and federally recognized tribes that share a border with Washington state;(c) Assessing and recommending improvements to data tracking and reporting practices relating to violence against American Indian and Alaska Native people in Washington state;(d) Making recommendations and best practices for improving:(i) The collection and reporting of data by tribal, local, and state law enforcement agencies to more effectively understand and address issues of violence facing American Indian and Alaska Native people;(ii) Jurisdictional and data-sharing issues on tribal reservation land and urban areas that impact gender-based violence against American Indian and Alaska Native people;(iii) The collaboration and coordination between law enforcement agencies and federal, state, county, local, and tribal social and health services; and(iv) Strategies and practices to improve communication and transparency with family members in missing and murdered indigenous women and people cases;(e) Reviewing prosecutorial trends and practices relating to crimes of violence against American Indian and Alaska Native people in Washington state, identifying disparities, and recommending changes to address such disparities;(f) Identifying barriers to providing more state resources in tracking and addressing violence against American Indian and Alaska Native people and reducing the incidences of violence;(g) Assessing and identifying state resources to support programs and services for survivors, impacted family members, and tribal and urban Indian service providers working with American Indian and Alaska Native people who have experienced violence and identifying needs of survivors, impacted family members, and tribal and urban Indian service providers that are not currently being met;(h) Identifying and making recommendations for increasing state resources for trainings on culturally attuned best practices for working with American Indian and Alaska Native communities for tribal, local, and state law enforcement personnel in Washington state; ((and))(i) Supporting efforts led by American Indian and Alaska Native people to address this crisis, with the recognition that those personally impacted are already doing critical work to address the impacts of the missing and murdered indigenous women and people crisis in communities and that community-led work must be centered in order to identify and fully address the scope of the issue; and(j) Developing best practices for law enforcement agencies, county coroners, and medical examiners on collecting indigenous demographic data. The task force shall submit a report including findings and recommendations to the appropriate committees of the legislature by June 30, 2026.(3) The task force shall conduct a feasibility to study to determine the potential impact and effectiveness of a commission focused on missing and murdered indigenous women and people. The feasibility study shall be submitted to the governor and appropriate committees of the legislature by June 30, 2026.(4) The truth and healing tribal advisory committee shall conduct research and outreach to understand the operations and impact of Indian boarding schools in Washington run by public and faith-based institutions, and to develop recommendations for the state to acknowledge and address the historical and intergenerational harms caused by Indian boarding schools and other cultural and linguistic termination practices. By June 30, 2026, the office must submit a report to the appropriate committees of the legislature that includes, but is not limited to:(a) A summary of activities undertaken by the advisory committee;(b) Findings regarding the extent and types of support provided by the state to Indian boarding schools;(c) Findings regarding current state policies and practices that originate from Indian boarding schools or other assimilationist policies and practices and that cause disproportionate harm to American Indian and Alaska Native people and communities; and(d) Recommendations regarding how the state can address the harm done by Indian boarding schools and other cultural and linguistic termination practices through a truth and reconciliation model, including but not limited to:(i) Resources and assistance that the state may provide to aid in the healing of trauma caused by Indian boarding school policies; and(ii) Actions to correct current state policies and practices with origins in assimilationist policies or that cause disproportionate harm to Native people and communities.(5)(a) The office of the attorney general shall administer and provide staff support to the task force and advisory committee and oversee the development of the reports and study required under subsections (2), (3), and (4) of this section.(((4)))(b) Where feasible, the task force may invite and consult with any entity, agency, or individual deemed necessary. The task force and tribal advisory committee, with the assistance of the Washington state office of the attorney general, must consult with federally recognized tribes in Washington state and in states bordering Washington state, and engage with urban Indian organizations to submit reports to the governor and the appropriate committees of the legislature by ((December 1, 2023, and June 1, 2025))June 1, 2026.(((5)(a) The office of the attorney general administers and provides staff support to the task force, organizes the summit required under subsection (2)(b) of this section, and oversees the development of the task force reports required under subsection (4) of this section. The task force and the office of the attorney general shall conduct four site visits in different locations across the state in collaboration with tribes and native-led organizations. The office of the attorney general may contract for the summit.(b) The office of the attorney general may, when deemed necessary by the task force, retain consultants to provide data analysis, research, recommendations, training, and other services to the task force for the purposes provided in subsection (3) of this section.(c) The office of the attorney general may share and exchange information received or created on behalf of the task force with other states, federally recognized Indian tribes, urban Indian organizations, and other national groups working on missing and murdered indigenous women and people issues.(d) The office of the attorney general must coordinate with the task force to create and update a missing and murdered indigenous women and people resource. The resource must include:(i) Instructions on how to report a missing indigenous woman or person;(ii) General information about the investigative processes in missing and murdered indigenous women and people cases;(iii) Best practices for family members in missing and murdered indigenous women and people cases when working with law enforcement; and(iv) Other useful information and resources.(6) Legislative members of the task force are reimbursed for travel expenses in accordance with RCW 44.04.120. Nonlegislative members are not entitled to be reimbursed for travel expenses if they are elected officials or are participating on behalf of an employer, governmental entity, or other organization. Any reimbursement for other nonlegislative members is subject to chapter 43.03 RCW.(7)))(6) To ensure that the task force ((has))and tribal advisory committee have diverse and inclusive representation of those affected by its work, task force members whose participation in the task force may be hampered by financial hardship may be compensated as provided in RCW 43.03.220.(((8) This section expires June 30, 2025.))Sec. 917. 2024 c 376 s 906 (uncodified) is reenacted and amended to read as follows:(1) The task force on the underground economy in the Washington state construction industry is established.(2) For purposes of this section, "underground economy" means contracting and construction activities in which payroll is unreported or underreported with consequent nonpayment of payroll taxes to federal and state agencies including nonpayment of workers' compensation and unemployment compensation taxes.(3) The task force shall study the nature and scope of the underground economy and recommend what policy changes, if any, are needed to address the underground economy, including whether greater cohesion and transparency among state agencies is needed. To assist the task force in achieving this goal, the department of labor and industries may contract with the institute for public policy, or, if the institute is unavailable, another entity with expertise capable of providing such assistance.(4)(a) The task force shall consist of the following members:(i) A member from each of the two largest caucuses of the senate appointed by the president of the senate;(ii) A member from each of the two largest caucuses of the house of representatives appointed by the speaker of the house of representatives;(iii) Four members representing the construction business, selected from nominations submitted by statewide construction business organizations and appointed jointly by the president of the senate and the speaker of the house of representatives;(iv) Four members representing construction workers, selected from nominations submitted by statewide labor organizations and appointed jointly by the president of the senate and the speaker of the house of representatives; and(v) One representative from the office of the attorney general.(b) In addition, the employment security department, the department of labor and industries, and the department of revenue shall cooperate with the task force and shall each maintain a liaison representative, who will be a nonvoting member of the task force. The departments shall cooperate with the task force and the institute for public policy, or other entity as appropriate, and shall provide information and data as the task force or the institute, or other entity as appropriate, may reasonably request.(c) The task force will choose the chair or cochairs of the task force from among its membership at the initial meeting. The department of labor and industries is responsible for scheduling the initial meeting of the task force.(5)(a) Legislative members of the task force shall be reimbursed for travel expenses in accordance with RCW 44.04.120. Nonlegislative members, except those representing an employer or organization, are entitled to be reimbursed for travel expenses in accordance with RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.(b) The expenses of the task force will be paid by the department of labor and industries. Task force expenditures are subject to approval by the department of labor and industries.(6) The task force shall report its findings and recommendations to the legislature by ((June 30))December 31, 2025.Sec. 918. RCW 9.46.100 and 2004 c 276 s 903 are each amended to read as follows:There is hereby created the gambling revolving fund which shall consist of all moneys receivable for licensing, penalties, forfeitures, and all other moneys, income, or revenue received by the commission. The state treasurer shall be custodian of the fund. All moneys received by the commission or any employee thereof, except for change funds and an amount of petty cash as fixed by rule or regulation of the commission, shall be deposited each day in a depository approved by the state treasurer and transferred to the state treasurer to be credited to the gambling revolving fund. Disbursements from the revolving fund shall be on authorization of the commission or a duly authorized representative thereof. In order to maintain an effective expenditure and revenue control the gambling revolving fund shall be subject in all respects to chapter 43.88 RCW but no appropriation shall be required to permit expenditures and payment of obligations from such fund. All expenses relative to commission business, including but not limited to salaries and expenses of the director and other commission employees shall be paid from the gambling revolving fund.((During the 2003-2005 fiscal biennium, the legislature may transfer from the gambling revolving fund to the problem gambling treatment account, contingent on enactment of chapter ..., Laws of 2004 (Second Substitute House Bill No. 2776, problem gambling treatment). Also during))During the 2003-2005 and 2025-2027 fiscal ((biennium))biennia, the legislature may transfer from the gambling revolving fund to the state general fund such amounts as reflect the excess nontribal fund balance of the fund. The commission shall not increase fees during the 2003-2005 fiscal biennium for the purpose of restoring the excess fund balance transferred under this section.Sec. 919. RCW 15.76.115 and 2021 c 245 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:(1) The fair fund is created in the custody of the state treasury.(2)(a) All moneys received by the department of agriculture for the purposes of this fund and from RCW 67.16.105 shall be deposited into the fund. Each fiscal year, the state treasurer shall transfer into the fair fund from the general fund an amount appropriated in the omnibus operating appropriations act equal to:(((a)))(i) $2,000,000 for fiscal year 2021;(((b)))(ii) $2,750,000 in each fiscal year 2022 and 2023;(((c)))(iii) $3,500,000 in each fiscal year 2024 and 2025; ((and(d)))(iv) $2,250,000 in each fiscal year 2026 and 2027; and(v) $4,000,000 in fiscal year ((2026))2028 and each fiscal year thereafter.(((e)))(b) To support inclusiveness at fair events, a portion of the additional funds provided to fairs as a result of chapter 245, Laws of 2021 must be prioritized to be spent on educational programs and outreach that are reflective of the diversity within a fair's local population.(3) Expenditures from the fund may be used only for assisting fairs in the manner provided in this chapter. Only the director of agriculture or the director's designee may authorize expenditures from the fund. The fund is subject to allotment procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required for expenditures.Sec. 920. RCW 18.04.105 and 2024 c 13 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:(1) A license to practice public accounting shall be granted by the board to any person:(a) Who is of good character. Good character, for purposes of this section, means lack of a history of dishonest or felonious acts. The board may refuse to grant a license on the ground of failure to satisfy this requirement only if there is a substantial connection between the lack of good character of the applicant and the professional and ethical responsibilities of a licensee and if the finding by the board of lack of good character is supported by a preponderance of evidence. When an applicant is found to be unqualified for a license because of a lack of good character, the board shall furnish the applicant a statement containing the findings of the board and a notice of the applicant's right of appeal;(b) Who has met the educational standards established by rule as the board determines to be appropriate;(c) Who has passed an examination;(d) Who has met the experience requirements established by rule by the board as it deems appropriate, which is gained:(i) Through the use of accounting, issuing reports, management advisory, financial advisory, tax, tax advisory, or consulting skills;(ii) While employed in government, industry, academia, or public practice; and(iii) Meeting the competency requirements in a manner as determined by the board to be appropriate and established by board rule; and(e) Who has paid appropriate application fees as established by rule by the board.(2) The examination described in subsection (1)(c) of this section shall test the applicant's knowledge of the subjects of accounting and auditing, and other related fields the board may specify by rule. The time for holding the examination is fixed by the board and may be changed from time to time. The board shall prescribe by rule the methods of applying for and taking the examination, including methods for grading examinations and determining a passing grade required of an applicant for a license. The board shall to the extent possible see to it that the grading of the examination, and the passing grades, are uniform with those applicable to all other states. The board may make use of all or a part of the uniform certified public accountant examination and advisory grading service of the American Institute of Certified Public Accountants and may contract with third parties to perform administrative services with respect to the examination as the board deems appropriate to assist it in performing its duties under this chapter. The board shall establish by rule provisions for transitioning to a new examination structure or to a new media for administering the examination.(3) The board shall charge each applicant an examination fee for the initial examination or for reexamination. The applicable fee shall be paid at the time an individual applies for examination, reexamination, or evaluation of educational qualifications. Fees for examination, reexamination, or evaluation of educational qualifications shall be determined by the board under this chapter. There is established in the state treasury an account to be known as the certified public accountants' account. All fees received from candidates to take any or all sections of the certified public accountant examination shall be used only for costs related to the examination, except during the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium, when the legislature may direct the state treasurer to make transfers of moneys in the certified public accountants' account to the general fund such amounts as reflect the excess fund balance of the account.(4) Individuals whose certificates are current and valid on June 30, 2024, will automatically be converted to a licensee in an inactive status. To activate a license and become an active licensee, the individual must apply to the board to activate the license and:(a) For applications to activate, the licensees must submit to the board documentation that they have gained one year of experience through the use of accounting, issuing reports, management advisory, financial advisory, tax, tax advisory, or consulting skills, without regard to the eight-year limitation set forth in (b) of this subsection, while employed in government, industry, academia, or public practice;(b) For applications submitted to the board before January 1, 2024, the individual must provide documentation to the board that they have one year of experience acquired within eight years prior to applying for a license through the use of accounting, issuing reports, management advisory, financial advisory, tax, tax advisory, or consulting skills in government, industry, academia, or public practice;(c) Meet competency requirements in a manner as determined by the board to be appropriate and established by board rule;(d) Submit to the board satisfactory proof of having completed an accumulation of one hundred twenty hours of CPE during the thirty-six months preceding the date of filing the petition;(e) Pay the appropriate fees established by rule by the board.(5) Individuals who did not hold a valid certificate on the conversion date of June 30, 2024, and who wish to apply for a license must apply as a new licensee and meet the requirements under subsection (1) of this section for initial licensure.(6) Licensees in good standing may request to have their license placed on inactive status. All licensees in inactive status, including those who converted from certificate to a license, are subject to the following conditions:(a) The licensee is prohibited from practicing public accounting;(b) The licensee must pay a renewal fee to maintain this status;(c) The licensee must comply with the applicable CPE requirements;(d) The licensee is subject to the requirements of this chapter and the rules adopted by the board.Sec. 921. RCW 18.20.430 and 2018 c 173 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:The assisted living facility temporary management account is created in the custody of the state treasurer. All receipts from civil penalties imposed under this chapter must be deposited into the account. Only the director or the director's designee may authorize expenditures from the account. The account is subject to allotment procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW, but an appropriation is not required for expenditures. Expenditures from the account may be used only for the protection of the health, safety, welfare, or property of residents of assisted living facilities found to be deficient. During the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium, the account may be expended for funding costs associated with the assisted living program. Uses of the account include, but are not limited to:(1) Payment for the costs of relocation of residents to other facilities;(2) Payment to maintain operation of an assisted living facility pending correction of deficiencies or closure, including payment of costs associated with temporary management authorized under this chapter;(3) Reimbursement of residents for personal funds or property lost or stolen when the resident's personal funds or property cannot be recovered from the assisted living facility or third-party insurer; and(4) The protection of the health, safety, welfare, and property of residents of assisted living facilities found to be noncompliant with licensing standards.Sec. 922. RCW 18.43.150 and 2019 c 442 s 14 are each amended to read as follows:The board shall set fees at a level adequate to pay the costs of administering this chapter. All fees collected under the provisions of RCW 18.43.050, 18.43.060, 18.43.080, 18.43.100, and 18.43.130 and fines collected under RCW 18.43.110 shall be paid into the professional engineers' account, which account is hereby established in the state treasury to be used to carry out the purposes and provisions of RCW 18.43.050, 18.43.060, 18.43.080, 18.43.100, 18.43.110, 18.43.120, 18.43.130, and all other duties required for operation and enforcement of this chapter. During the 2013-2015 ((and)), 2015-2017, and 2025-2027 fiscal biennia, the legislature may transfer moneys from the professional engineers' account to the state general fund such amounts as reflect the excess fund balance of the fund.Sec. 923. RCW 18.51.060 and 2011 c 336 s 486 are each amended to read as follows:(1) In any case in which the department finds that a licensee, or any partner, officer, director, owner of five percent or more of the assets of the nursing home, or managing employee failed or refused to comply with the requirements of this chapter or of chapter 74.42 RCW, or the standards, rules, and regulations established under them or, in the case of a medicaid contractor, failed or refused to comply with the medicaid requirements of Title XIX of the social security act, as amended, and regulations promulgated thereunder, the department may take any or all of the following actions:(a) Suspend, revoke, or refuse to renew a license;(b) Order stop placement;(c) Assess monetary penalties of a civil nature;(d) Deny payment to a nursing home for any medicaid resident admitted after notice to deny payment. Residents who are medicaid recipients shall not be responsible for payment when the department takes action under this subsection;(e) Appoint temporary management as provided in subsection (7) of this section.(2) The department may suspend, revoke, or refuse to renew a license, assess monetary penalties of a civil nature, or both, in any case in which it finds that the licensee, or any partner, officer, director, owner of five percent or more of the assets of the nursing home, or managing employee:(a) Operated a nursing home without a license or under a revoked or suspended license; or(b) Knowingly or with reason to know made a false statement of a material fact in his or her application for license or any data attached thereto, or in any matter under investigation by the department; or(c) Refused to allow representatives or agents of the department to inspect all books, records, and files required to be maintained or any portion of the premises of the nursing home; or(d) Willfully prevented, interfered with, or attempted to impede in any way the work of any duly authorized representative of the department and the lawful enforcement of any provision of this chapter or of chapter 74.42 RCW; or(e) Willfully prevented or interfered with any representative of the department in the preservation of evidence of any violation of any of the provisions of this chapter or of chapter 74.42 RCW or the standards, rules, and regulations adopted under them; or(f) Failed to report patient abuse or neglect in violation of chapter 70.124 RCW; or(g) Fails to pay any civil monetary penalty assessed by the department pursuant to this chapter within ten days after such assessment becomes final.(3) The department shall deny payment to a nursing home having a medicaid contract with respect to any medicaid-eligible individual admitted to the nursing home when:(a) The department finds the nursing home not in compliance with the requirements of Title XIX of the social security act, as amended, and regulations promulgated thereunder, and the facility has not complied with such requirements within three months; in such case, the department shall deny payment until correction has been achieved; or(b) The department finds on three consecutive standard surveys that the nursing home provided substandard quality of care; in such case, the department shall deny payment for new admissions until the facility has demonstrated to the satisfaction of the department that it is in compliance with medicaid requirements and that it will remain in compliance with such requirements.(4)(a) Civil penalties collected under this section or under chapter 74.42 RCW shall be deposited into a special fund administered by the department to be applied to the protection of the health or property of residents of nursing homes found to be deficient, including payment for the costs of relocation of residents to other facilities, maintenance of operation of a facility pending correction of deficiencies or closure, and reimbursement of residents for personal funds lost. During the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium, the fund may be expended for costs associated with nursing facilities.(b) Civil monetary penalties, if imposed, may be assessed and collected, with interest, for each day a nursing home is or was out of compliance. Civil monetary penalties shall not exceed three thousand dollars per violation. Each day upon which the same or a substantially similar action occurs is a separate violation subject to the assessment of a separate penalty.(c) Any civil penalty assessed under this section or chapter 74.46 RCW shall be a nonreimbursable item under chapter 74.46 RCW.(5)(a) The department shall order stop placement on a nursing home, effective upon oral or written notice, when the department determines:(i) The nursing home no longer substantially meets the requirements of chapter 18.51 or 74.42 RCW, or in the case of medicaid contractors, the requirements of Title XIX of the social security act, as amended, and any regulations promulgated under such statutes; and(ii) The deficiency or deficiencies in the nursing home:(A) Jeopardize the health and safety of the residents, or(B) Seriously limit the nursing home's capacity to provide adequate care.(b) When the department has ordered a stop placement, the department may approve a readmission to the nursing home from a hospital when the department determines the readmission would be in the best interest of the individual seeking readmission.(c) The department shall terminate the stop placement when:(i) The provider states in writing that the deficiencies necessitating the stop placement action have been corrected; and(ii) The department staff confirms in a timely fashion not to exceed fifteen working days that:(A) The deficiencies necessitating stop placement action have been corrected, and(B) The provider exhibits the capacity to maintain adequate care and service.(d) A nursing home provider shall have the right to an informal review to present written evidence to refute the deficiencies cited as the basis for the stop placement. A request for an informal review must be made in writing within ten days of the effective date of the stop placement.(e) A stop placement shall not be delayed or suspended because the nursing home requests a hearing pursuant to chapter 34.05 RCW or an informal review. The stop placement shall remain in effect until:(i) The department terminates the stop placement; or(ii) The stop placement is terminated by a final agency order, after a hearing, pursuant to chapter 34.05 RCW.(6) If the department determines that an emergency exists as a result of a nursing home's failure or refusal to comply with requirements of this chapter or, in the case of a medicaid contractor, its failure or refusal to comply with medicaid requirements of Title XIX of the social security act, as amended, and rules adopted thereunder, the department may suspend the nursing home's license and order the immediate closure of the nursing home, the immediate transfer of residents, or both.(7) If the department determines that the health or safety of residents is immediately jeopardized as a result of a nursing home's failure or refusal to comply with requirements of this chapter or, in the case of a medicaid contractor, its failure or refusal to comply with medicaid requirements of Title XIX of the social security act, as amended, and rules adopted thereunder, the department may appoint temporary management to:(a) Oversee the operation of the facility; and(b) Ensure the health and safety of the facilities residents while:(i) Orderly closure of the facility occurs; or(ii) The deficiencies necessitating temporary management are corrected.(8) The department shall by rule specify criteria as to when and how the sanctions specified in this section shall be applied. Such criteria shall provide for the imposition of incrementally more severe penalties for deficiencies that are repeated, uncorrected, pervasive, or present a threat to the health, safety, or welfare of the residents.Sec. 924. RCW 18.85.061 and 2016 sp.s. c 36 s 914 are each amended to read as follows:All fees required under this chapter shall be set by the director in accordance with RCW 43.24.086 and shall be paid to the state treasurer. All fees paid under the provisions of this chapter shall be placed in the real estate commission account in the state treasury. All money derived from fines imposed under this chapter shall be deposited in the real estate education program account created in RCW 18.85.321. During the 2013-2015 ((and)), 2015-2017, and 2025-2027 fiscal ((biennium [biennia]))biennia, the legislature may transfer to the state general fund such amounts as reflect the excess fund balance in the real estate commission account.Sec. 925. RCW 19.28.351 and 2013 2nd sp.s. c 4 s 956 are each amended to read as follows:All sums received from licenses, permit fees, or other sources, herein shall be paid to the state treasurer and placed in a special fund designated as the "electrical license fund," and paid out upon vouchers duly and regularly issued therefor and approved by the director of labor and industries or the director's designee following determination by the board that the sums are necessary to accomplish the intent of this chapter (( 19.28 RCW)). The treasurer shall keep an accurate record of payments into, or receipts of, the fund, and of all disbursements therefrom.During the 2013-2015 ((biennium))and 2025-2027 fiscal biennia, the legislature may transfer moneys from the electrical license fund to the state general fund such amounts as reflect the excess fund balance of the fund.Sec. 926. RCW 28B.76.525 and 2020 c 357 s 910 are each amended to read as follows:(1) The state financial aid account is created in the custody of the state treasurer. The primary purpose of the account is to ensure that all appropriations designated for financial aid through statewide student financial aid programs are made available to eligible students. The account shall be a nontreasury account.(2) The office shall deposit in the account all money received for the Washington college grant program established under chapter 28B.92 RCW, the state work-study program established under chapter 28B.12 RCW, the Washington scholars program established under RCW 28A.600.110, the Washington award for vocational excellence program established under RCW 28C.04.525, and the educational opportunity grant program established under chapter 28B.101 RCW. The account shall consist of funds appropriated by the legislature for the programs listed in this subsection and private contributions to the programs. Moneys deposited in the account do not lapse at the close of the fiscal period for which they were appropriated. Both during and after the fiscal period in which moneys were deposited in the account, the office may expend moneys in the account only for the purposes for which they were appropriated, and the expenditures are subject to any other conditions or limitations placed on the appropriations.(3) Expenditures from the account shall be used for scholarships to students eligible for the programs according to program rules and policies. For the 2019-2021 fiscal biennium, expenditures may also be used for scholarship awards in the passport to career program established under chapter 28B.117 RCW. It is the intent of the legislature that this policy will be continued in subsequent fiscal biennia.(4) Disbursements from the account are exempt from appropriations and the allotment provisions of chapter 43.88 RCW.(5) Only the director of the office or the director's designee may authorize expenditures from the account.(6) During the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium, the legislature may direct the state treasurer to transfer money in the state financial aid account to the state general fund.Sec. 927. RCW 28B.93.060 and 2023 c 475 s 924 and 2023 c 389 s 7 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:(1) The Washington student loan account is created in the state treasury. All receipts from the Washington student loan program must be deposited in the account. Expenditures from the account may be used only for administration and the issuance of new student loans. Moneys in the account may be spent only after appropriation. During the 2023-2025 and 2025-2027 fiscal ((biennium))biennia, the legislature may direct the state treasurer to make transfers of moneys in the Washington student loan account to the state general fund.(2)(a) The legislature may appropriate no more than a total of $40,000,000 for the program during four consecutive fiscal years, beginning with the first fiscal year from which loans are issued from the account. In the fifth fiscal year following the fiscal year in which the first student loan was issued, the legislature may appropriate up to $10,000,000 for the program.(b) The legislature may appropriate moneys from the account for the administrative and implementation costs of the program in the fiscal years prior to the first fiscal year in which loans are issued from the account.Sec. 928. RCW 28B.99.030 and 2018 c 209 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:(1) The medical student loan account is created in the custody of the state treasurer. Only the executive director of the office or the executive director's designee may authorize expenditures from the account. No appropriation is required for expenditures from the account for medical student loans. An appropriation is required for expenditures from the account for costs associated with program administration by the office.(2) The office shall deposit into the account all moneys received for the program. Revenues to the account consist of moneys received for the program by the office, including grants and donations, and receipts from participant repayments, including principal and interest.(3) Expenditures from the account may be used solely for medical student loans to participants in the program established by this chapter and costs associated with program administration by the office.(4) During the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium, the legislature may direct the state treasurer to transfer money in the medical student loan account to the state general fund.Sec. 929. RCW 28C.04.535 and 2019 c 415 s 955 are each amended to read as follows:Except for the 2018-19, 2019-20, ((and)) 2020-21, and 2026-27 school years, the Washington award for vocational excellence shall be granted annually. It is the intent of the legislature to continue the policy of not granting the Washington award for vocational excellence in the 2019-20 ((and)), 2020-21, 2027-28, and 2028-29 school years. The workforce training and education coordinating board shall notify the students receiving the award, their vocational instructors, local chambers of commerce, the legislators of their respective districts, and the governor, after final selections have been made. The workforce training and education coordinating board, in conjunction with the governor's office, shall prepare appropriate certificates to be presented to the selected students. Awards shall be presented in public ceremonies at times and places determined by the workforce training and education coordinating board in cooperation with the office of the governor.Sec. 930. RCW 28C.10.082 and 2014 c 11 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:The tuition recovery trust fund is hereby established in the custody of the state treasurer. The agency shall deposit in the fund all moneys received under RCW 28C.10.084. Moneys in the fund may be spent only for the purposes under RCW 28C.10.084. Disbursements from the fund shall be on authorization of the agency. Disbursements from the fund shall only be used to reimburse students who are Washington state residents, or agencies or businesses that pay tuition and fees on behalf of Washington students. During the 2013-2015 fiscal biennium, the legislature may transfer from the tuition recovery trust fund to the state general fund such amounts as reflect the excess fund balance in the fund. During the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium, moneys in the fund may also be used to cover the costs associated with the agency's administration, including private vocational school licensing and the veterans program. The fund is subject to the allotment procedure provided under chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required for disbursements.Sec. 931. RCW 34.12.130 and 1982 c 189 s 9 are each amended to read as follows:The administrative hearings revolving fund is hereby created in the state treasury for the purpose of centralized funding, accounting, and distribution of the actual costs of the services provided to agencies of the state government by the office of administrative hearings. During the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium, the legislature may direct the state treasurer to make transfers of moneys in the administrative hearings revolving fund to the general fund such amounts as reflect the excess fund balance of the fund.Sec. 932. RCW 36.22.175 and 2019 c 448 s 5 and 2019 c 372 s 3 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:(1)(a) In addition to any other charge authorized by law, the county auditor shall charge a surcharge of one dollar per instrument for each document recorded. Revenue generated through this surcharge shall be transmitted monthly to the state treasurer for deposit in the local government archives account under RCW 40.14.024. These funds shall be used solely for providing records scheduling, security microfilm inspection and storage, archival preservation, cataloging, and indexing for local government records and digital data and access to those records and data through the regional branch archives of the division of archives and records management.(b) The division of archives and records management within the office of the secretary of state shall provide records management training for local governments and shall establish a competitive grant program to solicit and prioritize project proposals from local governments for potential funding to be paid for by funds from the auditor surcharge and tax warrant surcharge revenues. Application for specific projects may be made by local government agencies only. The state archivist in consultation with the advisory committee established under RCW 40.14.027 shall adopt rules governing project eligibility, evaluation, awarding of grants, and other criteria including requirements for records management training for grant recipients.(2) The advisory committee established under RCW 40.14.027 shall review grant proposals and establish a prioritized list of projects to be considered for funding by January 1st of each even-numbered year, beginning in 2002. The evaluation of proposals and development of the prioritized list must be developed through open public meetings. Funding for projects shall be granted according to the ranking of each application on the prioritized list and projects will be funded only to the extent that funds are available. A grant award may have an effective date other than the date the project is placed on the prioritized list.(3) In addition to any other surcharge authorized by law, the county auditor shall charge a surcharge of one dollar per instrument for every document recorded after January 1, 2002. Revenue generated through this surcharge shall be transmitted to the state treasurer monthly for deposit in the following accounts, fifty percent of the surcharge authorized by this subsection shall be reverted to the local government archives account as prescribed in RCW 40.14.024 for maintenance and operation of the specialized regional archive facility located in eastern Washington and fifty percent of the surcharge authorized by this section shall be reverted to the account created in RCW 43.07.410 for payment of the financing contract entered into by the secretary of state for the Washington state library-archives building.(4) In addition to any other surcharge authorized by law, the county auditor shall charge a surcharge of one dollar per instrument for every document recorded. Revenue generated through this surcharge shall be transmitted to the state treasurer monthly for deposit in the local government archives account under RCW 40.14.024 to be used exclusively for the competitive grant program in RCW 40.14.026 or, during the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium, the administrative costs of the state archives, and for the attorney general's consultation program and state archivist's training services authorized in RCW 42.56.570.Sec. 933. RCW 39.12.080 and 2018 c 299 s 923 are each amended to read as follows:The public works administration account is created in the state treasury. The department of labor and industries shall deposit in the account all moneys received from fees or civil penalties collected under RCW 39.12.050, 39.12.065, and 39.12.070. Appropriations from the account may be made only for the purposes of administration of this chapter, including, but not limited to, the performance of adequate wage surveys, and for the investigation and enforcement of all alleged violations of this chapter as provided for in this chapter and chapters 49.48 and 49.52 RCW. During the 2017-2019 fiscal biennium the legislature may direct the state treasurer to make transfers of moneys in the public works administration account to the state general fund. It is the intent of the legislature to use the moneys transferred in the 2017-2019 biennium to support apprenticeship programs. During the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium, the legislature may direct the state treasurer to make transfers of moneys in the public works administration account to the general fund such amounts as reflect the excess fund balance of the account.Sec. 934. RCW 40.14.024 and 2017 c 303 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:The local government archives account is created in the state treasury. All receipts collected by the county auditors under RCW 40.14.027 and 36.22.175 for local government services, such as providing records schedule compliance, security microfilm inspection and storage, archival preservation, cataloging, and indexing for local government records and digital data and access to those records and data through the regional branch archives of the division of archives and records management, must be deposited into the account, and expenditures from the account may be used only for these purposes. Any amounts deposited in the account in accordance with RCW 36.22.175(4) may only be expended for the purposes authorized under that provision as follows: No more than fifty percent of funding may be used for the attorney general's consultation program and the state archivist's training services, and the remainder is to be used for the competitive grant program, except that during the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium the competitive grant program may be suspended or reduced and the remainder used for administrative costs of the state archives.Sec. 935. RCW 40.14.025 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 50 s 932 are each amended to read as follows:(1) The secretary of state and the director of financial management shall jointly establish a procedure and formula for allocating the costs of services provided by the division of archives and records management to state agencies. The total amount allotted for services to state agencies shall not exceed the appropriation to the archives and records management account during any allotment period.(2) There is created the public records efficiency, preservation, and access account in the state treasury which shall consist of all fees and charges collected under this section. The account shall be appropriated exclusively for the payment of costs and expenses incurred in the operation of the division of archives and records management as specified by law.(3) During the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium, moneys in the account may also be transferred into the Washington state library operations fund.Sec. 936. RCW 40.14.026 and 2019 c 372 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:(1) The division of archives and records management in the office of the secretary of state must establish and administer a competitive grant program for local agencies to improve technology information systems for public record retention, management, and disclosure, and any related training, except that during the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium the competitive grant program may be suspended or reduced. The division of archives and records management may use up to six percent of amounts appropriated for the program for administration of the grant program.(2) Any local agency may apply to the grant program. The division of archives and records management in the office of the secretary of state must award grants annually. The division of archives and records management must consult with the chief information officer to develop the criteria for grant recipient selection with a preference given to small local governmental agencies based on the applicant agency's need and ability to improve its information technology systems for public record retention, management, and disclosure. The division of archives and records management may award grants for specific hardware, software, equipment, technology services management and training needs, indexing for local records and digital data, and other resources for improving information technology systems. To the extent possible, information technology systems, processes, training, and other resources for improving information technology systems for records retention and distribution may be replicated and shared with other governmental entities. Grants are provided for one-time investments and are not an ongoing source of revenue for operation or management costs. A grantee may not supplant local funding with grant funding provided by the office of the secretary of state.(3) The joint legislative audit and review committee must conduct a review of the attorney general's consultation program and the state archivist's training services created under section 4, chapter 303, Laws of 2017, and the local government competitive grant program created under this section. The review must include:(a)(i) Information on the number of local governments served, the types of consultation and training provided, and the implementation of any practices adopted from the attorney general's consultation program and the state archivist's training services; and(ii) The effectiveness of the consultation program and the training services in providing assistance for local governments; and(b)(i) Information on the number of local governments that applied for and participated in the competitive grant program under this section, the amount of funding awarded through the grant program, and how such funding was used; and(ii) The effectiveness of the grant program in improving local government technology information systems for public records retention, management, disclosure, and training.(4) Each agency shall maintain a log of public records requests submitted to and processed by the agency, which shall include but not be limited to the following information for each request: The identity of the requestor if provided by the requestor, the date the request was received, the text of the original request, a description of the records produced in response to the request, a description of the records redacted or withheld and the reasons therefor, and the date of the final disposition of the request. The log must be retained by the agency in accordance with the relevant record retention schedule established under this chapter, and shall be a public record subject to disclosure under chapter 42.56 RCW.(5) To improve best practices for dissemination of public records, each agency with actual staff and legal costs associated with fulfilling public records requests of at least one hundred thousand dollars during the prior fiscal year must, and each agency with such estimated costs of less than one hundred thousand dollars during the prior fiscal year may, report to the joint legislative audit and review committee by July 1st of each subsequent year the following metrics, measured over the preceding year:(a) The number of requests where the agency provided the requested records within five days of receiving the request.(b) The number of requests where the agency provided a time estimate for providing responsive records beyond five days after receiving the request.(c) The average and median number of days from receipt of request to the date the request is closed.(d) The number of requests where the agency formally sought additional clarification from the requestor;(e) The number of requests denied in full or in part and the most common reasons for denying requests;(f) The number of requests abandoned by requestors;(g) To the extent the information is known by the agency, requests by type of requestor, including individuals, law firms, organizations, insurers, governments, incarcerated persons, the media, anonymous requestors, current or former employees, and others;(h) Which portion of requests were fulfilled electronically compared to requests fulfilled by physical records;(i) The number of requests where the agency scanned physical records electronically to fulfill disclosure;(j) The total estimated agency staff time spent on each individual request;(k) The estimated costs incurred by the agency in fulfilling records requests, including costs for staff compensation and legal review, and a measure of the average cost per request;(l) The number of claims filed alleging a violation of chapter 42.56 RCW or other public records statutes in the past year involving the agency, categorized by type and exemption at issue, if applicable;(m) The costs incurred by the agency litigating claims alleging a violation of chapter 42.56 RCW or other public records statutes in the past year, including any penalties imposed on the agency;(n) The costs incurred by the agency with managing and retaining records, including staff compensation and purchases of equipment, hardware, software, and services to manage and retain public records; and(o) Expenses recovered by the agency from requestors for fulfilling public records requests, including any customized service charges.(6) The joint legislative audit and review committee must consult with state and local agencies to develop a reporting method and clearly define standardized metrics in accordance with this section.(7) By December 1, 2019, the joint legislative audit and review committee must report to the legislature on its findings from the review, including recommendations on whether the competitive grant program, the attorney general's consultation program, and the state archivist's training services should continue or be allowed to expire.Sec. 937. RCW 41.05.120 and 2023 c 435 s 10 are each amended to read as follows:(1) The public employees' and retirees' insurance account is hereby established in the custody of the state treasurer, to be used by the director for the deposit of contributions, the remittance paid by school districts and educational service districts under RCW 28A.400.410, reserves, dividends, and refunds, for payment of premiums and claims for employee and retiree insurance benefit contracts and subsidy amounts provided under RCW 41.05.085, and transfers from the flexible spending administrative account as authorized in RCW 41.05.123. Moneys from the account shall be disbursed by the state treasurer by warrants on vouchers duly authorized by the director. Moneys from the account may be transferred to the flexible spending administrative account to provide reserves and start-up costs for the operation of the flexible spending administrative account program. During the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium, the legislature may direct the state treasurer to transfer money in the public employees' and retirees' insurance account to the state general fund.(2) The state treasurer and the state investment board may invest moneys in the public employees' and retirees' insurance account. All such investments shall be in accordance with RCW 43.84.080 or 43.84.150, whichever is applicable. The director shall determine whether the state treasurer or the state investment board or both shall invest moneys in the public employees' and retirees' insurance account.(3) The school employees' insurance account is hereby established in the custody of the state treasurer, to be used by the director for the deposit of contributions, reserves, dividends, and refunds, for payment of premiums and claims for school employee insurance benefit contracts, and for transfers from the school employees' benefits board flexible spending and dependent care administrative account as authorized in this subsection. Moneys from the account shall be disbursed by the state treasurer by warrants on vouchers duly authorized by the director. Moneys from the account may be transferred to the school employees' benefits board flexible spending and dependent care administrative account to provide reserves and start-up costs for the operation of the school employees' benefits board flexible spending arrangement and dependent care assistance program. During the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium, the legislature may direct the state treasurer to transfer money in the school employees' insurance account to the state general fund.(4) The state treasurer and the state investment board may invest moneys in the school employees' insurance account. These investments must be in accordance with RCW 43.84.080 or 43.84.150, whichever is applicable. The director shall determine whether the state treasurer or the state investment board or both shall invest moneys in the school employees' insurance account.(5) Moneys may be transferred between the public employees' and retirees' insurance account and the school employees' insurance account for short-term cash management and cash balance purposes.Sec. 938. RCW 41.06.280 and 2023 c 435 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:(1) The personnel service fund is created in the state treasury, to be used by the office of financial management as a revolving fund for the payment of salaries, wages, and operations required for the administration of the provisions of this chapter, applicable provisions of chapter 41.04 RCW, and chapter 41.60 RCW. An amount not to exceed one and one-half percent of the salaries and wages for all positions in each of the agencies subject to this chapter, except the institutions of higher education, shall be charged to the operations appropriations of each agency and credited to the personnel service fund as the allotments are approved pursuant to chapter 43.88 RCW. Subject to the above limitations, the amount shall be charged against the allotments pro rata, at a rate to be fixed by the director from time to time which, together with income derived from services rendered under RCW 41.06.080, will provide the office of financial management with funds to meet its anticipated expenditures during the allotment period, including the training requirements in RCW 41.06.500 and 41.06.530.(2) The director shall fix the terms and charges for services rendered by the office of financial management pursuant to RCW 41.06.080, which amounts shall be credited to the personnel service fund and charged against the proper fund or appropriation of the recipient of such services no longer than on a quarterly basis. Payment for services so rendered under RCW 41.06.080 shall be made according to the state administrative and accounting manual (SAAM) to the state treasurer and deposited in the personnel service fund.(3) The office of financial management may use the personnel service fund to administer an employee transit pass program and other employment benefits. The office of financial management must bill state agencies for the total cost of administering the program and payments received from agencies must be deposited in the personnel service fund.(4) During the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium, moneys in the account may also be transferred into the state general fund.Sec. 939. RCW 41.06.285 and 2023 c 435 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:(1) The higher education personnel service fund is created in the state treasury, to be used by the office of financial management as a revolving fund for the payment of salaries, wages, and operations required for the administration of the provisions of this chapter and applicable provisions of chapters 41.04 and 41.60 RCW. An amount not to exceed one-half of one percent of the salaries and wages for all positions in the classified service shall be contributed from the operations appropriations of each institution and the state board for community and technical colleges and credited to the higher education personnel service fund as such allotments are approved pursuant to chapter 43.88 RCW. Subject to the above limitations, such amount shall be charged against the allotments pro rata, at a rate to be fixed by the director of financial management from time to time, which will provide the office of financial management with funds to meet its anticipated expenditures during the allotment period.(2) During the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium, moneys in the account may also be transferred into the state general fund.Sec. 940. RCW 41.26.450 and 2023 c 475 s 927 and 2023 c 77 s 3 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:(1) Port districts established under Title 53 RCW, institutions of higher education as defined in RCW 28B.10.016, and tribal governments participating through a state-tribal compact as defined in RCW 41.26.565 shall contribute both the employer and state shares of the cost of the retirement system for any of their employees who are law enforcement officers.(2) Institutions of higher education shall contribute both the employer and the state shares of the cost of the retirement system for any of their employees who are firefighters.(3) During fiscal years 2018 and 2019 and during the 2019-2021, 2021-2023, ((and)) 2023-2025, and 2025-2027 fiscal biennia:When an employer charges a fee or recovers costs for work performed by a plan member where:(a) The member receives compensation that is includable as basic salary under RCW 41.26.030(4)(b); and(b) The service is provided, whether directly or indirectly, to an entity that is not an "employer" under RCW 41.26.030(14)(b);the employer shall contribute both the employer and state shares of the cost of the retirement system contributions for that compensation. Nothing in this subsection prevents an employer from recovering the cost of the contribution from the entity receiving services from the member.Sec. 941. RCW 41.50.110 and 2015 3rd sp.s. c 4 s 951 are each amended to read as follows:(1) Except as provided by RCW 41.50.255 and subsection (6) of this section, all expenses of the administration of the department, the expenses of administration of the retirement systems, and the expenses of the administration of the office of the state actuary created in chapters 2.10, 2.12, 28B.10, 41.26, 41.32, 41.40, 41.34, 41.35, 41.37, 43.43, and 44.44 RCW shall be paid from the department of retirement systems expense fund.(2) In order to reimburse the department of retirement systems expense fund on an equitable basis the department shall ascertain and report to each employer, as defined in RCW 28B.10.400, 41.26.030, 41.32.010, 41.35.010, 41.37.010, or 41.40.010, the sum necessary to defray its proportional share of the entire expense of the administration of the retirement system that the employer participates in during the ensuing biennium or fiscal year whichever may be required. Such sum is to be computed in an amount directly proportional to the estimated entire expense of the administration as the ratio of monthly salaries of the employer's members bears to the total salaries of all members in the entire system. It shall then be the duty of all such employers to include in their budgets or otherwise provide the amounts so required.(3) The department shall compute and bill each employer, as defined in RCW 28B.10.400, 41.26.030, 41.32.010, 41.35.010, 41.37.010, or 41.40.010, at the end of each month for the amount due for that month to the department of retirement systems expense fund and the same shall be paid as are its other obligations. Such computation as to each employer shall be made on a percentage rate of salary established by the department. However, the department may at its discretion establish a system of billing based upon calendar year quarters in which event the said billing shall be at the end of each such quarter.(4) The director may adjust the expense fund contribution rate for each system at any time when necessary to reflect unanticipated costs or savings in administering the department.(5) An employer who fails to submit timely and accurate reports to the department may be assessed an additional fee related to the increased costs incurred by the department in processing the deficient reports. Fees paid under this subsection shall be deposited in the retirement system expense fund.(a) Every six months the department shall determine the amount of an employer's fee by reviewing the timeliness and accuracy of the reports submitted by the employer in the preceding six months. If those reports were not both timely and accurate the department may prospectively assess an additional fee under this subsection.(b) An additional fee assessed by the department under this subsection shall not exceed fifty percent of the standard fee.(c) The department shall adopt rules implementing this section.(6) Expenses other than those under RCW 41.34.060(4) shall be paid pursuant to subsection (1) of this section.(7) During the ((2009-2011 and 2011-2013 fiscal biennia))2025-2027 fiscal biennium, the legislature may direct the state treasurer to transfer ((from))money in the department of retirement systems' expense fund to the state general fund ((such amounts as reflect the excess fund balance of the fund. During the 2015-2017 fiscal biennium, state contributions to the judicial retirement system may be made in part by appropriations from the department of retirement systems expense fund)).Sec. 942. RCW 41.50.150 and 2004 c 242 s 47 are each amended to read as follows:(1) The employer of any employee whose retirement benefits are based in part on excess compensation, as defined in this section, shall, upon receipt of a billing from the department, pay into the appropriate retirement system the present value at the time of the employee's retirement of the total estimated cost of all present and future benefits from the retirement system attributable to the excess compensation. The state actuary shall determine the estimated cost using the same method and procedure as is used in preparing fiscal note costs for the legislature. However, the director may in the director's discretion decline to bill the employer if the amount due is less than fifty dollars. Accounts unsettled within thirty days of the receipt of the billing shall be assessed an interest penalty of one percent of the amount due for each month or fraction thereof beyond the original thirty-day period.(2) "Excess compensation," as used in this section, includes the following payments, if used in the calculation of the employee's retirement allowance:(a) A cash out of unused annual leave in excess of two hundred forty hours of such leave. "Cash out" for purposes of this subsection means:(i) Any payment in lieu of an accrual of annual leave; or(ii) Any payment added to salary or wages, concurrent with a reduction of annual leave;(b) A cash out of any other form of leave;(c) A payment for, or in lieu of, any personal expense or transportation allowance to the extent that payment qualifies as reportable compensation in the member's retirement system;(d)(i) The portion of any payment, including overtime payments, that exceeds twice the regular daily or hourly rate of pay; and(ii) During the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium, the portion of any payment, including overtime payments, that exceeds one and one-half the regular daily or hourly rate of pay; and(e) Any termination or severance payment.(3) This section applies to the retirement systems listed in RCW 41.50.030 and to retirements occurring on or after March 15, 1984. Nothing in this section is intended to amend or determine the meaning of any definition in chapter 2.10, 2.12, 41.26, 41.32, 41.40, 41.35, 41.37, or 43.43 RCW or to determine in any manner what payments are includable in the calculation of a retirement allowance under such chapters.(4) An employer is not relieved of liability under this section because of the death of any person either before or after the billing from the department.Sec. 943. RCW 41.50.255 and 2004 c 242 s 49 are each amended to read as follows:The director is authorized to pay from the interest earnings of the trust funds of the public employees' retirement system, the teachers' retirement system, the Washington state patrol retirement system, the Washington judicial retirement system, the judges' retirement system, the school employees' retirement system, the public safety employees' retirement system, or the law enforcement officers' and firefighters' retirement system lawful obligations of the appropriate system for legal ((expenses and)), medical, and, during the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium, administrative expenses, which expenses are primarily incurred for the purpose of protecting or preventing losses from the appropriate trust fund or are incurred in compliance with statutes governing such funds.The term "legal expense" includes, but is not limited to, legal services provided through the legal services revolving fund, fees for expert witnesses, travel expenses, fees for court reporters, cost of transcript preparation, and reproduction of documents.The term "medical ((costs))expense" includes, but is not limited to, expenses for the medical examination or reexamination of members or retirees, the costs of preparation of medical reports, and fees charged by medical professionals for attendance at discovery proceedings or hearings.The term "administrative expenses" includes, but is not limited to, expenses incurred to prevent losses to the trust funds such as audits, cybersecurity, petition decisions, departmental liaison work with the attorney general's office, and other similar expenses incurred by the department to ensure that trust funds are protected against risks that might lead to losses from the trust funds.The director may also pay from the interest earnings of the trust funds specified in this section costs incurred in investigating fraud and collecting overpayments, including expenses incurred to review and investigate cases of possible fraud against the trust funds and collection agency fees and other costs incurred in recovering overpayments. Recovered funds must be returned to the appropriate trust funds.Sec. 944. RCW 41.80.010 and 2022 c 297 s 951 are each amended to read as follows:(1) For the purpose of negotiating collective bargaining agreements under this chapter, the employer shall be represented by the governor or governor's designee, except as provided for institutions of higher education in subsection (4) of this section.(2)(a)(i) Except as otherwise provided, if an exclusive bargaining representative represents more than one bargaining unit, the exclusive bargaining representative shall negotiate with each employer representative as designated in subsection (1) of this section one master collective bargaining agreement on behalf of all the employees in bargaining units that the exclusive bargaining representative represents.(ii) For those exclusive bargaining representatives who represent fewer than a total of five hundred employees each, negotiation shall be by a coalition of all those exclusive bargaining representatives. The coalition shall bargain for a master collective bargaining agreement covering all of the employees represented by the coalition. The governor's designee and the exclusive bargaining representative or representatives are authorized to enter into supplemental bargaining of agency-specific issues for inclusion in or as an addendum to the master collective bargaining agreement, subject to the parties' agreement regarding the issues and procedures for supplemental bargaining. Exclusive bargaining representatives that represent employees covered under chapter 41.06 RCW and exclusive bargaining representatives that represent employees exempt under chapter 41.06 RCW shall constitute separate coalitions and must negotiate separate master collective bargaining agreements. This subsection does not prohibit cooperation and coordination of bargaining between two or more exclusive bargaining representatives.(b) This subsection does not apply to exclusive bargaining representatives who represent employees of institutions of higher education, except when the institution of higher education has elected to exercise its option under subsection (4) of this section to have its negotiations conducted by the governor or governor's designee under the procedures provided for general government agencies in subsections (1) through (3) of this section.(c) If five hundred or more employees of an independent state elected official listed in RCW 43.01.010 are organized in a bargaining unit or bargaining units under RCW 41.80.070, the official shall be consulted by the governor or the governor's designee before any agreement is reached under (a) of this subsection concerning supplemental bargaining of agency specific issues affecting the employees in such bargaining unit.(d) For assistant attorneys general, the governor or the governor's designee and an exclusive bargaining representative shall negotiate one master collective bargaining agreement.(3) The governor shall submit a request for funds necessary to implement the compensation and fringe benefit provisions in the master collective bargaining agreement or for legislation necessary to implement the agreement. Requests for funds necessary to implement the provisions of bargaining agreements shall not be submitted to the legislature by the governor unless such requests:(a) Have been submitted to the director of the office of financial management by October 1 prior to the legislative session at which the requests are to be considered; and(b) Have been certified by the director of the office of financial management as being feasible financially for the state.The legislature shall approve or reject the submission of the request for funds as a whole. The legislature shall not consider a request for funds to implement a collective bargaining agreement unless the request is transmitted to the legislature as part of the governor's budget document submitted under RCW 43.88.030 and 43.88.060. If the legislature rejects or fails to act on the submission, either party may reopen all or part of the agreement or the exclusive bargaining representative may seek to implement the procedures provided for in RCW 41.80.090.(4)(a)(i) For the purpose of negotiating agreements for institutions of higher education, the employer shall be the respective governing board of each of the universities, colleges, or community colleges or a designee chosen by the board to negotiate on its behalf.(ii) A governing board of a university or college may elect to have its negotiations conducted by the governor or governor's designee under the procedures provided for general government agencies in subsections (1) through (3) of this section, except that:(A) The governor or the governor's designee and an exclusive bargaining representative shall negotiate one master collective bargaining agreement for all of the bargaining units of employees of a university or college that the representative represents; or(B) If the parties mutually agree, the governor or the governor's designee and an exclusive bargaining representative shall negotiate one master collective bargaining agreement for all of the bargaining units of employees of more than one university or college that the representative represents.(iii) A governing board of a community college may elect to have its negotiations conducted by the governor or governor's designee under the procedures provided for general government agencies in subsections (1) through (3) of this section.(b) Prior to entering into negotiations under this chapter, the institutions of higher education or their designees shall consult with the director of the office of financial management regarding financial and budgetary issues that are likely to arise in the impending negotiations.(c)(i) In the case of bargaining agreements reached between institutions of higher education other than the University of Washington and exclusive bargaining representatives agreed to under the provisions of this chapter, if appropriations are necessary to implement the compensation and fringe benefit provisions of the bargaining agreements, the governor shall submit a request for such funds to the legislature according to the provisions of subsection (3) of this section, except as provided in (c)(iii) of this subsection.(ii) In the case of bargaining agreements reached between the University of Washington and exclusive bargaining representatives agreed to under the provisions of this chapter, if appropriations are necessary to implement the compensation and fringe benefit provisions of a bargaining agreement, the governor shall submit a request for such funds to the legislature according to the provisions of subsection (3) of this section, except as provided in this subsection (4)(c)(ii) and as provided in (c)(iii) of this subsection.(A) If appropriations of less than ten thousand dollars are necessary to implement the provisions of a bargaining agreement, a request for such funds shall not be submitted to the legislature by the governor unless the request has been submitted to the director of the office of financial management by October 1 prior to the legislative session at which the request is to be considered.(B) If appropriations of ten thousand dollars or more are necessary to implement the provisions of a bargaining agreement, a request for such funds shall not be submitted to the legislature by the governor unless the request:(I) Has been submitted to the director of the office of financial management by October 1 prior to the legislative session at which the request is to be considered; and(II) Has been certified by the director of the office of financial management as being feasible financially for the state.(C) If the director of the office of financial management does not certify a request under (c)(ii)(B) of this subsection as being feasible financially for the state, the parties shall enter into collective bargaining solely for the purpose of reaching a mutually agreed upon modification of the agreement necessary to address the absence of those requested funds. The legislature may act upon the compensation and fringe benefit provisions of the modified collective bargaining agreement if those provisions are agreed upon and submitted to the office of financial management and legislative budget committees before final legislative action on the biennial or supplemental operating budget by the sitting legislature.(iii) In the case of a bargaining unit of employees of institutions of higher education in which the exclusive bargaining representative is certified during or after the conclusion of a legislative session, the legislature may act upon the compensation and fringe benefit provisions of the unit's initial collective bargaining agreement if those provisions are agreed upon and submitted to the office of financial management and legislative budget committees before final legislative action on the biennial or supplemental operating budget by the sitting legislature.(5) If, after the compensation and fringe benefit provisions of an agreement are approved by the legislature, a significant revenue shortfall occurs resulting in reduced appropriations, as declared by proclamation of the governor or by resolution of the legislature, both parties shall immediately enter into collective bargaining for a mutually agreed upon modification of the agreement.(6) After the expiration date of a collective bargaining agreement negotiated under this chapter, all of the terms and conditions specified in the collective bargaining agreement remain in effect until the effective date of a subsequently negotiated agreement, not to exceed one year from the expiration date stated in the agreement. Thereafter, the employer may unilaterally implement according to law.(7)(a) ((For the 2019-2021 fiscal biennium, the legislature may approve funding for a collective bargaining agreement negotiated by a higher education institution and the Washington federation of state employees and ratified by the exclusive bargaining representative before final legislative action on the omnibus appropriations act by the sitting legislature.(b) Subsection (3)(a) and (b) of this section do not apply to requests for funding made pursuant to this subsection.(8)(a) For the 2021-2023 fiscal biennium, the legislature may approve funding for a collective bargaining agreement negotiated by the governor or governor's designee and the Washington public employees association community college coalition and the general government agencies and ratified by the exclusive bargaining representative before final legislative action on the omnibus appropriations act by the sitting legislature.(b) For the 2021-2023 fiscal biennium, the legislature may approve funding for a collective bargaining agreement negotiated between Highline Community College and the Washington public employees association and ratified by the exclusive bargaining representative before final legislative action on the omnibus appropriations act by the sitting legislature.(c) For the 2021-2023 fiscal biennium, the legislature may approve funding for collective bargaining agreements negotiated between Eastern Washington University and bargaining units of the Washington federation of state employees and the public school employees association, and between Yakima Valley College and the Washington public employees association, and ratified by the exclusive bargaining representatives before final legislative action on the omnibus appropriations act by the sitting legislature.(d)))For the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium, the legislature may approve funding for a collective bargaining agreement negotiated by a higher education institution and the western Washington university fraternal order of police and ratified by the exclusive bargaining representative by October 5, 2024.(b) Subsection (3)(a) and (b) of this section ((does))do not apply to requests for funding made pursuant to this subsection.Sec. 945. RCW 43.07.410 and 2023 c 474 s 8030 are each amended to read as follows:The Washington state library-archives building account is created in the custody of the state treasurer. All moneys received under RCW 36.18.010(12), 36.22.175(3), and 43.07.370(3) must be deposited in the account. Except for during the 2023-2025 fiscal biennium, expenditures from the account may be made only for the purposes of payment of the financing contract entered into by the secretary of state for the Washington state library-archives building. During the 2023-2025 fiscal biennium, the secretary of state may spend up to $8,000,000 from the account for costs associated with the design and construction of the state library-archives building and for costs necessary to prepare the building for occupancy. Only the secretary of state or the secretary of state's designee may authorize expenditures from the account. An appropriation is not required for expenditures, but the account is subject to allotment procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW. During the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium, moneys in the account may also be transferred into the state general fund.Sec. 946. RCW 43.09.282 and 2009 c 564 s 928 are each amended to read as follows:For the purposes of centralized funding, accounting, and distribution of the costs of the audits performed on local governments by the state auditor, there is hereby created an account entitled the municipal revolving account. The state treasurer shall be custodian of the account. All moneys received by the state auditor or by any officer or employee thereof shall be deposited with the state treasurer and credited to the municipal revolving account. Only the state auditor or the auditor's designee may authorize expenditures from the account. No appropriation is required for expenditures. The state auditor shall keep such records as are necessary to detail the auditing costs attributable to the various types of local governments. During the 2009-2011 fiscal biennium, the state auditor shall reduce the municipal revolving account charges for financial audits performed on local governments by five percent. During the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium, the legislature may direct the state treasurer to make transfers of moneys in the municipal revolving account to the general fund such amounts as reflect the excess fund balance of the account.Sec. 947. RCW 43.09.475 and 2023 c 475 s 928 are each amended to read as follows:The performance audits of government account is hereby created in the custody of the state treasurer. Revenue identified in RCW 82.08.020(5) and 82.12.0201 shall be deposited in the account. Money in the account shall be used to fund the performance audits and follow-up performance audits under RCW 43.09.470 and shall be expended by the state auditor in accordance with chapter 1, Laws of 2006. Only the state auditor or the state auditor's designee may authorize expenditures from the account. The account is subject to allotment procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW, but an appropriation is not required for expenditures. The performance audits of government account may be appropriated for the joint legislative audit and review committee, the legislative evaluation and accountability program committee, and for the office of financial management's performance audit and compliance audit activities. During the 2019-2021, 2021-2023, and 2023-2025 fiscal biennia, the performance audits of government account may be appropriated for the superintendent of public instruction, the office of the governor, and audits of school districts. In addition, during the 2019-2021 and 2021-2023 fiscal biennia the account may be used to fund the office of financial management's contract for the compliance audit of the state auditor and audit activities at the department of revenue. During the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium, the legislature may direct the state treasurer to make transfers of moneys in the performance audits of government account to the general fund such amounts as reflect the excess fund balance of the account.Sec. 948. RCW 43.19.025 and 2014 c 221 s 915 are each amended to read as follows:The enterprise services account is created in the custody of the state treasurer and shall be used for all activities conducted by the department, except information technology services. Only the director or the director's designee may authorize expenditures from the account. The account is subject to the allotment procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW. During the 2013-2015 fiscal biennium, the director of the office of financial management may authorize expenditures from the account for the provision of small agency client services. During the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium, the legislature may direct the state treasurer to transfer money in the enterprise services account to the state general fund.Sec. 949. RCW 43.24.150 and 2017 c 281 s 40 are each amended to read as follows:(1) The business and professions account is created in the state treasury. All receipts from business or professional licenses, registrations, certifications, renewals, examinations, or civil penalties assessed and collected by the department from the following chapters must be deposited into the account:(a) Chapter 18.11 RCW, auctioneers;(b) Chapter 18.16 RCW, cosmetologists, barbers, and manicurists;(c) Chapter 18.145 RCW, court reporters;(d) Chapter 18.165 RCW, private investigators;(e) Chapter 18.170 RCW, security guards;(f) Chapter 18.185 RCW, bail bond agents;(g) Chapter 18.280 RCW, home inspectors;(h) Chapter 19.16 RCW, collection agencies;(i) Chapter 19.31 RCW, employment agencies;(j) Chapter 19.105 RCW, camping resorts;(k) Chapter 19.138 RCW, sellers of travel;(l) Chapter 42.45 RCW, notaries public;(m) Chapter 64.36 RCW, timeshares;(n) Chapter 67.08 RCW, boxing, martial arts, and wrestling;(o) Chapter 18.300 RCW, body art, body piercing, and tattooing;(p) Chapter 79A.60 RCW, whitewater river outfitters;(q) Chapter 19.158 RCW, commercial telephone solicitation; and(r) Chapter 19.290 RCW, scrap metal businesses.Moneys in the account may be spent only after appropriation. Expenditures from the account may be used only for expenses incurred in carrying out these business and professions licensing activities of the department. Any residue in the account must be accumulated and may not revert to the general fund at the end of the biennium. However, during the 2013-2015 and 2025-2027 fiscal ((biennium))biennia the legislature may transfer to the state general fund such amounts as reflect the excess fund balance in the account.(2) The director must biennially prepare a budget request based on the anticipated costs of administering the business and professions licensing activities listed in subsection (1) of this section, which must include the estimated income from these business and professions fees.Sec. 950. RCW 43.41.450 and 2023 c 435 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:The office of financial management central service account is created in the state treasury. The account is to be used by the office as a revolving fund for the payment of salaries, wages, and other costs required for the operation and maintenance of statewide budgeting, accounting, forecasting, and functions and activities in the office. All receipts from agency fees and charges for services collected from public agencies must be deposited into the account. The director shall fix the terms and charges to agencies based on each agency's share of the office statewide cost allocation plan for federal funds. Moneys in the account may be spent only after appropriation. During the 2021-2023 and 2023-2025 fiscal biennia, the account may be used as a revolving fund for the payment of salaries, wages, and other costs related to policy activities in the office. During the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium, moneys in the account may also be transferred into the state general fund.Sec. 951. RCW 43.79.195 and 2021 c 334 s 971 and 2021 c 170 s 6 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:(1) The workforce education investment account is created in the state treasury. All revenues from the workforce investment surcharge created in RCW 82.04.299 and those revenues as specified under RCW 82.04.290(2)(c) must be deposited directly into the account. Moneys in the account may be spent only after appropriation. Expenditures from the account may be used only for higher education programs, higher education operations, higher education compensation, state-funded student aid programs, and workforce development including career connected learning as defined by RCW 28C.30.020.(2) ((Expenditures))Except in the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium, expenditures from the workforce education investment account must be used to supplement, not supplant, other federal, state, and local funding for higher education. It is the intent of the legislature to continue this policy in the 2027-2029 fiscal biennium.Sec. 952. RCW 43.79.567 and 2023 c 435 s 7 are each amended to read as follows:(1) The community reinvestment account is created in the state treasury. Revenues to the account shall consist of appropriations and transfers by the legislature and all other moneys directed for deposit into the account. Moneys in the account may be spent only after appropriation.(2) Expenditures from the account may be used by the department of commerce for:(a) Economic development, which includes addressing wealth disparities to promote asset building such as home ownership and expanding access to financial resources including, but not limited to, grants and loans for small businesses and entrepreneurs, financial literacy training, and other small business training and support activities;(b) Civil and criminal legal assistance to provide postconviction relief and case assistance, including the expungement of criminal records and vacation of criminal convictions;(c) Community-based violence intervention and prevention services, which may include after-school programs focused on providing education and mentorship to youths;(d) Reentry services to facilitate successful transitions for persons formerly incarcerated in an adult correctional facility or juvenile residential facility in Washington; and(e) Beginning July 1, 2025, agricultural and economic support and services available to historically marginalized communities.(3) The distribution of the grants under this section must be done in collaboration with "by and for community organizations" as defined by the department of commerce and the office of equity. For the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium, "by and for community organizations" include, but are not limited to, those operated by and for Black, Latino, Native American, Asian, Native Hawaiian, and Pacific Islander communities.Sec. 953. RCW 43.83B.430 and 2023 c 474 s 8033 and 2023 c 287 s 2 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:The state drought preparedness account is created in the state treasury. All receipts from appropriated funds designated for the account and all cost recovery revenues collected under RCW 43.83B.410(5) must be deposited into the account. Expenditures from the account may be used for drought planning and preparedness activities under this chapter, including grants issued under RCW 43.83B.415. Moneys in the account may be spent only after appropriation. During the 2021-2023 ((and)), 2023-2025, and 2025-2027 fiscal biennia, the legislature may appropriate moneys from the account for activities related to water banking. During the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium, the legislature may transfer from the state drought preparedness account to the state general fund.Sec. 954. RCW 43.101.200 and 2024 c 376 s 908 are each amended to read as follows:(1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, all law enforcement personnel, except volunteers, and reserve officers whether paid or unpaid, initially employed on or after January 1, 1978, shall engage in basic law enforcement training which complies with standards adopted by the commission pursuant to RCW 43.101.080. For personnel initially employed before January 1, 1990, such training shall be successfully completed during the first fifteen months of employment of such personnel unless otherwise extended or waived by the commission and shall be requisite to the continuation of such employment. Personnel initially employed on or after January 1, 1990, shall commence basic training during the first six months of employment unless the basic training requirement is otherwise waived or extended by the commission. Successful completion of basic training is requisite to the continuation of employment of such personnel initially employed on or after January 1, 1990.(2)(a) All law enforcement personnel who are limited authority Washington peace officers and whose employment commences on or after July 1, 2023, shall commence basic training during the first 12 months of employment unless the basic training requirement is otherwise waived or extended by the commission. Successful completion of basic training is requisite to the continuation of employment of such personnel initially employed on or after July 1, 2023.(b)(i) The commission shall review the training files of all law enforcement personnel who are limited authority Washington peace officers, whose employment commenced prior to July 1, 2023, and who have not successfully completed training that complies with standards adopted by the commission, to determine what, if any, supplemental training is required to appropriately carry out the officers' duties and responsibilities.(ii) Nothing in this section may be interpreted to require law enforcement personnel who are limited authority Washington peace officers, whose employment commenced prior to July 1, 2023, to complete the basic law enforcement training academy as a condition of continuing employment as a limited authority Washington peace officer.(iii) Law enforcement personnel who are limited authority Washington peace officers are not required to complete the basic law enforcement academy or an equivalent basic academy upon transferring to a general authority Washington law enforcement agency or limited authority Washington law enforcement agency, as defined in RCW 10.93.020, if they have:(A) Been employed as a special agent with the Washington state gambling commission, been a natural resource investigator with the department of natural resources, been a liquor enforcement officer with the liquor and cannabis board, been an investigator with the office of the insurance commissioner, or been a park ranger with the Washington state parks and recreation commission, before or after July 1, 2023; and(B) Received a certificate of successful completion from the basic law enforcement academy or the basic law enforcement equivalency academy and thereafter engaged in regular and commissioned law enforcement employment with an agency listed in (b)(iii)(A) of this subsection without a break or interruption in excess of 24 months; and(C) Remained current with the in-service training requirements as adopted by the commission by rule.(3) Except as provided in RCW 43.101.170, the commission shall provide the aforementioned training and shall have the sole authority to do so. The commission shall provide necessary facilities, supplies, materials, and the board and room of noncommuting attendees for seven days per week, except ((during the 2017-2019, 2019-2021, and 2021-2023 fiscal biennia, and)) during fiscal year 2024 and during the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium, when the employing, county, city, or state law enforcement agency shall reimburse the commission for twenty-five percent of the cost of training its personnel. Additionally, to the extent funds are provided for this purpose, the commission shall reimburse to participating law enforcement agencies with ten or less full-time commissioned patrol officers the cost of temporary replacement of each officer who is enrolled in basic law enforcement training: PROVIDED, That such reimbursement shall include only the actual cost of temporary replacement not to exceed the total amount of salary and benefits received by the replaced officer during his or her training period:PROVIDED FURTHER, That limited authority Washington law enforcement agencies as defined in RCW 10.93.020 shall reimburse the commission for the full cost of training their personnel.Sec. 955. RCW 43.101.220 and 2024 c 376 s 909 are each amended to read as follows:(1) The corrections personnel of the state and all counties and municipal corporations initially employed on or after January 1, 1982, shall engage in basic corrections training which complies with standards adopted by the commission. The standards adopted must provide for basic corrections training of at least ten weeks in length for any corrections officers subject to the certification requirement under RCW 43.101.095 who are hired on or after July 1, 2021, or on an earlier date set by the commission. The training shall be successfully completed during the first six months of employment of the personnel, unless otherwise extended or waived by the commission, and shall be requisite to the continuation of employment.(2) The commission shall provide the training required in this section, together with facilities, supplies, materials, and the room and board for noncommuting attendees, except ((during the 2021-2023 fiscal biennium, and)) during fiscal year 2025 and during the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium, when the employing county, municipal corporation, or state agency shall reimburse the commission for twenty-five percent of the cost of training its personnel.(3)(a) Subsections (1) and (2) of this section do not apply to the Washington state department of corrections prisons division. The Washington state department of corrections is responsible for identifying training standards, designing curricula and programs, and providing the training for those corrections personnel employed by it. In doing so, the secretary of the department of corrections shall consult with staff development experts and correctional professionals both inside and outside of the agency, to include soliciting input from labor organizations.(b) The commission and the department of corrections share the responsibility of developing and defining training standards and providing training for community corrections officers employed within the community corrections division of the department of corrections.Sec. 956. RCW 43.155.050 and 2023 c 475 s 932 and 2023 c 474 s 8037 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:(1) The public works assistance account is hereby established in the state treasury. Money may be placed in the public works assistance account from the proceeds of bonds when authorized by the legislature or from any other lawful source. Money in the public works assistance account shall be used to make loans and grants and to give financial guarantees to local governments for public works projects. Moneys in the account may also be appropriated or transferred to the water pollution control revolving fund and the drinking water assistance account to provide for state match requirements under federal law. Moneys in the account may be transferred to the move ahead WA account to provide support of public works projects funded in the move ahead WA program. Not more than 20 percent of the biennial capital budget appropriation to the public works board from this account may be expended or obligated for preconstruction loans and grants, emergency loans and grants, or loans and grants for capital facility planning under this chapter. Not more than 10 percent of the biennial capital budget appropriation to the public works board from this account may be expended or obligated as grants for preconstruction, emergency, capital facility planning, and construction projects. During the 2017-2019 and 2019-2021 fiscal biennia, the legislature may appropriate moneys from the account for activities related to rural economic development, the growth management act, the aviation revitalization loan program, the community economic revitalization board broadband program, and the voluntary stewardship program. During the 2021-2023 and 2023-2025 fiscal biennia, the legislature may appropriate moneys from the account for activities related to the community aviation revitalization board. During the 2019-2021 fiscal biennia, the legislature may direct the state treasurer to make transfers of moneys in the public works assistance account to the education legacy trust account. During the 2019-2021 and 2021-2023 fiscal biennia, the legislature may direct the state treasurer to make transfers of moneys in the public works assistance account to the statewide broadband account. The legislature may appropriate moneys from the public works assistance account for activities related to the voluntary stewardship program, rural economic development, and the growth management act. During the 2021-2023 biennium, the legislature may appropriate moneys from the account for projects identified in section 1033, chapter 296, Laws of 2022. During the 2023-2025 fiscal biennium, the legislature may appropriate moneys from the public works assistance account for an evaluation of the costs of relocating public utilities related to fish barrier removal projects. During the 2023-2025 fiscal biennium, the legislature may appropriate moneys from the account for activities related to developing a data dashboard to map investments made by the public works board, the department of commerce, the department of health, the department of ecology, the department of transportation, the transportation improvement board, and by board partners to the system improvement team created in RCW 43.155.150.(2) For fiscal year 2024 through fiscal year 2038, the state treasurer must transfer from the public works assistance account to the move ahead WA account created in RCW 46.68.510 $57,000,000 each fiscal year in four equal quarterly transfers.(3) During the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium, the legislature may direct the state treasurer to transfer money from the public works assistance account to the state general fund.Sec. 957. RCW 43.216.828 and 2021 c 199 s 301 are each amended to read as follows:(1) It is the intent of the legislature to systemically increase child care subsidy rates over time until rates are equal to the full cost of providing high quality child care.(2) Beginning July 1, ((2021))2026, child care subsidy base rates must achieve the 85th percentile of market, as established by the most recent market rate survey published before the effective date of this section, for licensed or certified child care providers. The state and the exclusive representative for family child care providers must enter into bargaining over the implementation of the subsidy rate increase under this subsection.(3)(a) The department shall build upon the work of the child care collaborative task force to develop and implement a child care cost estimate model and use the completed child care cost model to recommend subsidy rates at levels that are sufficient to compensate licensed or certified child care providers for the full costs of providing high quality child care. The department shall consider:(i) Adjusting rates to reflect cost of living such as area median income, cost of living by zip code, and grouping by categories such as rural, suburban, or urban; and(ii) Incorporating the rate model for nonstandard child care hours developed under section 306, chapter 199, Laws of 2021.(b) The department shall build upon the work of the child care collaborative task force to evaluate options to support access to affordable health care insurance coverage for licensed or certified child care providers.(4) This section does not interfere with, impede, or in any way diminish the right of family child care providers to bargain collectively with the state through the exclusive bargaining representatives as provided for under RCW 41.56.028.Sec. 958. RCW 43.320.110 and 2023 c 475 s 933 are each amended to read as follows:(1) There is created in the custody of the state treasurer a local fund known as the "financial services regulation fund" which shall consist of all moneys received by the divisions of the department of financial institutions, except as provided in subsection (2) of this section.(2) The division of securities shall deposit thirteen percent of all moneys received, except as provided in RCW 43.320.115 and subsection (3) of this section, and which shall be used for the purchase of supplies and necessary equipment; the payment of salaries, wages, and utilities; the establishment of reserves; and other incidental costs required for the proper regulation of individuals and entities subject to regulation by the department.(3) The division of securities shall deposit one hundred percent of all moneys received that are attributable to increases in fees implemented by rule pursuant to RCW 21.20.340(15).(4) Disbursements from the fund shall be on authorization of the director of financial institutions or the director's designee. In order to maintain an effective expenditure and revenue control, the fund shall be subject in all respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required to permit expenditures and payment of obligations from the fund.(5) During the 2017-2019 fiscal biennium, the legislature may transfer from the financial services regulation fund to the state general fund such amounts as reflect the excess fund balance of the fund. During the 2017-2019 and 2021-2023 fiscal biennia, moneys from the financial services regulation fund may be appropriated for the family prosperity account program at the department of commerce and for the operations of the department of revenue.(6)(a) Beginning in the 2020-2021 fiscal year, the state treasurer shall annually transfer from the fund to the student loan advocate account created in RCW 28B.77.008, the greater of one hundred seventy-five thousand dollars or twenty percent of the annual assessment derived from student education loan servicing.(b) The department must provide information to the state treasurer regarding the amount of the annual assessment derived from student education loan servicing.(7) The director's obligations or duties under chapter 62, Laws of 2018 are subject to section 21, chapter 62, Laws of 2018.(8) During the 2019-2021 ((and)), 2023-2025, and 2025-2027 fiscal biennia, moneys in the financial services regulation fund may be appropriated for the operations of the department of revenue.(9) During the 2021-2023 ((and)), 2023-2025, and 2025-2027 fiscal biennia, the legislature may direct the state treasurer to make transfers of moneys in the financial services regulation fund to the general fund. It is the intent of the legislature to continue this policy in subsequent biennia.Sec. 959. RCW 43.330.184 and 2022 c 216 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:The apple health and homes account is created in the state treasury. Moneys in the account may be spent only after appropriation. Expenditures from the account may be used only for permanent supportive housing programs administered by the office created in RCW 43.330.181, including acquisition and development of permanent supportive housing units, operations, maintenance, and services costs of permanent supportive housing units, project-based vouchers, provider grants, and other purposes authorized by appropriations made in the operating budget. The department must prioritize allocating at least 10 percent of the expenditures from the account to organizations that serve and are substantially governed by individuals disproportionately impacted by homelessness and behavioral health conditions, including black, indigenous, and other people of color, lesbian, gay, bisexual, queer, transgender, and other gender diverse individuals. When selecting projects supported by funds from the account, the office shall balance the state's interest in quickly approving and financing projects, the degree to which the project will leverage other funds, the extent to which the project promotes racial equity, and the extent to which the project will promote priorities of chapter 216, Laws of 2022 on a statewide basis, including in rural areas and in geographically diverse parts of the state. During the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium, the legislature may direct the state treasurer to transfer money in the apple health and homes account to the state general fund.Sec. 960. RCW 43.330.250 and 2019 c 415 s 974 are each amended to read as follows:(1) The economic development strategic reserve account is created in the state treasury to be used only for the purposes of this section.(2) Only the governor, with the recommendation of the director of the department of commerce, may authorize expenditures from the account.(3) During the 2009-2011 ((and)), 2011-2013, and 2025-2027 fiscal biennia, moneys in the account may also be transferred into the state general fund.(4) Expenditures from the account may be made to prevent closure of a business or facility, to prevent relocation of a business or facility in the state to a location outside the state, or to recruit a business or facility to the state. Expenditures may be authorized for:(a) Workforce development;(b) Public infrastructure needed to support or sustain the operations of the business or facility;(c) Other lawfully provided assistance including, but not limited to, technical assistance, environmental analysis, relocation assistance, and planning assistance. Funding may be provided for such assistance only when it is in the public interest and may only be provided under a contractual arrangement ensuring that the state will receive appropriate consideration, such as an assurance of job creation or retention; and(d) The joint center for aerospace technology innovation.(5) The funds shall not be expended from the account unless:(a) The circumstances are such that time does not permit the director of the department of commerce or the business or facility to secure funding from other state sources;(b) The business or facility produces or will produce significant long-term economic benefits to the state, a region of the state, or a particular community in the state;(c) The business or facility does not require continuing state support;(d) The expenditure will result in new jobs, job retention, or higher incomes for citizens of the state;(e) The expenditure will not supplant private investment; and(f) The expenditure is accompanied by private investment.(6) No more than three million dollars per year may be expended from the account for the purpose of assisting an individual business or facility pursuant to the authority specified in this section.(7) If the account balance in the strategic reserve account exceeds fifteen million dollars at any time, the amount in excess of fifteen million dollars shall be transferred to the education construction account.(8) During the 2017-2019 ((and)), 2019-2021, and 2025-2027 fiscal biennia, the legislature may appropriate moneys from the account to fund programs and grants at the department of commerce. It is the intent of the legislature that this policy will be continued in subsequent fiscal biennia.Sec. 961. RCW 44.90.070 and 2024 c 333 s 9 are each amended to read as follows:(1) Collective bargaining negotiations under this chapter must commence no later than July 1st of each even-numbered year after a bargaining unit has been certified.(2) The duration of any collective bargaining agreement shall not exceed one fiscal biennium.(3)(a)(i) The director must submit ratified collective bargaining agreements, with cost estimates, to the employer by October 1st before the legislative session at which the request for funds is to be considered. The transmission by the legislature to the governor under RCW 43.88.090 must include a request for funds necessary to implement the provisions of all collective bargaining agreements covering legislative employees.(ii) For the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium, the legislature may approve funding for collective bargaining agreements with the Washington public employees association on behalf of legislative staff that ratified after October 1, 2024, and before December 31, 2024. Subsequent agreements must be submitted to the employer by October 1st before the legislative session at which the request for funds is to be considered in order to be included in the omnibus operating appropriations act.(b) If the legislature or governor fails to provide the funds for a collective bargaining agreement for legislative employees, either party may reopen all or part of the agreement or the exclusive bargaining representative may seek to implement the procedures provided for in RCW 44.90.075.(4) Negotiation for economic terms will be by a coalition of all exclusive bargaining representatives. Any such provisions agreed to by the employer and the coalition must be included in all collective bargaining agreements negotiated by the parties. The director and the exclusive bargaining representative or representatives are authorized to enter into supplemental bargaining of bargaining unit specific issues for inclusion in the collective bargaining agreement, subject to the parties' agreement regarding the issues and procedures for supplemental bargaining. This subsection does not prohibit cooperation and coordination of bargaining between two or more exclusive bargaining representatives.(5) If a significant revenue shortfall occurs resulting in reduced appropriations, as declared by proclamation of the governor or by resolution of the legislature, both parties must immediately enter into collective bargaining for a mutually agreed-upon modification of the agreement.Sec. 962. RCW 46.09.510 and 2007 c 241 s 15 are each amended to read as follows:The nonhighway and off-road vehicle activities program account is created in the state treasury. Moneys in this account are subject to legislative appropriation. The recreation and conservation funding board shall administer the account for purposes specified in this chapter and shall hold it separate and apart from all other money, funds, and accounts of the board. Grants, gifts, or other financial assistance, proceeds received from public bodies as administrative cost contributions, and any moneys made available to the state of Washington by the federal government for outdoor recreation may be deposited into the account. During the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium, funds may be used for recreation-based appropriations at the department of natural resources.Sec. 963. RCW 46.09.520 and 2021 c 334 s 985 are each amended to read as follows:(1) From time to time, but at least once each year, the state treasurer must refund from the motor vehicle fund one percent of the motor vehicle fuel tax revenues collected under chapter 82.38 RCW, based on: (a) A tax rate of: (i) Nineteen cents per gallon of motor vehicle fuel from July 1, 2003, through June 30, 2005; (ii) twenty cents per gallon of motor vehicle fuel from July 1, 2005, through June 30, 2007; (iii) twenty-one cents per gallon of motor vehicle fuel from July 1, 2007, through June 30, 2009; (iv) twenty-two cents per gallon of motor vehicle fuel from July 1, 2009, through June 30, 2011; (v) twenty-three cents per gallon of motor vehicle fuel from July 1, 2011, through July 31, 2015; (vi) thirty cents per gallon of motor vehicle fuel from August 1, 2015, through June 30, 2016; and (vii) thirty-four and nine-tenths cents per gallon of motor vehicle fuel from July 1, 2016, through June 30, 2031; and (b) beginning July 1, 2031, and thereafter, the state's motor vehicle fuel tax rate in existence at the time of the fuel purchase, less proper deductions for refunds and costs of collection as provided in RCW 46.68.090.(2) The treasurer must place these funds in the general fund as follows:(a) Thirty-six percent must be credited to the ORV and nonhighway vehicle account and administered by the department of natural resources solely for acquisition, planning, development, maintenance, and management of ORV, nonmotorized, and nonhighway road recreation facilities, and information programs and maintenance of nonhighway roads;(b) Three and one-half percent must be credited to the ORV and nonhighway vehicle account and administered by the department of fish and wildlife solely for the acquisition, planning, development, maintenance, and management of ORV, nonmotorized, and nonhighway road recreation facilities and the maintenance of nonhighway roads;(c) Two percent must be credited to the ORV and nonhighway vehicle account and administered by the parks and recreation commission solely for the acquisition, planning, development, maintenance, and management of ORV, nonmotorized, and nonhighway road recreation facilities; and(d) Fifty-eight and one-half percent must be credited to the nonhighway and off-road vehicle activities program account to be administered by the board for planning, acquisition, development, maintenance, and management of ORV, nonmotorized, and nonhighway road recreation facilities and for education, information, and law enforcement programs. The funds under this subsection must be expended in accordance with the following limitations:(i) Not more than thirty percent may be expended for education, information, and law enforcement programs under this chapter;(ii) Not less than seventy percent may be expended for ORV, nonmotorized, and nonhighway road recreation facilities. Except as provided in (d)(iii) of this subsection, of this amount:(A) Not less than thirty percent, together with the funds the board receives under RCW 46.68.045, may be expended for ORV recreation facilities;(B) Not less than thirty percent may be expended for nonmotorized recreation facilities. Funds expended under this subsection (2)(d)(ii)(B) are known as Ira Spring outdoor recreation facilities funds; and(C) Not less than thirty percent may be expended for nonhighway road recreation facilities;(iii) The board may waive the minimum percentage cited in (d)(ii) of this subsection due to insufficient requests for funds or projects that score low in the board's project evaluation. Funds remaining after such a waiver must be allocated in accordance with board policy.(3) On a yearly basis an agency may not, except as provided in RCW 46.68.045, expend more than ten percent of the funds it receives under this chapter for general administration expenses incurred in carrying out this chapter.(4) During the 2009-2011 fiscal biennium, the legislature may appropriate such amounts as reflect the excess fund balance in the NOVA account to the department of natural resources to install consistent off-road vehicle signage at department-managed recreation sites, and to implement the recreation opportunities on department-managed lands in the Reiter block and Ahtanum state forest, and to the state parks and recreation commission. The legislature finds that the appropriation of funds from the NOVA account during the 2009-2011 fiscal biennium for maintenance and operation of state parks or to improve accessibility for boaters and off-road vehicle users at state parks will benefit boaters and off-road vehicle users and others who use nonhighway and nonmotorized recreational facilities. The appropriations under this subsection are not required to follow the specific distribution specified in subsection (2) of this section.(5) During the 2021-2023 and 2025-2027 fiscal ((biennium))biennia, the legislature may appropriate moneys from the NOVA account to the department of natural resources to support programs that benefit ORV, nonhighway road(([,])), and nonmotorized recreational facilities.Sec. 964. RCW 46.66.080 and 2023 c 388 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:(1) The Washington auto theft prevention authority account is created in the state treasury, subject to appropriation. Revenues consist of deposits to the account under RCW 48.14.020(1)(b) and all receipts from gifts, grants, bequests, devises, or other funds from public and private sources to support the activities of the auto theft prevention authority must be deposited into the account. Expenditures from the account may be used only for activities relating to motor vehicle theft, including education, prevention, law enforcement, investigation, prosecution, and confinement.(2) The authority shall allocate moneys appropriated from the account to public agencies for the purpose of establishing, maintaining, and supporting programs that are designed to prevent motor vehicle theft, including:(a) Financial support to prosecution agencies to increase the effectiveness of motor vehicle theft prosecution;(b) Financial support to a unit of local government or a team consisting of units of local governments to increase the effectiveness of motor vehicle theft enforcement;(c) Financial support for the procurement of equipment and technologies for use by law enforcement agencies for the purpose of enforcing motor vehicle theft laws; and(d) Financial support for programs that are designed to educate and assist the public in the prevention of motor vehicle theft.(3) The costs of administration shall not exceed 10 percent of the moneys in the account in any one year so that the greatest possible portion of the moneys available to the authority is expended on combating motor vehicle theft.(4) Prior to awarding any moneys from the Washington auto theft prevention authority account for motor vehicle theft enforcement, the auto theft prevention authority must verify that the financial award includes sufficient funding to cover proposed activities.(5) Moneys expended from the Washington auto theft prevention authority account under subsection (2) of this section shall be used to supplement, not supplant, other moneys that are available for motor vehicle theft prevention.(6) Grants provided under subsection (2) of this section constitute reimbursement for purposes of RCW 43.135.060(1).(7) During the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium, moneys in the account may also be transferred into the state general fund.Sec. 965. RCW 50.16.010 and 2019 c 415 s 977 are each amended to read as follows:(1) There shall be maintained as special funds, separate and apart from all public moneys or funds of this state an unemployment compensation fund and an administrative contingency fund, which shall be administered by the commissioner exclusively for the purposes of this title, and to which RCW 43.01.050 shall not be applicable.(2)(a) The unemployment compensation fund shall consist of:(i) All contributions collected under RCW 50.24.010 and payments in lieu of contributions collected pursuant to the provisions of this title;(ii) Any property or securities acquired through the use of moneys belonging to the fund;(iii) All earnings of such property or securities;(iv) Any moneys received from the federal unemployment account in the unemployment trust fund in accordance with Title XII of the social security act, as amended;(v) All money recovered on official bonds for losses sustained by the fund;(vi) All money credited to this state's account in the unemployment trust fund pursuant to section 903 of the social security act, as amended;(vii) All money received from the federal government as reimbursement pursuant to section 204 of the federal-state extended compensation act of 1970 (84 Stat. 708-712; 26 U.S.C. Sec. 3304);(viii) The portion of the additional penalties as provided in RCW 50.20.070(2) that is fifteen percent of the amount of benefits overpaid or deemed overpaid; and(ix) All moneys received for the fund from any other source.(b) All moneys in the unemployment compensation fund shall be commingled and undivided.(3)(a) Except as provided in (b) of this subsection, the administrative contingency fund shall consist of:(i) All interest on delinquent contributions collected pursuant to this title;(ii) All fines and penalties collected pursuant to the provisions of this title, except the portion of the additional penalties as provided in RCW 50.20.070(2) that is fifteen percent of the amount of benefits overpaid or deemed overpaid;(iii) All sums recovered on official bonds for losses sustained by the fund; and(iv) Revenue received under RCW 50.24.014.(b) All fees, fines, forfeitures, and penalties collected or assessed by a district court because of the violation of this title or rules adopted under this title shall be remitted as provided in chapter 3.62 RCW.(c) Except as provided in (d) of this subsection, moneys available in the administrative contingency fund, other than money in the special account created under RCW 50.24.014, shall be expended upon the direction of the commissioner, with the approval of the governor, whenever it appears to him or her that such expenditure is necessary solely for:(i) The proper administration of this title and that insufficient federal funds are available for the specific purpose to which such expenditure is to be made, provided, the moneys are not substituted for appropriations from federal funds which, in the absence of such moneys, would be made available.(ii) The proper administration of this title for which purpose appropriations from federal funds have been requested but not yet received, provided, the administrative contingency fund will be reimbursed upon receipt of the requested federal appropriation.(iii) The proper administration of this title for which compliance and audit issues have been identified that establish federal claims requiring the expenditure of state resources in resolution. Claims must be resolved in the following priority: First priority is to provide services to eligible participants within the state; second priority is to provide substitute services or program support; and last priority is the direct payment of funds to the federal government.(d)(i) During the 2007-2009 fiscal biennium, moneys available in the administrative contingency fund, other than money in the special account created under RCW 50.24.014(1)(a), shall be expended as appropriated by the legislature for: (A) The cost of the job skills or worker retraining programs at the community and technical colleges and administrative costs at the state board for community and technical colleges; and (B) reemployment services such as business and project development assistance, local economic development capacity building, and local economic development financial assistance at the department of commerce. The remaining appropriation may be expended as specified in (c) of this subsection.(ii) During the 2015-2017, 2017-2019, ((and)) 2019-2021, and 2025-2027 fiscal biennia, moneys available in the administrative contingency fund, other than money in the special account created under RCW 50.24.014(1)(a), shall be expended as appropriated by the legislature: (A) For the department of social and health services for employment and training services and programs in the WorkFirst program; (B) for the administrative costs of state agencies participating in the WorkFirst program; and (C) by the commissioner for the work group on agricultural and agricultural-related issues as provided in the 2013-2015 omnibus operating appropriations act. The remaining appropriation may be expended as specified in (c) of this subsection.(iii) During the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium, moneys available in the administrative contingency fund, other than money in the special account created under RCW 50.24.014(1)(a), shall be expended as appropriated by the legislature for the career connected learning grant program authorized in RCW 28C.30.040 and 28C.30.050, and for additional audit support staff due to an increase in the workload associated with audits. The remaining appropriation may be expended as specified in (c) of this subsection.(4) Money in the special account created under RCW 50.24.014(1)(a) may only be expended, after appropriation, for the purposes specified in this section and RCW 50.62.010, 50.62.020, 50.62.030, 50.24.014, 50.44.053, and 50.22.010.Sec. 966. RCW 50.24.014 and 2023 c 475 s 934 are each amended to read as follows:(1)(a) A separate and identifiable account to provide for the financing of special programs to assist the unemployed is established in the administrative contingency fund. All money in this account shall be expended solely for the purposes of this title and for no other purposes whatsoever, except as provided in subsection (4) of this section. Contributions to this account shall accrue and become payable by each employer, except employers as described in RCW 50.44.010 and 50.44.030 who have properly elected to make payments in lieu of contributions, taxable local government employers as described in RCW 50.44.035, and those employers who are required to make payments in lieu of contributions, at a basic rate of two one-hundredths of one percent. The amount of wages subject to tax shall be determined under RCW 50.24.010.(b) A separate and identifiable account is established in the administrative contingency fund for financing the employment security department's administrative costs under RCW 50.22.150 and 50.22.155 and the costs under RCW 50.22.150(11) and 50.22.155 (1)(m) and (2)(m). All money in this account shall be expended solely for the purposes of this title and for no other purposes whatsoever. Contributions to this account shall accrue and become payable by each employer, except employers as described in RCW 50.44.010 and 50.44.030 who have properly elected to make payments in lieu of contributions, taxable local government employers as described in RCW 50.44.035, those employers who are required to make payments in lieu of contributions, those employers described under RCW 50.29.025(1)(d), and those qualified employers assigned rate class 20 or rate class 40, as applicable, under RCW 50.29.025, at a basic rate of one one-hundredth of one percent. The amount of wages subject to tax shall be determined under RCW 50.24.010. Any amount of contributions payable under this subsection (1)(b) that exceeds the amount that would have been collected at a rate of four one-thousandths of one percent must be deposited in the account created in (a) of this subsection.(2)(a) Contributions under this section shall become due and be paid by each employer under rules as the commissioner may prescribe, and shall not be deducted, in whole or in part, from the remuneration of individuals in the employ of the employer. Any deduction in violation of this section is unlawful.(b) In the payment of any contributions under this section, a fractional part of a cent shall be disregarded unless it amounts to one-half cent or more, in which case it shall be increased to one cent.(3) If the commissioner determines that federal funding has been increased to provide financing for the services specified in chapter 50.62 RCW, the commissioner shall direct that collection of contributions under this section be terminated on the following January 1st.(4) During the 2023-2025 and 2025-2027 fiscal ((biennium))biennia, moneys in the account in subsection (1)(a) of this section may be appropriated for poverty reduction programs that coordinate employment, training, education, and other existing systems designed to assist low-income individuals attain self-sufficiency.Sec. 967. RCW 51.44.190 and 2023 c 213 s 10 are each amended to read as follows:(1) The construction registration inspection account is created in the state treasury. All moneys, except fines and penalties, received or collected under the terms of chapters 18.27 and 70.87 RCW and under the terms of RCW 43.22.335 through 43.22.430 and 43.22.432 through 43.22.495 must be deposited into the account. Moneys in the account may only be spent after appropriation. Expenditures from the account, not including moneys transferred to the general fund, may be used only to carry out the purposes of chapters 18.27 and 70.87 RCW and RCW 43.22.335 through 43.22.430 and 43.22.432 through 43.22.495.(2) The department shall set the fees deposited in the account at a level that generates revenue that is as near as practicable to the amount of the appropriation to carry out the duties specified in this section.(3) On the last working day of the first month following each quarterly period, three and one-half percent of all revenues received into the account during the previous quarter from licenses, permits, and registrations, net of refunds paid to customers, must be transferred into the general fund. During the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium, the legislature may direct the state treasurer to make transfers of moneys in the construction registration inspection account to the general fund such amounts as reflect the excess fund balance of the account.Sec. 968. RCW 67.16.285 and 2004 c 246 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:The Washington horse racing commission class C purse fund account is created in the custody of the state treasurer. All receipts from RCW 67.16.105(3) must be deposited into the account. Expenditures from the account may be used only for the purposes provided in RCW 67.16.105(3). Only the secretary of the commission or the secretary's designee may authorize expenditures from the account. The account is subject to allotment procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW, but an appropriation is not required for expenditures. During the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium, the legislature may direct the state treasurer to make transfers of moneys in the horse racing commission class C purse fund account to the Washington horse racing commission operating account such amounts as reflect the excess fund balance of the account.Sec. 969. RCW 67.70.044 and 2010 1st sp.s. c 37 s 940 are each amended to read as follows:(1) Pursuant to RCW 67.70.040(1)(a), the commission may enter into the multistate agreement establishing a shared game lottery known as "The Big Game," that was entered into by party state lotteries in August 1996 and subsequently amended and a shared game lottery known as "Powerball."(2) The shared game lottery account is created as a separate account outside the state treasury. The account is managed, maintained, and controlled by the commission and consists of all revenues received from the sale of shared game lottery tickets or shares, and all other moneys credited or transferred to it from any other fund or source under law. The account is allotted according to chapter 43.88 RCW. During the 2009-2011 and 2025-2027 fiscal ((biennium))biennia, the legislature may transfer from the shared game lottery account to the education legacy trust account such amounts as reflect the excess fund balance of the account.Sec. 970. RCW 70.79.350 and 2003 1st sp.s. c 25 s 931 are each amended to read as follows:The chief inspector shall give an official receipt for all fees required by chapter 70.79 RCW and shall transfer all sums so received to the treasurer of the state of Washington as ex officio custodian thereof and the treasurer shall place all sums in a special fund hereby created and designated as the "pressure systems safety fund." Funds shall be paid out upon vouchers duly and regularly issued therefor and approved by the director of the department of labor and industries. The treasurer, as ex officio custodian of the fund, shall keep an accurate record of any payments into the fund, and of all disbursements therefrom. The fund shall be used exclusively to defray only the expenses of administering chapter 70.79 RCW by the chief inspector as authorized by law and the expenses incident to the maintenance of the office. The fund shall be charged with its pro rata share of the cost of administering the fund which is to be determined by the director of financial management and by the director of the department of labor and industries.During the 2003-2005 and 2025-2027 fiscal ((biennium))biennia, the legislature may transfer from the pressure systems safety fund to the state general fund such amounts as reflect the excess fund balance of the fund.Sec. 971. RCW 70.128.160 and 2016 sp.s. c 36 s 944 are each amended to read as follows:(1) The department is authorized to take one or more of the actions listed in subsection (2) of this section in any case in which the department finds that an adult family home provider has:(a) Failed or refused to comply with the requirements of this chapter or the rules adopted under this chapter;(b) Operated an adult family home without a license or under a revoked license;(c) Knowingly or with reason to know made a false statement of material fact on his or her application for license or any data attached thereto, or in any matter under investigation by the department; or(d) Willfully prevented or interfered with any inspection or investigation by the department.(2) When authorized by subsection (1) of this section, the department may take one or more of the following actions:(a) Refuse to issue a license;(b) Impose reasonable conditions on a license, such as correction within a specified time, training, and limits on the type of clients the provider may admit or serve;(c) Impose civil penalties of at least one hundred dollars per day per violation;(d) Impose civil penalties of up to three thousand dollars for each incident that violates adult family home licensing laws and rules, including, but not limited to, chapters 70.128, 70.129, 74.34, and 74.39A RCW and related rules. Each day upon which the same or substantially similar action occurs is a separate violation subject to the assessment of a separate penalty;(e) Impose civil penalties of up to ten thousand dollars for a current or former licensed provider who is operating an unlicensed home;(f) Suspend, revoke, or refuse to renew a license; or(g) Suspend admissions to the adult family home by imposing stop placement.(3) When the department orders stop placement, the facility shall not admit any person until the stop placement order is terminated. The department may approve readmission of a resident to the facility from a hospital or nursing home during the stop placement. The department shall terminate the stop placement only after: (a) The violations necessitating the stop placement have been corrected; and (b) the provider exhibits the capacity to maintain correction of the violations previously found deficient. However, if upon the revisit the department finds new violations that the department reasonably believes will result in a new stop placement, the previous stop placement shall remain in effect until the new stop placement is imposed. In order to protect the home's existing residents from potential ongoing neglect, when the provider has been cited for a violation that is repeated, uncorrected, pervasive, or presents a threat to the health, safety, or welfare of one or more residents, and the department has imposed a stop placement, the department shall also impose a condition on license or other remedy to facilitate or spur prompter compliance if the violation has not been corrected, and the provider has not exhibited the capacity to maintain correction, within sixty days of the stop placement.(4) Nothing in subsection (3) of this section is intended to apply to stop placement imposed in conjunction with a license revocation or summary suspension or to prevent the department from imposing a condition on license or other remedy prior to sixty days after a stop placement, if the department considers it necessary to protect one or more residents' well-being. After a department finding of a violation for which a stop placement has been imposed, the department shall make an on-site revisit of the provider within fifteen working days from the request for revisit, to ensure correction of the violation. For violations that are serious or recurring or uncorrected following a previous citation, and create actual or threatened harm to one or more residents' well-being, including violations of residents' rights, the department shall make an on-site revisit as soon as appropriate to ensure correction of the violation. Verification of correction of all other violations may be made by either a department on-site revisit or by written or photographic documentation found by the department to be credible. This subsection does not prevent the department from enforcing license suspensions or revocations. Nothing in this subsection shall interfere with or diminish the department's authority and duty to ensure that the provider adequately cares for residents, including to make departmental on-site revisits as needed to ensure that the provider protects residents, and to enforce compliance with this chapter.(5) Chapter 34.05 RCW applies to department actions under this section, except that orders of the department imposing license suspension, stop placement, or conditions for continuation of a license are effective immediately upon notice and shall continue in effect pending a hearing, which must commence no later than sixty days after receipt of a request for a hearing. The time for commencement of a hearing may be extended by agreement of the parties or by the presiding officer for good cause shown by either party, but must commence no later than one hundred twenty days after receipt of a request for a hearing.(6) A separate adult family home account is created in the custody of the state treasurer. All receipts from civil penalties imposed under this chapter must be deposited into the account. Only the director or the director's designee may authorize expenditures from the account. The account is subject to allotment procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW, but an appropriation is not required for expenditures. The department shall use the special account only for promoting the quality of life and care of residents living in adult family homes. During the ((2015-2017))2025-2027 fiscal biennium, the account may be expended for funding costs associated with the adult family home program.(7) The department shall by rule specify criteria as to when and how the sanctions specified in this section must be applied. The criteria must provide for the imposition of incrementally more severe penalties for deficiencies that are repeated, uncorrected, pervasive, or present a threat to the health, safety, or welfare of one or more residents. The criteria shall be tiered such that those homes consistently found to have deficiencies will be subjected to increasingly severe penalties. The department shall implement prompt and specific enforcement remedies without delay for providers found to have delivered care or failed to deliver care resulting in problems that are repeated, uncorrected, pervasive, or present a threat to the health, safety, or welfare of one or more residents. In the selection of remedies, the health, safety, and well-being of residents must be of paramount importance.Sec. 972. RCW 70A.65.030 and 2023 c 475 s 936 and 2023 c 475 s 1902 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:(1) Except as provided in subsection (4) of this section, each year or biennium, as appropriate, when allocating funds from the carbon emissions reduction account created in RCW 70A.65.240, the climate commitment account created in RCW 70A.65.260, the natural climate solutions account created in RCW 70A.65.270, the climate investment account created in RCW 70A.65.250, the air quality and health disparities improvement account created in RCW 70A.65.280, the climate transit programs account created in RCW 46.68.500, or the climate active transportation account created in RCW 46.68.490, or administering grants or programs funded by the accounts, agencies shall conduct an environmental justice assessment consistent with the requirements of RCW 70A.02.060 and establish a minimum of not less than 35 percent and a goal of 40 percent of total investments that provide direct and meaningful benefits to vulnerable populations within the boundaries of overburdened communities through: (a) The direct reduction of environmental burdens in overburdened communities; (b) the reduction of disproportionate, cumulative risk from environmental burdens, including those associated with climate change; (c) the support of community led project development, planning, and participation costs; or (d) meeting a community need identified by the community that is consistent with the intent of this chapter or RCW 70A.02.010.(2) The allocation of funding under subsection (1) of this section must adhere to the following principles, additional to the requirements of RCW 70A.02.080: (a) Benefits and programs should be directed to areas and targeted to vulnerable populations and overburdened communities to reduce statewide disparities; (b) investments and benefits should be made roughly proportional to the health disparities that a specific community experiences, with a goal of eliminating the disparities; (c) investments and programs should focus on creating environmental benefits, including eliminating health burdens, creating community and population resilience, and raising the quality of life of those in the community; and (d) efforts should be made to balance investments and benefits across the state and within counties, local jurisdictions, and unincorporated areas as appropriate to reduce disparities by location and to ensure efforts contribute to a reduction in disparities that exist based on race or ethnicity, socioeconomic status, or other factors.(3) Except as provided in subsection (4) of this section, state agencies allocating funds or administering grants or programs from the carbon emissions reduction account created in RCW 70A.65.240, the climate commitment account created in RCW 70A.65.260, the natural climate solutions account created in RCW 70A.65.270, the climate investment account created in RCW 70A.65.250, the air quality and health disparities improvement account created in RCW 70A.65.280, the climate transit programs account created in RCW 46.68.500, or the climate active transportation account created in RCW 46.68.490, must:(a) Report annually to the environmental justice council created in RCW 70A.02.110 regarding progress toward meeting environmental justice and environmental health goals;(b) Consider recommendations by the environmental justice council; and(c)(i) If the agency is not a covered agency subject to the requirements of chapter 70A.02 RCW, create and adopt a community engagement plan to describe how it will engage with overburdened communities and vulnerable populations in allocating funds or administering grants or programs from the climate investment account.(ii) The plan must include methods for outreach and communication with those who face barriers, language or otherwise, to participation.(4) During the 2023-2025 and 2025-2027 fiscal ((biennium))biennia:(a) The requirement of subsection (1) of this section to conduct an environmental justice assessment applies only to covered agencies as defined in RCW 70A.02.010 and to significant agency actions as defined in RCW 70A.02.010.(b) Agencies shall coordinate with the department and the office of financial management to achieve total statewide spending from the accounts listed in subsection (1) of this section of not less than 35 percent and a goal of 40 percent of total investments that provide direct and meaningful benefits to vulnerable populations within the boundaries of overburdened communities as otherwise described in subsection (1)(a) through (d) of this section and in accordance with RCW 70A.65.230.(c) The requirements of subsection (3)(c) of this section for agencies other than covered agencies to create and adopt community engagement plans apply only to executive branch agencies and institutions of higher education, as defined in RCW 28B.10.016, receiving total appropriations of more than $2,000,000 for the 2023-2025 fiscal biennium from the accounts listed in subsection (1) of this section.Sec. 973. RCW 70A.65.250 and 2024 c 376 s 911 are each amended to read as follows:(1)(a) The climate investment account is created in the state treasury. Except as otherwise provided in chapter 316, Laws of 2021, all receipts from the auction of allowances authorized in this chapter must be deposited into the account. Moneys in the account may be spent only after appropriation.(b) Projects or activities funded from the account must meet high labor standards, including family sustaining wages, providing benefits including health care and employer-contributed retirement plans, career development opportunities, and maximize access to economic benefits from such projects for local workers and diverse businesses. Each contracting entity's proposal must be reviewed for equity and opportunity improvement efforts, including: (i) Employer paid sick leave programs; (ii) pay practices in relation to living wage indicators such as the federal poverty level; (iii) efforts to evaluate pay equity based on gender identity, race, and other protected status under Washington law; (iv) facilitating career development opportunities, such as apprenticeship programs, internships, job-shadowing, and on-the-job training; and (v) employment assistance and employment barriers for justice affected individuals.(2) Moneys in the account may be used only for projects and programs that achieve the purposes of the greenhouse gas emissions cap and invest program established under this chapter and for tribal capacity grants under RCW 70A.65.305. During the 2023-2025 fiscal biennium, moneys in the account may also be used for tribal capacity grant activities supporting climate resilience and adaptation, developing tribal clean energy projects, applying for state or federal grant funding, and other related work; and for providing payments to agricultural fuel purchasers. During the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium, moneys in the account may also be used for tribal capacity grant activities supporting climate resilience and adaptation, developing tribal clean energy projects, applying for state or federal grant funding, and other related work. Moneys in the account as described in this subsection must first be appropriated for the administration of the requirements of this chapter, in an amount not to exceed five percent of the total receipt of funds from allowance auction proceeds under this chapter. Beginning July 1, 2023, and annually thereafter, the state treasurer shall distribute funds in the account that exceed the amounts appropriated for the purposes of this subsection (2) as follows:(a) Seventy-five percent of the moneys to the climate commitment account created in RCW 70A.65.260; and(b) Twenty-five percent of the moneys to the natural climate solutions account created in RCW 70A.65.270.(3) The allocations specified in subsection (2)(a) and (b) of this section must be reviewed by the legislature on a biennial basis based on the changing needs of the state in meeting its clean economy and greenhouse gas reduction goals in a timely, economically advantageous, and equitable manner.(4) During the 2023-2025 and 2025-2027 fiscal ((biennium))biennia, the legislature may direct the state treasurer to make transfers of moneys in the climate investment account to the carbon emissions reduction account, the climate commitment account, and the natural climate solutions account.Sec. 974. RCW 70A.65.260 and 2023 c 475 s 939 are each amended to read as follows:(1) The climate commitment account is created in the state treasury. The account must receive moneys distributed to the account from the climate investment account created in RCW 70A.65.250. Moneys in the account may be spent only after appropriation. Projects, activities, and programs eligible for funding from the account must be physically located in Washington state and include, but are not limited to, the following:(a) Implementing the working families' tax credit in RCW 82.08.0206;(b) Supplementing the growth management planning and environmental review fund established in RCW 36.70A.490 for the purpose of making grants or loans to local governments for the purposes set forth in RCW 43.21C.240, 43.21C.031, 36.70A.500, and 36.70A.600, for costs associated with RCW 36.70A.610, and to cover costs associated with the adoption of optional elements of comprehensive plans consistent with RCW 43.21C.420;(c) Programs, activities, or projects that reduce and mitigate impacts from greenhouse gases and copollutants in overburdened communities, including strengthening the air quality monitoring network to measure, track, and better understand air pollution levels and trends and to inform the analysis, monitoring, and pollution reduction measures required in RCW 70A.65.020;(d) Programs, activities, or projects that deploy renewable energy resources, such as solar and wind power, and projects to deploy distributed generation, energy storage, demand-side technologies and strategies, and other grid modernization projects;(e) Programs, activities, or projects that increase the energy efficiency or reduce greenhouse gas emissions of industrial facilities including, but not limited to, proposals to implement combined heat and power, district energy, or on-site renewables, such as solar and wind power, to upgrade the energy efficiency of existing equipment, to reduce process emissions, and to switch to less emissions intensive fuel sources;(f) Programs, activities, or projects that achieve energy efficiency or emissions reductions in the agricultural sector including:(i) Fertilizer management;(ii) Soil management;(iii) Bioenergy;(iv) Biofuels;(v) Grants, rebates, and other financial incentives for agricultural harvesting equipment, heavy duty trucks, agricultural pump engines, tractors, and other equipment used in agricultural operations;(vi) Grants, loans, or any financial incentives to food processors to implement projects that reduce greenhouse gas emissions;(vii) Renewable energy projects;(viii) Farmworker housing weatherization programs;(ix) Dairy digester research and development;(x) Alternative manure management; and(xi) Eligible fund uses under RCW 89.08.615;(g) Programs, activities, or projects that increase energy efficiency in new and existing buildings, or that promote low carbon architecture, including use of newly emerging alternative building materials that result in a lower carbon footprint in the built environment over the life cycle of the building and component building materials;(h) Programs, activities, or projects that promote the electrification and decarbonization of new and existing buildings, including residential, commercial, and industrial buildings;(i) Programs, activities, or projects that improve energy efficiency, including district energy, and investments in market transformation of high efficiency electric appliances and equipment for space and water heating;(j) Clean energy transition and assistance programs, activities, or projects that assist affected workers or people with lower incomes during the transition to a clean energy economy, or grow and expand clean manufacturing capacity in communities across Washington state including, but not limited to:(i) Programs, activities, or projects that directly improve energy affordability and reduce the energy burden of people with lower incomes, as well as the higher transportation fuel burden of rural residents, such as bill assistance, energy efficiency, and weatherization programs;(ii) Community renewable energy projects that allow qualifying participants to own or receive the benefits of those projects at reduced or no cost;(iii) Programs, activities, or other worker-support projects for bargaining unit and nonsupervisory fossil fuel workers who are affected by the transition away from fossil fuels to a clean energy economy. Worker support may include, but is not limited to: (A) Full wage replacement, health benefits, and pension contributions for every worker within five years of retirement; (B) full wage replacement, health benefits, and pension contributions for every worker with at least one year of service for each year of service up to five years of service; (C) wage insurance for up to five years for workers reemployed who have more than five years of service; (D) up to two years of retraining costs, including tuition and related costs, based on in-state community and technical college costs; (E) peer counseling services during transition; (F) employment placement services, prioritizing employment in the clean energy sector; and (G) relocation expenses;(iv) Direct investment in workforce development, via technical education, community college, institutions of higher education, apprenticeships, and other programs including, but not limited to:(A) Initiatives to develop a forest health workforce established under RCW 76.04.521; and(B) Initiatives to develop new education programs, emerging fields, or jobs pertaining to the clean energy economy;(v) Transportation, municipal service delivery, and technology investments that increase a community's capacity for clean manufacturing, with an emphasis on communities in greatest need of job creation and economic development and potential for commute reduction;(k) Programs, activities, or projects that reduce emissions from landfills and waste-to-energy facilities through diversion of organic materials, methane capture or conversion strategies, installation of gas collection devices and gas control systems, monitoring and reporting of methane emissions, or other means, prioritizing funding needed for any activities by local governments to comply with chapter 70A.540 RCW;(l) Carbon dioxide removal projects, programs, and activities; and(m) Activities to support efforts to mitigate and adapt to the effects of climate change affecting Indian tribes, including capital investments in support of the relocation of Indian tribes located in areas at heightened risk due to anticipated sea level rise, flooding, or other disturbances caused by climate change. The legislature intends to dedicate at least $50,000,000 per biennium from the account for purposes of this subsection.(2) Moneys in the account may not be used for projects or activities that would violate tribal treaty rights or result in significant long-term damage to critical habitat or ecological functions. Investments from this account must result in long-term environmental benefits and increased resilience to the impacts of climate change.(3) During the 2023-2025 and 2025-2027 fiscal ((biennium))biennia, the legislature may appropriate moneys from the climate commitment account for activities related to environmental justice, including implementation of chapter 314, Laws of 2021.Sec. 975. RCW 70A.65.300 and 2024 c 376 s 912 are each amended to read as follows:(1) The department shall prepare, post on the department website, and submit to the appropriate committees of the legislature an annual report that identifies all distributions of moneys from the accounts created in RCW 70A.65.240 through 70A.65.280.(2) The report must identify, at a minimum, the recipient of the funding, the amount of the funding, the purpose of the funding, the actual end result or use of the funding, whether the project that received the funding produced any verifiable reduction in greenhouse gas emissions or other long-term impact to emissions, and if so, the quantity of reduced greenhouse gas emissions, the cost per carbon dioxide equivalent metric ton of reduced greenhouse gas emissions, and a comparison to other greenhouse gas emissions reduction projects in order to facilitate the development of cost-benefit ratios for greenhouse gas emissions reduction projects.(3) The department shall require by rule that recipients of funds from the accounts created in RCW 70A.65.240 through 70A.65.280 report to the department, in a form and manner prescribed by the department, the information required for the department to carry out the department's duties established in this section.(4) The department shall update its website with the information described in subsection (2) of this section as appropriate but no less frequently than once per calendar year.(5) The department shall submit its report to the appropriate committees of the legislature with the information described in subsection (2) of this section no later than September 30 of each year. For fiscal year 2025, the report must be submitted no later than November 30, 2024. During the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium, the report must be submitted no later than November 30 of each fiscal year.Sec. 976. RCW 70A.200.140 and 2022 c 297 s 963 are each amended to read as follows:(1) There is hereby created an account within the state treasury to be known as the waste reduction, recycling, and litter control account. Moneys in the account may be spent only after appropriation. Expenditures from the waste reduction, recycling, and litter control account shall be used as follows:(a) Forty percent to the department of ecology, primarily for use by the departments of ecology, natural resources, revenue, transportation, and corrections, and the parks and recreation commission, for litter collection programs under RCW 70A.200.170. The amount to the department of ecology shall also be used for a central coordination function for litter control efforts statewide; to support employment of youth in litter cleanup as intended in RCW 70A.200.020, and for litter pick up using other authorized agencies; and for statewide public awareness programs under RCW 70A.200.150(7). The amount to the department shall also be used to defray the costs of administering the funding, coordination, and oversight of local government programs for waste reduction, litter control, recycling, and composting so that local governments can apply one hundred percent of their funding to achieving program goals. The amount to the department of revenue shall be used to enforce compliance with the litter tax imposed in chapter 82.19 RCW;(b)(i) Twenty percent to the department for local government funding programs for waste reduction, litter control, recycling activities, and composting activities by cities and counties under RCW 70A.200.190, to be administered by the department of ecology; (ii) any unspent funds under (b)(i) of this subsection may be used to create and pay for a matching fund competitive grant program to be used by local governments for the development and implementation of contamination reduction and outreach plans for inclusion in comprehensive solid waste management plans or by local governments and nonprofit organizations for local or statewide education programs designed to help the public with litter control, waste reduction, recycling, and composting of primarily the products taxed under chapter 82.19 RCW. Recipients under this subsection include programs to reduce wasted food and food waste that are designed to achieve the goals established in RCW 70A.205.715(1) and that are consistent with the plan developed in RCW 70A.205.715(3). Grants must adhere to the following requirements: (A) No grant may exceed sixty thousand dollars; (B) grant recipients shall match the grant funding allocated by the department by an amount equal to twenty-five percent of eligible expenses. A local government's share of these costs may be met by cash or contributed services; (C) the obligation of the department to make grant payments is contingent upon the availability of the amount of money appropriated for this subsection (1)(b); and (D) grants are managed under the guidelines for existing grant programs; and(c) Forty percent to the department of ecology to: (i) Implement activities under RCW 70A.200.150 for waste reduction, recycling, and composting efforts; (ii) provide technical assistance to local governments and commercial businesses to increase recycling markets and recycling and composting programs primarily for the products taxed under chapter 82.19 RCW designed to educate citizens about waste reduction, litter control, and recyclable and compostable products and programs; (iii) increase access to waste reduction, composting, and recycling programs, particularly for food packaging and plastic bags and appropriate composting techniques; and (iv) for programs to reduce wasted food and food waste that are designed to achieve the goals established in RCW 70A.205.715(1) and that are consistent with the plan developed in RCW 70A.205.715(3).(2) All taxes imposed in RCW 82.19.010 and fines and bail forfeitures collected or received pursuant to this chapter shall be deposited in the waste reduction, recycling, and litter control account and used for the programs under subsection (1) of this section.(3) Not less than five percent and no more than ten percent of the amount appropriated into the waste reduction, recycling, and litter control account every biennium shall be reserved for capital needs, including the purchase of vehicles for transporting crews and for collecting litter and solid waste. Capital funds shall be distributed among state agencies and local governments according to the same criteria provided in RCW 70A.200.170 for the remainder of the funds, so that the most effective waste reduction, litter control, recycling, and composting programs receive the most funding. The intent of this subsection is to provide funds for the purchase of equipment that will enable the department to account for the greatest return on investment in terms of reaching a zero litter goal.(4) Funds in the waste reduction, recycling, and litter control account, collected under chapter 82.19 RCW, must be prioritized for the products identified under RCW 82.19.020 solely for the purposes of recycling, composting, and litter collection, reduction, and control programs.(5) During the 2021-2023 fiscal biennium, Washington State University may use funds in the waste reduction, recycling, and litter control account, collected under chapter 82.19 RCW, to conduct an organic waste study.(6) During the 2021-2023 fiscal biennium, and as an exception to the distribution of expenditures otherwise required in this section, the department of ecology may use funds in the waste reduction, recycling, and litter control account to continue a series of food waste reduction campaigns, to continue to invest in litter prevention campaigns, to conduct a recycling study, and to increase litter control on state highways.(7) During the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium the legislature may appropriate funding for general administrative purposes at the department of ecology. In addition, during the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium, subsection (1)(a), (b), and (c) of this section is suspended.Sec. 977. RCW 70A.305.180 and 2023 c 475 s 940 are each amended to read as follows:(1) The model toxics control operating account is hereby created in the state treasury.(2) Moneys in the model toxics control operating account must be used only to carry out the purposes of this chapter, including but not limited to the following:(a) The state's responsibility for hazardous waste planning, management, regulation, enforcement, technical assistance, and public education required under chapter 70A.300 RCW;(b) The state's responsibility for solid waste planning, management, regulation, enforcement, technical assistance, and public education required under chapter 70A.205 RCW;(c) The hazardous waste clean-up program required under this chapter;(d) State matching funds required under federal cleanup law;(e) Financial assistance for local programs and plans, including local solid waste financial assistance, in accordance with chapters 70A.405, 70A.205, 70A.214, 70A.224, and 70A.300 RCW;(f) State government programs for the safe reduction, recycling, or disposal of paint and hazardous wastes from households, small businesses, and agriculture;(g) Oil and hazardous materials spill prevention, preparedness, training, and response activities;(h) Water and environmental health protection and monitoring programs;(i) Programs authorized under chapter 70A.135 RCW;(j) A public participation program;(k) Development and demonstration of alternative management technologies designed to carry out the hazardous waste management priorities of RCW 70A.300.260;(l) State agriculture and health programs for the safe use, reduction, recycling, or disposal of pesticides;(m) Funding requirements to maintain receipt of federal funds under the federal solid waste disposal act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 6901 et seq.);(n) Air quality programs and actions for reducing public exposure to toxic air pollution;(o) Petroleum-based plastic or expanded polystyrene foam debris clean-up activities in fresh or marine waters; and(p) For the 2021-2023 fiscal biennium, and solely to continue the policy of previous biennia, forest practices at the department of natural resources.(3) Except for unanticipated receipts under RCW 43.79.260 through 43.79.282, moneys in model toxics control operating account may be spent only after appropriation by statute.(4) One percent of the moneys collected under RCW 82.21.030 must be allocated only for public participation grants to persons who may be adversely affected by a release or threatened release of a hazardous substance and to not-for-profit public interest organizations. The primary purpose of these grants is to facilitate the participation by persons and organizations in the investigation and remedying of releases or threatened releases of hazardous substances and to implement the state's solid and hazardous waste management priorities. No grant may exceed sixty thousand dollars. Grants may be renewed annually. Moneys appropriated for public participation that are not expended at the close of any biennium revert to the model toxics control operating account.(5) The department must adopt rules for grant or loan issuance and performance.(6) During the 2023-2025 and 2025-2027 fiscal ((biennium))biennia, the legislature may direct the state treasurer to make transfers of moneys in the model toxics control operating account to the state general fund.Sec. 978. RCW 70A.305.190 and 2024 c 375 s 8009 are each amended to read as follows:(1) The model toxics control capital account is hereby created in the state treasury.(2) In addition to the funds deposited into the model toxics control capital account required under RCW 82.21.030, the following moneys must be deposited into the model toxics control capital account:(a) The costs of remedial actions recovered under this chapter, except as provided under RCW 70A.305.170(7);(b) Penalties collected or recovered under this chapter; and(c) Any other money appropriated or transferred to the account by the legislature.(3) Moneys in the model toxics control capital account must be used for the improvement, rehabilitation, remediation, and cleanup of toxic sites and other capital-related expenditures for programs and activities identified in subsection (4) of this section.(4) Moneys in the model toxics control capital account may be used only for capital projects and activities that carry out the purposes of this chapter and for financial assistance to local governments or other persons to carry out those projects or activities, including but not limited to the following, generally in descending order of priority:(a) Remedial actions, including the following generally in descending order of priority:(i) Extended grant agreements entered into under subsection (5)(a) of this section;(ii) Grants or loans to local governments for remedial actions, including planning for adaptive reuse of properties as provided for under subsection (5)(d) of this section. The department must prioritize funding of remedial actions at:(A) Facilities on the department's hazardous sites list with a high hazard ranking for which there is an approved remedial action work plan or an equivalent document under federal cleanup law;(B) Brownfield properties within a redevelopment opportunity zone if the local government is a prospective purchaser of the property and there is a department-approved remedial action work plan or equivalent document under the federal cleanup law;(iii) Department-conducted remedial actions;(iv) Grants to persons intending to remediate contaminated real property for development of affordable housing;(v) Public funding to assist potentially liable persons to pay for the costs of remedial action in compliance with clean-up standards under RCW 70A.305.030(2)(e) if:(A) The amount and terms of the funding are established under a settlement agreement under RCW 70A.305.040(4); and(B) The director has found that the funding will achieve both a substantially more expeditious or enhanced cleanup than would otherwise occur, and the prevention or mitigation of unfair economic hardship;(vi) Public funding to assist prospective purchasers to pay for the costs of remedial action in compliance with clean-up standards under RCW 70A.305.030(2)(e) if:(A) The facility is located within a redevelopment opportunity zone designated under RCW 70A.305.150;(B) The amount and terms of the funding are established under a settlement agreement under RCW 70A.305.040(5); and(C) The director has found the funding will achieve a substantially more expeditious or enhanced cleanup than would otherwise occur, provide a public benefit in addition to cleanup commensurate with the scope of the public funding; and meet any additional criteria established in rule by the department; and(vii) To expedite multiparty clean-up efforts, purchase of remedial action cost-cap insurance;(b) Grants, or loans, or contracts to local governments for solid waste plans and programs under chapters 70A.205, 70A.214, 70A.224, 70A.222, 70A.230, and 70A.300 RCW. Funds must be allocated consistent with priorities and matching requirements in the respective chapters;(c) Toxic air pollutant reduction programs, including grants or loans to local governments for woodstoves and diesel;(d) Grants, loans, or contracts to local governments for hazardous waste plans and programs under chapters 70A.405 and 70A.300 RCW, including chemical action plan implementation. Funds must be allocated consistent with priorities and matching requirements in the respective chapters; and(e) Petroleum-based plastic or expanded polystyrene foam debris clean-up activities in fresh or marine waters.(5) The department may establish and administer a program to provide grants and loans to local governments for remedial actions, including planning for adaptive reuse of contaminated properties. To expedite cleanups throughout the state, the department may use the following strategies when providing grants to local governments under this subsection:(a) Enter into an extended grant agreement with a local government conducting remedial actions at a facility where those actions extend over multiple biennia and the total eligible cost of those actions exceeds $20,000,000. The agreement is subject to the following limitations:(i) The initial duration of such an agreement may not exceed 10 years. The department may extend the duration of such an agreement upon finding substantial progress has been made on remedial actions at the facility;(ii) Extended grant agreements may not exceed 50 percent of the total eligible remedial action costs at the facility; and(iii) The department may not allocate future funding to an extended grant agreement unless the local government has demonstrated to the department that funds awarded under the agreement during the previous biennium have been substantially expended or contracts have been entered into to substantially expend the funds;(b) Enter into a grant agreement with a local government conducting a remedial action that provides for periodic reimbursement of remedial action costs as they are incurred as established in the agreement;(c) Enter into a grant agreement with a local government prior to it acquiring a property or obtaining necessary access to conduct remedial actions, provided the agreement is conditioned upon the local government acquiring the property or obtaining the access in accordance with a schedule specified in the agreement;(d) Provide integrated planning grants to local governments to fund studies necessary to facilitate remedial actions at brownfield properties and adaptive reuse of properties following remediation. Eligible activities include, but are not limited to: Environmental site assessments; remedial investigations; health assessments; feasibility studies; site planning; community involvement; land use and regulatory analyses; building and infrastructure assessments; economic and fiscal analyses; and any environmental analyses under chapter 43.21C RCW;(e) Provide grants to local governments for remedial actions related to area-wide groundwater contamination. To receive the funding, the local government does not need to be a potentially liable person or be required to seek reimbursement of grant funds from a potentially liable person;(f) The director may alter grant matching requirements to create incentives for local governments to expedite cleanups when one of the following conditions exists:(i) Funding would prevent or mitigate unfair economic hardship imposed by the clean-up liability;(ii) Funding would create new substantial economic development, public recreational opportunities, or habitat restoration opportunities that would not otherwise occur; or(iii) Funding would create an opportunity for acquisition and redevelopment of brownfield property under RCW 70A.305.040(5) that would not otherwise occur; and(g) When pending grant applications under subsection (4)(d) and (e) of this section exceed the amount of funds available, designated redevelopment opportunity zones must receive priority for distribution of available funds.(6) Except for unanticipated receipts under RCW 43.79.260 through 43.79.282, moneys in model toxics control capital account may be spent only after appropriation by statute.(7) The legislature finds that, in 2023, wildfires in Spokane and Pend Oreille counties resulted in a loss of approximately 366 homes as well as secondary buildings. The burning of these structures has resulted in a large toxic debris field containing asbestos, heavy metals, plastics, and fuel which are at risk of leaching into the soil and groundwater. During the 2023-2025 fiscal biennium, moneys in the model toxics control capital account may be used for financial assistance to local governments for the testing of hazardous materials, removal of debris, and remediation of soil necessary to support the rebuilding of communities impacted by these wildfires.(8) During the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium, the legislature may direct the state treasurer to make transfers of moneys in the model toxics control capital account to the state general fund.Sec. 979. RCW 71.24.580 and 2024 c 179 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:(1) The criminal justice treatment account is created in the state treasury. Moneys in the account may be expended solely for: (a) Substance use disorder treatment and treatment support services for offenders with a substance use disorder that, if not treated, would result in addiction, against whom charges are filed by a prosecuting attorney in Washington state; (b) the provision of substance use disorder treatment services and treatment support services for nonviolent offenders within a drug court program and for 180 days following graduation from the drug court program; and (c) the administrative and overhead costs associated with the operation of a drug court. Amounts provided in this subsection must be used for treatment and recovery support services for criminally involved offenders and authorization of these services shall not be subject to determinations of medical necessity. Moneys in the account may be spent only after appropriation.(2) For purposes of this section:(a) "Treatment" means services that are critical to a participant's successful completion of his or her substance use disorder treatment program, including but not limited to the recovery support and other programmatic elements outlined in RCW 2.30.030 authorizing therapeutic courts; and(b) "Treatment support" includes transportation to or from inpatient or outpatient treatment services when no viable alternative exists, and child care services that are necessary to ensure a participant's ability to attend outpatient treatment sessions.(3) Revenues to the criminal justice treatment account consist of: (a) Funds transferred to the account pursuant to this section; and (b) any other revenues appropriated to or deposited in the account.(4)(a) For the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2005, and each subsequent fiscal year, the state treasurer shall transfer eight million two hundred fifty thousand dollars from the general fund to the criminal justice treatment account, divided into four equal quarterly payments. For the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2006, and each subsequent fiscal year, the amount transferred shall be increased on an annual basis by the implicit price deflator as published by the federal bureau of labor statistics.(b) In each odd-numbered year, the legislature shall appropriate the amount transferred to the criminal justice treatment account in (a) of this subsection to the department for the purposes of subsection (5) of this section.(5) Moneys appropriated to the authority from the criminal justice treatment account shall be distributed as specified in this subsection. The authority may retain up to three percent of the amount appropriated under subsection (4)(b) of this section for its administrative costs.(a) Seventy percent of amounts appropriated to the authority from the account shall be distributed to counties pursuant to the distribution formula adopted under this section. The authority, in consultation with the department of corrections, the Washington state association of counties, the Washington state association of drug court professionals, the superior court judges' association, the Washington association of prosecuting attorneys, representatives of the criminal defense bar, representatives of substance use disorder treatment providers, and any other person deemed by the authority to be necessary, shall establish a fair and reasonable methodology for distribution to counties of moneys in the criminal justice treatment account. County or regional plans submitted for the expenditure of formula funds must be approved by the panel established in (b) of this subsection.(b) Thirty percent of the amounts appropriated to the authority from the account shall be distributed as grants for purposes of treating offenders against whom charges are filed by a county prosecuting attorney. The authority shall appoint a panel of representatives from the Washington association of prosecuting attorneys, the Washington association of sheriffs and police chiefs, the superior court judges' association, the Washington state association of counties, the Washington defender's association or the Washington association of criminal defense lawyers, the department of corrections, the Washington state association of drug court professionals, and substance use disorder treatment providers. The panel shall review county or regional plans for funding under (a) of this subsection and grants approved under this subsection. The panel shall attempt to ensure that treatment as funded by the grants is available to offenders statewide.(6) The county alcohol and drug coordinator, county prosecutor, county sheriff, county superior court, a substance abuse treatment provider appointed by the county legislative authority, a member of the criminal defense bar appointed by the county legislative authority, and, in counties with a drug court, a representative of the drug court shall jointly submit a plan, approved by the county legislative authority or authorities, to the panel established in subsection (5)(b) of this section, for disposition of all the funds provided from the criminal justice treatment account within that county. The submitted plan should incorporate current evidence-based practices in substance use disorder treatment. The funds shall be used solely to provide approved alcohol and substance use disorder treatment pursuant to RCW 71.24.560 and treatment support services. No more than ten percent of the total moneys received under subsections (4) and (5) of this section by a county or group of counties participating in a regional agreement shall be spent for treatment support services.(7) Counties are encouraged to consider regional agreements and submit regional plans for the efficient delivery of treatment under this section.(8) Moneys allocated under this section shall be used to supplement, not supplant, other federal, state, and local funds used for substance abuse treatment.(9) If a region or county uses criminal justice treatment account funds to support a therapeutic court, the therapeutic court must allow the use of all medications approved by the federal food and drug administration for the treatment of opioid use disorder as deemed medically appropriate for a participant by a medical professional. If appropriate medication-assisted treatment resources are not available or accessible within the jurisdiction, the health care authority's designee for assistance must assist the court with acquiring the resource.(10) Counties must meet the criteria established in RCW 2.30.030(3).(11) The authority shall annually review and monitor the expenditures made by any county or group of counties that receives appropriated funds distributed under this section. Counties shall repay any funds that are not spent in accordance with the requirements of its contract with the authority.(12) During the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium, the legislature may appropriate moneys from the criminal justice treatment account to provide access to medications for opioid use disorders and alcohol use disorders to individuals in city, county, regional, and tribal jails, and for short-term housing vouchers for individuals with substance use disorders that may also interact with the criminal justice system. Appropriations made under this subsection are not subject to the distribution methodology or other requirements and limitations outlined in subsection (1) through subsection (11) of this section. It is the intent of the legislature to continue this policy in subsequent fiscal biennia.Sec. 980. RCW 71.24.890 and 2024 c 368 s 4 and 2024 c 364 s 1 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:(1) Establishing the state designated 988 contact hubs and enhancing the crisis response system will require collaborative work between the department, the authority, and regional system partners within their respective roles. The department shall have primary responsibility for designating 988 contact hubs, and shall seek recommendations from the behavioral health administrative services organizations to determine which 988 contact hubs best meet regional needs. The authority shall have primary responsibility for developing, implementing, and facilitating coordination of the crisis response system and services to support the work of the designated 988 contact hubs, regional crisis lines, and other coordinated regional behavioral health crisis response system partners. In any instance in which one agency is identified as the lead, the expectation is that agency will communicate and collaborate with the other to ensure seamless, continuous, and effective service delivery within the statewide crisis response system.(2) The department shall provide adequate funding for the state's crisis call centers to meet an expected increase in the use of the 988 contact hubs based on the implementation of the 988 crisis hotline. The funding level shall be established at a level anticipated to achieve an in-state call response rate of at least 90 percent by July 22, 2022. The funding level shall be determined by considering standards and cost per call predictions provided by the administrator of the national suicide prevention lifeline, call volume predictions, guidance on crisis call center performance metrics, and necessary technology upgrades. Contracts with the 988 contact hubs:(a) May provide funding to support designated 988 contact hubs to enter into limited partnerships with the public safety answering point to increase the coordination and transfer of behavioral health calls received by certified public safety telecommunicators that are better addressed by clinic interventions provided by the 988 system. Tax revenue may be used to support partnerships. These partnerships with 988 and public safety may be expanded to include regional crisis lines administered by behavioral health administrative services organizations;(b) Shall require that 988 contact hubs enter into data-sharing agreements, when appropriate, with the department, the authority, regional crisis lines, and applicable regional behavioral health administrative services organizations to provide reports and client level data regarding 988 contact hub calls, as allowed by and in compliance with existing federal and state law governing the sharing and use of protected health information. Data-sharing agreements with regional crisis lines must include real-time information sharing. All coordinated regional behavioral health crisis response system partners must share dispatch time, arrival time, and disposition for behavioral health calls referred for outreach by each region consistent with any regional protocols developed under RCW 71.24.432. The department and the authority shall establish requirements for 988 contact hubs to report data to regional behavioral health administrative services organizations for the purposes of maximizing medicaid reimbursement, as appropriate, and implementing this chapter and chapters 71.05 and 71.34 RCW. The behavioral health administrative services organization may use information received from the 988 contact hubs in administering crisis services for the assigned regional service area, contracting with a sufficient number of licensed or certified providers for crisis services, establishing and maintaining quality assurance processes, maintaining patient tracking, and developing and implementing strategies to coordinate care for individuals with a history of frequent crisis system utilization.(3) The department shall adopt rules by January 1, 2025, to establish standards for designation of crisis call centers as designated 988 contact hubs. The department shall collaborate with the authority, other agencies, and coordinated regional behavioral health crisis response system partners to assure coordination and availability of services, and shall consider national guidelines for behavioral health crisis care as determined by the federal substance abuse and mental health services administration, national behavioral health accrediting bodies, and national behavioral health provider associations to the extent they are appropriate, and recommendations from behavioral health administrative services organizations and the crisis response improvement strategy committee created in RCW 71.24.892.(4) The department shall designate 988 contact hubs considering the recommendations of behavioral health administrative services organizations by January 1, 2026. The designated 988 contact hubs shall provide connections to crisis intervention services, triage, care coordination, and referrals for individuals contacting the 988 contact hubs from any jurisdiction within Washington 24 hours a day, seven days a week, using the system platform developed under subsection (5) of this section. The department may not designate more than a total of four 988 contact hubs without legislative approval.(a) To be designated as a 988 contact hub, the applicant must demonstrate to the department the ability to comply with the requirements of this section and to contract to provide 988 contact hub services. If a 988 contact hub fails to substantially comply with the contract, data-sharing requirements, or approved regional protocols developed under RCW 71.24.432, the department may revoke the designation of the 988 contact hub and, after consulting with the affected behavioral health administrative services organization, may designate a 988 contact hub recommended by a behavioral health administrative services organization which is able to meet necessary state and federal requirements.(b) The contracts entered shall require designated 988 contact hubs to:(i) Have an active agreement with the administrator of the national suicide prevention lifeline for participation within its network;(ii) Meet the requirements for operational and clinical standards established by the department and based upon the national suicide prevention lifeline best practices guidelines and other recognized best practices;(iii) Employ highly qualified, skilled, and trained clinical staff who have sufficient training and resources to provide empathy to callers in acute distress, de-escalate crises, assess behavioral health disorders and suicide risk, triage to system partners for callers that need additional clinical interventions, and provide case management and documentation. Call center staff shall be trained to make every effort to resolve cases in the least restrictive environment and without law enforcement involvement whenever possible. Call center staff shall coordinate with certified peer counselors to provide follow-up and outreach to callers in distress as available. It is intended for transition planning to include a pathway for continued employment and skill advancement as needed for experienced crisis call center employees;(iv) Train employees on agricultural community cultural competencies for suicide prevention, which may include sharing resources with callers that are specific to members from the agricultural community. The training must prepare staff to provide appropriate assessments, interventions, and resources to members of the agricultural community. Employees may make warm transfers and referrals to a crisis hotline that specializes in working with members from the agricultural community, provided that no person contacting 988 shall be transferred or referred to another service if they are currently in crisis and in need of emotional support;(v) Prominently display 988 crisis hotline information on their websites and social media, including a description of what the caller should expect when contacting the crisis call center and a description of the various options available to the caller, including call lines specialized in the behavioral health needs of veterans, American Indian and Alaska Native persons, Spanish-speaking persons, and LGBTQ populations. The website may also include resources for programs and services related to suicide prevention for the agricultural community;(vi) Collaborate with the authority, the national suicide prevention lifeline, and veterans crisis line networks to assure consistency of public messaging about the 988 crisis hotline;(vii) Collaborate with coordinated regional behavioral health crisis response system partners within the 988 contact hub's regional service area to develop protocols under RCW 71.24.432, including protocols related to the dispatching of mobile rapid response crisis teams and community-based crisis teams endorsed under RCW 71.24.903;(viii) Provide data and reports and participate in evaluations and related quality improvement activities, according to standards established by the department in collaboration with the authority; and(ix) Enter into data-sharing agreements with the department, the authority, regional crisis lines, and applicable behavioral health administrative services organizations to provide reports and client level data regarding 988 contact hub calls, as allowed by and in compliance with existing federal and state law governing the sharing and use of protected health information, which shall include sharing real-time information with regional crisis lines. The department and the authority shall establish requirements that the designated 988 contact hubs report data to regional behavioral health administrative services organizations for the purposes of maximizing medicaid reimbursement, as appropriate, and implementing this chapter and chapters 71.05 and 71.34 RCW including, but not limited to, administering crisis services for the assigned regional service area, contracting with a sufficient number of licensed or certified providers for crisis services, establishing and maintaining quality assurance processes, maintaining patient tracking, and developing and implementing strategies to coordinate care for individuals with a history of frequent crisis system utilization.(c) The department and the authority shall incorporate recommendations from the crisis response improvement strategy committee created under RCW 71.24.892 in its agreements with designated 988 contact hubs, as appropriate.(5) The department and authority must coordinate to develop the technology and platforms necessary to manage and operate the behavioral health crisis response and suicide prevention system. The department and the authority must include designated 988 contact hubs, regional crisis lines, and behavioral health administrative services organizations in the decision-making process for selecting any technology platforms that will be used to operate the system. No decisions made by the department or the authority shall interfere with the routing of the 988 contact hubs calls, texts, or chat as part of Washington's active agreement with the administrator of the national suicide prevention lifeline or 988 administrator that routes 988 contacts into Washington's system. The technologies developed must include:(a) A new technologically advanced behavioral health and suicide prevention crisis call center system platform for use in 988 contact hubs designated by the department under subsection (4) of this section. This platform, which shall be implemented as soon as possible and fully funded by ((January 1, 2026))June 30, 2027, shall be developed by the department and must include the capacity to receive crisis assistance requests through phone calls, texts, chats, and other similar methods of communication that may be developed in the future that promote access to the behavioral health crisis system; and(b) A behavioral health integrated client referral system capable of providing system coordination information to designated 988 contact hubs and the other entities involved in behavioral health care. This system shall be developed by the authority.(6) In developing the new technologies under subsection (5) of this section, the department and the authority must coordinate to designate a primary technology system to provide each of the following:(a) Access to real-time information relevant to the coordination of behavioral health crisis response and suicide prevention services, including:(i) Real-time bed availability for all behavioral health bed types and recliner chairs, including but not limited to crisis stabilization services, 23-hour crisis relief centers, psychiatric inpatient, substance use disorder inpatient, withdrawal management, peer-run respite centers, and crisis respite services, inclusive of both voluntary and involuntary beds, for use by crisis response workers, first responders, health care providers, emergency departments, and individuals in crisis; and(ii) Real-time information relevant to the coordination of behavioral health crisis response and suicide prevention services for a person, including the means to access:(A) Information about any less restrictive alternative treatment orders or mental health advance directives related to the person; and(B) Information necessary to enable the designated 988 contact hubs to actively collaborate with regional crisis lines, emergency departments, primary care providers and behavioral health providers within managed care organizations, behavioral health administrative services organizations, and other health care payers to establish a safety plan for the person in accordance with best practices and provide the next steps for the person's transition to follow-up noncrisis care. To establish information-sharing guidelines that fulfill the intent of this section the authority shall consider input from the confidential information compliance and coordination subcommittee established under RCW 71.24.892;(b) The means to track the outcome of the 988 call to enable appropriate follow-up, cross-system coordination, and accountability, including as appropriate: (i) Any immediate services dispatched and reports generated from the encounter; (ii) the validation of a safety plan established for the caller in accordance with best practices; (iii) the next steps for the caller to follow in transition to noncrisis follow-up care, including a next-day appointment for callers experiencing urgent, symptomatic behavioral health care needs; and (iv) the means to verify and document whether the caller was successful in making the transition to appropriate noncrisis follow-up care indicated in the safety plan for the person, to be completed either by the care coordinator provided through the person's managed care organization, health plan, or behavioral health administrative services organization, or if such a care coordinator is not available or does not follow through, by the staff of the designated 988 contact hub;(c) A means to facilitate actions to verify and document whether the person's transition to follow-up noncrisis care was completed and services offered, to be performed by a care coordinator provided through the person's managed care organization, health plan, or behavioral health administrative services organization, or if such a care coordinator is not available or does not follow through, by the staff of the designated 988 contact hub;(d) The means to provide geographically, culturally, and linguistically appropriate services to persons who are part of high-risk populations or otherwise have need of specialized services or accommodations, and to document these services or accommodations; and(e) When appropriate, consultation with tribal governments to ensure coordinated care in government-to-government relationships, and access to dedicated services to tribal members.(7) The authority shall:(a) Collaborate with county authorities and behavioral health administrative services organizations to develop procedures to dispatch behavioral health crisis services in coordination with designated 988 contact hubs to effectuate the intent of this section;(b) Establish formal agreements with managed care organizations and behavioral health administrative services organizations by January 1, 2023, to provide for the services, capacities, and coordination necessary to effectuate the intent of this section, which shall include a requirement to arrange next-day appointments for persons contacting the 988 contact hub or a regional crisis line experiencing urgent, symptomatic behavioral health care needs with geographically, culturally, and linguistically appropriate primary care or behavioral health providers within the person's provider network, or, if uninsured, through the person's behavioral health administrative services organization;(c) Create best practices guidelines by July 1, 2023, for deployment of appropriate and available crisis response services by behavioral health administrative services organizations in coordination with designated 988 contact hubs to assist 988 hotline callers to minimize nonessential reliance on emergency room services and the use of law enforcement, considering input from relevant stakeholders and recommendations made by the crisis response improvement strategy committee created under RCW 71.24.892;(d) Develop procedures to allow appropriate information sharing and communication between and across crisis and emergency response systems for the purpose of real-time crisis care coordination including, but not limited to, deployment of crisis and outgoing services, follow-up care, and linked, flexible services specific to crisis response; and(e) Establish guidelines to appropriately serve high-risk populations who request crisis services. The authority shall design these guidelines to promote behavioral health equity for all populations with attention to circumstances of race, ethnicity, gender, socioeconomic status, sexual orientation, and geographic location, and include components such as training requirements for call response workers, policies for transferring such callers to an appropriate specialized center or subnetwork within or external to the national suicide prevention lifeline network, and procedures for referring persons who access the 988 contact hubs to linguistically and culturally competent care.(8) The department shall monitor trends in 988 crisis hotline caller data, as reported by designated 988 contact hubs under subsection (4)(b)(ix) of this section, and submit an annual report to the governor and the appropriate committees of the legislature summarizing the data and trends beginning December 1, 2027.(9) Subject to authorization by the national 988 administrator and the availability of amounts appropriated for this specific purpose, any Washington state subnetwork of the 988 crisis hotline dedicated to the crisis assistance needs of American Indian and Alaska Native persons shall offer services by text, chat, and other similar methods of communication to the same extent as does the general 988 crisis hotline. The department shall coordinate with the substance abuse and mental health services administration for the authorization.Sec. 981. RCW 74.31.060 and 2019 c 181 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:The traumatic brain injury account is created in the state treasury. The fee imposed under RCW 46.63.110(7)(c) must be deposited into the account. ((Moneys))Except for the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium, when the treasurer shall transfer $1,111,000 to the general fundâstate, moneys in the account may be spent only after appropriation, and may be used only to support the activities in the statewide traumatic brain injury comprehensive plan, to provide a public awareness campaign and services relating to traumatic brain injury under RCW 74.31.040 and 74.31.050, for information and referral services, and for costs of required department staff who are providing support for the council under RCW 74.31.020 and 74.31.030. The secretary of the department of social and health services has the authority to administer the funds. The department must make every effort to disburse the incremental revenue that is the result of the fee increased under RCW 46.63.110(7)(c) in a diverse manner to include rural areas of the state.Sec. 982. RCW 74.46.581 and 2016 c 131 s 7 are each amended to read as follows:A separate nursing facility quality enhancement account is created in the custody of the state treasurer. Beginning July 1, 2015, all net receipts from the reconciliation and settlement process provided in RCW 74.46.022(6), as described within RCW 74.46.561, must be deposited into the account. Beginning July 1, 2016, all receipts from the system of financial penalties for facilities out of compliance with minimum staffing standards, as described within RCW 74.42.360, must be deposited into the account. Only the secretary, or the secretary's designee, may authorize expenditures from the account. The account is subject to allotment procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW, but an appropriation is not required for expenditures. ((The))Except during the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium, the department shall use the special account only for technical assistance for nursing facilities, specialized training for nursing facilities, or an increase to the quality enhancement established in RCW 74.46.561, or as necessary for the reconciliation and settlement process, which requires deposits and withdrawals to complete both the preliminary and final settlement net receipt amounts for this account. During the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium, the account may be expended for funding costs associated with nursing facilities.Sec. 983. RCW 76.04.511 and 2021 c 298 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:(1) The wildfire response, forest restoration, and community resilience account is created in the state treasury. All receipts from moneys directed to the account must be deposited in the account. Moneys in the account may be spent only after appropriation. Expenditures from the account may be used only for carrying out the purposes of chapter 298, Laws of 2021 and for no other purposes.(2) Expenditures from the account may be made to state agencies, federally recognized tribes, local governments, fire and conservation districts, nonprofit organizations, forest collaboratives, and small forestland owners, consistent with the 20-year forest health strategic plan, the wildland fire protection 10-year strategic plan, and the Washington state forest action plan.(3) The wildfire response, forest restoration, and community resilience account may only be used to monitor, track, and implement the following purposes:(a) Fire preparedness activities consistent with the goals contained in the state's wildland fire protection 10-year strategic plan including, but not limited to, funding for firefighting capacity and investments in ground and aerial firefighting resources, equipment, and technology, and the development and implementation of a wildland fire aviation support plan in order to expand and improve the effectiveness and cost-efficiency of the department's wildland fire aviation program;(b) Fire prevention activities to restore and improve forest health and reduce vulnerability to drought, insect infestation, disease, and other threats to healthy forests including, but not limited to, silvicultural treatments, seedling development, thinning and prescribed fire, and postfire recovery activities to stabilize and prevent unacceptable degradation to natural and cultural resources and minimize threats to life and property resulting from the effects of a wildfire. Funding priority under this subsection must be given to programs, activities, or projects aligned with the 20-year forest health strategic plan, the wildland fire protection 10-year strategic plan, and the Washington state forest action plan across any combination of local, state, federal, tribal, and private ownerships;(c) Fire protection activities for homes, properties, communities, and values at risk including, but not limited to: Potential control lines or strategic fuel breaks in forests and rangelands near communities; improved warning and communications systems to prepare for wildfires; increased engagement with non-English speaking communities in their home language for community preparedness; and the national fire protection association's fire wise USA and the fire-adapted communities network programs to help communities take action before wildfires;(d) During the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium, activities related to post-wildland fire response including post-wildfire debris flow monitoring.(4) Appropriations for forest health activities funded by the wildfire response, forest restoration, and community resilience account shall not be less than 25 percent of the biennial appropriated funding.(5) Appropriations for community resilience activities funded by the wildfire response, forest restoration, and community resilience account shall not be less than 15 percent of the biennial appropriated funding.(6) Funding may not be used for emergency fire costs or suppression costs as defined in RCW 76.04.005.(7) To the maximum extent possible, workforce development investments from the wildfire response, forest restoration, and community resilience account should prioritize historically marginalized, underrepresented, rural, and low-income communities.(8) Any expenditures from the wildfire response, forest restoration, and community resilience account for forest health treatments on federal lands must be additive to the baseline accomplishments and outputs already funded through the federal government and outlined in the annual work plans of the United States forest service, bureau of land management, the national park service, and/or the United States fish and wildlife service.(9) The department may solicit the forest health advisory committee established in RCW 76.06.200 and wildland fire advisory committee established in RCW 76.04.179 to provide recommendations for investments under this section. In assessing investments and developing recommendations for communities that will be impacted based on ecological, public infrastructure, and life safety needs as set forth in the 20-year forest health strategic plan and the wildland fire protection 10-year strategic plan, the forest health advisory committee and wildland fire advisory committee must use environmental justice or equity focused tools, such as the Washington tracking network's environmental health disparities tool to identify highly impacted communities. This identification must be used as a factor in determining recommendations for investments under this section. "Highly impacted communities" has the same meaning as defined in RCW 19.405.020.(10) To the maximum extent practicable and where consistent with the 20-year forest health strategic plan, the wildland fire protection 10-year strategic plan, or the Washington state forest action plan and landowner objectives, forest health treatments funded through the wildfire response, forest restoration, and community resilience account shall seek to utilize the value of any merchantable materials to help offset treatment costs.Sec. 984. RCW 77.12.170 and 2020 c 148 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:(1) There is established in the state treasury the limited fish and wildlife account which consists of moneys received from:(a) Fees for personalized vehicle, Wild on Washington, and Endangered Wildlife license plates, Washington's Wildlife license plate collection, and Washington's fish license plate collection as provided in chapter 46.17 RCW;(b) The department's share of revenues from auctions and raffles authorized by the commission;(c) The sale of watchable wildlife decals under RCW 77.32.560;(d) Moneys received from the recreation access pass account created in RCW 79A.80.090 must be dedicated to stewardship, operations, and maintenance of department lands used for public recreation purposes;(e) Fees for informational materials published by the department;(f) Those portions of the sale of licenses, permits, tags, stamps, endorsements, and application fees that are specified for a limited purpose within chapters 77.32, 77.65, and 77.70 RCW; and(g) Income directed to the limited fish and wildlife account by any other statute not listed in this subsection.(2) State and county officers receiving any moneys listed in subsection (1) of this section shall deposit them in the state treasury to be credited to the limited fish and wildlife account.(3) There is established in the state treasury the fish, wildlife, and conservation account that consists of moneys received from:(a) Rentals or concessions of the department;(b) The sale of real or personal property held for department purposes, unless the property is seized or recovered through a fish, shellfish, or wildlife enforcement action;(c) The assessment of administrative penalties;(d) Those portions of the sale of licenses, permits, tags, stamps, endorsements, and application fees that are not specified for a limited purpose within chapters 77.32, 77.65, and 77.70 RCW;(e) Articles or wildlife sold by the director under RCW 77.12.140;(f) Excise tax on anadromous game fish collected under chapter 82.27 RCW;(g) Donations received by the director under RCW 77.12.039;(h) Income directed to the fish, wildlife, and conservation account by any other statute not listed in this subsection.(4) State and county officers receiving any moneys listed in subsection (3) of this section shall deposit them in the state treasury to be credited to the fish, wildlife, and conservation account.(5) Compensation for damage to department property or wildlife losses or contributions, gifts, or grants received under RCW 77.12.320 must be deposited into the special wildlife account created in RCW 77.12.323. However, this excludes fish and shellfish overages and court-ordered restitution or donations associated with any fish, shellfish, or wildlife enforcement action, as such moneys must be deposited in the enforcement reward account pursuant to RCW 77.15.425.(6) During the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium, moneys from the limited fish and wildlife account may be transferred to the fish, wildlife, and conservation account.Sec. 985. RCW 77.44.050 and 2020 c 148 s 25 are each amended to read as follows:The warm water game fish account is created in the state treasury. Moneys in the account are subject to legislative appropriation and shall be used for the purpose of funding the warm water game fish enhancement program, including the development of warm water pond and lake habitat, culture of warm water game fish, improvement of warm water fish habitat, management of warm water fish populations, and other practical activities that will improve the fishing for warm water fish. Funds for warm water game fish as provided in RCW 77.32.440 shall not serve as replacement funding for department-operated warm water fish projects existing on December 31, 1994. During the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium, moneys from the warm water game fish account may be transferred to the fish, wildlife, and conservation account.Sec. 986. RCW 77.105.150 and 2003 c 173 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:The recreational fisheries enhancement account is created in the state treasury. All receipts from RCW 77.105.140 shall be deposited into the account. Moneys in the account may be spent only after appropriation. Expenditures from the account may be used only for recreational fisheries enhancement programs identified in this chapter. ((Under))Except during the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium, in which moneys may be transferred to the fish, wildlife, and conservation account, under no circumstances may moneys from the account be used to backfill shortfalls in other state funding sources.Sec. 987. RCW 79.64.040 and 2023 c 475 s 943 are each amended to read as follows:(1) The board shall determine the amount deemed necessary in order to achieve the purposes of this chapter and shall provide by rule for the deduction of this amount from the moneys received from all leases, sales, contracts, licenses, permits, easements, and rights-of-way issued by the department and affecting state lands and aquatic lands, except as provided in RCW 79.64.130, provided that no deduction shall be made from the proceeds from agricultural college lands.(2) Moneys received as deposits from successful bidders, advance payments, and security under RCW 79.15.100, 79.15.080, and 79.11.150 prior to December 1, 1981, which have not been subjected to deduction under this section are not subject to deduction under this section.(3) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (5) of this section, the deductions authorized under this section shall not exceed twenty-five percent of the moneys received by the department in connection with any one transaction pertaining to state lands and aquatic lands other than second-class tide and shore lands and the beds of navigable waters, and fifty percent of the moneys received by the department pertaining to second-class tide and shore lands and the beds of navigable waters.(4) In the event that the department sells logs using the contract harvesting process described in RCW 79.15.500 through 79.15.530, the moneys received subject to this section are the net proceeds from the contract harvesting sale.(5) During the 2015-2017, 2017-2019, 2019-2021, 2021-2023, ((and)) 2023-2025, and 2025-2027 fiscal biennia, the board may increase the twenty-five percent limitation up to thirty-two percent.Sec. 988. RCW 79.64.110 and 2023 c 475 s 944 and 2023 c 383 s 8 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:(1) Any moneys derived from the lease of state forestlands or from the sale of valuable materials, oils, gases, coal, minerals, or fossils from those lands, except as provided in RCW 79.64.130, or the appraised value of these resources when transferred to a public agency under RCW 79.22.060, must be distributed as follows:(a) For state forestlands acquired through RCW 79.22.040 or by exchange or as replacement for lands acquired through RCW 79.22.040:(i) The expense incurred by the state for administration, reforestation, and protection, not to exceed 25 percent, which rate of percentage shall be determined by the board, must be returned to the forest development account created in RCW 79.64.100. During the 2017-2019, 2019-2021, 2021-2023, ((and)) 2023-2025, and 2025-2027 fiscal biennia, the board may increase the 25 percent limitation up to 27 percent.(ii) Any balance remaining must be paid to the county in which the land is located or, if the land acquired under RCW 79.22.040 was exchanged, transferred, or disposed, payment must be made to the county from which the land was exchanged, transferred, or disposed. For counties participating in a land pool created under RCW 79.22.140, to each participating county proportionate to its contribution of asset value to the land pool as determined by the board. Payments made under this subsection are to be paid, distributed, and prorated to the various funds in the same manner as general taxes are paid and distributed during the year of payment. However, a county may in its discretion pay, distribute, and prorate payments made under this subsection of moneys derived from state forestlands acquired by exchange or as replacement lands, for lands acquired through RCW 79.22.040, in the same manner as general taxes are paid and distributed during the year of payment for the former state forestlands that were subject to the exchange.(iii) Any balance remaining, paid to a county with a population of less than 16,000, must first be applied to the reduction of any indebtedness existing in the current expense fund of the county during the year of payment.(iv) With regard to moneys remaining under this subsection (1)(a), within seven working days of receipt of these moneys, the department shall certify to the state treasurer the amounts to be distributed to the counties. The state treasurer shall distribute funds to the counties four times per month, with no more than 10 days between each payment date.(b) For state forestlands acquired through RCW 79.22.010 or by exchange or as replacement lands for lands acquired through RCW 79.22.010, except as provided in RCW 79.64.120:(i) Fifty percent shall be placed in the forest development account.(ii) Fifty percent shall be prorated and distributed to the state general fund, to be dedicated for the benefit of the public schools, to the county in which the land is located or, for counties participating in a land pool created under RCW 79.22.140, to each participating county proportionate to its contribution of asset value to the land pool as determined by the board, and according to the relative proportions of tax levies of all taxing districts in the county. The portion to be distributed to the state general fund shall be based on the regular school levy rate under RCW 84.52.065 (1) and (2) and the levy rate for any school district enrichment levies. With regard to the portion to be distributed to the counties, the department shall certify to the state treasurer the amounts to be distributed within seven working days of receipt of the money. The state treasurer shall distribute funds to the counties four times per month, with no more than 10 days between each payment date. The money distributed to the county must be paid, distributed, and prorated to the various other funds in the same manner as general taxes are paid and distributed during the year of payment.(2) A school district may transfer amounts deposited in its debt service fund pursuant to this section into its capital projects fund as authorized in RCW 28A.320.330.Sec. 989. RCW 80.01.080 and 2017 3rd sp.s. c 25 s 11 are each amended to read as follows:There is created in the state treasury a public service revolving fund. Regulatory fees payable by all types of public service companies shall be deposited to the credit of the public service revolving fund. Except for expenses payable out of the pipeline safety account, all expense of operation of the Washington utilities and transportation commission shall be payable out of the public service revolving fund. During the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium, moneys in the account may also be transferred into the state general fund.Sec. 990. RCW 81.88.050 and 2007 c 142 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:The pipeline safety account is created in the custody of the state treasurer. All fees received by the commission for the pipeline safety program according to RCW 80.24.060 and 81.24.090 and all receipts from the federal office of pipeline safety and any other state or federal funds provided for pipeline safety shall be deposited in the account. Any penalties collected under this chapter, or otherwise designated to this account must be deposited in the account. Moneys in the account may be spent only after appropriation. Expenditures from the account may be used only for funding pipeline safety. During the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium, moneys in the account may also be transferred into the state general fund.Sec. 991. RCW 82.86.050 and 2023 c 454 s 10 are each amended to read as follows:(1) The statewide 988 behavioral health crisis response and suicide prevention line account is created in the state treasury. All receipts from the statewide 988 behavioral health crisis response and suicide prevention line tax imposed pursuant to this chapter must be deposited into the account. Moneys may only be spent after appropriation.(2) Expenditures from the account may only be used for:(a) Ensuring the efficient and effective routing of calls made to the 988 crisis hotline to an appropriate crisis hotline center or designated 988 contact hub; ((and))(b) Personnel and the provision of acute behavioral health, crisis outreach, and crisis stabilization services, as defined in RCW 71.24.025, by directly responding to the 988 crisis hotline and enhancing mobile crisis service standards and performance provided through mobile rapid response crisis teams and community-based crisis teams endorsed under RCW 71.24.903. Ten percent of the annual receipts from the tax must be dedicated to the establishment grants, performance payments, and supplemental performance payments for mobile rapid response crisis teams and community-based crisis teams endorsed under RCW 71.24.903 and endorsement activities in RCW 71.24.903, up to 30 percent of which is dedicated to mobile rapid response crisis teams and community-based crisis teams endorsed under RCW 71.24.903 that are affiliated with a tribe in Washington; and(c) During the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium, the legislature may appropriate moneys from the statewide 988 behavioral health crisis response and suicide prevention line account to maintain and expand behavioral health crisis response services including services provided by mobile crisis response teams, 23-hour crisis relief centers, and other community settings providing services to individuals experiencing a behavioral health crisis. Appropriations made for these purposes are not subject to the limitation in subsection (3) of this section. It is the intent of the legislature that this policy will be continued in subsequent fiscal biennia.(3) Moneys in the account may not be used to supplant general fund appropriations for behavioral health services or for medicaid covered services to individuals enrolled in the medicaid program.Sec. 992. RCW 86.26.007 and 2019 c 415 s 991 are each amended to read as follows:The flood control assistance account is hereby established in the state treasury. At the beginning of the 2005-2007 fiscal biennium, the state treasurer shall transfer three million dollars from the general fund to the flood control assistance account. Each biennium thereafter the state treasurer shall transfer four million dollars from the general fund to the flood control assistance account, except for the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium, when the treasurer shall transfer $3,700,000 to the flood control assistance account. Moneys in the flood control assistance account may be spent only after appropriation for purposes specified under this chapter. During the 2017-2019 and 2019-2021 fiscal biennia, the legislature may appropriate moneys from the account for the purposes specified under chapter 90.94 RCW.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 993. During the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium, the legislature may direct the state treasurer to make transfers of moneys in the state seizure account to the general fund such amounts as reflect the excess fund balance of the account.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 994. Section 940 of this act takes effect July 1, 2025.(End of part)PART XIGENERAL GOVERNMENTSec. 1101. 2024 c 376 s 101 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVESGeneral FundâState Appropriation (FY 2024). . . .$60,051,000General FundâState Appropriation (FY 2025). . . .(($62,841,000))Â Â Â Â Â $58,741,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($122,892,000))Â Â Â Â Â $118,792,000Sec. 1102. 2024 c 376 s 102 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE SENATEGeneral FundâState Appropriation (FY 2024). . . .$44,379,000General FundâState Appropriation (FY 2025). . . .(($48,193,000))Â Â Â Â Â $45,193,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($92,572,000))Â Â Â Â Â $89,572,000The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: $260,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $270,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the payment of membership dues to the council of state governments, the national conference of state legislatures, the pacific northwest economic region, the pacific fisheries legislative task force, and the western legislative forestry task force.Sec. 1103. 2024 c 376 s 112 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE COURT OF APPEALSGeneral FundâState Appropriation (FY 2024). . . .$28,173,000General FundâState Appropriation (FY 2025). . . .(($27,771,000))Â Â Â Â Â $28,649,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($55,944,000))Â Â Â Â Â $56,822,000The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: $764,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $764,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5046 (postconviction counsel).Sec. 1104. 2024 c 376 s 113 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE ADMINISTRATOR FOR THE COURTSGeneral FundâState Appropriation (FY 2024). . . .$125,457,000General FundâState Appropriation (FY 2025). . . .(($125,109,000))Â Â Â Â Â $124,787,000General FundâFederal Appropriation. . . .$2,209,000General FundâPrivate/Local Appropriation. . . .$681,000Judicial Stabilization Trust AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$122,817,000Judicial Information Systems AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$79,530,000Opioid Abatement Settlement AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$479,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($456,282,000))Â Â Â Â Â $455,960,000The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) The distributions made under this section and distributions from the county criminal justice assistance account made pursuant to section 801 of this act constitute appropriate reimbursement for costs for any new programs or increased level of service for purposes of RCW 43.135.060.(2)(a) $7,000,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $7,000,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for distribution to county juvenile court administrators for the costs associated with processing and case management of truancy, children in need of services, and at-risk youth referrals. The administrator for the courts, in conjunction with the juvenile court administrators, shall develop an equitable funding distribution formula. The formula must neither reward counties with higher than average per-petition/referral processing costs nor shall it penalize counties with lower than average per-petition/referral processing costs.(b) Each fiscal year during the 2023-2025 fiscal biennium, each county shall report the number of petitions processed and the total actual costs of processing truancy, children in need of services, and at-risk youth petitions. Counties shall submit the reports to the administrator for the courts no later than 45 days after the end of the fiscal year. The administrator for the courts shall electronically transmit this information to the chairs and ranking minority members of the house of representatives and senate fiscal committees no later than 60 days after a fiscal year ends. These reports are informational in nature and are not for the purpose of distributing funds.(3) $1,094,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $1,094,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the statewide fiscal impact on Thurston county courts. It is the intent of the legislature that this policy will be continued in subsequent fiscal biennia.(4) $3,000,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $3,000,000 of the judicial stabilization trust accountâstate appropriation are provided solely for distribution to local courts for costs associated with the court-appointed attorney and visitor requirements set forth in the uniform guardianship act, chapter 11.130 RCW. If the amount provided in this subsection is insufficient to fully fund the local court costs, distributions must be reduced on a proportional basis to ensure that expenditures remain within the available funds provided in this subsection. No later than December 31, 2023, the administrative office of the courts will provide a report on distributions to local courts including, but not limited to, the amount provided to each court, the number of guardianship cases funded at each court, costs segregated by attorney appointments and court visitor appointments, the amount of any pro rata reductions, and a recommendation on how to forecast distributions for potential future funding by the legislature.(5) $1,000,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $1,000,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the administrative office of the courts to use as matching funds to distribute to small municipal and county courts, located in a rural county as defined in RCW 43.160.020, for the purpose of increasing security for court facilities. Grants must be used solely for security equipment and services for municipal, district, and superior courts and may not be used for staffing or administrative costs.(6) $250,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 is provided solely for the administrative office of the courts to provide grants to superior courts for the purpose of creating or expanding sanitary lactation spaces or pods that provide privacy for courthouse visitors needing to breastfeed or express breast milk.(7)(a) $250,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $1,100,000 of the judicial stabilization trust accountâstate appropriation are provided solely for the administrative office of the courts to contract with an equity and justice nonprofit organization to expand the capacity of the existing equity dashboard program. The contract must review and organize newly available criminal case data with the goal of consolidating and collecting adult felony case data to determine disparities in the legal justice system. The equity dashboard program must be expanded to include adult felony case data that is consolidated, interactable, transparent, and accessible to the public.(b) Of the amounts provided in this subsection for fiscal year 2025, the $1,000,000 in funding shall be split evenly between two equity and justice nonprofit organizations for the purpose of continuing the work of the existing public equity data dashboard on the collection of sentencing data and expanding their work to partner with a nonprofit organization that advocates for equity in technology and education to provide the public with data on social determinants that impact education outcomes. The organization that promotes equity in education must be a coalition that advocates for an educational system that promotes racial equity and focuses on ensuring that the race of a child and the child's address are not the predicating factors in defining their success.(8) $500,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $250,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Substitute House Bill No. 1766 (protection orders/hope cards).(9) $1,090,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $1,090,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely to address data quality issues across Washington state court management systems.(10) $51,428,000 of the judicial stabilization trust accountâstate appropriation is provided solely to establish a direct refund process to individuals to refund legal financial obligations, collection costs, and document-verified costs paid to third parties previously paid by defendants whose convictions have been vacated by court order due to the State v. Blake ruling. Superior court clerks, district court administrators, and municipal court administrators must certify and send to the office the amount of any refund ordered by the court. The court order must either contain the amount of the refund or provide language for the clerk or court administrator to certify to the office the amount to be refunded to the individual.(11) $1,627,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $1,812,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for activities of the office relating to the resentencing or vacating convictions of individuals and refund of legal financial obligations and costs associated with the State v. Blake ruling. In addition to contracting with cities and counties for the disbursement of funds appropriated for resentencing costs, the office must:(a) Collaborate with superior court clerks, district court administrators, and municipal court administrators to prepare comprehensive reports, based on available court records, of all cause numbers impacted by State v. Blake going back to 1971. Such reports must include the refund amount related to each cause number;(b) In collaboration with the office of public defense and the office of civil legal aid, establish a process that can be used by individuals seeking a refund, provide individuals information regarding the application process necessary to claim a refund, and issue payments from the refund bureau to individuals certified in subsection (10) of this section; and(c) Collaborate with counties and municipalities to adopt standard coding for application to State v. Blake convictions and to develop a standardized practice regarding vacated convictions.(12) $38,000,000 of the judicial stabilization trust accountâstate appropriation is provided solely to assist counties with costs of complying with the State v. Blake decision that arise from the county's role in operating the state's criminal justice system, including resentencing, vacating prior convictions for simple drug possession, and certifying refunds of legal financial obligations and collections costs. The office shall contract with counties for judicial, clerk, defense, and prosecution expenses for these purposes if requested by a county. A county may designate the office to use available funding to administer a vacate process, or a portion of the vacate process, on behalf of the county. The office must collaborate with counties to adopt standard coding for application to Blake convictions and to develop a standardized practice regarding vacated convictions.(13) $11,500,000 of the judicial stabilization trust accountâstate appropriation is provided solely to assist cities with costs of complying with the State v. Blake decision that arise from the city's role in operating the city's criminal justice system, including vacating prior convictions for simple drug possession, to include cannabis and possession of paraphernalia, and certifying refunds of legal financial obligations and collections costs. The office shall contract with cities for judicial, clerk, defense, and prosecution expenses for these purposes if requested by a city. A city may designate the office to use available funding to administer a vacate process, or a portion of the vacate process, on behalf of the city. The office must collaborate with cities to adopt standard coding for application to Blake convictions and to develop a standardized practice regarding vacated convictions.(14) $439,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $304,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5128 (jury diversity).(15) $40,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $1,520,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $169,000 of the judicial stabilization trust accountâstate appropriation are provided solely for the office to administer a jury pay pilot program in Pierce county. Funding must be used to increase jury pay up to $100 for each day served in Pierce county superior court. The funds provided in this subsection must supplement, and not supplant, existing local funding for juror pay. The office must compare juror demographics after the pay increase as compared to data collected from the 2022 jury demographic survey to measure the impact increasing juror pay has on jury diversity and juror response rates.(16) $1,800,000 of the judicial stabilization trust accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for distribution to counties to help cover the cost of electronic monitoring with victim notification technology when an individual seeking a protection order requests electronic monitoring with victim notification technology from the court and the respondent is unable to pay. Of the amount provided in this subsection, up to five percent of the funding each fiscal year may be used by the office for education and outreach to the courts regarding this technology.(17) $18,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $18,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for implementation of House Bill No. 1102 (judge pro tempore compensation).(18) $20,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 is provided solely for implementation of Substitute House Bill No. 1562 (violence).(19) $109,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed House Bill No. 1324 (prior juvenile offenses).(20) $659,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $639,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the development and expansion of online and on-demand eLearning courses offered through the WACOURTS education portal for judicial officers, administrators, clerks, assistants, and other staff employed in state and local courts.(21) $686,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $686,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the administrative office of the courts to fund public guardianship services provided by the office of public guardianship.(22) $250,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $250,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the administrative office of the courts to develop a sequential intercept model pilot program. The intercept model pilot program must include the establishment of a coordinated care and services network in courts of limited jurisdiction located in two counties, one county east of the crest of the Cascade mountains and one county west of the crest of the Cascade mountains.(a) In developing the pilot program, the administrative office of the courts must consult local government, the district and municipal court judges' association, the health care authority, the department of social and health services, the department of health, law enforcement agencies, and other impacted stakeholders as identified by the administrative office of the courts.(((ii)))(b) The pilot project shall include any sequential intercept mapping that is necessary to determine the availability of willing stakeholders and to determine gaps in services and programs in the geographic area served by the proposed coordinated care and services network.(((iii)))(c) The pilot project may include the use of a common source of peer support services as the means to link affected persons to the coordinated care and services network from the various intercepts in the sequential intercept model.(((iv)))(d) No court may be required by the administrative office of the courts to participate in the pilot program.(((v)))(e) For the purposes of this pilot project, "stakeholder" may include any public or private entity or individual that provides services, funds, or goods related to housing, shelter, education, employment, substance use disorder treatment or other behavioral health treatment, medical treatment, dental treatment, peer support, self-help, crisis care, income assistance, nutritional assistance, clothing, assistance with public benefits, or financial management and other life skills education.(((vi)))(f) The pilot project ends June 1, 2025. The administrative office of the courts shall submit a report to the legislature detailing the work of the pilot program project, which must include recommendations, if any, for continuation, modification, or expansion of the pilot program to other regions of the state, no later than June 30, 2025.(23) $150,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 is provided solely for the Washington state center for court research of the administrative office of the courts to conduct a study of legal financial obligations (LFO) charged by superior courts, juvenile courts, and courts of limited jurisdiction, including the reviews required in Engrossed Substitute House Bill No. 1169 (legal financial obligations). The administrative office of the courts must submit a report of the findings to the appropriate committees of the legislature by November 30, 2023. At a minimum, the study must include statewide and county-level data that shows, during the previous five state fiscal years that data is available:(a) The total number of juvenile and criminal cases handled by court, the number of cases where legal financial obligations were imposed pursuant to chapter 13.40 RCW, the percentage of cases where legal financial obligations were not imposed, and the total amount of legal financial obligations that were collected;(b) The total amount assessed to, collected from, and waived for all individuals, in fees, court costs, fines, and restitution, disaggregated by the defendants' age at the time of adjudication or conviction, the underlying charge, race, gender, LFO type, and charging court, for each of the last five years data is available;(c) The average amount assessed, collected, and waived per case by fines, fees, and restitution, disaggregated by defendants' age at the time of adjudication or conviction, the underlying charge, race, gender, LFO type, and charging court for each of the last five years data is available;(d) The average amount collected per case by fines, fees, and restitution, disaggregated by defendants' age at the time of adjudication or conviction, race, gender, LFO type, and charging court, for each of the last five years data is available;(e) The estimated annual collection rate for restitution and nonrestitution LFOs for the last five years data is available;(f) An estimate of the proportion of restitution assessed, disaggregated by victim type including natural persons, businesses, state agencies, and insurance companies, for each of the last five years data is available;(g) The percentage, number of cases, and total amount of legal financial obligations that are uncollectible pursuant to RCW 13.40.190 or 13.40.192, or other statutory authority for the expiration of legal financial obligation debt including debt assessed in criminal cases; and(h) The total amount of outstanding debt owed in fees, court costs, fines, and restitution, disaggregated by the defendants' age at the time of adjudication or conviction, race, gender, legal financial obligation type, charging court, and date of assessment.(24) $653,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $264,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 1715 (domestic violence).(25) Funding in this section is sufficient to reimburse courts participating in the interpreter program for up to 100 percent of interpreter costs in fiscal years 2024 and 2025.(26) $60,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for the administrative office of the courts to compile and submit a report to the fiscal and appropriate committees of the legislature by December 1, 2024. The report must include:(a) A summary of the count of individuals whose juvenile points were used in calculating their current offender score in total, and by county, as identified by the department of corrections in section 223(2)(v) of this act;(b) The estimated cost per county on how much resentencing for the individuals identified by the department of corrections in section 223(2)(v) of this act, would cost the county;(c) Each county's assumptions for the cost per individual case, how long each case is estimated to take, and how many cases the county assumes they can complete by fiscal year given staffing levels in fiscal years 2025 through 2027.(27)(a) $165,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for the Washington state center for court research of the administrative office of the courts to continue the study on legal financial obligations (LFO) charged by superior courts and courts of limited jurisdiction. The administrative office of the courts must submit a preliminary report to the appropriate committees of the legislature by November 30, 2024, and a final report by June 30, 2025. At a minimum, the report must include statewide data that shows, disaggregated by court type, LFO type, charge type, court user demographics, and community characteristics, during the previous five state fiscal years that data is available:(i) The total number of juvenile and criminal cases handled by court, the number of cases where legal financial obligations were imposed pursuant to chapter 13.40 RCW, the percentage of cases where LFOs were imposed, and the total amount of LFOs that were collected;(ii) The total amount assessed to, collected from, and waived for all individuals, in fees, court costs, fines, and restitution disaggregated by the defendants' age at the time of adjudication or conviction, the underlying charge, race, gender, LFO type, and charging court;(iii) An estimate of the proportion of restitution owed in all cases, disaggregated by victim type including natural persons, businesses, state agencies, and insurance companies; and(iv) A description of community level impact of LFO imposition measured as a ratio of aggregate debt to household income.(b) Superior courts and courts of limited jurisdiction that do not enter their LFO data into a statewide data management system must provide their LFO data to the administrative office of the courts at dates to be set by the office to be included in the statewide report.(c) Within the amounts provided in this subsection, the administrative office of the courts shall form a stakeholder group to review the report and make recommendations for data development and reporting topics.(28) $218,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for implementation of Senate Bill No. 5836 (Clark county superior court). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2024, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.))(29) $850,000 of the judicial stabilization trust accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for additional education and training for judicial officers and staff, and partial reimbursement for pro tempore coverage for judicial officers' education attendance. Of the amount provided in this subsection, $350,000 shall be solely used for the training and education activities of the courts of limited jurisdiction and $500,000 shall be solely used for the training and education activities for superior courts.(30) $8,000 of the judicial stabilization trust accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Substitute House Bill No. 1241 (harassment). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2024, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.))(31) $70,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed House Bill No. 1964 (prorate & fuel tax collect). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2024, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.))(32) $218,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for implementation of House Bill No. 1992 (superior court/Whatcom). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2024, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.))(33) $560,000 of the judicial stabilization trust accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Substitute House Bill No. 2384 (traffic safety cameras). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2024, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.))(34) $2,094,000 of the judicial stabilization trust accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5825 (guardianship). During the fiscal biennium, in conformity with RCW 2.72.030, the administrative office of the courts shall collect uniform and consistent data on decision making assistance to include, but not limited to: The number of requests for decision making assistance received from hospitals, the number of guardianships and less restrictive alternatives to guardianships provided, the support and housing provided, and any other data related to case monitoring and management. ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2024, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.))(35) $200,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5828 (water rights commissioners). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2024, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.))(36) $51,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5974 (unenforceable LFOs). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2024, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.))(37) $248,000 of the judicial stabilization trust accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 6068 (dependency outcome reporting). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2024, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.))(38) $479,000 of the opioid abatement settlement accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 6109 (children and families). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2024, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.))Sec. 1105. 2024 c 376 s 114 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE OFFICE OF PUBLIC DEFENSEGeneral FundâState Appropriation (FY 2024). . . .$66,902,000General FundâState Appropriation (FY 2025). . . .(($70,781,000))Â Â Â Â Â $72,188,000General FundâFederal Appropriation. . . .$385,000Judicial Stabilization Trust AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .(($16,218,000))Â Â Â Â Â $15,318,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($154,286,000))Â Â Â Â Â $154,793,000The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) $900,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $900,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the purpose of improving the quality of trial court public defense services as authorized by chapter 10.101 RCW. The office of public defense must allocate these amounts so that $450,000 per fiscal year is distributed to counties, and $450,000 per fiscal year is distributed to cities, for grants under chapter 10.101 RCW.(2) (($8,863,000))$8,363,000 of the judicial stabilization trust accountâstate appropriation is provided solely to assist counties with public defense services related to vacating the convictions of defendants and/or resentencing for defendants whose convictions or sentences are affected by the State v. Blake decision. Of the amount provided in this subsection:(a) (($1,863,000))$1,763,000 of the judicial stabilization trust accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the office of public defense to provide statewide attorney training, technical assistance, data analysis and reporting, and quality oversight, to administer financial assistance for public defense costs related to State v. Blake impacts, and to maintain a triage team to provide statewide support to the management and flow of hearings for individuals impacted by the State v. Blake decision.(b) (($7,000,000))$6,600,000 of the judicial stabilization trust accountâstate appropriation is provided solely to assist counties in providing counsel for defendants seeking to vacate a conviction and/or be resentenced under State v. Blake. Assistance shall be allocated to all counties based upon a formula established by the office of public defense. Counties may receive assistance by: (i) Applying for grant funding; and/or (ii) designating the office of public defense to contract directly with counsel.(3) $1,000,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $1,000,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely to provide prefiling legal representation to pregnant parents and parents of newborns at risk of removal by the department of children, youth, and families.(4) $623,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $1,165,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5046 (postconviction counsel).(5) $6,863,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and (($6,602,000))$6,102,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5415 (public defense/insanity).(6) $1,434,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $1,434,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the parents for parents program.(7) $1,000,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $1,000,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the office of public defense to establish and operate a telephone consultation line to provide contracted legal counsel for parents, guardians, or legal custodians when the department of children, youth, and families proposes a voluntary placement agreement when there is no pending dependency proceeding under chapter 13.34 RCW pursuant to RCW 13.34.090(4).(8) $442,000 of the judicial stabilization trust accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the office of public defense to administer a public defense recruitment program to recruit and retain a sufficient pool of qualified attorneys and other public defense professionals. The recruitment program shall engage with students and faculty at colleges and law schools on topics relating to public defense and other public law practices; provide technical assistance and training to county and city public defense coordinators on recruitment strategies including establishment of law clerk programs; and administer a public defense internship program.(9) $10,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $40,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the office of public defense to address emergency safety assistance and other urgent needs for clients served by the parents representation program. Temporary, limited assistance may be made available for short-term housing, utilities, transportation, food assistance, and other urgent needs that, if unaddressed, could adversely impact case outcomes and impede successful family reunification. The office of public defense shall establish eligibility criteria and an expedited process for reviewing financial assistance requests submitted by parents representation program contractors.(((11)))(10) $1,108,000 of the judicial stabilization trust accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 6109 (children and families). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2024, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.(((12)))(11) $611,000 of the judicial stabilization trust accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5780 (public defense & prosecution). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2024, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.(12) $2,002,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for the office of public defense to administer contracts for appellate attorneys to cover a backlog of case assignments and increasing workload associated with indigent appeals. The office shall provide training for contracted attorneys.Sec. 1106. 2024 c 376 s 115 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE OFFICE OF CIVIL LEGAL AIDGeneral FundâState Appropriation (FY 2024). . . .$54,376,000General FundâState Appropriation (FY 2025). . . .(($62,001,000))Â Â Â Â Â $62,851,000Judicial Stabilization Trust AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$6,698,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($123,075,000))Â Â Â Â Â $123,925,000The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1)(a) $3,917,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and (($7,711,000))$8,561,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the appointed counsel program for children and youth in dependency cases under RCW 13.34.212(3) in accordance with revised practice, caseload, and training standards adopted by the supreme court commission on children in foster care and includes a vendor rate increase for contracted attorneys. Sufficient funding is provided for implementation of Senate Bill No. 5761 (dependency/attorney appt.).(b) By October 1, 2023, the office must develop a revised implementation schedule based on a caseload assumption of adding no more than 1,250 new dependency cases to the program each fiscal year for consideration by the governor and the legislature.(2) $2,408,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $2,579,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the provision of civil legal information, advice, and representation for tenants at risk of eviction but not yet eligible for appointed counsel services under RCW 59.18.640.(3) $16,542,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $17,965,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the appointed counsel program for tenants in unlawful detainer cases established in RCW 59.18.640 and includes a vendor rate increase for contracted attorneys. The office of civil legal aid shall assign priority to providing legal representation to indigent tenants in those counties in which the most evictions occur and to indigent tenants who are disproportionately at risk of eviction, as provided in RCW 59.18.640.(4) $5,234,000 of the judicial stabilization trust accountâstate appropriation is provided solely to continue legal information, advice, assistance, and representation for individuals eligible for civil relief under the supreme court's ruling in State v. Blake.(5) An amount not to exceed $40,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and an amount not to exceed $40,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 may be used to provide telephonic legal advice and assistance to otherwise eligible persons who are 60 years of age or older on matters authorized by RCW 2.53.030(2) (a) through (k) regardless of household income or asset level.(6) $350,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $350,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely to the office of civil legal aid to establish a legal advice phone line to provide guidance and legal advice for kinship caregivers. The phone line must be staffed by two FTE contracted attorneys that have experience with kinship care, guardianship statutes, the child welfare system, and issues relating to legal custody.(7) $2,000,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $2,000,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the office of civil legal aid to expand civil legal aid services for survivors of domestic violence, including legal services for protection order proceedings, family law cases, immigration assistance, and other civil legal issues arising from or related to the domestic violence they experienced.(8) $1,009,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $1,022,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the office of civil legal aid to continue the statewide reentry legal aid project as established in section 115(12), chapter 357, Laws of 2020.(9) $156,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 6109 (children and families). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2024, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.Sec. 1107. 2024 c 376 s 116 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE OFFICE OF THE GOVERNORGeneral FundâState Appropriation (FY 2024). . . .$24,808,000General FundâState Appropriation (FY 2025). . . .(($30,250,000))Â Â Â Â Â $28,578,000Economic Development Strategic Reserve AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$10,850,000GOV Central Service AccountâState Appropriation. . . .(($19,538,000))Â Â Â Â Â $19,038,000Performance Audits of Government AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$827,000Workforce Education Investment AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$100,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($86,373,000))Â Â Â Â Â $84,201,000The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) $1,146,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and (($1,841,000))$1,146,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the office of the education ombuds.(2) (($19,238,000))$18,738,000 of the GOV central service accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the office of equity. Within the amounts provided in this subsection, $571,000 of the GOV central service accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the office of equity for additional staffing resources to provide effective communication and meaningful access to state information and services.(3) $100,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely to the office of the governor to implement career connected learning.(4)(a) $554,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $750,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the governor to invite federally recognized tribes, local governments, agricultural producers, commercial and recreational fisher organizations, business organizations, salmon recovery organizations, forestry and agricultural organizations, and environmental organizations to participate in a process facilitated by an independent entity to develop recommendations on proposed changes in policy and spending priorities to improve riparian habitat to ensure salmon and steelhead recovery.(i) The independent entity must develop recommendations on furthering riparian funding and policy, including but not limited to, strategies that can attract private investment in improving riparian habitat, and developing a regulatory or compensation strategy if voluntary programs do not achieve concrete targets.(ii) Preliminary recommendations shall be submitted to the legislature and governor by May 1, 2024, with a final report by June 30, 2024.(b) The amounts provided in fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the task force to develop proposals to implement the recommendations submitted in (a) of this subsection. The independent entity must convene a group of interested members of the legislature to provide the task force with background information regarding the recommendations submitted to the legislature, and to support the development of the implementation proposals. A report outlining the implementation proposals is due to the governor and the appropriate committees of the legislature by November 15, 2024.(c) The office of the governor may contract for an independent facilitator. The contract is exempt from the competitive procurement requirements in chapter 39.26 RCW.(5) $3,020,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $2,980,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute House Bill No. 1580 (children in crisis). Within the amounts provided in this subsection:(a) $2,359,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $2,359,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for flexible funding to support children in crisis. Uses of the flexible funding include, but are not limited to:(i) Residential, housing, or wraparound supports that facilitate the safe discharge of children in crisis from hospitals;(ii) Support for families and caregivers to mitigate the risk of a child going into or returning to a state of crisis;(iii) Respite and relief services for families and caregivers that would assist in the safe discharge of a child in crisis from a hospital, or prevent or mitigate a child's future hospitalization due to crisis; or(iv) Any support or service that would expedite a safe discharge of a child in crisis from an acute care hospital or that would prevent or mitigate a child's future hospitalization due to crisis.(b) Flexible funding expenditures may not be used for administrative expenses.(c) The care coordinator created in Second Substitute House Bill No. 1580 (children in crisis) must approve any expenditures of flexible funding.(6) $300,000 of the GOV central service accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the office of equity to conduct community engagement and develop an equity toolkit. Within the amounts provided in this subsection:(a) The office of equity must consult with state boards and commissions that support the participation of people from underrepresented populations in policy-making processes, and may consult with other relevant state agencies, departments, and offices, to identify:(i) Barriers to access and meaningful participation in stakeholder engagement by people from underrepresented populations who have lived experience;(ii) Tools to support access and meaningful participation in stakeholder engagement;(iii) Modifications to stakeholder engagement processes that promote an increase in access and opportunities for participation by people from underrepresented populations who have lived experience in policy-making processes. Any modifications identified may not restrict or otherwise prevent compliance with requirements under federal statute or regulations; and(iv) Changes to law or agency rules that will promote increased access and participation in the policy-making process.(b) The office of equity must submit a report, in compliance with RCW 43.01.036, to the appropriate committees of the legislature that details its findings under (a) of this subsection by July 1, 2024.(c) By November 30, 2024, the office of equity must develop a toolkit on best practices for supporting meaningful engagement of underrepresented individuals with lived experience participating on statutory entities. The toolkit must be transmitted to all state agencies, including the office of the governor, members of the legislature, the secretary of the senate, and the chief clerk of the house of representatives. The toolkit must include:(i) Best practices for identifying and recruiting underrepresented individuals with lived experience;(ii) Best practices for appropriately and meaningfully engaging individuals from underrepresented populations with lived experience. Recommendations of these best practices may include suggestions from engagement conducted under (a) of this subsection;(iii) Information on how to plan the work of a statutory entity using the principles of universal design, which may include suggestions from community engagement conducted under (a) of this subsection;(iv) Best practices for onboarding all statutory entity members including how to support underrepresented individuals with lived experience in accessing compensation in accordance with chapter 43.03 RCW; and(v) A list of state entities that appointing authorities may consult with when considering appointments to statutory entities for the purpose of increasing meaningful participation by people from underrepresented populations who have lived experience.(d) For purposes of this subsection:(i) "Lived experience" has the same meaning as provided in RCW 43.03.220.(ii) "Statutory entity" means a multimember task force, work group, or advisory committee, that is temporary, established by legislation adopted after January 1, 2025, established for the specific purpose of examining a particular policy or issue which directly and tangibly affects one or more underrepresented populations, and is required to report to the legislature on the policy or issues it is tasked with examining. "Statutory entity" does not include legislative select committees or other statutorily created legislative entities composed of only legislative members.(iii) "Underrepresented population" means a population group that is more likely to be at higher risk for disenfranchisement due to adverse socioeconomic factors such as unemployment, high housing and transportation costs relative to income, effects of environmental harms, limited access to nutritious food and adequate health care, linguistic isolation, and any other factors that may be barriers for participating in policy-making processes.(7) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, the Washington state office of equity must cofacilitate the Washington digital equity forum with the statewide broadband office.(8)(a) $125,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 is provided solely for the office of the corrections ombuds to prepare a report on incarcerated persons who have been in solitary confinement or any other form of restrictive housing more than 120 days in total during their period of incarceration or have been in solitary confinement or any other form of restrictive housing more than 45 consecutive days in the prior fiscal year. The report must:(i) Include the basis on which each person was placed in restrictive housing;(ii) Define the types of restrictive housing used by the department of corrections including, but not limited to, solitary confinement, administrative segregation, disciplinary segregation, protective custody, and maximum custody;(iii) Identify the specific type of restrictive housing each incarcerated person was placed in and the reason for such placement;(iv) Provide information regarding each incarcerated person's underlying offenses;(v) Identify any sanctions imposed during the incarceration of each person;(vi) State the amount of time each person has remaining in total confinement;(vii) Document any attempted suicides by each individual in restrictive housing over the past 10 years and the reason, if known;(viii) Describe the programming offered to and accepted by each incarcerated person during the person's period of restrictive confinement; and(ix) Identify any short-term policies identified, implemented, or improved by the department for the restrictive housing population including, but not limited to, lighting, ventilation, and access to personal property, communication, and visitation.(b) The department shall provide a report to the governor and appropriate committees of the legislature by June 30, 2024.(9) Within existing resources, the governor's office of results Washington must conduct a review of the provisions in state law relating to statewide performance management in RCW 43.88.090 and 43.17.380 through 43.17.390 and other statutes as applicable. The office must produce a report to the governor and appropriate committees of the legislature by October 31, 2024, including recommendations for legislative actions to provide meaningful performance information and oversight for decision makers in the governor's office and other agencies responsible for enterprise-wide initiatives. Results Washington should consult with the office of financial management and other agencies as applicable to ensure that recommendations minimize duplication of effort and support their statutory oversight roles.(10) $559,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Fourth Substitute House Bill No. 1239 (educator ethics & complaints). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2024, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.))(11) $75,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 2000 (international leadership). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2024, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.))(12) $225,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute House Bill No. 2071 (residential housing). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2024, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.))(13) $618,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute House Bill No. 2084 (construction training/DOC). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2024, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.))Sec. 1108. 2024 c 376 s 118 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE PUBLIC DISCLOSURE COMMISSIONGeneral FundâState Appropriation (FY 2024). . . .$6,108,000General FundâState Appropriation (FY 2025). . . .(($6,186,000))Â Â Â Â Â $6,099,000Public Disclosure Transparency AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .(($2,300,000))Â Â Â Â Â $2,161,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($14,594,000))Â Â Â Â Â $14,368,000The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) No moneys may be expended from the appropriations in this section to establish an electronic directory, archive, or other compilation of political advertising unless explicitly authorized by the legislature.(2) $2,170,000 of the public disclosure transparency accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the public disclosure commission for the purpose of improving the ability of the public to access information about political campaigns, lobbying, and elected officials, and facilitating accurate and timely reporting by the regulated community. The commission must report to the office of financial management and fiscal committees of the legislature by October 31st of each year detailing information on the public disclosure transparency account. The report shall include, but is not limited to:(a) An investment plan of how funds would be used to improve the ability of the public to access information about political campaigns, lobbying, and elected officials, and facilitate accurate and timely reporting by the regulated community;(b) A list of active projects as of July 1st of the fiscal year. This must include a breakdown of expenditures by project and expense type for all current and ongoing projects;(c) A list of projects that are planned in the current and following fiscal year and projects the commission would recommend for future funding. The commission must identify priorities, and develop accountability measures to ensure the projects meet intended purposes; and(d) Any other metric or measure the commission deems appropriate to track the outcome of the use of the funds.Sec. 1109. 2024 c 376 s 119 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE SECRETARY OF STATEGeneral FundâState Appropriation (FY 2024). . . .$56,190,000General FundâState Appropriation (FY 2025). . . .(($62,517,000))Â Â Â Â Â $67,262,000General FundâFederal Appropriation. . . .$8,606,000Public Records Efficiency, Preservation, and AccessAccountâState Appropriation. . . .$11,702,000Charitable Organization Education AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$1,233,000Washington State Library Operations AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$14,765,000Local Government Archives AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$12,089,000Election AccountâFederal Appropriation. . . .$4,487,000Personnel Service AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$2,262,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($173,851,000))Â Â Â Â Â $178,596,000The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) $16,998,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and (($21,450,000))$25,943,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely to reimburse counties for the state's share of primary and general election costs, the state's share of presidential primary costs, and the costs of conducting mandatory recounts on state measures. Funds may also be used by the secretary of state for costs associated with the printing and distribution of the presidential primary voters pamphlet. Counties shall be reimbursed only for those costs that the secretary of state validates as eligible for reimbursement.(2)(a) $4,052,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $6,052,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for contracting with a nonprofit organization to produce gavel-to-gavel television coverage of state government deliberations and other events statewide. The funding level for each year of the contract shall be based on the amount provided in this subsection. The nonprofit organization shall be required to raise contributions or commitments to make contributions, in cash or in kind, in an amount equal to forty percent of the state contribution. The office of the secretary of state may make full or partial payment once all criteria in this subsection have been satisfactorily documented.(b) The legislature finds that the commitment of on-going funding is necessary to ensure continuous, autonomous, and independent coverage of public affairs. For that purpose, the secretary of state shall enter into a contract with the nonprofit organization to provide public affairs coverage.(c) The nonprofit organization shall prepare an annual independent audit, an annual financial statement, and an annual report, including benchmarks that measure the success of the nonprofit organization in meeting the intent of the program.(d) No portion of any amounts disbursed pursuant to this subsection may be used, directly or indirectly, for any of the following purposes:(i) Attempting to influence the passage or defeat of any legislation by the legislature of the state of Washington, by any county, city, town, or other political subdivision of the state of Washington, or by the congress, or the adoption or rejection of any rule, standard, rate, or other legislative enactment of any state agency;(ii) Making contributions reportable under chapter 42.17 RCW; or(iii) Providing any: (A) Gift; (B) honoraria; or (C) travel, lodging, meals, or entertainment to a public officer or employee.(3) Any reductions to funding for the Washington talking book and Braille library may not exceed in proportion any reductions taken to the funding for the library as a whole.(4) $75,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $75,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for humanities Washington speaker's bureau community conversations.(5) $114,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $114,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for election reconciliation reporting. Funding provides for one staff to compile county reconciliation reports, analyze the data, and to complete an annual statewide election reconciliation report for every state primary and general election. The report must be submitted annually on July 31, to legislative policy and fiscal committees. The annual report must include statewide analysis and by county analysis on the reasons for ballot rejection and an analysis of the ways ballots are received, counted, rejected and cure data that can be used by policymakers to better understand election administration.(6) $896,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $870,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for staff dedicated to the maintenance and operations of the voter registration and election management system. These staff will manage database upgrades, database maintenance, system training and support to counties, and triage and customer service to system users.(7) $8,000,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $8,000,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for:(a) Funding the security operations center, including identified needs for expanded operations, systems, technology tools, training resources;(b) Additional staff dedicated to the cyber and physical security of election operations at the office and county election offices;(c) Expanding security assessments, threat monitoring, enhanced security training; and(d) Providing grants to county partners to address identified threats and expand existing grants and contracts with other public and private organizations such as the Washington military department, national guard, private companies providing cyber security, and county election offices.(8) $148,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 is provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5128 (jury diversity).(9) $148,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5112 (voter registration).(10) $148,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 is provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5182 (candidate filing).(11) $148,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 is provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5208 (online voter registration).(12) $616,000 of the personnel service accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Senate Bill No. 5015 (productivity board).(13) $400,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $600,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for a contract with humanities Washington to expand the prime time family reading program.(14) The office of the secretary of state must conduct a feasibility study of replacing the combined fund drive donor management system. The office must report its findings and a plan for replacement to the appropriate committees of the legislature by December 31, 2023.(15) $850,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 is provided solely for legal services costs for Vet Voice Foundation et al. v. Hobbs.(16) $3,724,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $2,674,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the agency to design and implement strategies and products to counter false narratives surrounding election security and integrity, including community engagement with underserved populations such as young voters, voters with disabilities, tribal communities, and non-English-speaking voters. Of the amounts provided in this subsection, $500,000 per fiscal year are provided solely for grants to county auditors for the same purposes.(17) The office of the secretary of state must work with the office of the chief information officer to evaluate the office of the secretary of state's information technology infrastructure and applications to determine the appropriate candidates for the location of data and the systems that could be exempt from consolidated technology services oversight. The office shall report its findings to the appropriate committees of the legislature by December 31, 2023.(18) $83,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $67,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely the office of the secretary of state to assist businesses and nonprofits providing therapeutic rehabilitation within Washington state's juvenile secure residential facilities. It is well established that providing outreach and therapeutic education among incarcerated youth remains critical to successful community reentry. The amounts provided under this subsection are subject to the following conditions and limitations: To be eligible for a grant under this subsection, a business must (a) apply for or have applied for the grant; (b) be registered as a Washington state business or non-profit; (c) reported annual gross receipts are no more than $1,000,000 in the most recent calendar year; (d) must have ability to conduct in-person business operations at one of Washington's juvenile correctional facilities; (e) of the total grant amount awarded, no more than 10 percent may be awarded for travel expenses; (f) agree to operate in-person, in accordance with the requirements of applicable federal, state, and local directives and guidance; and (g) at least one principal of entity must demonstrate the following educational credential, minimum masters degree in related field, and professional experience of conducting therapeutic gaming. The office of the secretary of state may use up to 10 percent of the amount provided in this subsection for administrative costs.(19) $730,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $580,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the office's migration of its applications and systems to Azure cloud environments, and is subject to the conditions, limitations, and review requirements of section 701 of this act.(20) $160,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 is provided solely for a contract with the University of Washington Evans school of public policy and governance to complete a study based on the preliminary report and research design submitted to the office on June 30, 2022. The preliminary report analyzed the 2022 state auditor's performance audit titled "evaluating Washington's ballot rejection rates." The study must be reported to the governor and the appropriate committees of the legislature by November 1, 2023.(21) $125,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $125,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the office to continue developing a statewide digital assessment tool and protocol for the tool's usage. The office must use the tool and protocol it developed to reach additional underserved audiences and make improvements to the tool and protocol. The office must develop and publish recommendations to improve implementation of the tool by June 30, 2025.(22) $198,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 ((and $154,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are))is provided solely to establish a Washington state library branch at Green Hill school.(23) $90,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $90,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for the office to contract with the University of Washington Evans school of public policy and governance to examine processes for providing voting registration, voting materials, and voting assistance for people held in Washington jails.(a) The study must:(i) Identify challenges and obstacles to voting in Washington jails;(ii) Examine how election offices and jails can ensure that voter registration, materials, and assistance are provided to registered voters and eligible citizens who are in jail prior to each election;(iii) Develop recommendations for facilitating voter registration for eligible citizens and voting for registered voters in Washington jails; and(iv) Develop recommendations for identifying individuals who are registered to vote upon jail admission and for providing voter assistance upon release from jail.(b) The study is due to the office, the governor, and the appropriate committees of the legislature by December 1, 2024.(24) $148,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for implementation of House Bill No. 1962 (voter address changes). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2024, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.))(25) $137,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 is provided solely for costs associated with verifying signatures on initiatives to the legislature.(26) (($81,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for implementation of Senate Bill No. 5843 (election security breaches). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2024, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.(27))) $125,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5890 (ballot rejections). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2024, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.(28)))(27) $125,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 6125 (Lakeland Village records). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2024, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.))Sec. 1110. 2024 c 376 s 120 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE GOVERNOR'S OFFICE OF INDIAN AFFAIRSGeneral FundâState Appropriation (FY 2024). . . .$802,000General FundâState Appropriation (FY 2025). . . .(($987,000))Â Â Â Â Â $787,000Climate Commitment AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$658,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($2,447,000))Â Â Â Â Â $2,247,000The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) The office shall assist the department of enterprise services on providing the government-to-government training sessions for federal, state, local, and tribal government employees. The training sessions shall cover tribal historical perspectives, legal issues, tribal sovereignty, and tribal governments. Costs of the training sessions shall be recouped through a fee charged to the participants of each session. The department of enterprise services shall be responsible for all of the administrative aspects of the training, including the billing and collection of the fees for the training.(2)(a) $125,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $125,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the office to engage a contractor to:(i) Conduct a detailed analysis of the opportunity gap for native American students;(ii) Analyze the progress in developing effective government-to-government relations and identification and adoption of curriculum regarding tribal history, culture, and government as provided under RCW 28A.345.070;(iii) Develop recommendations for continuing efforts to close the educational opportunity gap while meeting the state's academic achievement indicators as identified in the state's every student succeeds act consolidated plan; and(iv) Identify performance measures to monitor adequate yearly progress.(b) The contractor shall submit a study update by December 1, 2024, and submit a final report by June 30, 2025, to the educational opportunity gap oversight and accountability committee, the governor, the superintendent of public instruction, the state board of education, and the education committees of the legislature.(3)(a) $404,000 of the climate commitment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 1216 (clean energy siting). Within amounts provided in this subsection, the governor's office of Indian affairs, in consultation with the department of ecology, the department of commerce, and the department of archaeology and historic preservation, must coordinate government-to-government engagement with federally recognized Indian tribes who have treaty rights in Washington. Topics of engagement may include:(i) Implementation of environmental and energy laws, policy regulations, programs, and finances;(ii) The climate commitment act, chapter 316, Laws of 2021;(iii) Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 1216 (clean energy siting); and(iv) Other related policy.(b) Funding provided within this subsection may support:(i) Participation on the interagency clean energy siting coordinating council;(ii) Creation and maintenance of a list of contacts of federally recognized tribes, and tribal preferences regarding outreach about clean energy siting and permitting; and(iii) Development and delivery of training to clean energy project developers on consultation and engagement processes for federally recognized Indian tribes.(4) The office must report to and coordinate with the department of ecology to track expenditures from climate commitment accounts, as defined and described in RCW 70A.65.300 and section 302(13) of this act.Sec. 1111. 2024 c 376 s 121 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE COMMISSION ON ASIAN PACIFIC AMERICAN AFFAIRSGeneral FundâState Appropriation (FY 2024). . . .$943,000General FundâState Appropriation (FY 2025). . . .(($920,000))Â Â Â Â Â $1,020,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($1,863,000))Â Â Â Â Â $1,963,000The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1)(a) $125,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $125,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the commission to engage a contractor to:(i) Conduct a detailed analysis of the opportunity gap for Asian American students;(ii) Develop recommendations for continuing efforts to close the educational opportunity gap while meeting the state's academic achievement indicators as identified in the state's every student succeeds act consolidated plan; and(iii) Identify performance measures to monitor adequate yearly progress.(b) The contractor shall submit a study update by December 1, 2024, and submit a final report by June 30, 2025, to the educational opportunity gap oversight and accountability committee, the governor, the superintendent of public instruction, the state board of education, and the education committees of the legislature.(2)(a) $125,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $125,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the commission to engage a contractor to:(i) Conduct a detailed analysis of the opportunity gap for Native Hawaiian and Pacific Islander students;(ii) Develop recommendations for continuing efforts to close the educational opportunity gap while meeting the state's academic achievement indicators as identified in the state's every student succeeds act consolidated plan; and(iii) Identify performance measures to monitor adequate yearly progress.(b) The contractor shall submit a study update by December 1, 2024, and submit a final report by June 30, 2025, to the educational opportunity gap oversight and accountability committee, the governor, the superintendent of public instruction, the state board of education, and the education committees of the legislature.Sec. 1112. 2024 c 376 s 122 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE STATE TREASURERState Treasurer's Service AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .(($24,541,000))Â Â Â Â Â $24,591,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($24,541,000))Â Â Â Â Â $24,591,000The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) $500,000 of the state treasurer's service accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the office to study existing and proposed laws in other jurisdictions that limit consideration of material factors in public financing and investments. The study must consider any investment risk and economic risk to Washington associated with identified laws. Authorized uses of the amount provided in this subsection include, but are not limited to, staffing, consulting fees, travel expenditures, or other goods and services. The office must submit the study to the appropriate committees of the legislature by December 1, 2024.(2) Pursuant to RCW 82.08.225, the legislature authorizes the state treasurer to deposit up to $3,000,000 of taxes collected pursuant to RCW 82.08.020(1) into the statewide tourism marketing account created in RCW 43.384.040 for the 2023-2025 fiscal biennium.(3) $280,000 of the state treasurer's service accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 6069 (retirement savings). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2024, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.))Sec. 1113. 2024 c 376 s 125 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE ATTORNEY GENERALGeneral FundâState Appropriation (FY 2024). . . .$48,659,000General FundâState Appropriation (FY 2025). . . .(($42,377,000))Â Â Â Â Â $41,822,000General FundâFederal Appropriation. . . .(($25,263,000))Â Â Â Â Â $25,838,000General FundâPrivate/Local Appropriation. . . .$50,000Public Service Revolving AccountâState Appropriation. . . .(($4,742,000))Â Â Â Â Â $5,242,000New Motor Vehicle Arbitration AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$1,897,000Medicaid Fraud Penalty AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$6,584,000Child Rescue FundâState Appropriation. . . .$200,000Legal Services Revolving AccountâState Appropriation. . . .(($409,394,000))Â Â Â Â Â $409,854,000Local Government Archives AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$1,123,000Tobacco Prevention and Control AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$276,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($540,515,000))Â Â Â Â Â $541,545,000The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) The attorney general shall report each fiscal year on actual legal services expenditures and actual attorney staffing levels for each agency receiving legal services. The report shall be submitted to the office of financial management and the fiscal committees of the senate and house of representatives no later than ninety days after the end of each fiscal year. As part of its by agency report to the legislative fiscal committees and the office of financial management, the office of the attorney general shall include information detailing the agency's expenditures for its agency-wide overhead and a breakdown by division of division administration expenses.(2) Prior to entering into any negotiated settlement of a claim against the state that exceeds five million dollars, the attorney general shall notify the director of the office of financial management and the chairs and ranking members of the senate committee on ways and means and the house of representatives committee on appropriations.(3) The attorney general shall annually report to the fiscal committees of the legislature all new cy pres awards and settlements and all new accounts, disclosing their intended uses, balances, the nature of the claim or account, proposals, and intended timeframes for the expenditure of each amount. The report shall be distributed electronically and posted on the attorney general's web site. The report shall not be printed on paper or distributed physically.(4) $1,806,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $1,981,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for multi-year arbitrations of the state's diligent enforcement of its obligations to receive amounts withheld from tobacco master settlement agreement payments.(5) $6,189,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $4,000,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for implementation of chapter 326, Laws of 2021 (law enforcement data).(6) $1,458,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $1,458,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for implementation of a program for receiving and responding to tips from the public regarding risks or potential risks to the safety or well-being of youth, called the YES tip line program. Risks to safety or well-being may include, but are not limited to, harm or threats of harm to self or others, sexual abuse, assault, rape, bullying or cyberbullying, substance use, and criminal acts. Any person contacting the YES tip line, whether for themselves or for another person, must receive timely assistance and not be turned away. The program must operate within the guidelines of this subsection.(a) During the development and implementation of the YES tip line program the attorney general shall convene an advisory committee consisting of representatives from the Washington state patrol, the department of health, the health care authority, the office of the superintendent of public instruction, the Washington student achievement council, the Washington association of educational service districts, and other participants the attorney general appoints.(b) The attorney general shall develop and implement policies and processes for:(i) Assessing tips based on the level of severity, urgency, and assistance needed using best triage practices including the YES tip line;(ii) Risk assessment for referral of persons contacting the YES tip line to service providers;(iii) Threat assessment that identifies circumstances requiring the YES tip line to alert law enforcement, mental health services, or other first responders immediately when immediate emergency response to a tip is warranted;(iv) Referral and follow-up on tips to schools or postsecondary institution teams, local crisis services, law enforcement, and other entities;(v) YES tip line information data retention and reporting requirements;(vi) Ensuring the confidentiality of persons submitting a tip and to allow for disclosure when necessary to respond to a specific emergency threat to life; and(vii) Systematic review, analysis, and reporting by the YES tip line program of YES tip line data including, but not limited to, reporting program utilization and evaluating whether the YES tip line is being implemented equitably across the state.(c) The YES tip line shall be operated by a vendor selected by the attorney general through a competitive contracting process. The attorney general shall ensure that the YES tip line program vendor and its personnel are properly trained and resourced. The contract must require the vendor to be bound by confidentiality policies developed by the office. The contract must also provide that the state of Washington owns the data and information produced from the YES tip line and that vendor must comply with the state's data retention, use, and security requirements.(d) The YES tip line program must develop and maintain a reference and best practices tool kit for law enforcement and mental health officials that identifies statewide and community mental health resources, services, and contacts, and provides best practices and strategies for investigators to use in investigating cases and assisting youths and their parents and guardians.(e) The YES tip line program must promote and market the program and YES tip line to youth, families, community members, schools, and others statewide to build awareness of the program's resources and the YES tip line. Youth perspectives must be included and consulted in tip line development and implementation including creating marketing campaigns and materials required for the YES tip line program. The insights of youth representing marginalized and minority communities must be prioritized for their invaluable insight. Youths are eligible for stipends and reasonable allowances for reimbursement, lodging, and travel expenses as provided in RCW 43.03.220.(7) $561,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and (($508,000))$158,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the office of the attorney general to support the Washington state missing and murdered indigenous women and people task force in section 912 of this act.(8) $9,188,000 of the legal services revolving fundâstate appropriation is provided solely for additional legal services to address additional legal services necessary for dependency actions where the state and federal Indian child welfare act apply. The office must report to the fiscal committees of the legislature within 90 days of the close of the fiscal year the following information for new cases initiated in the previous fiscal year to measure quantity and use of this funding:(a) The number and proportion of cases where the state and federal Indian child welfare act (ICWA) applies as compared to non-ICWA new cases;(b) The amount of time spent advising on, preparing for court, and litigating issues and elements related to ICWA's requirements as compared to the amount of time advising on, preparing for court, and litigating issues and elements that are not related to ICWA's requirements;(c) The length of state and federal Indian child welfare act cases as compared to non-ICWA cases measured by time or number of court hearings; and(d) Any other information or metric the office determines is appropriate to measure the quantity and use of the funding in this subsection.(9)(a) $250,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $250,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the establishment of a truth and reconciliation tribal advisory committee to conduct research and outreach to understand the operations and impact of Indian boarding schools in Washington run by public and faith-based institutions, and to develop recommendations for the state to acknowledge and address the historical and intergenerational harms caused by Indian boarding schools and other cultural and linguistic termination practices.(b) The advisory committee shall consist of five members nominated by the attorney general. The committee members must be citizens from federally recognized tribes in diverse geographic areas across the state that possess personal, policy, or specific expertise with Indian boarding school history and policies, or who have expertise in truth and healing endeavors that are traditionally and culturally appropriate.(c) The advisory committee must hold its first meeting by September 30, 2023, and shall meet at least quarterly. The advisory committee may conduct meetings in person or virtually and must accept written testimony. The advisory committee may, when feasible, invite and consult with any entity, agency, or individual deemed necessary to further its work, or with experts or professionals involved, having expertise, or having lived experience regarding Indian boarding schools or tribal engagement.(d) The office and the advisory committee must conduct at least six listening sessions in collaboration with tribes and Native-led organizations. The listening sessions must be held with consideration of the cultural, emotional, spiritual, and psychological well-being of survivors, family members, and community members. In planning and facilitating the listening sessions, the office must seek to avoid imposing undue burdens on survivors, family members, or community members.(e) The office of the attorney general must administer and provide staff support for the advisory committee.(f) By June 30, 2025, the office must submit a final report to the appropriate committees of the legislature that includes, but is not limited to:(i) A summary of activities undertaken by the advisory committee;(ii) Findings regarding the extent and types of support provided by the state to Indian boarding schools;(iii) Findings regarding current state policies and practices that originate from Indian boarding schools or other assimilationist policies and practices and that cause disproportionate harm to American Indian and Alaska Native people and communities; and(iv) Recommendations regarding how the state can address the harm done by Indian boarding schools and other cultural and linguistic termination practices through a truth and reconciliation model, including but not limited to:(A) Resources and assistance that the state may provide to aid in the healing of trauma caused by Indian boarding school policies; and(B) Actions to correct current state policies and practices with origins in assimilationist policies or that cause disproportionate harm to Native people and communities.(10) $1,381,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 is provided solely for legal services and other costs related to voter rights and redistricting commission litigation.(11) $566,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $436,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for legal services related to litigation challenging chapter 104, Laws of 2022 (ESSB 5078).(12) $749,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $689,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for legal services related to the defense of the state and its agencies in a federal environmental cleanup action involving the Quendall terminals superfund site.(13) $731,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $1,462,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for additional resources for the prosecution of sexually violent predator cases pursuant to chapter 71.09 RCW.(14) $699,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $699,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for additional resources for the criminal litigation unit to address increased wrongfully convicted person claims under chapter 4.100 RCW and increased workload and complexity of cases referred to the unit.(15) $755,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $1,510,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the office to create a centralized statewide organized retail crime task force to coordinate, investigate, and prosecute multijurisdictional retail crime.(16) $1,399,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $1,399,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5078 (firearms industry duties).(17) $50,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year ((2024))2025 is provided solely for the office of the attorney general to update the introduction to Washington water law legal primer. The updated primer must cover subjects including, but not limited to, municipal water law, the trusts water rights program, instream flows, and significant appellate water law cases that have been decided since the previous introduction to Washington water law was prepared in 2000. The office must complete the updated primer by June 30, 2025.(18) $39,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $39,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $30,000 of the legal services revolving fundâstate appropriation are provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5263 (psilocybin).(19) $2,071,000 of the legal services revolving fundâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5080 (cannabis social equity).(20) $204,000 of the legal services revolving fundâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5236 (hospital staffing standards).(21) $2,316,000 of the legal services revolving fundâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5272 (speed safety cameras).(22) $138,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 is provided solely for staff support to the joint legislative task force on jail standards authorized by RCW 70.48.801. The task force shall report finding and recommendations to the governor and the appropriate committees of the legislature no later than December 1, 2023.(23) $463,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $454,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025, $398,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation, $91,000 of the public service revolving accountâstate appropriation, $133,000 of the medicaid fraud penalty accountâstate appropriation, and $6,740,000 of the legal services revolving fundâstate appropriation are provided solely for implementation of the legal matter management system and is subject to the conditions, limitations, and review requirements of section 701 of this act.(24) $50,000 of the legal services revolving accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 1181 (climate change/planning).(25) $138,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $138,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute House Bill No. 1028 (crime victims and witnesses).(26) $213,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $213,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Substitute House Bill No. 1469 (health care services/access).(27) $158,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $153,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for implementation of House Bill No. 1512 (missing persons).(28) $1,005,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $1,005,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for implementation of Substitute House Bill No. 1177 (indigenous women).(29) $26,000 of the legal services revolving accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute House Bill No. 1470 (private detention facilities).(30) $75,000 of the legal services revolving accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Substitute House Bill No. 1570 (TNC insurance programs).(31) $106,000 of the legal services revolving accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute House Bill No. 1762 (warehouse employees).(32) $338,000 of the legal services revolving accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Substitute House Bill No. 1175 (petroleum storage tanks).(33)(a) $50,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $50,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the attorney general, in collaboration with the office of the insurance commissioner, to study approaches to improve health care affordability including, but not limited to:(i) Health provider price or rate regulation policies or programs, other than traditional health plan rate review, in use or under consideration in other states to increase affordability for health insurance purchasers and enrollees. At a minimum, this shall include:(A) Analysis of payment rate or payment rate increase caps and reference pricing strategies;(B) Analysis of research or other findings related to the outcomes of the policy or program, including experience in other states;(C) A preliminary analysis of the regulatory authority and administrative capacity necessary to implement each policy or program reviewed in Washington state;(D) Analysis of such approaches used in Washington state including, but not limited to, the operation of the hospital commission, formerly established under chapter 70.39 RCW; and(E) A feasibility analysis of implementing a global hospital budget strategy in one or more counties or regions in Washington state, including potential impacts on spending and access to health care services if such a strategy were adopted;(ii) Regulatory approaches in use or under consideration by other states to address any anticompetitive impacts of horizontal consolidation and vertical integration in the health care marketplace to supplement federal antitrust law. At a minimum, this regulatory review shall include:(A) Analysis of research, case law, or other findings related to the outcomes of the state's activities to encourage competition, including implementation experience;(B) A preliminary analysis of regulatory authority and administrative capacity necessary to implement each policy or program reviewed in Washington state; and(C) Analysis of recent health care consolidation and vertical consolidation activity in Washington state, to the extent information is available;(iii) Recommended actions based on other state approaches and Washington data, if any; and(iv) Additional related areas of data or study needed, if any.(b) The office of the insurance commissioner or office of the attorney general may contract with third parties and consult with other state entities to conduct all or any portion of the study.(c) The attorney general and office of the insurance commissioner shall submit a preliminary report to the relevant policy and fiscal committees of the legislature by December 1, 2023, and a final report by August 1, 2024.(34) $9,000 of the legal services revolving accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Substitute House Bill No. 1069 (mental health counselor compensation).(35) $526,000 of the legal services revolving accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 1216 (clean energy siting).(36) $801,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for the office to create a permanent sexual assault kit initiative program.(37)(a) $247,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for the office of the attorney general, jointly with the department of health, to form a task force to provide recommendations to establish a comprehensive public health and community-based framework to combat extremism and mass violence.(b) The office of the attorney general must, in consultation with the department of health, appoint a minimum of 10 members to the task force representing different stakeholder groups including, but not limited to:(i) Community organizations working to address the impacts of or to assist those who are affected by extremism and mass violence;(ii) Law enforcement organizations that gather data about or work to combat extremism and mass violence; and(iii) Public health and nonprofit organizations that work to address the impacts of extremism and mass violence.(c) The office of the attorney general and the department of health may each have no more than one voting member on the task force.(d) The office of the attorney general must provide staff support for the task force.(e) Any reimbursement for nonlegislative members of the task force is subject to chapter 43.03 RCW.(f) The first meeting of the task force must be held by December 31, 2024. The task force must submit a preliminary report to the governor and the appropriate committees of the legislature by June 1, 2025, and a final report by December 1, 2026. The final report must include legislative and policy recommendations for establishing the comprehensive framework. It is the intent of the legislature to provide funding for the task force to complete the final report in the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium.(g) No aspect of this subsection should be construed as a directive to alter any aspect of criminal law, create new criminal penalties, or increase criminal law enforcement.(38) $61,000 of the legal services revolving accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Substitute House Bill No. 1905 (equal pay/protected classes). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2024, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.))(39) $30,000 of the legal services revolving accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Substitute House Bill No. 2061 (health employees/overtime). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2024, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.))(40) $100,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 1618 (childhood sexual abuse/SOL). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2024, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.))(41) $73,000 of the legal services revolving accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 6058 (carbon market linkage). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2024, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.))(42) $1,100,000 of the legal services revolving accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute House Bill No. 1205 (service by pub./dependency). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2024, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.))(43) $106,000 of the legal services revolving accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 2301 (waste material management). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2024, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.))(44) $33,000 of the legal services revolving accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Substitute House Bill No. 2467 (LTSS portability). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2024, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.))(45) $216,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for personnel and associated costs to implement and maintain functional operations such as support, records management and disclosure, victim liaisons, and information technology for the clemency and pardons board.(46) $350,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for the office, in collaboration with the Washington association of sheriffs and police chiefs, to support the Washington state indigenous demographic data collection work group of the Washington state missing and murdered indigenous women and people task force established in section 912, chapter 475, Laws of 2023.(47) $743,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5427 (hate crimes & bias incidents). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2024, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.))(48) $131,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $528,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5838 (AI task force). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2024, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.))(49) (($45,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for the office to support the underground economy task force created in section 906 of this act.(50))) $3,000 of the legal services revolving accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5271 (DOH/facilities enforcement). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2024, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.(51)))(50) $30,000 of the legal services revolving accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5793 (paid sick leave). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2024, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.(52)))(51) $40,000 of the legal services revolving accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 6105 (adult entertainment workers). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2024, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.))Sec. 1114. 2023 c 475 s 128 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCEThe appropriations in sections 129 through 133 of this act are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) Repayments of outstanding mortgage and rental assistance program loans administered by the department under RCW 43.63A.640 shall be remitted to the department, including any current revolving account balances. The department shall collect payments on outstanding loans, and deposit them into the state general fund. Repayments of funds owed under the program shall be remitted to the department according to the terms included in the original loan agreements.(2) The department is authorized to suspend issuing any nonstatutorily required grants or contracts of an amount less than $1,000,000 per year.(3)(a) The appropriations to the department of commerce in this act must be expended for the programs and in the amounts specified in this act. However, after May 1, ((2024))2025, unless prohibited by this act, the department may transfer general fundâstate appropriations for fiscal year ((2024))2025 among programs after approval by the director of the office of financial management. However, the department may not transfer state appropriations that are provided solely for a specified purpose, except that provisoed amounts may be transferred among programs if they are transferred in their entirety.(b) Within 30 days after the close of fiscal year ((2024))2025, the department must provide the office of financial management and the fiscal committees of the legislature with an accounting of any transfers under this subsection. The accounting shall include a narrative explanation and justification of the changes, along with expenditures and allotments by budget unit and appropriation, both before and after any allotment modifications or transfers. The department must also provide recommendations for revisions to appropriations to better align funding with the new budget structure for the department in this act and to eliminate the need for the transfer authority in future budgets.(4) The department must report to and coordinate with the department of ecology to track expenditures from climate commitment act accounts, as defined and described in RCW 70A.65.300 and section 302(13) of this act.Sec. 1115. 2024 c 376 s 127 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCEâCOMMUNITY SERVICES AND HOUSINGGeneral FundâState Appropriation (FY 2024). . . .$409,465,000General FundâState Appropriation (FY 2025). . . .(($492,261,000))Â Â Â Â Â $491,636,000General FundâFederal Appropriation. . . .(($281,789,000))Â Â Â Â Â $310,257,000General FundâPrivate/Local Appropriation. . . .$5,252,000Affordable Housing for All AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$109,227,000Apple Health and Homes AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$28,452,000Climate Commitment AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$35,000,000Community Reinvestment AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$200,000,000Community and Economic Development Fee AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$3,159,000Covenant Homeownership AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$150,000,000Financial Fraud and Identity Theft CrimesInvestigation and Prosecution AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$2,631,000Home Security Fund AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$290,410,000Lead Paint AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$233,000Prostitution Prevention and Intervention AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$26,000Washington Housing Trust AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$9,863,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($2,017,768,000))Â Â Â Â Â $2,045,611,000The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) $10,500,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $10,500,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for a grant to resolution Washington to build statewide capacity for alternative dispute resolution centers and dispute resolution programs that guarantee that citizens have access to low-cost resolution as an alternative to litigation.(2) $375,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $375,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for a grant to the retired senior volunteer program.(3) Within existing resources, the department shall provide administrative and other indirect support to the developmental disabilities council.(4) $2,000,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $2,000,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the Washington new Americans program. The department may require a cash match or in-kind contributions to be eligible for state funding.(5) $768,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $797,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the department to contract with a private, nonprofit organization to provide developmental disability ombuds services.(6) $500,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $500,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025, $1,000,000 of the home security fundâstate appropriation, $2,000,000 of the Washington housing trust accountâstate appropriation, and $1,000,000 of the affordable housing for all accountâstate appropriation are provided solely for the department of commerce for services to homeless families and youth through the Washington youth and families fund.(7) $1,000,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $1,000,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $2,000,000 of the home security fundâstate appropriation are provided solely for the administration of the grant program required in chapter 43.185C RCW, linking homeless students and their families with stable housing.(8)$11,844,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $11,844,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for housing assistance, including long-term rental subsidies, permanent supportive housing, and low and no barrier housing beds, for unhoused individuals. Priority must be given to individuals with a mental health disorder, substance use disorder, or other complex conditions; individuals with a criminal history; and individuals transitioning from behavioral health treatment facilities or local jails.(9) $557,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $557,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the department to design and administer the achieving a better life experience program.(10) $8,000,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $8,000,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the department to contract with organizations and attorneys to provide either legal representation or referral services for legal representation, or both, to indigent persons who are in need of legal services for matters related to their immigration status. Persons eligible for assistance under any contract entered into pursuant to this subsection must be determined to be indigent under standards developed under chapter 10.101 RCW.(11)(a) $12,500,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $12,500,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $37,000,000 of the affordable housing for all accountâstate appropriation are provided solely for grants to support the building operation, maintenance, and service costs of permanent supportive housing projects or units within housing projects that have or will receive funding from the housing trust fundâstate account or other public capital funding that:(i) Is dedicated as permanent supportive housing units;(ii) Is occupied by low-income households with incomes at or below 30 percent of the area median income; and(iii) Requires a supplement to rent income to cover ongoing property operating, maintenance, and service expenses.(b) Permanent supportive housing projects receiving federal operating subsidies that do not fully cover the operation, maintenance, and service costs of the projects are eligible to receive grants as described in this subsection.(c) The department may use a reasonable amount of funding provided in this subsection to administer the grants.(d) Within amounts provided in this subsection, the department must provide staff support for the permanent supportive housing operations, maintenance, and services forecast. The department must develop a model to estimate demand for operating, maintenance, and services costs for permanent supportive housing units that qualify for grant funding under (a) of this subsection. The model shall incorporate factors including the number of qualifying units currently in operation; the number of new qualifying units assumed to come online since the previous forecast and the timing of when those units will become operational; the impacts of enacted or proposed investments in the capital budget on the number of new potentially qualifying units; the number of units supported through a grant awarded under (a) of this subsection; the historical actuals for per unit average grant awards under (a) of this subsection; reported data from housing providers on actual costs for operations, maintenance, and services; and other factors identified as appropriate for estimating the demand for maintenance, operations, and services for qualifying permanent supportive housing units. The forecast methodology, updates, and methodology changes must be conducted in coordination with staff from the department, the office of financial management, and the appropriate fiscal committees of the state legislature. The forecast must be updated each February and November during the fiscal biennium and the department must submit a report to the legislature summarizing the updated forecast based on actual awards made under (a) of this subsection and the completed construction of new qualifying units.(12) $7,000,000 of the home security fundâstate appropriation is provided solely for the office of homeless youth prevention and protection programs to:(a) Expand outreach, services, and housing for homeless youth and young adults including but not limited to secure crisis residential centers, crisis residential centers, and HOPE beds, so that resources are equitably distributed across the state;(b) Contract with other public agency partners to test innovative program models that prevent youth from exiting public systems into homelessness; and(c) Support the development of an integrated services model, increase performance outcomes, and enable providers to have the necessary skills and expertise to effectively operate youth programs.(13) $4,000,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $4,000,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the office of homeless youth to build infrastructure and services to support a continuum of interventions, including but not limited to prevention, crisis response, and long-term housing, to reduce youth homelessness in communities identified as part of the anchor community initiative.(14) $2,125,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $2,125,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the office of homeless youth to contract with one or more nonprofit organizations to provide youth services and young adult housing on a multi-acre youth campus located in the city of Tacoma. Youth services include, but are not limited to, HOPE beds and crisis residential centers to provide temporary shelter and permanency planning for youth under the age of 18. Young adult housing includes, but is not limited to, rental assistance and case management for young adults ages 18 to 24. The department shall submit an annual report to the legislature on the use of the funds. The report is due annually on June 30th. The report shall include but is not limited to:(a) A breakdown of expenditures by program and expense type, including the cost per bed;(b) The number of youth and young adults helped by each program;(c) The number of youth and young adults on the waiting list for programs, if any; and(d) Any other metric or measure the department deems appropriate to evaluate the effectiveness of the use of the funds.(15) $65,310,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $65,310,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the essential needs and housing support program and related services. The department may use a portion of the funds provided in this subsection to continue the pilot program established in section 127(106) of chapter 357, Laws of 2020 (addressing the immediate housing needs of low or extremely low-income elderly or disabled adults in certain counties who receive social security disability or retirement income). The department must ensure the timely redistribution of the funding provided in this subsection among entities or counties to reflect actual caseload changes as required under RCW 43.185C.220(5)(c).(16) $5,000,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for a grant to King county for costs to provide transitional and long-term housing supports for unsheltered, recently-arrived individuals and families.(17) $250,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $250,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the department to contract with an entity located in the Beacon hill/Chinatown international district area of Seattle to provide low income housing, low income housing support services, or both. To the extent practicable, the chosen location must be colocated with other programs supporting the needs of children, the elderly, or persons with disabilities.(18) $4,740,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $4,740,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $4,500,000 of the home security fundâstate appropriation are provided solely for the consolidated homeless grant program.(a) Of the amounts provided in this subsection, $4,500,000 of the home security fundâstate appropriation is provided solely for permanent supportive housing targeted at those families who are chronically homeless and where at least one member of the family has a disability. The department will also connect these families to medicaid supportive services.(b) Of the amounts provided in this subsection, $1,000,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $1,000,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for diversion services for those families and individuals who are at substantial risk of losing stable housing or who have recently become homeless and are determined to have a high probability of returning to stable housing.(c) Of the amounts provided in this subsection, $3,240,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $3,240,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for up to nine months of rental assistance for individuals enrolled in the foundational community supports initiative who are transitioning off of benefits under RCW 74.04.805 due to increased income or other changes in eligibility. The health care authority, department of social and health services, and department of commerce shall collaborate on this effort.(19) $1,258,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $1,332,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the operations of the long-term care ombudsman program.(20) $1,007,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $1,007,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the department to administer a transitional housing program for nondependent homeless youth.(21) $80,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $80,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the department to establish an identification assistance and support program to assist homeless persons in collecting documentation and procuring an identicard issued by the department of licensing. This program may be operated through a contract for services. The program shall operate in one county west of the crest of the Cascade mountain range with a population of 1,000,000 or more and one county east of the crest of the Cascade mountain range with a population of 500,000 or more.(22)(a) $2,500,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $2,500,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the office of homeless youth prevention and protection programs to administer flexible funding to support the anchor community initiative and anchor communities through the homeless prevention and diversion fund and serve eligible youth and young adults. The flexible funding administered under this subsection may be used for the immediate needs of eligible youth or young adults. An eligible youth or young adult may receive support under this subsection more than once.(b) Flexible funding provided under this subsection may be used for purposes including but not limited to:(i) Car repair or other transportation assistance;(ii) Rental application fees, a security deposit, or short-term rental assistance;(iii) Offsetting costs for first and last month's rent and security deposits;(iv) Transportation costs to go to work;(v) Assistance in obtaining photo identification or birth certificates; and(vi) Other uses that will support the eligible youth or young adult's housing stability, education, or employment, or meet immediate basic needs.(c) The flexible funding provided under this subsection may be provided to:(i) Eligible youth and young adults. For the purposes of this subsection, an eligible youth or young adult is a person under age 25 who is experiencing or at risk of experiencing homelessness, including but not limited to those who are unsheltered, doubled up or in unsafe living situations, exiting inpatient programs, or in school;(ii) Community-based providers assisting eligible youth or young adults in attaining safe and stable housing; and(iii) Individuals or entities, including landlords, providing safe housing or other support designed to lead to housing for eligible youth or young adults.(23) $607,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $3,607,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the department to assist homeowners at risk of foreclosure pursuant to chapter 61.24 RCW. Funding provided in this section may be used for activities to prevent mortgage or tax lien foreclosure, housing counselors, a foreclosure prevention hotline, legal services for low-income individuals, mediation, and other activities that promote homeownership. The department may contract with other foreclosure fairness program state partners to carry out this work.(24) $100,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $100,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the department to contract with a nonprofit entity located in Seattle that focuses on poverty reduction and racial equity to convene and staff a poverty reduction workgroup steering committee comprised of individuals that have lived experience with poverty. Funding provided in this section may be used to reimburse steering committee members for travel, child care, and other costs associated with participation in the steering committee.(25) $400,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $400,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for capacity-building grants through the Latino community fund for emergency response services, educational programs, and human services support for children and families in rural and underserved communities.(26) $1,400,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $1,400,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the office of homeless youth to administer a competitive grant process to award funding to licensed youth shelters, HOPE centers, and crisis residential centers to provide behavioral health support services for youth in crisis, and to increase funding for current grantees.(27) $2,500,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for a grant to the city of Tukwila for costs incurred related to unsheltered, recently-arrived individuals and families. Of the amount provided in this subsection, $2,000,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for transitional and long-term housing supports, on the condition that the city of Tukwila contract with the office of refugee and immigrant assistance for the use of a location for providing tiered support services for unsheltered, recently-arrived individuals and families. The office may subcontract to provide the support services.(28) $9,575,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $9,575,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the department to continue the Washington state office of firearm safety and violence prevention, including the creation of a state and federal grant funding plan to direct resources to cities that are most impacted by community violence. Of the amounts provided in this subsection:(a) $600,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $600,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for community-based violence prevention and intervention services to individuals identified through the King county shots fired social network analysis. The department must complete an evaluation of the program and provide a report to the governor and the appropriate legislative committees by June 30, 2023.(b) $5,318,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $5,318,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for grants to support existing programs and capacity building for new programs providing evidence-based violence prevention and intervention services to youth who are at high risk to perpetrate or be victims of firearm violence and who reside in areas with high rates of firearm violence as provided in RCW 43.330A.050.(i) Priority shall be given to programs that partner with the University of Washington, school of medicine, department of psychiatry and behavioral sciences for training and support to deliver culturally relevant family integrated transition services through use of credible messenger advocates.(ii) The office may enter into agreement with the University of Washington or another independent entity with expertise in evaluating community-based grant-funded programs to evaluate the grant program's effectiveness.(iii) The office shall enter into agreement to provide funding to the University of Washington, school of medicine, department of psychiatry and behavioral sciences to directly deliver trainings and support to programs providing culturally relevant family integrated transition services through use of credible messenger and to train a third-party organization to similarly support those programs.(iv) Of the amounts provided under (b) of this subsection, $250,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $250,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for a certified credible messenger program that does work in at least three regions of Washington state to train and certify credible messengers to implement a culturally responsive, evidence-based credible messenger violence prevention and intervention services program.(c) $2,000,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $2,000,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided to further support firearm violence prevention and intervention programs and initiatives consistent with the duties of the office as set forth in RCW 43.330A.020.(d) $500,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $500,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided to support safe storage programs and suicide prevention outreach and education efforts across the state.(29) $2,500,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $2,500,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the department to administer grants to diaper banks for the purchase of diapers, wipes, and other essential baby products, for distribution to families in need. The department must give priority to providers serving or located in marginalized, low-income communities or communities of color; and providers that help support racial equity.(30) $4,500,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $4,500,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for grants to counties to stabilize newly arriving refugees, including those from the 2021 Afghanistan conflict and the 2022 Ukraine-Russia conflict.(31) $120,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $120,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for a grant to a nonprofit resource center in King county that provides sexual assault advocacy services, therapy services, and prevention and outreach to begin a three-year, multigrade sexual violence prevention program in the Renton school district.(32) $200,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $200,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the office of homeless youth prevention and protection programs to colead a prevention work group with the department of children, youth, and families. The work group must focus on preventing youth and young adult homelessness and other related negative outcomes. The work group shall consist of members representing the department of social and health services, the employment security department, the health care authority, the office of the superintendent of public instruction, the Washington student achievement council, the interagency work group on homelessness, community-based organizations, and young people and families with lived experience of housing instability, child welfare involvement, justice system involvement, or inpatient behavioral health involvement.(a) The work group shall help guide implementation of:(i) The state's strategic plan on prevention of youth homelessness;(ii) Chapter 157, Laws of 2018 (SSB 6560);(iii) Chapter 312, Laws of 2019 (E2SSB 5290);(iv) Efforts to reform family reconciliation services; and(v) Other state initiatives addressing the prevention of youth homelessness.(b) The office of homeless youth prevention and protection programs must use the amounts provided in this subsection to contract with a community-based organization to support the involvement with the work group of young people and families with lived experience of housing instability, child welfare involvement, justice system involvement, or inpatient behavioral health involvement. The community-based organization must serve and be substantially governed by marginalized populations. The amounts provided in this subsection must supplement private funding to support the work group.(33) $22,802,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $22,803,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely to increase existing grantee contracts providing rental or housing subsidy and services for eligible tenants in housing and homeless programs. The department must distribute funding in a manner that will prioritize maintaining current levels of homeless subsidies and services and stabilizing the homeless service provider workforce.(34)(a) $35,000,000 of the climate commitment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the department to administer grant funding through the existing network of federal low-income home energy assistance program grantees to provide low-income households with energy utility bill assistance.(b) To qualify for assistance, a household must be below 80 percent of the area median income and living in a community that experiences high environmental health disparities.(c) Under the grant program, each household accessing energy bill assistance must be offered an energy assessment that includes determining the household's need for clean cooling and heating system upgrades that improve safety and efficiency while meeting Washington's climate goals. If beneficial, households may be offered grant funding to cover the replacement of inefficient, outdated, or unsafe home heating and cooling systems with more energy efficient electric heating and cooling technologies, such as heat pumps.(d) Of the amounts provided in this subsection, no more than 60 percent of the funding may be utilized by the department to target services to multifamily residential buildings across the state that experience high energy use, where a majority of the residents within the building are below 80 percent of the area median income and the community experiences high environmental health disparities.(e) In serving low-income households who rent or lease a residence, the department must establish processes to ensure that the rent for the residence is not increased and the tenant is not evicted as a result of receiving assistance under the grant program.(f) The department must incorporate data collected while implementing this program into future energy assistance reports as required under RCW 19.405.120. The department may publish information on its website on the number of furnace or heating and cooling system replacements, including replacements within multifamily housing units.(g) The department may utilize a portion of the funding provided within this subsection to create an electronic application system.(35) $55,500,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $55,500,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025are provided solely for the department to continue grant funding for emergency housing and shelter capacity and associated supports such as street outreach, diversion services, short-term rental assistance, hotel and motel vouchers, housing search and placement, and housing stability case management. Entities eligible for grant funding include local governments and nonprofit entities. The department may use existing programs, such as the consolidated homelessness grant program, to award funding under this subsection. Grants provided under this subsection must be used to maintain or increase current emergency housing capacity, funded by the shelter program grant and other programs, as practicable due to increased costs of goods, services, and wages. Emergency housing includes transitional housing, congregate or noncongregate shelter, sanctioned encampments, or short-term hotel or motel stays. Of the amount provided in this subsection for fiscal year 2025, $1,500,000 must be granted to a housing readiness program serving individuals experiencing homelessness in the city of Longview. Funding may be used to operate severe weather shelters, housing navigation, case management, laundry and hygiene facilities, connection to other social services, and other programs serving unhoused individuals in Cowlitz county.(36)(a) $75,050,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $75,050,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for a targeted grant program to transition persons residing in encampments to safer housing opportunities, with an emphasis on ensuring individuals living unsheltered reach permanent housing solutions. Eligible grant recipients include local governments and nonprofit organizations operating to provide housing or services. The department may provide funding to state agencies to ensure individuals accessing housing services are also able to access other wrap-around services that enable them to obtain housing such as food, personal identification, and other related services. Local government and nonprofit grant recipients may use grant funding to provide outreach, housing, case management, transportation, site monitoring, and other services needed to assist individuals residing in encampments and on public rights-of-way with moving into housing.(b) Of the amounts provided in this subsection:(i) No less than $120,000,000 must be used for housing services for persons residing on state-owned rights-of-way; and(ii) All remaining funds may be used for housing services for persons residing in encampments, including encampments located on public lands, as defined in RCW 79.02.010, or state parks and parkways.(c) Grant criteria must include, but are not limited to:(i) Whether a site where the grantee will conduct outreach and engagement has been identified as a location where individuals residing in encampments or on the public right-of-way are in specific circumstances or physical locations that expose them to especially or imminently unsafe conditions;(ii) A commitment to resolve encampments through extensive outreach followed by matching individuals with temporary lodging or permanent housing that is reasonably likely to fit with their actual needs and situation, is noncongregate whenever possible, and takes into consideration individuals' immediate and long-term needs and abilities to achieve and maintain housing stability;(iii) A commitment to transition individuals who are initially matched to temporary lodging into a permanent housing placement within six months except under unusual circumstances;(iv) Local government readiness and capacity to enter into and fulfill the grant requirements as applicable; and(v) Other criteria as identified by the department.(d) When awarding grants under (a) of this subsection, the department must prioritize applicants that focus on ensuring an expeditious path to sustainable permanent housing solutions, and that demonstrate an understanding of working with individuals to identify their optimal housing type and level of ongoing services through the effective use of outreach, engagement, and temporary lodging and permanent housing placement.(e) Grant recipients under (a) of this subsection must enter into a memorandum of understanding with the department, and other state agencies if applicable, as a condition of receiving funds. Memoranda of understanding must specify the responsibilities of the grant recipients and the state agencies, consistent with the requirements of (c) of this subsection, and must include specific measurable outcomes for each entity signing the memorandum. The department must publish all signed memoranda on the department's website and must publish updates on outcomes for each memorandum at least every 90 days, while taking steps to protect the privacy of individuals served by the program. At a minimum, outcomes must include:(i) The number of people actually living in any encampment identified for intervention by the department or grantees;(ii) The demographics of those living in any encampment identified for intervention by the department or grantees;(iii) The duration of engagement with individuals living within encampments;(iv) The types of housing options that were offered;(v) The number of individuals who accepted offered housing;(vi) Any reasons given for why individuals declined offered housing;(vii) The types of assistance provided to move individuals into offered housing;(viii) Any services and benefits in which an individual was successfully enrolled; and(ix) The housing outcomes of individuals who were placed into housing six months and one year after placement.(f) Grant recipients under (a) of this subsection may not transition individuals from encampments or close encampments unless they have provided extensive outreach and offered each individual temporary lodging or permanent housing that matches the actual situation and needs of each person, is noncongregate whenever possible, and takes into consideration individuals' immediate and long-term needs and abilities to achieve and maintain housing stability. Grant recipients who initially match an individual to temporary lodging must make efforts to transition the person to a permanent housing placement within six months except under unusual circumstances. The department must establish criteria regarding the safety, accessibility, and habitability of housing options to be offered by grant recipients to ensure that such options are private, sanitary, healthy, and dignified, and that grant recipients provide options that are well-matched to an individual's assessed needs.(g) Funding granted to eligible recipients under (a) of this subsection may not be used to supplant or replace existing funding provided for housing or homeless services.(37) $2,000,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $2,000,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely to increase funding for the community services block grant program. Distribution of these funds to community action agencies shall prioritize racial equity and undoing inequity from historic underinvestment in Black, indigenous, and people of color, and rural communities.(38) $100,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $100,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the department to provide a grant to a nonprofit organization to identify opportunities for cities in Whatcom county to improve access to affordable housing through conducting market research, engaging stakeholders, and developing tools and implementation strategies for cities that will increase access to affordable housing. The grant recipient must be a nonprofit organization based in Bellingham that promotes affordable housing solutions and with a mission to create thriving communities.(39) $225,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $225,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the department to provide a grant to a nonprofit organization located in the city of Redmond that serves Latino low-income, immigrant, and Spanish-speaking communities in King and Snohomish counties through arts and culture events and community services. The grant funding may be used to expand existing programs including, but not limited to, support for small businesses, rent assistance, vaccination and COVID-19 outreach, programs aimed at increasing postsecondary enrollments in college and trade schools, and other community services and programs.(40) $2,000,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $6,000,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the department to administer grants to community-based organizations that serve historically disadvantaged populations to conduct outreach and to assist community members in applying for state and federal assistance programs including, but not limited to, those administered by the department of social and health services, department of commerce, and department of children, youth, and families.(41) $110,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $40,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the department to provide a grant to a nonprofit organization located in the city of Issaquah to provide cultural programs and navigational supports for individuals and families who may face language or other cultural barriers when engaging with schools, public safety, health and human services, and local government agencies.(42) $200,000,000 of the community reinvestment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the department to distribute grants for economic development, civil and criminal legal assistance, community-based violence intervention and prevention services, and reentry services programs. Grants must be distributed in accordance with the recommendations of the community reinvestment plan developed pursuant to section 128(134), chapter 297, Laws of 2022 (ESSB 5693).(43) $500,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $150,000,000 of the covenant homeownership accountâstate appropriation are provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute House Bill No. 1474 (covenant homeownership prg.).(44) $140,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $140,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for additional staffing for the developmental disabilities council.(45) $500,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $500,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for a grant to a nonprofit organization located in the city of Spokane to provide transitional housing, educational programs, and other resources for refugee and immigrant families.(46) $1,169,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $1,169,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 1715 (domestic violence).(47) $500,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $500,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for a grant to a dispute resolution center located in Snohomish county to provide mediation and resolution services for landlords and tenants, with the goal of avoiding evictions.(48) $500,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 is provided solely for grants to nonprofit organizations to operate hunger relief response programs serving individuals living in permanent supportive housing. Of the amounts provided in this subsection:(a) $275,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 is provided solely for a grant to a nonprofit organization located in King county.(b) $225,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 is provided solely for a grant to a nonprofit organization located in Spokane county.(49) $180,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 is provided solely for a grant to a nonprofit organization operating a teen center in the city of Issaquah to provide case management and counseling services for youth ages 12 to 19.(50)(a) $375,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $375,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for a grant to a nonprofit community-based organization for the coordination of a gang violence prevention consortium with entities including community-based organizations, law enforcement, and members of the faith community, and to continue and expand after-school activities and social services for students and young adults in the Yakima valley. Social services may include, but are not limited to, employment, mental health, counseling, tutoring, and mentoring services. The grant recipient must be a community-based organization located in Granger operating a Spanish language public radio station and with the mission of addressing the social, educational, and health needs of economically disadvantaged Spanish-speaking residents of central and eastern Washington.(b) By June 30, 2025, the department must provide a report to the appropriate committees of the legislature. The report must include: (i) A description of the gang violence prevention programs conducted by the consortium and how they were implemented; and (ii) The number of individuals who participated in or received services through the programs conducted by the consortium, including any relevant demographic data for those individuals.(51) $400,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for the department to contract with a nonprofit organization to develop an affordable housing predevelopment plan. The affordable housing predevelopment plan must assess the feasibility of using surplus public land located at or near north Seattle Community College and Highline Community College for the development of affordable colocated housing that could serve low and moderate-income state workers. The contract recipient must be an organization that provides consultation services on affordable housing development. In creating the predevelopment plan, the contract recipient must solicit input from interested parties including, but not limited to, low-income and affordable housing experts, policy staff in the office of the governor, state public employee unions, and legislators. The contract recipient may also use funds provided under this subsection for affordable housing predevelopment work at North Seattle Community College or Highline Community College.(52) $781,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $781,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for implementation of Substitute House Bill No. 1406 (youth seeking housing assist).(53)(a) $1,750,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $1,750,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the office of firearm safety and violence prevention to continue a healthy youth and violence prevention initiative demonstration program serving south King county, with the goal of preventing violence, decreasing involvement with the juvenile justice system, and encouraging health and wellbeing for youth and young adults ages 12 to 24. As part of the demonstration program, the office must provide grant funding to and partner with a community-based organization to serve as a regional coordinator to:(i) Connect youth and young adults ages 12 to 24 who are most vulnerable to violence with programs that provide services including, but not limited to, street outreach, youth employment and preapprenticeship programs, case management, behavioral health services, and other services as appropriate; and(ii) Assist local governments, service providers, and nonprofit organizations in accessing and leveraging federal, state, and local funding for violence prevention and related services.(b) The grant recipient under (a) of this subsection must be a nonprofit health system currently administering a violence prevention initiative in King and Pierce counties. The grant recipient may subgrant or subcontract funds to programs providing services as described in (a)(i) of this subsection.(54) $300,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 is provided solely for a grant to a nonprofit sexual assault resource center located in Renton. Grant funding may be used for information technology improvements focused on client data management that will improve client access to health services, cybersecurity, and data privacy.(55)(a) $850,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $850,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the continuation of existing contracts with a nonprofit organization to increase housing supply and equitable housing outcomes by advancing affordable housing developments, including supportive housing, transitional housing, shelter, or housing funded through the apple health and homes program, that are colocated with community services such as education centers, health clinics, nonprofit organizations, social services, or community spaces or facilities, available to residents or the public, on underutilized or tax-exempt land.(b) The contract recipient must use the funding provided under this subsection to:(i) Implement strategies to accelerate development of affordable housing with space for education centers, health clinics, nonprofit organizations, social services, or community space or facilities, available to residents or the public, on underutilized or tax-exempt land;(ii) Analyze the suitability of properties and sites for affordable housing as described under (b)(i) of this subsection, including existing buildings for supportive housing, through completing due diligence, conceptual design, and financial analysis activities, and applying and implementing an equity lens in site selection, program planning, development, and operations;(iii) Work with elected officials, local governments, educational institutions, public agencies, local housing and community development partners, early learning partners, health care providers, and nonprofit service organizations to:(A) Identify and catalyze surplus, underutilized, or tax-exempt properties for the development of affordable housing;(B) Provide catalytic funding and technical assistance to advance the development of affordable housing, including by identifying funding sources to support the needs of specific projects; and(C) Identify impediments to the development of affordable housing and develop recommendations and strategies to address those impediments, reduce costs, advance community vision and equitable outcomes, and accelerate predevelopment and development times associated with affordable housing;(iv) Organize community partners and build capacity to develop affordable housing sites;(v) Facilitate collaboration and codevelopment between affordable housing and education centers, health clinics, nonprofit organizations, social services, or community spaces and facilities available to residents or the public;(vi) Provide technical assistance and predevelopment services to support future development of sites; and(vii) Catalyze the redevelopment of at least 20 sites to create approximately 2,000 affordable homes.(c) Funding may also be used to:(i) Partner with state, regional, and local public entities, nonprofit housing developers, and service providers to develop a broad range of housing types for supportive housing for populations authorized to receive the housing benefit under the apple health and homes act;(ii) Provide technical assistance on the constructive alignment of state or local capital funds and other services for the construction, acquisition, refurbishment, redevelopment, master leasing of properties for noncongregate housing, or conversion of units from nonresidential to residential, of dwelling units for supportive housing funded through the apple health and homes program;(iii) Advise on local community engagement, especially with populations with lived experience of homelessness and housing insecurity, for supportive housing funded through the apple health and homes program;(iv) Subcontract for specialized predevelopment services, as needed, and subgrant to reimburse for supportive housing funded through the apple health and homes program; and(v) Hire staff necessary to implement activities under (b) and (c) of this subsection.(56)(a) $375,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $375,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the department to continue a lifeline support system pilot project to assist individuals who have experienced or are at risk of entering into public systems of care. Public systems of care include office of homeless youth prevention and protection shelter and housing programs, the juvenile justice system, dependency under chapter 13.34 RCW, and inpatient behavioral health treatment.(b)(i) The lifeline must function as a no-wrong-door access point for support and connections to services for qualifying individuals who require assistance to overcome a life challenge that could escalate into a crisis, or who are in need of general mentorship and counsel. The lifeline support system must facilitate and promote partnerships across state agencies, federally recognized tribes, counties, and community-based providers to coordinate trauma-informed and culturally responsive services for youth and young adults and their supports. The department is authorized to implement lifeline services through contracts with community partners and nonprofit organizations.(ii) From amounts provided in this subsection, the department must allocate funding to establish a lifeline fund program. The department may use moneys allocated for the fund program to assist community partners and nonprofit organizations to implement lifeline services when those providers cannot identify an existing resource to resolve a recipient's need. The department must establish an application process and criteria for the fund program.(c) By June 30, 2025, the department shall report to the legislature regarding the success and shortcomings of the lifeline support system, request-for-service outcomes, and the demographics of beneficiaries.(57) $350,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $350,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for a grant to a nonprofit organization to provide legal aid in subjects including, but not limited to, criminal law and civil rights cases for underserved populations focusing on Black gender-diverse communities. The grant recipient must be a nonprofit organization with offices in Seattle and Tacoma and with a mission to provide intersectional legal and social services for Black intersex and gender-diverse communities in Washington.(58) $213,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $773,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for a grant to a nonprofit organization within the city of Tacoma that provides social services and educational programming to assist Latino and indigenous communities in honoring heritage and culture through the arts, and in overcoming barriers to social, political, economic, and cultural community development. Of the amounts provided in this subsection:(a) $175,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $535,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for education and training programming in community health organizing, "promotora" health education, grassroots organizing, leadership development, college preparedness and financial aid outreach, small business technical support and education, and civic engagement focused on Latino and indigenous community members; and(b) $38,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $238,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for family support services for bilingual, bicultural clients.(59) $500,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $1,500,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the department to provide grants to nonprofit organizations including, but not limited to, religious nonprofits, "by and for" organizations, or cultural community centers, to fund the physical security or repair of such institutions. Grant recipients must substantiate that their site or sites have been subject to or at risk of physical attacks, threats, vandalism, or damages based on their mission, ideology, or beliefs and demonstrate a need for investments in physical security enhancements, construction or renovation, target hardening, preparedness planning, training, or exercises.(60) $400,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $400,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the department to provide grant funding to a nonprofit organization to provide supports, including behavioral health resources, housing services, and parenting education, to parents with substance use disorder. The grant recipient must be a nonprofit organization located in the south Puget Sound region that provides a parent child assistance program and focuses on building parenting skills and confidence to ensure children have safe and healthy childhoods.(61) $450,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and (($450,000))$900,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for costs to develop and operate community-based residential housing and services for youth wellness spanning a range of needs and circumstances at the Pacific hospital preservation and development authority quarters, buildings three through 10 in Seattle. The amounts provided in this subsection may be used for planning, lease payments, and other related expenses for the development and operation of comprehensive residential programs providing housing, on-site social services, and community-based resources for youth identified by the department of commerce, the department of children, youth, and families, or the health care authority. The funding may also be used for the preparation and issuance of a request for qualifications for a site operator, or lease management and related administrative functions. The department is authorized to enter into a lease, with an option to enter into multiyear extensions, for the Pacific hospital preservation and development authority quarters, buildings three through 10.(62) $350,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $350,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for a grant to a nonprofit organization based in the city of Seattle that works to improve the quality of life for low-income families and members of the refugee and immigrant community, with a focus on the Somali and Oromos community. The grant funding may be used to expand current programs including, but not limited to, case management and referral services for immigrants and refugees, youth programs, and services for seniors.(63) $270,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $270,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for a grant to a nonprofit organization headquartered in Mount Vernon for costs to operate and provide homeless services at a low-barrier emergency temporary homeless center located in Burlington.(64) $750,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $750,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for a grant to a nonprofit organization located in the city of Seattle that provides legal assistance and representation to survivors of sexual and gender-based violence to expand their current services including, but not limited to, legal assistance and representation; technical assistance for advocates, providers, and attorneys; community education and trainings; and other legal support services. In providing services, the grant recipient must protect the privacy, safety, and civil rights of survivors and utilize trauma-informed practices and equity principles.(65) $250,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $250,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the department to provide a grant to a nonprofit organization serving King and Snohomish counties for a program conducted in partnership with King county, which serves individuals who are involved in the criminal justice system and who have experienced domestic, sexual, or gender-based violence. The grant recipient may use the funding for costs including, but not limited to, legal advocacy, outreach, connecting clients to housing and other resources, data analytics, and staffing.(66) $150,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $50,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the office of crime victims advocacy to contract for a study of the impacts of the commercial sex industry on Black and African American communities in Washington, with a focus on Black and African American persons who identify as female. The office must contract with an organization that has expertise on the topic of the commercial sex industry and Black communities in Washington. The study must include a review of the impacts of the commercial sex industry on Black and African American residents of Washington, and culturally informed and survivor-informed policy recommendations for reducing sex trafficking and sexual exploitation of Black and African American Washingtonians. The department must submit a report of the study findings to the appropriate committees of the legislature by September 1, 2024.(67) $20,656,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $20,655,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for grants to crime victims service providers to ensure continuity of services impacted by reductions in federal victims of crime act funding and to help address increased demand for services attributable to the COVID-19 pandemic. The department must distribute the funding in a manner that is consistent with the office of crime victims advocacy's state plan. Of the amounts provided in this subsection:(a) $2,000,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $2,000,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely to programs operated by and for historically marginalized populations to support "by and for" culturally specific services for victims of domestic violence, sexual assault, and other crimes in historically marginalized populations. Marginalized populations can include, but are not limited to, organizations or groups composed along racial, ethnic, religious, sexual orientation, and gender lines.(b) $2,000,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $2,000,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely to programs developed to support the enhancement and development of additional services for tribal members, including programs to address needs of crime victims, including strategies which integrate services or multiple crime types.(68) $200,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 is provided solely for a grant to the city of Seattle for start-up costs for the Seattle social housing developer and to meet the requirements of the city of Seattle initiative 135, which concerns developing and maintaining affordable social housing in Seattle. The funding provided under this subsection may only be used for costs associated with creating social housing developments, operating costs associated with maintaining social housing developments, and administrative costs of operating social housing.(69) $250,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 is provided solely to contract with a nonprofit to provide wraparound services for homeless families with children, including prevention, shelter, and stabilization services. The nonprofit must be located in Pierce county and be an affiliate of a national organization dedicated to preventing and ending family homelessness by providing prevention, shelter, and stabilization services.(70) Within existing resources, the department must submit an interim and a final report to the appropriate committees of the legislature on efforts taken by the department to stabilize rents for tenants of affordable housing units financed through the housing assistance program created under RCW 43.185A.020 including, but not limited to, efforts to limit or mitigate the impacts of rent increases for tenants of qualifying units. The department must submit the interim report by December 1, 2023, and the final report by December 1, 2024.(71) Before awarding or entering into grants or contracts for the 2023-2025 fiscal biennium for homeless housing and service programs that are funded from the home security fund account or the affordable housing for all account, the department must first consult with local governments and eligible grantees to ensure that funding from these accounts is used to maintain the quantity and types of homeless housing and services funded in local communities as of February 28, 2023. The department may take into consideration local document recording fee balances and individual county fluctuations in recording fee collections when allocating state funds. The department must redeploy funds to other nonprofit and county grantees if originally granted amounts are not expended or committed within a reasonable timeline. The department may then provide funding to eligible entities to undertake the activities described in RCW 36.22.250(4)(b), such as funding for project-based vouchers and other assistance necessary to support permanent supportive housing as defined in RCW 36.70A.030 or as administered by the office of apple health and homes created in RCW 43.330.181.(72) $500,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 is provided solely for a grant to an Everett-based affiliate of a national nonprofit human services organization to stabilize newly arriving refugees from the 2021 Afghanistan conflict and the 2022 Ukraine conflict.(73) $150,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $150,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for a contract with a nonprofit organization to expand private capacity to provide legal services for indigent foreign nationals in contested domestic relations and family law cases. The contract recipient must be a nonprofit organization headquartered in the city of Seattle that provides training to attorneys and judges on international family law issues and provides direct representation to qualified indigent clients. Amounts provided in this subsection may not be expended for direct private legal representation of clients in domestic relations and family law cases.(74) $125,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $125,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for a grant to a youth development organization providing civic engagement and education through a youth and government program. The grant is provided solely for support of the organization's mock trial and youth legislature programs.(75) $252,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $229,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5198 (mobile home community sales).(76) $1,694,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $1,694,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5561 (law enforcement community grants).(77) $1,000,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $1,000,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5599 (protected health care/youth). The entirety of this amount is provided for the office of homeless youth for prevention and protection programs to provide supportive care grants to organizations to address the needs of youth seeking protected health care services.(78) $100,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $100,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for a grant to the city of Monroe to continue existing pilot projects that enable the city to dispatch human services and social services staff in conjunction with law enforcement staff to support unhoused residents and residents in crisis.(79) $2,574,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $3,126,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5114 (sex trafficking).(80) $250,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $250,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for a grant to the city of Bellevue for one-time expenses required for the operation of an expanded community service center to help low-income individuals and immigrant and refugee community members. The center will join with community partners to provide utility rate and rent relief; health care access; energy assistance; food access; medical, legal and financial services; housing; childcare resources; employment assistance; and resources for starting a business.(81) $215,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $345,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the department to produce a report to the legislature detailing the scope of work, cost estimates, and implementation timeline to create or procure an online registry of rental units in Washington state subject to state information system planning and oversight requirements. The online rental unit registry must have the capacity to collect and report out timely information on each rental unit in the state. Information to collect includes, but is not limited to, the rental unit's physical address, identity of the property owner, monthly rent charged, and vacancy status. The scope of work must assume integration with existing rental registries operated by local governments. Cost and timeline estimates must provide two alternatives with one assuming statewide implementation and the other assuming implementation in the six largest counties of the state. The department shall consult with landlord representatives, tenant representatives, local governments operating existing rental registries, and other interested stakeholders as part of the process of developing the scope of work and timeline for the online rental unit registry. The department must submit the report to the legislature by December 1, 2024.(82) $150,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 is provided solely for a Seattle based nonprofit to create a temporary space to allow youth and low-income populations to participate in ice rink related events during the 2024 national hockey league winter classic.(83) $150,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $150,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for a grant to a nonprofit organization based in Kitsap county that partners with the Bremerton and central Kitsap school districts, first responders, and other organizations to expand implementation of the handle with care program.(84) $371,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $371,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for Pacific county to operate or participate in a drug task force to enhance coordination and intelligence while facilitating multijurisdictional criminal investigations.(85) $1,000,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $1,000,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for distribution to statewide and community asset building coalitions across Washington to support capacity in organizations that coordinate financial health services and outreach efforts around poverty reduction resources such as the earned income tax credit and the working families tax credit.(86) $200,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $200,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for a community based organization in Whatcom county to expand services to unhoused and low-income residents of Ferndale and north Whatcom county and to provide a safe parking program.(87) $155,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 ((and $175,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are))is provided solely for a grant to an organization in Pierce county experienced in providing peer-to-peer training, to develop and implement a program aimed at reducing workplace sexual harassment in the agricultural sector. Funding will be used to continue peer-to-peer trainings for farmworkers in Yakima county and expand services into Grant and Benton counties. Funding may also be used to support an established network of farmworker peer trainers whose primary purpose is to prevent workplace sexual harassment and assault through leadership and education. The organization is expected to share best practices from their peer-to-peer model at a statewide conference.(88) $150,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $150,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for a grant to a Seattle-based nonprofit that provides holistic services to help refugee and immigrant women. Funds must be used to expand an existing program that increases equity in ice skating and hockey by providing skate lessons to preschoolers from diverse and low-income families.(89)(a) $1,000,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $2,000,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the department to administer grants to strengthen family resource center services and increase capacity statewide. Grant funding may be used: For an organization to provide new services in order to meet the statutory requirements of a family resource center, as defined in RCW 43.216.010; to increase capacity or enhance service provision at current family resource centers, including but not limited to direct staffing and administrative costs; and to conduct data collection, evaluation, and quality improvement activities. The department may award an amount from $30,000 up to $200,000 per grant recipient.(b) Eligible applicants for a grant under (a) of this subsection include current family resource centers, as defined in RCW 43.330.010, or organizations in the process of becoming qualified as family resource centers. Applicants must affirm their ability and willingness to serve all families requesting services in order to receive a grant. Applicants must currently be or agree to become a member of a statewide family resource center network during the grant award period in order to receive a grant. Applicants must provide proof of certification in the standards of quality for family strengthening and support developed by the national family support network for one member of the applicant's organizational leadership in order to receive a grant.(c) In distributing grant funding, the department must, to the extent it is practicable, award 75 percent of funding to organizations located west of the crest of the Cascade mountains, and 25 percent of funding to organizations located east of the crest of the Cascade mountains.(d) By July 1, 2025, grant recipients must submit a report to the department on the use of grant funding, including, but not limited to, progress in attaining status as a family resource center, if applicable; the number and type of services offered to families; demographic and income data for families served; and family post-service outcomes. By September 1, 2025, the department must submit a report to the Legislature on topics including, but not limited to, the grant application process; needs identified by family resource centers; and use of funds by grant recipients.(e) Of the amounts provided in (a) of this subsection, $250,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $250,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the department to provide a grant to the statewide nonprofit organization that serves as the registered Washington state network member of the national family support network. The grant recipient may use the grant funding for costs including, but not limited to, outreach and engagement, data and evaluation, and providing training and development opportunities in support of family resource centers statewide.(90) $9,000,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $34,000,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the department for grants to local governments for maintaining programs and investments which are primarily funded through the document recording fee collected pursuant to RCW 36.22.250. In allocating grant funding to local jurisdictions, awards must be based on a formula, determined by the department, to ensure that grants are distributed equitably among cities and counties.(91)(a) $1,500,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $1,500,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for a law enforcement technology grant program for the purpose of providing law enforcement with modern vehicle pursuit management technology including, but not limited to, global positioning system tracking equipment, automated license plate reading technology, aircraft, and nonarmed and nonarmored drone technology.(b) Grants must be awarded to local law enforcement agencies based on locally developed proposals. The department shall establish policies for applications under this subsection in addition to criteria for evaluating and selecting grant recipients. A proposal must include a request for specific technology and a specific plan for the implementation, use, and effectiveness reporting of that technology.(c) Before grants are awarded, each local law enforcement agency seeking to acquire vehicle pursuit technology must:(i) Establish data-sharing and management policies including policies related to sharing data between law enforcement agencies and other third parties; and(ii) Establish policies ensuring all personnel who operate the vehicle pursuit technology, or access the vehicle pursuit technology data, are trained to use that technology and are able to comply with the data-sharing and management policies prior to the operational use of the vehicle pursuit technology.(92) $400,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $1,600,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the distribution of grants to cities, counties, or nonprofit organizations to support individuals in need of emergency housing assistance. Emergency housing assistance may include, but is not limited to, short-term rental assistance, moving costs, other one-time costs associated with identifying and obtaining housing, or temporary shelter in the event of a crisis or when people have been displaced. Funding provided under this subsection must be prioritized for entities that can demonstrate that the population served includes families with children, pregnant individuals, or other medically vulnerable individuals. The department may only distribute funding under this subsection upon coordination with the office of the governor.(93)(a) $2,700,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for the department to continue to provide grant funding to local multijurisdictional task forces that previously received funding through the federal Edward Byrne memorial justice assistance grant program. Grants provided under this section must be used consistent with the requirements of Edward Byrne memorial justice assistance grants and with national best practices for law enforcement.(b) Of the amounts provided in this subsection, $50,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for the department, with the office of the governor, to coordinate three roundtables to review policies, regulations, and fiscal investments regarding multijurisdictional drug task forces in Washington state. The roundtables must include representatives from state, tribal, and local governments, and invite representatives from the federal government. By June 30, 2025, the department must submit a summary report of the roundtable's findings to the appropriate committees of the legislature.(94) $475,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for a grant to a nonprofit organization located in King county that develops training and support for low-income individuals, with a focus on women and people of color, to move into the construction industry for living wage jobs. The grant funding must be used to support a preapprenticeship program that, through the construction of units, integrates housing and workforce development in service of the following goals:(a) Creating a blueprint to integrating workforce development and housing for local jurisdictions;(b) Providing construction training to underserved populations;(c) Creating a pathway for trainees to enter construction careers; and(d) Addressing the effects of sexism and racism in housing, education, training, employment, and career development.(95) $500,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for a grant to a nonprofit organization to assist local law enforcement agencies throughout the state in establishing community-supported programs for officers to provide short-term assistance such as food, clothing, fuel, and other means of support during interactions with community members in need. The grant recipient must be a nonprofit organization headquartered in Puyallup with experience in assisting local law enforcement agencies in administering such programs. Local law enforcement agencies that establish community-supported programs under this subsection may also pursue private funding to support the provision of assistance.(96) $50,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $250,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for grants to nonprofit organizations to provide homeownership assistance to homeowners and first-time homebuyers from communities served by those organizations. Homeownership assistance activities may include, but are not limited to, housing counseling for current homeowners; housing counseling for first-time homebuyers; financial literacy education for homeowners and homebuyers; and outreach. Of the amounts provided in this subsection:(a) $25,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $125,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are for a grant to a nonprofit community land trust headquartered in the city of Seattle with a mission to acquire, develop, and steward land in the greater Seattle area to empower and preserve the Black diaspora community; and(b) $25,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $125,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are for a grant to a nonprofit community-based organization based in the city of Seattle with a mission to provide resources, education, and advocacy to help Black homeowners achieve and sustain homeownership.(97) $240,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for a grant to a nonprofit organization to provide holistic reentry support to persons formerly incarcerated in prisons in Washington state. The grant recipient must be a nonprofit organization based in King county that promotes healing, relationships, and humanity by providing services including community-based reintegration support, gun violence intervention processes, and healing work through antioppression and culturally-responsive compassionate communication workshops, and which uses the evidence-based credible messengers model.(98) $500,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for a grant to a nonprofit organization to provide essential social services for low-income families and individuals. The grant recipient must be a nonprofit community action agency based in the city of Seattle that provides safety-net services for low-income families and individuals and that has a history of serving the African American community in the Central District.(99) $150,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely to contract with a social purpose corporation that operates a cultural community center located in the city of Tumwater to provide a trauma-informed cultural and job training program for people of color and those facing barriers to employment.(100) $395,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for the department to provide a grant to the Yakima valley local crime lab for analysis and data collection on firearm crimes, support for investigations for deaths related to fentanyl, and to support the rapid DNA work group.(101) $2,000,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for the department to contract with the housing finance commission for activities related to the implementation of the covenant homeownership program created in chapter 43.181 RCW. Of the amounts provided in this subsection:(a) $1,500,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for the commission to contract through a request for proposals process with nonprofit community organizations, public housing agencies, or public development authorities across the state who are focused on increasing homeownership or are serving communities eligible for assistance through the covenant homeownership program to:(i) Provide the full spectrum of housing counseling services, including prepurchase counseling, assistance in the home buying process, and support to maintain homeownership and prevent foreclosure, including community outreach efforts; and(ii) Provide technical assistance to "by and for" homeownership developers in areas such as site identification and predevelopment activities in order to increase the quantity of starter homes for first-time homebuyers who are eligible for assistance through the covenant homeownership program.(b)(i) $500,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for the commission to draft a plan with specific strategies to:(A) Reduce the cost of starter homes for first-time homebuyers and lessen other costs associated with purchasing a home;(B) Acquire publicly owned and other sites that can be dedicated to homeownership;(C) Identify other ways to further enable first-time homebuyers to afford their home purchase; and(D) Encourage a variety of design and development options for starter homes.(ii) The commission must submit the plan developed under (b)(i) of this subsection to the governor and the appropriate committees of the legislature by January 15, 2025.(102) $750,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for a grant to a nonprofit organization to complete the acquisition of property for a community center to provide services to residents in south King county. The grant recipient must be a community action agency headquartered in the city of Seattle with an office in the city of Federal Way, and that is grounded in the Latino community of Washington state.(103) (($1,000,000))$100,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely to administer housing assistance for persons who are fleeing or who have recently fled intimate partner violence. The department must allocate funding through contracts with service providers that have current contracts with the office of crime victims advocacy to provide services for survivors of intimate partner or domestic violence. A provider must use at least 80 percent of contracted funds for rental payments to landlords and the remainder for other program operation costs. Priority for assistance must be provided to survivors who face the greatest risk of serious violence and have the least access to housing resources.(104) $200,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for a grant to a nonprofit organization that operates a community resource center in the city of Ferndale to maintain and expand services for families and individuals, including but not limited to providing one-on-one navigation services to access housing and other assistance; providing clothing, food, and other forms of immediate assistance; and conducting direct outreach to unhoused individuals and families.(105) $300,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for a grant to a nonprofit organization to conduct planning and site development activities for building affordable housing in the city of Roslyn. The grant recipient must be a nonprofit organization with offices in Seattle and Roslyn and with a mission to innovate and scale land-based solutions to address the climate crisis and support equitable, green, and prosperous communities.(106) $350,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for a grant to a nonprofit organization to provide culturally competent legal services, training, outreach, and education to immigrant workers regarding a federal deferred action program for workers who are victims or witnesses of violations of labor rights during labor disputes. The grant recipient must be a nonprofit organization that operates a free civil legal aid clinic in partnership with Seattle University and the University of Washington that educates, advises, and represents workers in employment law cases.(107) $250,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for the department to contract with two nongovernmental organizations to host a Washington state developmental disabilities intersectional summit in October 2024. The purpose of the summit is to analyze systemic barriers impacting the lives of BIPOC individuals with intellectual and developmental disabilities and their families, and to identify solutions for addressing those barriers. The contract recipients must be nongovernmental organizations that are BIPOC-led and that have demonstrated skills and experience working for and with people with developmental disabilities and their families.(108) $787,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for the statewide reentry council to implement a pilot project to operate a trauma-informed, peer-based, human dignity model reentry program at the Lynnwood municipal jail. The reentry program must provide peer-led intensive case management services for participants that are both prerelease and postrelease.(109) $34,000,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for grants to local governments for homeless housing programs and services, including but not limited to emergency housing and shelter, temporary housing, and permanent supportive housing programs. Of the amounts provided in this subsection:(a) $12,000,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for a grant to King county to maintain shelter, emergency housing, and permanent supportive housing programs.(b) $3,000,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for a grant to the city of Tacoma to prevent the closure of temporary and emergency shelter beds.(c) $4,000,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for a grant to the city of Spokane to provide temporary emergency shelter for homeless individuals and for costs associated with transitioning individuals from their current shelter location to smaller shelters and inclement weather centers.(d) $15,000,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for grants to local jurisdictions who are not eligible for funding under (a), (b), or (c) of this subsection. Grant funds must be prioritized for maintaining existing levels of service and preventing the closure of existing beds or programs.(110) $100,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for a grant to a nonprofit organization to expand support services and mentorship programs serving at-risk youth, with a focus on BIPOC and transgender youth, in Kitsap county. The grant recipient must be a nonprofit organization based in Kitsap county that provides advocacy and other support services for at-risk youth and their families, with a focus on BIPOC and LGBTQ youth.(111) $125,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for a grant to a nonprofit organization to support the development of and outreach for community-led mental health support groups and classes serving individuals and families throughout Washington state, with special focus on Latino communities, rural areas, and tribes. The grant recipient must be a nonprofit organization that serves as the Washington state office of a national grassroots mental health organization dedicated to building better lives for individuals affected by mental health conditions.(112) $250,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for a grant to a nonprofit organization to provide support to self-advocates, caregivers, and others in attending a summit addressing the topic of federal and state funding for programs that benefit people with developmental disabilities in 2025. The grant recipient must be a nonprofit organization that advocates for and beside children and adults with intellectual and developmental disabilities and their families that is headquartered in the city of Olympia.(113) $300,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for the department to contract with a nonprofit organization to maintain and increase access to technical assistance, advice, fundraising services, and foundational support such as human resources, information technology, and financial services for community-based nonprofit organizations in Washington. The contract recipient must be a nonprofit organization headquartered in the city of Seattle that provides management and technology consulting; training; and free advisory services for nonprofit and community-based organizations.(114) $230,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for a grant to a nonprofit organization to expand an existing gang prevention program that provides mentoring, education, and drug awareness services for elevated-risk youth in middle and elementary schools in Yakima county, with the goals of reducing youth gang involvement, increasing school enrollment and reducing truancy, and reducing the accessibility and usage of drugs by elevated-risk youth. The grant recipient must be a nonprofit organization based in Yakima that provides outreach, education, and prevention services to improve community safety in the Yakima valley, including a drug-free coalition and a youth mentoring program.(115) $120,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for grants to two nonprofit entities to establish 4-H curriculum-based initiatives for students and foster educational opportunities tied to the land grant university knowledge base. One grant recipient must be a nonprofit entity operating multiple locations in Skagit county and have at least 25 years of experience serving youth in the region, and one grant recipient must be a nonprofit entity operating multiple locations in Snohomish county with at least 75 years of experience serving youth in the region.(116) $125,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for a grant to a nonprofit organization to expand their mentoring, job training, and internship programs for at-risk youth. The grant recipient must be a nonprofit organization who serves at-risk youth in the Snoqualmie and Issaquah valleys through mentoring, job skill development, and teen internship programs in coordination with local school districts.(117) $350,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for a grant to the Vancouver housing authority for the operational and services costs of a licensed residential care facility located in Vancouver that provides housing and other services for low-income, disabled, and homeless and formerly homeless individuals.(118) $198,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for a grant to a nonprofit organization for activities to develop affordable housing units and permanent supportive housing units for individuals with intellectual and developmental disabilities in rural Snohomish and Skagit counties. The grant recipient must be a nonprofit organization headquartered in Arlington that offers client housing, residential supported living services, employment services, job readiness and life skills training, and arts and music enrichment programs to individuals with intellectual and developmental disabilities.(119) $250,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for a grant to Whatcom county to increase the number of families served through a family motel shelter program.(120) $81,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for implementation of Substitute House Bill No. 2329 (insurance market/housing). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2024, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.(121) $250,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for a grant to a nonprofit organization to provide technical assistance and direct resident support to residents of manufactured and mobile home communities immediately following a notice of sale issued pursuant to RCW 59.20.300. The grant recipient must be a nonprofit organization headquartered in the city of Olympia that assists new and existing cooperative businesses, with emphasis on resident owned communities, home care agencies, and converting existing businesses into worker-owned or community-owned cooperatives.(122) $250,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for the department to conduct a comprehensive study to identify and analyze funding structures to preserve manufactured and mobile home communities as nonprofit or cooperatively-run affordable housing projects. In conducting the study, the department must consult with financial experts, conduct field interviews, and identify existing and innovative funding options to support the creation of resident-owned communities. The department must submit a report summarizing the study's findings to the governor and the legislature by June 30, 2025.(123) $54,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 6175 (existing structures/tax). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2024, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.(124)(a) $1,000,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for a contract with a statewide organization with a mission of developing new and innovative ways to combat organized retail crime to implement a pilot program to respond to organized retail crime, with a focus on diversion-oriented programs.(b) The contract recipient must establish three pilot program sites. The contract recipient must make a reasonable effort to establish at least one site east of the Cascade mountains. No single pilot site may use more than $300,000 of the funding provided under this subsection.(c) The contract recipient must use the funds to coordinate community efforts to enhance responses to organized retail crime within each pilot site area. Coordination must include the following entities: Cities, counties, or affiliated associations with programs focused on diversion and restitution; local retail stores; law enforcement agencies; local prosecutors and public defense; and therapeutic courts. Funding may also be used for planning and other activities to achieve a targeted response to reported retail crimes from diversion programs or law enforcement agencies.(d) The contract recipient must provide a report to the department by June 15, 2025, on the number of responses to retail crime and the number of diversions initiated for each pilot site, data regarding the role of local prosecutors at each site, and opportunities and challenges in retail crime response and diversion identified by pilot participants. The department must submit the report to the appropriate committees of the legislature by June 30, 2025.(125) $150,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for a grant to a nonprofit organization to continue sexual assault prevention education programming to K-12 schools in Tacoma and expand services to the Franklin Pierce school district. The grant recipient must be a state-accredited community sexual assault program serving Pierce county that provides professional training, prevention education, intervention, and advocacy programs for victims of sexual assault, sexual abuse, and sex trafficking.(126) $350,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for a grant to a nonprofit organization to provide community-based healing-centered arts engagement programming for populations including, but not limited to, survivors of gender-based violence and individuals working to reintegrate after incarceration. The grant recipient must be a nonprofit organization based in the city of Seattle with experience in providing arts engagement programming, including serving veteran and Latino cohorts.(127) $300,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for a grant to a nonprofit based in King county that exclusively serves foreign-trained physicians to help foreign-trained physicians prepare to work in a United States clinical setting and obtain a medical doctor: clinical experience license in Washington state. The nonprofit may use the amount provided in this subsection to:(a) Provide stipends of up to $2,000 per foreign-trained physician to:(i) Take medical exams or English as a second language classes;(ii) Obtain a professional resume review or interview skill development; or(iii) Defray any other expenses that may limit their ability to become hire-ready physicians; and(b) Operate an educational outreach program to help medical providers and institutions understand the medical doctor: clinical experience program including eligibility, licensure laws, and details of working with foreign-trained physicians in their facilities.(128) $500,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for a grant to a nonprofit in east King county, recognized as a by and for organization, to advance affordable housing. The grant recipient must be an organization that partners in equitable, affordable housing development. The grant recipient must use the funding as follows:(a) To educate residents on the benefits of affordable housing in east King county;(b) To facilitate partnerships to enable equitable transit-oriented development across the east King county region that builds housing at scale;(c) For a project that will produce up to 33 affordable housing units on the Eastside; and(d) To identify strategies for land acquisition and assembly around high-capacity transit stations that will result in a mix of housing.(129) $625,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for Snohomish county human services to provide technical assistance and contract with a nonprofit to support youth, parents, and families with school-based collaboration, and social activities for youth.(130) $477,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for Kitsap county to provide 70 continuous-stay, low-barrier/harm reduction model shelter beds.(131) $15,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $20,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely to contract with a nonprofit in Seattle to develop a list of BIPOC families, with an emphasis on African American households, that want to live in Seattle for the purpose of assisting those families with finding and keeping housing in Seattle.(132) $50,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $420,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for a grant to a Seattle-based community center that assists eastern European refugees and immigrants to provide short term housing assistance, immigration services, and support to individuals in Washington who fled the Ukraine-Russia conflict.(133) $100,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 is provided solely for a grant to a Bellingham-based nonprofit serving youth and young adults experiencing homelessness and housing insecurity to increase capacity and the ability for staff to support clients in attending appointments, providing navigating services, and assessing resources throughout Whatcom county.(134) $45,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for a grant to a Seattle-based nonprofit that teaches math using hands-on learning experiences and collaborates with community partners to create equity-based, culturally relevant math education opportunities.(135) $317,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for a grant to three resource centers that are expecting a reduction in funding from the office of crime victims advocacy. Funding is intended to cover any deficit these organizations experience to continue service levels to sexual assault survivors. Of this amount:(a) $200,000 is for a nonprofit sexual assault resource center in King county;(b) $77,000 is for a Richland-based accredited community sexual assault program; and(c) $40,000 is for a nonprofit organization that provides crime victim support in multiple locations across the region, including in Spokane and Vancouver.(136) $250,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for a grant to a nonprofit organization to expand theater arts education programming and for activities to support equitable access to the arts for students. The grant recipient must be a nonprofit organization located in the city of Federal Way that operates a semiprofessional theater and provides theater arts education programming.(137) $1,500,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for the office of crime victims advocacy for activities to address domestic violence. Of the amounts provided in this subsection:(a) $200,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for the office to convene a work group to create a roadmap that provides a detailed pathway describing the steps necessary for insurance billing for domestic violence intervention treatment in Washington state.(i) In developing the roadmap, the work group must:(A) Determine if a medicaid state plan amendment or 1115 waiver would be necessary to allow medicaid billing for domestic violence intervention treatment;(B) Determine if existing billing codes would work for medicaid and commercial insurance, or if new billing codes would be necessary;(C) Identify any healthcare certification or credentials needed for providers to be able to bill insurance for domestic violence intervention treatment;(D) Identify the educational pathways that exist to become a domestic violence intervention treatment provider; and(E) Identify any statutory changes or funding necessary to implement the roadmap.(ii) The work group members must include representatives of:(A) Organizations that provide domestic violence intervention treatment;(B) Individual clinicians that provide domestic violence intervention treatment;(C) Social workers;(D) Licensed marriage and family therapists;(E) Domestic violence survivors;(F) The domestic violence treatment program administered by the department of social and health services;(G) Staff from the department of health with expertise in licensing and credentialing of health professionals;(H) Staff from the health care authority who work on insurance billing for medicaid, the public employees benefits board, and the school employees benefits board;(I) The office of the insurance commissioner;(J) Medicaid managed care organizations; and(K) Commercial insurance carriers.(iii) The office of crime victims advocacy must provide staff support for the work group.(iv) The work group must submit a preliminary report including the roadmap to the appropriate committees of the legislature by December 31, 2024.(b) $1,300,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for the office to contract with a research university to conduct a randomized control trial comparing the strength at home program to standard domestic violence intervention treatment methods used in Washington state. The research university must have completed a randomized control trial of domestic violence intervention treatment at joint base Lewis-McChord. The target population of the randomized control trial must be individuals in Washington state who have been referred to domestic violence intervention treatment via the criminal or civil legal systems. The research university must also conduct a demonstration project using the internal family systems modality as a domestic violence intervention treatment.(138) $1,000,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for the office of homeless youth prevention and protection programs to provide grants to nonprofit organizations implementing place-based health zone models to provide and strengthen youth development services and mental and behavioral health supports for youth and their families for clearly demarcated geographical health zones. The services and supports may range from primary prevention to crisis services. Grant funding may support health zone activities and evaluation activities. The office must distribute four grants, as follows:(a) Two grants to nonprofits with established place-based health zone models, for costs to provide services and conduct evaluation activities; and(b) Two grants to nonprofits who are currently developing and implementing place-based health zone models, for costs to establish and provide services and conduct evaluation activities.(139) $150,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for a grant to a nonprofit organization to assist fathers transitioning from incarceration to community and family reunification. The grant recipient must have experience contracting with the department of corrections to support incarcerated individual betterment projects and contracting with the department of social and health services to provide access and visitation services.(140) $250,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for the department to evaluate alternative methods for calculating average median household income. The department must include in its evaluation the feasibility of using median household income data by state legislative district as published by the United States census bureau. The department must submit a report of recommendations to the appropriate committees of the legislature by June 30, 2025.Sec. 1116. 2024 c 376 s 128 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCEâLOCAL GOVERNMENTGeneral FundâState Appropriation (FY 2024). . . .$48,331,000General FundâState Appropriation (FY 2025). . . .(($60,537,000))Â Â Â Â Â $60,216,000General FundâFederal Appropriation. . . .$44,574,000General FundâPrivate/Local Appropriation. . . .$1,050,000Climate Commitment AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$53,353,000Community Preservation and Development AuthorityAccountâState Appropriation. . . .$4,750,000Growth Management Planning and Environmental ReviewFundâState Appropriation. . . .$5,681,000Liquor Excise Tax AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$986,000Liquor Revolving AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$6,827,000Model Toxics Control Operating AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$1,000,000Model Toxics Control Stormwater AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$100,000Natural Climate Solutions AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$2,747,000Public Facilities Construction Loan RevolvingAccountâState Appropriation. . . .$1,026,000Public Works Assistance AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$7,267,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($238,229,000))Â Â Â Â Â $237,908,000The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) The department shall administer its growth management act technical assistance and pass-through grants so that smaller cities and counties receive proportionately more assistance than larger cities or counties.(2) $375,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $375,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely as pass-through funding to Walla Walla Community College for its water and environmental center.(3) $6,827,000 of the liquor revolving accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the department to contract with the municipal research and services center of Washington.(4) The department must develop a model ordinance for cities and counties to utilize for siting community based behavioral health facilities.(5) $100,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $100,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the department to produce the biennial report identifying a list of projects to address incompatible developments near military installations as provided in RCW 43.330.520.(6) $100,000 of the model toxics control stormwater accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for planning work related to stormwater runoff at the aurora bridge and I-5 ship canal bridge. Planning work may include, but is not limited to, coordination with project partners, community engagement, conducting engineering studies, and staff support.(7) $2,000,000 of the community preservation and development authority accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the Pioneer Square-International district community preservation and development authority established in RCW 43.167.060 to carry out the duties and responsibilities set forth in RCW 43.167.030.(8) $1,160,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $1,159,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the statewide broadband office established in RCW 43.330.532.(9) $10,000,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $10,000,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the department for grants for updating and implementing comprehensive plans and development regulations in order to implement the requirements of the growth management act.(a) In allocating grant funding to local jurisdictions, awards must be based on a formula, determined by the department, to ensure that grants are distributed equitably among cities and counties. Grants will be used primarily to fund the review and update requirements for counties and cities required by RCW 36.70A.130. Funding provided on this formula basis shall cover additional county and city costs, if applicable, to implement chapter 254, Laws of 2021 (Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 1220) and to implement Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5412 (land use permitting/local).(b) Within the amounts not utilized under (a) of this subsection, the department shall establish a competitive grant program to implement requirements of the growth management act.(c) Up to $500,000 per biennium may be allocated toward growth management policy research and development or to assess the ongoing effectiveness of existing growth management policy.(d) The department must develop a process for consulting with local governments, affected stakeholders, and the appropriate committees of the legislature to establish emphasis areas for competitive grant distribution and for research priorities.(10) $1,100,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $1,100,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the department to contract with the municipal research and services center, in coordination with the Washington procurement technical assistance center, to provide training and technical assistance to local governments and contractors on public works contracting. Training topics may include utilization of supplemental bidding criteria, utilization of alternate public works, contracting, cost estimating, obtaining performance and payment bonds, and increasing participation of women-owned and minority-owned businesses.(11) $3,000,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $3,000,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the department to administer grants and provide technical assistance to cities or counties for actions relating to adopting ordinances that plan for and accommodate housing. Of this amount:(a) $2,500,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $2,500,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for grants to cities and counties. Grants may be used for the following activities:(i) Analyzing comprehensive plan policies and development regulations to determine the extent of amendments required to meet the goal of authorizing middle housing types on at least 30 percent of lots currently zoned as single family residential within the city, or for counties inside the unincorporated urban growth area. For the purposes of this subsection, "middle housing types" means buildings that are compatible in scale, form, and character with single family houses, and contain two or more attached, stacked, or clustered homes. This includes duplexes, triplexes, fourplexes, fiveplexes, sixplexes, townhouses, courtyard apartments, and cottage housing;(ii) Planning work to facilitate transit-oriented development, including costs associated with the preparation of state environmental policy act environmental impact statements, planned action ordinances, and subarea plans, costs associated with the use of other tools under the state environmental policy act, and the costs of local code adoption and implementation of such efforts; and(iii) Planning for and accommodating housing that is affordable for individuals and families earning less than 50 percent of the area median income, including:(A) Land use and regulatory solutions to address homelessness and low-income housing; and(B) Bridging homeless service planning with land use planning.(b) $500,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $500,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for an affordable housing auditing program to monitor ongoing affordability of income-restricted units constructed with affordable housing incentives, including the multifamily tax exemption.(12) Within the amounts provided in this section, the department must publish on its website housing data needed to complete housing needs assessments required by RCW 36.70A.070(2)(a). The data shall include:(a) Housing profiles for each county and city in the state, including cost burden, vacancy, and income;(b) Data to assess racially disparate impacts, exclusion, and displacement; and(c) A dashboard to display data in an easily accessible format.(13) $1,330,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $995,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 1110 (middle housing).(14) $15,000,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $20,000,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the department to provide grants to entities that provide digital navigator services, devices, and subscriptions. These services must include, but are not limited to, one-on-one assistance for people with limited access to services, including individuals seeking work, students seeking digital technical support, families supporting students, English language learners, medicaid clients, people experiencing poverty, and seniors. Of the amounts provided from the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025, at least $3,000,000 must be provided to tribes.(15) $2,750,000 of the community preservation and development authority accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the Central district community preservation and development authority established in RCW 43.167.070 to carry out the duties and responsibilities set forth in RCW 43.167.030.(16) $187,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $188,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for a grant to the city of Battle Ground to contract for a study to explore feasible options to redesign their downtown corridor to emphasize pedestrian accessibility, improve safety, and highlight community amenities.(17) $175,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 is provided solely for a grant to the city of Cheney fire department for the purchase of a new type 6 fire truck to replace one destroyed in a mutual aid fire.(18) $175,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 is provided solely for a grant to Ferry/Okanogan fire protection district number 14 for the purchase of a new ambulance and related costs for response to 911 calls, including those from local residents, recreators, and hunters.(19) $250,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 is provided solely for a grant to the Pierce county public transportation benefit area corporation (Pierce transit) to administer a public transit and behavioral health coresponder pilot program in partnership with a Pierce county behavioral health professional agency.(20) $120,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $115,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the transportation demand management program at the canyon park subarea in the city of Bothell.(21) (a) $50,953,000 of the climate commitment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 1181 (climate change/planning).(b) Of the amount provided in (a) of this subsection, $10,000,000 of the climate commitment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for programs, services, or capital facilities included in greenhouse gas emissions reduction subelements required by chapter 228, Laws of 2023 (E2SHB 1181). The department shall provide funding to jurisdictions for programs, services, or capital facilities included in approved subelements that the department concludes will reduce greenhouse gas emissions or per capita vehicle miles traveled until funds in this subsection are expended. The department shall prioritize funding for programs, services, or capital facilities that result in cobenefits or address disproportionately impacted communities. If Initiative Measure No. 2117 is approved in the 2024 general election, upon the effective date of the measure, funds from the consolidated climate account may not be used for the purposes in this subsection (b).(22) $490,000 of the public works assistance accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the public works board to develop a data dashboard to map investments made by the public works board, the department of commerce, the department of health, the department of ecology, the department of transportation, the transportation improvement board, and by board partners to the system improvement team created in RCW 43.155.150.(23) $96,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $423,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the department to conduct a study on the feasibility of implementing a Washington state zoning atlas project that will provide a publicly available mapping tool illustrating key features of zoning codes across jurisdictions.(24) $733,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $734,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5268 (public works procurement).(25) $37,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5536 (controlled substances).(26) $134,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $135,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely to the city of Tacoma for the operating costs of the hilltop community hub. The hilltop community fund shall support a distribution center to provide housing goods.(27) $50,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $50,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for a grant to the city of Ferndale for the purpose of implementing and improving a wayfinding system throughout the greater Ferndale market area.(28) $464,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $3,510,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5290 (local permit review). Of the amount provided in this subsection, at least $3,000,000 is provided solely for grants to local governments.(29) $2,400,000 of the climate commitment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the Port Gamble S'Klallam Tribe for phase 3 of the Port Gamble shoreline restoration project.(30) $1,000,000 of the model toxics control accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for grants to address emergency drinking water problems in overburdened communities. The department may utilize existing programs to distribute the funding provided under this section, including the emergency rapid response program.(31) $198,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 ((and $198,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are))is provided solely to retain a behavioral health facilities siting administrator within the department to coordinate development of effective behavioral health housing options and provide technical assistance in siting of behavioral health treatment facilities statewide to aide in the governor's plan to discharge individuals from the state psychiatric hospitals into community settings. This position must work closely with local government legislative authorities, planning departments, behavioral health providers, the health care authority, the department of social and health services, and other entities to facilitate linkages among disparate behavioral health community bed capacity-building efforts. This position must work to integrate building behavioral health treatment and infrastructure capacity in addition to ongoing supportive housing benefits.(32) $225,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for a grant to the Chelan-Douglas regional port authority to fund public engagement efforts in Chelan and Douglas counties related to a future regional sports complex. Engagement efforts may include print and electronically mailed materials, media advertisements, social media, and other forms of communications related to study information, including but not limited to:(a) Consultants' analyses;(b) Steering committee recommendations;(c) Design and location options;(d) Artistic renderings;(e) Economic impacts;(f) Capital and operational costs;(g) Financing options; and(h) Other information.(33) $200,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for the department to contract with a consultant to study incorporating the unincorporated communities of Dash Point and Browns Point into a single city. The study must include, but not be limited to, the impact of incorporation on the local tax base, crime, homelessness, infrastructure, public services, and behavioral health services, in the listed communities. The department must submit the results of the study to the office of financial management and the appropriate committees of the legislature by June 1, 2025.(34) $250,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for the department to convene a task force to make recommendations on integrating water, sewer, school, and port districts into the growth management act planning process. The task force shall build upon the findings, concepts, and recommendations in recent reports, including the "collaborative roadmap phase III" report prepared for the department in 2023 and the "roadmap to Washington's future" issued by the William D. Ruckelshaus center in 2019. The task force must involve diverse perspectives including but not limited to representatives of state agencies, cities, counties, special districts, tribal governments, builders, and planning and environmental organizations that have experience with local or special purpose district planning processes. The department must provide a preliminary report on the task force's activities and progress by June 30, 2025. It is the intent of the legislature to continue funding the study in the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium, with a final report with recommendations due December 1, 2025.(35) $200,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for Whatcom county to study the potential of creating an interjurisdictional coordinating body focused on improving the housing market for tenants, landlords, and those interested in becoming landlords. The study should examine the potential for an office of healthy housing to:(a) Have a sustainable funding model and assist landlords and tenants in understanding leases and procedures;(b) Increase housing supply by providing resources to small landlords; and(c) Work with major local employers and local higher education institutions to ensure a thriving local housing market.(36) $600,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for the department to provide technical assistance to local governments in planning for and siting supportive housing and emergency housing facilities; and provide dispute resolution services to help resolve disputes between local governments and service providers attempting to site supportive housing and emergency housing facilities. The department shall submit a report, pursuant to RCW 43.01.036, to the appropriate committees of the legislature by March 1, 2025, on which local governments received funding and resolution status for disputes resolved.(37) $213,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Substitute House Bill No. 2321 (middle housing requirements). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2024, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.))(38) $25,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for a grant to a nonprofit, professional association of state, county, city, and town officials engaged in development, enforcement, and administration of building construction codes and ordinances to collaborate with the Washington state board for community and technical colleges to design and implement training programs to accelerate the hiring of city and county permit technicians.(39) $30,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for the city of Elma to place automatic external defibrillators in city vehicles and public spaces in city buildings.(40) $1,000,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for the Okanogan county sheriff's office for the Okanogan county public safety radio network improvement project.(41) $16,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $46,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5834 (urban growth areas). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2024, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.))(42) $57,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 6015 (residential parking). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2024, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.))(43) $67,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5955 (large port districts). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2024, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.))Sec. 1117. 2024 c 376 s 129 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCEâOFFICE OF ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENTGeneral FundâState Appropriation (FY 2024). . . .$25,389,000General FundâState Appropriation (FY 2025). . . .(($34,502,000))Â Â Â Â Â $33,352,000General FundâFederal Appropriation. . . .$108,069,000General FundâPrivate/Local Appropriation. . . .$1,230,000Dedicated Cannabis AccountâState Appropriation(FY 2024). . . .$3,446,000Dedicated Cannabis AccountâState Appropriation(FY 2025). . . .$3,591,000Andy Hill Cancer Research Endowment Fund MatchTransfer AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$31,684,000Climate Commitment AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$4,477,000Community and Economic Development Fee AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$765,000Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery FundâFederalAppropriation. . . .$23,400,000Economic Development Strategic Reserve AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$2,786,000Statewide Tourism Marketing AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$9,000,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($248,339,000))Â Â Â Â Â $247,189,000The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) $4,304,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $5,000,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for associate development organizations. During the 2023-2025 fiscal biennium, the department shall consider an associate development organization's total resources when making contracting and fund allocation decisions, in addition to the schedule provided in RCW 43.330.086. The department must distribute the funding as follows:(a) For associate development organizations serving urban counties, which are counties other than rural counties as defined in RCW 82.14.370, a locally matched allocation of up to $1.00 per capita, totaling no more than $300,000 per organization; and(b) For associate development organizations in rural counties, as defined in RCW 82.14.370, a $1.00 per capita allocation with a base allocation of $75,000.(2) $350,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $350,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the northwest agriculture business center.(3) $150,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $150,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the regulatory roadmap program for the construction industry and to identify and coordinate with businesses in key industry sectors to develop additional regulatory roadmap tools.(4) $1,070,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $1,070,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the small business export assistance program. The department must ensure that at least one employee is located outside the city of Seattle for purposes of assisting rural businesses with export strategies.(5) $60,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $60,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the department to submit the necessary Washington state membership dues for the Pacific Northwest economic region.(6) $1,808,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $2,438,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the department to identify and invest in strategic growth areas, support key sectors, and align existing economic development programs and priorities. The department must consider Washington's position as the most trade-dependent state when identifying priority investments. The department must engage states and provinces in the northwest as well as associate development organizations, small business development centers, chambers of commerce, ports, and other partners to leverage the funds provided. Sector leads established by the department must include the industries of: (a) Aerospace; (b) clean technology and renewable and nonrenewable energy; (c) wood products and other natural resource industries; (d) information and communication technology; (e) life sciences and global health; (f) maritime; (g) military and defense; and (h) creative industries. The department may establish these sector leads by hiring new staff, expanding the duties of current staff, or working with partner organizations and or other agencies to serve in the role of sector lead.(7) $31,684,000 of the Andy Hill cancer research endowment fund match transfer accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the Andy Hill cancer research endowment program. Amounts provided in this subsection may be used for grants and administration costs.(8) $600,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $600,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the department to establish representation in key international markets that will provide the greatest opportunities for increased trade and investment for small businesses in the state of Washington. Prior to entering into any contract for representation, the department must consult with associate development organizations and other organizations and associations that represent small business, rural industries, and disadvantaged business enterprises.(9) $100,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $100,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for a grant to assist people with limited incomes in urban areas of the state start and sustain small businesses. The grant recipient must be a nonprofit organization involving a network of microenterprise organizations and professionals to support micro entrepreneurship and access to economic development resources.(10) $3,000,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $3,000,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for a nonprofit organization whose sole purpose is to provide grants, capacity building, and technical assistance support to a network of microenterprise development organizations. The microenterprise development organizations will support rural and urban Black, indigenous and people of color owned businesses, veteran owned businesses, and limited resourced and other hard to serve businesses with five or fewer employees throughout the state with business training, technical assistance, and microloans.(11) $1,000,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $1,000,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for a grant to a business center that provides confidential, no-cost, one-on-one, client-centered assistance to small businesses to expand outreach in underserved communities, especially Black, indigenous, and people of color-owned businesses, providing targeted assistance where needed. Funding may also be used to collaborate the department, the Washington economic development association, and others to develop a more effective and efficient service delivery system for Washington's women and minority-owned small businesses.(12) $200,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $200,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely to strengthen capacity of the keep Washington working act work group established in RCW 43.330.510.(13) $7,000,000 of the coronavirus state fiscal recovery fundâfederal appropriation is provided solely for the department to continue to administer the small business innovation and competitiveness fund program created in section 128(167), chapter 297, Laws of 2022 (ESSB 5693). The department may prioritize projects that received conditional awards in the 2021-2023 fiscal biennium but were not funded due to the project's inability to be substantially completed by June 30, 2023.(14) $2,000,000 of the coronavirus state fiscal recovery fundâfederal appropriation is provided solely for the department to administer grants to businesses and nonprofits in the arts, heritage, and science sectors, including those that operate live entertainment venues, to provide bridge funding for continued recovery from the COVID-19 pandemic and related economic impacts. The department must develop criteria for successful grant applications in coordination with the Washington state arts commission.(15) $352,000 of the climate commitment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute House Bill No. 1176 (climate-ready communities).(16) $225,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $225,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the department to contract with an associate development organization located in Thurston county to provide a training curriculum to assist small businesses in scaling up to reach their next tier of operations. The contract recipient may use the funding for costs including, but not limited to, curriculum materials, trainers, and follow up coaching and mentorship in multiple languages.(17) $250,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $250,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the department to contract for technical assistance programs focused on assisting small minority, women, and veteran-owned businesses in south King and Pierce counties. The contract recipient must be a nonprofit organization located in Tukwila that provides educational and business assistance for underserved and minority groups, with a focus on the African American community. The department must provide a preliminary report on program outcomes by June 30, 2024, and a final report by June 30, 2025, to the relevant committees of the legislature. The preliminary and final reports must include outcome data including, but not limited to, the number of events or workshops provided, the number of businesses served, and ownership and other demographics of businesses served.(18) $250,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $250,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely to contract with a nonprofit organization to conduct workforce and economic development activities serving the south Puget Sound region. The contract recipient must be a nongovernmental nonprofit organization located in Federal Way that has been in operation for at least 10 years and whose mission is to develop resources to enhance the economy of the south sound region by facilitating innovation, job creation, and the growth and development of businesses.(19) $250,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 is provided solely for the department to provide grant funding to a nonprofit biotech incubator and science research center located in the city of Tacoma. The grant funding is to provide support for programs aimed at increasing workforce readiness and entrepreneurship in the life sciences, with a focus on promoting access to science, technology, engineering, and math careers for individuals from underserved communities.(20) $700,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $700,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for grants to associate development organizations pursuant to Substitute House Bill No. 1783 (grant writers).(21) $9,000,000 of the statewide tourism marketing accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the statewide tourism marketing program and operation of the statewide tourism marketing authority pursuant to chapter 43.384 RCW.(22) $500,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $500,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the department to renew licenses for cloud-based business engagement tools for state agencies and local workforce and economic development boards, and to procure additional licenses for state agency procurement professionals, to assist in complying with the department of enterprise services supplier diversity policy effective April 1, 2023.(23) $2,500,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and (($2,500,000))$1,800,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for activities related to securing federal funding from programs created by or funded through federal legislation including, but not limited to, the inflation reduction act, P.L. 117-169; the chips and science act, P.L. 117-167; and the infrastructure investment and jobs act, P.L. 117-58. Funding provided under this subsection may be used to support regional and locally led initiatives seeking federal funding, to provide technical support for application development and grant writing, to conduct economic analysis of various sectors, and other activities the department deems necessary for the state and partners with the state to compete for federal funds.(24) $877,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and (($878,000))$528,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5096 (employee ownership).(25) $409,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $411,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5269 (manufacturing).(26) $150,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and (($150,000))$50,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the department, in consultation with other agencies as necessary, to support activities related to cooperation with governmental and public agencies of the Republic of Finland, the Kingdom of Sweden, and the Kingdom of Norway. Eligible activities include, but are not limited to, cooperation in clean energy, clean technology, clean transportation, telecommunications, agriculture and wood science technology, general economic development, and other areas of mutual interest with Nordic nations and institutions.(27) $125,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $125,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for a Bellingham based nonprofit that assists entrepreneurs to create, build, and grow businesses in northwest Washington to help establish a network of innovation centers for entrepreneurs and innovative small businesses between Seattle and the Canadian border.(28)(a) $150,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 is provided solely for the department to develop strategies for cooperation with governmental agencies of Vietnam, including higher education institutions, and organizations around the following:(i) Trade and investment, including, but not limited to, the agriculture, information technology, food processing, manufacturing, and textile industries;(ii) Combating climate change, including, but not limited to, cooperation on clean energy, clean transportation, and climate-smart agriculture; and(iii) Academic and cultural exchange.(b) By June 30, 2024, the department must provide a report on the use of funds in this subsection, any key metrics and deliverables, and any recommendations for further opportunities for collaboration.(29) $350,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $350,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the department to provide an economic development grant to a nongovernmental organization established in Federal Way, in operation for at least 30 years, whose primary focus is the economic development of the greater Federal Way region, in order to provide assessment for the development of innovation campuses in identified economic corridors.(30) $200,000 of the coronavirus state fiscal recovery fundâfederal appropriation is provided solely for a grant to a Tacoma based automotive museum as businesses assistance to address COVID-19 pandemic impacts to revenues from decreased attendance and loss of other revenue generating opportunities.(31) $250,000 of the climate commitment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for a study or studies to assess strategies necessary for the state of Washington to engage in the offshore wind supply chain. The study may address public infrastructure needed for manufacturing, assembly, and transport of supply chain components, and an assessment of workforce needs and community benefits. The department must submit a preliminary report summarizing the status of the study or studies to the governor and the appropriate committees of the legislature by June 30, 2025, and a final report summarizing the findings of the study or studies by November 30, 2025. It is the intent of the legislature to provide funding to complete the final report in the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium. Funds provided in this subsection may not be expended or obligated prior to January 1, 2025. If Initiative Measure No. 2117 is approved, this subsection is null and void upon the effective date of the measure.(32) $2,110,000 of the climate commitment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely to expand the industrial symbiosis program. At least 20 percent of the amount provided in this section must be prioritized to benefit individuals in overburdened communities. Funds provided in this subsection may not be expended or obligated prior to January 1, 2025. If Initiative Measure No. 2117 is approved, this subsection is null and void upon the effective date of the measure.(33) $250,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for a grant to a nonprofit organization for a small business incubator program focused on the arts and culture sectors that provides technical assistance and business training to creative entrepreneurs, with a focus on BIPOC-owned and women-owned businesses. The grant recipient must be a nonprofit arts organization based in the city of Tacoma that hosts live performances and provides youth and adult arts education programming.(34) $150,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for a grant to a nonprofit organization to administer a workforce development program serving youth and young adults from underserved communities to learn technical, creative, and business skills related to concert and event promotion. The grant recipient must be a nonprofit organization headquartered in the city of Seattle that provides youth arts and education programming and produces a music festival based in Seattle that takes place over Labor Day weekend.(35) $375,000 of the climate commitment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the department to contract with a nonregulatory coalition to identify economic, community, and workforce development opportunities resulting from Washington state's participation in the offshore wind supply chain through conducting convenings, workshops, and studies as appropriate. Funds provided in this subsection may not be expended or obligated prior to January 1, 2025. If Initiative Measure No. 2117 is approved, this subsection is null and void upon the effective date of the measure.(36) $200,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for a grant to a nonprofit organization to provide a workforce development and small business training program serving primarily low-income Latinx immigrant families in south King county. The grant recipient must be a nonprofit organization based in the city of Seattle that advances the power and well-being of Latino immigrants through employment, education, and community organizing.(37) $390,000 of the climate commitment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the department to establish a circular economy market development program. At least 20 percent of the amount provided in this subsection must be prioritized to benefit individuals in overburdened communities. Funds provided in this subsection may not be expended or obligated prior to January 1, 2025. If Initiative Measure No. 2117 is approved, this subsection is null and void upon the effective date of the measure.(38) $1,000,000 of the climate commitment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the innovation cluster accelerator program. Funding provided in this subsection may only be used to develop and maintain clusters that aim to reduce and mitigate impacts from greenhouse gases in overburdened communities, deploy renewable energy resources, increase energy efficiency or reduction, or other permissible uses pursuant to RCW 70A.65.260. Funds provided in this subsection may not be expended or obligated prior to January 1, 2025. If Initiative Measure No. 2117 is approved, this subsection is null and void upon the effective date of the measure.(39) $250,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for a grant to an associate development organization to provide technical assistance, workforce development training, and business innovation training to small businesses in Benton and Franklin counties, with a focus on businesses in BIPOC communities. Technical assistance may also include financial literacy, grant writing, and federal grant assistance for tribes and overburdened communities. The grant recipient must be an associate development organization comprised of a coalition of more than 25 but less than 100 small businesses, nonprofit, and business leaders located in Benton and Franklin counties, and must be a recognized "by and for" organization serving the BIPOC community.(40)(a) $275,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for the department to convene an electrical transmission workforce needs work group and study. The work group must provide advice, develop strategies, and make recommendations to the legislature, state and local agencies, and utilities on efforts to support the needs of Washington's electrical transmission industry workforce. The work group must consist of eight members:(i) One representative each from a labor organization located in Tacoma, Clark county, and Spokane county that represents line workers;(ii) One representative from a statewide labor organization with at least 250,000 affiliated members that represents line workers and workers from outside the electrical transmission and construction industry; and(iii) Two representatives from two different investor-owned utilities and two representatives from two different consumer-owned utilities each.(b)(i) The department must conduct a study of the employment and workforce education needs of the electrical transmission industry of the state. The work group must assist the department in developing the scope of the study; review the preliminary and final reports of the study; and, if appropriate, recommend any legislative changes needed to address issues raised as a result of the study. The study must focus on the following job classifications in the electrical transmission industry: Line workers, line clearance tree trimmers, and substation technicians. The department may contract with a third party to complete the study.(ii) By December 1, 2024, the department must submit a preliminary report of the study to the appropriate committees of the legislature, including the methodology that will be used to conduct the study and any demographic data or other information gathered regarding the electrical transmission industry workforce in preparation for the study.(iii) By November 1, 2025, the department must submit a final report of the study to the appropriate committees of the legislature. It is the intent of the legislature to provide funding to complete the final report in the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium.(iv) The final report must at a minimum include:(A) Estimates of electrical transmission industry jobs needed to expand electrical transmission capacity to meet the state's clean energy and climate goals, inclusive of the workforce needed to maintain existing infrastructure. These estimates should cover, at a minimum, the time periods required for the planning, including the construction, reconstruction, or enlargement, of new or existing electrical transmission facilities under RCW 19.28.010, 80.50.060, and 80.50.045, and the state environmental policy act;(B) The number of apprenticeships in the job classifications listed in (b)(i) of this subsection;(C) An inventory of existing apprentice programs and anticipated need for expansion of existing apprenticeships or supplemental training programs to meet current and future workforce needs;(D) Demographic data of the workforce, including age, gender, race, ethnicity, and, where possible, other categories of identity;(E) Identification of gaps and barriers to a full electrical transmission workforce pool, including, but not limited to, the loss of workers to retirement in the next five, 10, and 15 years, and other current and anticipated retention issues;(F) A comparison of wages between different jurisdictions in Washington state, and between Washington and other neighboring states, including any incentives offered by other states;(G) Data on the number of workers in the job classifications identified in (b)(i) of this subsection who completed training in Washington and left to work in a different state;(H) Data on the number of out-of-state workers who enter Washington to meet workforce needs on large scale electrical transmission projects in Washington;(I) Key challenges that could emerge in the foreseeable future based on factors such as growth in demand for electricity and changes in energy production and availability; and(J) Recommendations for the training, recruitment, and retention of the current and anticipated electrical transmission workforce that supplement, enhance, or exceed current training requirements. This must include identification of barriers to entrance into the electrical transmission workforce, and recommendations to attract and retain a more diverse workforce, such as members of federally recognized Indian tribes and individuals from overburdened communities as defined in RCW 70A.02.010.(41) $500,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for implementation of Substitute House Bill No. 1870 (local comm. federal funding). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2024, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.))(42) $250,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for the innovation cluster accelerator program to support an industry-led fusion energy cluster. By June 30, 2025, the fusion energy cluster must submit a report to the appropriate committees of the legislature that includes recommendations for promoting the development of fusion energy and the manufacturing and assembling of component parts for fusion energy in Washington state. The report must:(a) Include an evaluation of the applicability of new and existing clean energy incentives for manufacturing, facility construction, and the purchase of materials and equipment; and(b) Identify opportunities for state funding, including matching federal grants.(43) $350,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for the department to contract for technical assistance services for small businesses owned or operated by members of historically disadvantaged populations located in western Washington. The contract recipient must be a business in the arts, entertainment, and media services sector based in the city of Federal Way and with experience working with BIPOC communities. Technical assistance includes but is not limited to services such as: Business and intellectual property development; franchise development and expansion; digital and social media marketing and brand development; community outreach; opportunities to meet potential strategic partners or corporate sponsors; executive workshops; networking events; small business coaching; and start-up assistance.(44) $200,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for a grant to a nonprofit organization for a program to assist low-income individuals from Washington state in entering the maritime industry as mariners, including training, credentialing, and wrap-around services. The grant recipient must be a nonprofit organization located in the city of Seattle that serves as a workforce development intermediary creating equitable workforce systems and developing impactful partnerships to address structural racism. The nonprofit organization must consult with two unions based in the city of Seattle who represent mariners on the West coast in developing the program.(45) $1,000,000 of the coronavirus state fiscal recovery fundâfederal appropriation is provided solely for the department to administer a business assistance program to provide grants to statewide or local destination marketing organizations in Washington state for activities to promote tourism to Washington in advance of the 2026 FIFA World Cup. The department must enter into contracts with grant recipients by December 31, 2024. To qualify for a grant under this subsection, a destination marketing organization must have been negatively impacted by the COVID-19 public health emergency and:(a) Have revenues at the time of applying for the grant that are less than their revenues in calendar year 2019;(b) Have used reserve operating funds after March 3, 2021, to make up for revenue shortfalls; or(c) Have demonstrated needs for funding to support programs designed to increase tourism to Washington state from across the country and the world in advance of the 2026 FIFA World Cup.(46) $184,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for a grant to a nongovernmental organization whose primary focus is community and economic development in downtown Renton to provide holistic navigation and education services.(47) $100,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for the Washington state manufacturing council to convene a subgroup of at least two of its members, with at least four members representing advanced manufacturing who have expertise in diversity, equity and inclusion. Annually, the work group must provide recommendations to the manufacturing council to vastly improve the representation of black, indigenous, and people of color, as well as women, in manufacturing ownership and within the workforce across all levels of manufacturing.(48) $4,000,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for the Washington state public stadium authority to modernize interior stadium infrastructure. Funding is provided to improve operational infrastructure such that stadium can accommodate and attract mega events benefiting the state. Improvements will include, but are not limited to, installing new seating, improving ADA access, upgrading hospitality features, and making security enhancements.(49)(a) $1,000,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for the department to provide grants to eligible sports commissions to support activities promoting sports tourism, sporting events, and tournaments, and fostering economic and community development.(b) An "eligible sports commission" under this subsection means an entity whose primary purpose is to promote tourism through hosting sporting events in Washington state. Entities may be independent nonprofit organizations or a division of a regional or national convention or visitors bureau.(c) The department must develop application criteria and eligible uses of funds for the grant program.(d) In determining the distribution of grant awards under this subsection, the department may allocate funds in proportion to the population of the county or counties in which the eligible sports commission conducts its activities.(e) The department must develop reporting requirements for grant recipients, including but not limited to how grant funds are used. All grant recipients must report back to the department by June 30, 2025.(50) $300,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $500,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the city of Seattle to lease space for nonprofit and academic institutions to incubate technology business startups, especially those focusing on artificial intelligence and develop and teach curricula to skill up workers to use artificial intelligence as a business resource.Sec. 1118. 2024 c 376 s 130 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCEâENERGY AND INNOVATIONGeneral FundâState Appropriation (FY 2024). . . .$8,641,000General FundâState Appropriation (FY 2025). . . .(($12,287,000))Â Â Â Â Â $11,127,000General FundâFederal Appropriation. . . .$325,724,000General FundâPrivate/Local Appropriation. . . .$34,000Building Code Council AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$13,000Climate Commitment AccountâState Appropriation. . . .(($230,557,000))Â Â Â Â Â $219,507,000Community and Economic Development Fee AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$160,000Electric Vehicle Incentive AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$50,000,000Low-Income Weatherization and StructuralRehabilitation Assistance AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$1,399,000Natural Climate Solutions AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$1,167,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($629,982,000))Â Â Â Â Â $617,772,000The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) The department is authorized to require an applicant to pay an application fee to cover the cost of reviewing the project and preparing an advisory opinion on whether a proposed electric generation project or conservation resource qualifies to meet mandatory conservation targets.(2)(a) $50,000,000 of the electric vehicle incentive accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the department to implement programs and incentives that promote the purchase of or conversion to alternative fuel vehicles. The department must work with the interagency electric vehicle coordinating council to develop and implement alternative fuel vehicle programs and incentives.(b) In developing and implementing programs and incentives under this subsection, the department must prioritize programs and incentives that:(i) Will serve individuals living in an overburdened community, as defined in RCW 70A.02.010;(ii) Will serve individuals who are in greatest need of this assistance in order to reduce the carbon emissions and other environmental impacts of their current mode of transportation in the overburdened community in which they live; and(iii) Will serve low-income communities, communities with the greatest health disparities, and communities of color that are most likely to receive the greatest health benefits from the programs through a reduction in greenhouse gas emissions and other pollutants that will result in improved groundwater and stormwater quality, improved air quality, and reductions in noise pollution.(3) $2,000,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and (($2,000,000))$1,340,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely to build a mapping and forecasting tool that provides locations and information on charging and refueling infrastructure as required in chapter 300, Laws of 2021 (zero emissions transp.). The department shall collaborate with the interagency electric vehicle coordinating council established in chapter 182, Laws of 2022 (transportation resources) when developing the tool and must work to meet benchmarks established in chapter 182, Laws of 2022 (transportation resources).(4) $10,000,000 of the climate commitment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for grants to support port districts, counties, cities, towns, special purpose districts, any other municipal corporations or quasi-municipal corporations, and tribes to support siting and permitting of clean energy projects in the state. Eligible uses of grant funding provided in this section include supporting predevelopment work for sites intended for clean energy projects, land use studies, conducting or engaging in planning efforts such as planned actions and programmatic environmental impact statements, and staff to improve permit timeliness and certainty.(5)(a) $1,000,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and (($1,000,000))$500,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the department to contract with one or more of the western national laboratories, or a similar independent research organization, in consultation with state and federal energy agencies, stakeholders, and relevant utilities, to conduct an analysis for new electricity generation, transmission, ancillary services, efficiency and storage sufficient to offset those presently provided by the lower Snake river dams. The analysis should include a list of requirements for a replacement portfolio that diversifies and improves the resilience and maintains the reliability and adequacy of the electric power system, is consistent with the state's statutory and regulatory requirements for clean electricity generation, and is supplementary to the resources that will be required to replace fossil fuels in the electrical generation, transportation, industry, and buildings sectors. The department and its contractor's assessment will include quantitative analysis based on available data as well as qualitative input gathered from tribal and other governments, the Northwest power and conservation council, relevant utilities, and other key stakeholders. The analysis must include the following:(i) Expected trends for demand, and distinct scenarios that examine potential outcomes for electricity demand, generation, and storage technologies development, land use and land use constraints, and cost through 2050, as well as the most recent analysis of future resource adequacy and reliability;(ii) A resource portfolio approach in which a combination of commercially available generating resources, energy efficiency, conservation, and demand response programs, transmission resources, and other programs and resources that would be necessary prerequisites to replace the power and grid reliability services otherwise provided by the lower Snake river dams and the time frame needed to put those resources into operation;(iii) Identification of generation and transmission siting options consistent with the overall replacement resource portfolio, in coordination with other state processes and requirements supporting the planning of clean energy and transmission siting;(iv) An evaluation of alternatives for the development, ownership and operation of the replacement resource portfolio;(v) Examination of possible impacts and opportunities that might result from the renewal of the Columbia river treaty, revisions of the Bonneville power administration preference contracts, implementation of the western resource adequacy program (WRAP), and other changes in operation and governance of the regional electric power system, consistent with statutory and regulatory requirements of the clean energy transformation act;(vi) Identification of revenue and payment structures sufficient to maintain reliable and affordable electricity supplies for ratepayers, with emphasis on overburdened communities;(vii) Development of distinct scenarios that examine different potential cost and timeline potentials for development and implementation of identified generation and transmission needs and options including planning, permitting, design, and construction, including relevant federal authorities, consistent with the statutory and regulatory requirements of the clean energy transformation act;(viii) Quantification of impacts to greenhouse gas emissions including life-cycle emissions analysis associated with implementation of identified generation and transmission needs and options including (A) planning, permitting, design, and construction, and, if relevant, emissions associated with the acquisition of non-Washington state domestic or foreign sources of electricity, and (B) any additional operations of existing fossil-fueled generating resources; and(ix) An inventory of electricity demand by state-owned or operated facilities and information needed to complete a request for proposals (RFP) to satisfy this demand through new nonhydro renewable energy generation and/or conservation.(b) The department shall, to the extent determined practicable, consider related analyses undertaken by the federal government as part of the Columbia river system operation stay of litigation agreed to in National Wildlife Federation et al. v. National Marine Fisheries Service et al. in October 2021.(c) The department shall provide a status update to the energy and environment committees of the legislature and governor's office by December 31, 2024.(6) $10,664,000 of the climate commitment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the department to administer a pilot program to provide grants and technical assistance to support planning, predevelopment, and installation of commercial, dual-use solar power demonstration projects. Eligible grant recipients may include, but are not limited to, nonprofit organizations, public entities, and federally recognized tribes.(7) $20,592,000 of the climate commitment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the department to administer a grant program to assist owners of public buildings in covering the costs of conducting an investment grade energy audit for those buildings. Public buildings include those owned by state and local governments, tribes, and school districts.(8)(a) $300,000 of the climate commitment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the department to develop recommendations on a design for a statewide energy assistance program to address the energy burden and provide access to energy assistance for low-income households. The department may contract with a third-party entity to complete the work required in this subsection.(b) The recommendations must include considerations for data collection on the energy burden and assistance need of households, universal intake coordination and data sharing across statewide programs serving low-income households, program eligibility, enrollment, multilingual services, outreach and community engagement, program administration, funding, and reporting.(c) By January 1, 2024, the department must submit a report with the recommendations to the appropriate committees of the legislature.(9) $250,000 of the climate commitment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for a grant to a nonprofit for a smart buildings education program to educate building owners and operators about smart building practices and technologies, including the development of onsite and digital trainings that detail how to operate residential and commercial facilities in an energy efficient manner. The grant recipient must be located in a city with a population of more than 700,000 and must serve anyone within Washington with an interest in better understanding energy efficiency in commercial and institutional buildings.(10) $111,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $109,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute House Bill No. 1390 (district energy systems).(11) $3,152,000 of the climate commitment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 1216 (clean energy siting).(12) $167,000 of the natural climate solutions accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 1170 (climate response strategy).(13) $250,000 of the climate commitment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the department to convene stakeholders and plan for a statewide energy rebate navigator aimed at assisting residential and small commercial buildings, with priority for buildings owned or occupied by low-income, Black, indigenous, and people of color and converting overburdened communities to clean energy. Of this amount:(a) $50,000 of the climate commitment accountâstate appropriation is for the department to convene a summit of stakeholders around building energy topics related to the development of a statewide energy rebate navigator, including initial and ongoing guidance regarding program design and implementation. The summit should develop recommendations for the program to improve and grow, addressing gaps in program design and implementation, outreach into overburdened communities, HEAL Act compliance, workforce development issues, and contractor needs.(b) $200,000 of the climate commitment accountâstate appropriation is for statewide rebate navigator evaluation and project planning, which shall include:(i) Evaluation of how technical assistance can focus on serving Black, indigenous, and people of color, and low-income communities;(ii) Research of existing data and software solutions the state can leverage to provide a one-stop-shop for energy improvements;(iii) Evaluation of program delivery models to optimize energy service delivery, including realizing economies of scale and reaching high rates of penetration in overburdened communities, indigenous communities, and communities of color;(iv) Evaluation and cultivation of potential program implementers who are qualified to deliver navigator program services, including community energy efficiency program grantees; and(v) Evaluation and cultivation of qualified potential energy services providers, including providers owned by Black, indigenous, and people of color, utility trade ally programs, and weatherization plus health weatherization agencies.(14) $33,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $17,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Substitute House Bill No. 1329 (utility shutoffs/heat).(15) $93,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $96,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute House Bill No. 1032 (wildfires/electric utilities).(16)(a) $200,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $50,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the department to contract with a third-party entity to conduct a study that analyzes how the economic impact of oil refining in Washington state is likely to impact Washington's refineries, refinery workers, and refinery communities. By December 31, 2024, the report must be distributed to the energy and environment committees of the state legislature.(b) The study required in (a) of this subsection must include:(i) An overview of Washington's five oil refineries including: Location, age, workforce demographics, direct and indirect jobs connected with the industry, health and environmental impacts, local tax revenues paid by refineries, and primary and secondary products and markets;(ii) A summary of projected scenarios for Washington refineries' primary markets, taking into account realistic, real world outcomes, given existing mandated decarbonization targets, feedstock availability, and statutes that impact Washington refinery products;(iii) A summary of anticipated short-term, medium-term, and long-term economic viability of the five Washington oil refineries based on refinery product demand forecasts as outlined in (b)(ii) of this subsection;(iv) A forecast of direct and indirect effects of the projected petroleum decline, including indirect employment impacts, the geography of those impacts, and impacts to local jurisdictions, utilities, ports, and special purpose districts from reduction in tax revenues, and impacts to local nonprofits and community programs from the refining industry;(v) An assessment of potential future uses of refinery sites that include energy industrial, nonenergy industrial, heavy manufacturing, and industrial symbiosis, including an assessment of previously closed refinery sites throughout the United States and current use of those sites. Each potential future use shall be assessed and include data regarding: Greenhouse gas emissions, local pollution and environmental health, direct and indirect employment benefits, estimated tax impacts, potential costs to Washington residents, and feasibility based on relevant market trends; and an assessment of previously closed refinery sites throughout the United States and current use of those sites;(vi) The competitive position of Washington refineries to produce alternative fuels consistent with Washington's emissions reductions defined in RCW 70A.45.020, the anticipated regional, national, and global demand for these fuels between 2023 and 2050; and the likely employment, tax, environmental, cultural, and treaty impacts of refinery conversion to these alternative fuels;(vii) An identification of refinery workers' skillsets, potential alternative sectors and industries of employment, an assessment and comparison of total compensation and benefit packages including retirement and health care programs of current and alternative jobs, impacts to apprenticeship utilization, and the current and expected availability of those jobs in Pierce, Skagit, and Whatcom counties;(viii) A land and water remediation analysis; including cost estimates, current terrestrial and aquatic pollution mapping, an overview of existing policies and regulations that determine accountability for cleanup and identifies gaps that may leave local and state taxpayers financially liable, and an assessment of the workforce and skills required for potential cleanup;(ix) A summary of existing petroleum refining capacity and trends in Washington, the United States, and internationally; and(x) An assessment of decline or loss of tax revenues supporting state environmental programs including the model toxics control act, the pollution liability insurance agency, and other programs, as well as the decline or loss of transportation gas tax revenues.(c) The department may require data and analysis from refinery owners and operators to inform the study. Pursuant to RCW 42.56.270, data shared or obtained in the course of this study is not subject to public disclosure. Where unavailable, the department and entity commissioned to complete the study shall rely on the best available public data.(d) The study must include a robust public engagement process including local and state elected officials, labor groups, fence line communities, port districts, economic development associations, and environmental organizations in Skagit, Whatcom, and Pierce counties, and the five Washington refineries.(e) The department must offer early, meaningful, and individual consultation with any affected Indian tribe for the purpose of understanding potential impacts to tribal rights and resources including cultural resources, archaeological sites, sacred sites, fisheries, and human health.(17) $600,000 of the climate commitment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5447 (alternative jet fuel).(18) $1,000,000 of the climate commitment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for a grant to the Yakama Nation for an advanced rail energy storage project.(19) $800,000 of the climate commitment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely to contract with a nonprofit entity to serve as a Washington state green bank. The purpose of the funds is to leverage federal funds available for green bank development to support development of sustainable and clean energy financing solutions within Washington. If Initiative Measure No. 2117 is approved at the 2024 general election, upon the effective date of the measure, funds from the consolidated climate account may not be used for the purposes in this subsection.(20) $2,500,000 of the climate commitment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the department to build an internet web portal for grant seekers and to establish a marketing and outreach campaign that makes information about funding opportunities widely available. Of the amount provided in this subsection:(a) $1,000,000 of the climate commitment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the department to build an internet web portal that provides a centralized location for grant seekers to find all state and federal grant and incentive opportunities in the energy, climate, and clean technology sectors. The portal shall include, but is not limited to, an interactive internet website that is launched to include, at a minimum, information identifying every grant administered by the state and incentive opportunities that will provide clean energy and climate assistance. The department, in consultation with the governor's office, shall ensure that the internet website is accessible and provides helpful information to a diverse set of potential applicants including, but not limited to, nonprofit and community-based organizations, and other entities that are working to support and benefit tribes, rural communities, and vulnerable and overburdened communities. Funds provided in this subsection (a) may not be expended or obligated prior to January 1, 2025. If Initiative Measure No. 2117 is approved in the general election, this subsection (a) is null and void upon the effective date of the measure.(b) $1,500,000 of the climate commitment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the department to establish a marketing and outreach campaign that makes information about funding opportunities widely available and easy to understand, encouraging more people and organizations to participate. The department shall work with consultants and third-party administrators to identify a range of groups including tribes, vulnerable and overburdened communities, rural communities, local governments, businesses of all sizes, households, nonprofits, educational institutions, and the clean energy developers and clean tech manufacturers that would benefit from state and federal funding available for clean energy projects. The campaign shall include a comprehensive marketing and outreach strategy, using various ways to communicate, ensuring all materials are clear, simple, and available in multiple languages, and employing best practices for communicating with diverse and underserved communities. The department, along with selected partners and third-party administrators, shall work with organizations directly serving these communities to extend the reach of these communications, with a goal of directing at least 40 percent of the marketing and outreach funds expended to benefit vulnerable populations in overburdened communities. If Initiative Measure No. 2117 is approved at the 2024 general election, upon the effective date of the measure, funds from the consolidated climate account may not be used for the purposes in this subsection (b).(21)(a) $5,000,000 of the climate commitment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the department to administer a program to assist community-based organizations, local governments, ports, tribes, and other entities to access federal tax incentives and grants. Eligible entities for the program include, but are not limited to, local governments in Washington, tribal governments and tribal entities, community-based organizations, housing authorities, ports, transit agencies, nonprofit organizations, and for-profit businesses. The department shall prioritize assistance that benefits vulnerable populations in overburdened communities, with a goal of directing at least 25 percent of funds to this purpose.(b) Within the amounts provided in (a) of this subsection, the department must contract with a nonprofit organization to provide the following services:(i) Development of tax guidance resources for clean energy tax credits, including core legal documents to be used broadly across stakeholders;(ii) Providing tailored marketing materials for these resources targeting underserved entities; and(iii) Providing funds to subcontract with clean energy tax attorneys to pilot office hours style support available to eligible entities across the state.(c) If Initiative Measure No. 2117 is approved at the 2024 general election, upon the effective date of the measure, funds from the consolidated climate account may not be used for the purposes in this subsection.(22)(a) $2,500,000 of the climate commitment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the department to support a tribal clean energy innovation and training center in partnership and colocated at Northwest Indian College. The center aims to support tribal energy goals and pursue clean energy deployment opportunities that enhance tribal energy sovereignty and well-being among tribes.(b) Activities of the center include, but are not limited to: (i) Developing technical training offerings that could build the tribal workforce pipeline, especially in emerging technologies like geothermal heat pumps and hydrogen technologies, and provide economic development opportunities and resources to the region; (ii) researching and demonstrating the feasibility of innovative clean energy technologies that also nourish and protect the environment; and (iii) creating a model for tribal clean energy centers that can be adopted by other tribal colleges in the region to establish clean energy deployment and land use best practices built on tribal knowledge.(c) If Initiative Measure No. 2117 is approved at the 2024 general election, upon the effective date of the measure, funds from the consolidated climate account may not be used for the purposes in this subsection.(23) $4,500,000 of the climate commitment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the department to administer a grant program to assist community-based organizations, local governments, ports, tribes, and other entities to author federal grant applications and to provide support for federal grant reporting for entities that receive federal grants. The department will determine a process for prioritizing applicants, including first time or underserved applicants, tribes, and rural areas of the state. The state may also partner with third-party administrators and regional and local partners, such as associate development organizations and other local nonprofits to ensure equitable access to resources. Eligible entities for the program include, but are not limited to, local governments in Washington, tribal governments and tribal entities, community-based organizations, housing authorities, ports, transit agencies, nonprofit organizations, and for-profit businesses. The department shall prioritize grants that provide benefit to vulnerable populations in overburdened communities, with a goal of directing at least 60 percent of funds to this purpose. If Initiative Measure No. 2117 is approved at the 2024 general election, upon the effective date of the measure, funds from the consolidated climate account may not be used for the purposes in this subsection.(24) $539,000 of the climate commitment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the department to develop plans to test hydrogen combustion and resulting nitrogen oxides (NOx) emissions, technical assistance for strategic end uses of hydrogen, a feasibility assessment regarding underground storage of hydrogen in Washington, and an environmental justice toolkit for hydrogen projects. If Initiative Measure No. 2117 is approved in the 2024 general election, upon the effective date of the measure, funds from the consolidated climate account may not be used for the purposes in this subsection.(25) $1,112,000 of the climate commitment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Second Engrossed Substitute House Bill No. 1282 (buy clean and buy fair), including to develop and maintain a publicly accessible database for covered projects to submit environmental and working conditions data, to convene a technical work group, and to develop legislative reports. ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2024, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.)) Funds provided in this subsection may not be expended or obligated prior to January 1, 2025. ((If Initiative Measure No. 2117 is approved in the general election, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse upon the effective date of the measure.))(26) (($3,500,000 of the climate commitment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the department to provide and facilitate access to energy assistance programs, including incentives, energy audits, and rebate programs to retrofit homes and small businesses. Funds provided in this subsection may not be expended or obligated prior to January 1, 2025. If Initiative Measure No. 2117 is approved in the general election, this subsection is null and void upon the effective date of the measure.(27) $750,000 of the climate commitment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the department to provide technical assistance and education materials to help counties establish effective commercial property assessed clean energy and resiliency (C-PACER) programs. Funds provided in this subsection may not be expended or obligated prior to January 1, 2025. If Initiative Measure No. 2117 is approved in the general election, this subsection is null and void upon the effective date of the measure.(28) $3,000,000 of the climate commitment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the department to establish a Washington clean energy ambassadors program. This program will offer education, planning, technical assistance, and community engagement across the state. Ambassadors will link local entities with resources and best practices to enable clean energy access for all communities and promote a just transition to a net-zero economy. The department must prioritize providing meaningful benefits to vulnerable populations in overburdened communities as defined under RCW 70A.02.010. Funds provided in this subsection may not be expended or obligated prior to January 1, 2025. If Initiative Measure No. 2117 is approved in the general election, this subsection is null and void upon the effective date of the measure. This program must:(a) Identify a pilot cohort of intermediary organizations;(b) Recruit and train clean energy ambassadors;(c) Host community energy and resilience educational events and workshops; and(d) Provide technical assistance to help governments, community-based organizations, businesses, and communities obtain clean energy resources.(29) $150,000,000))$146,700,000 of the climate commitment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the department to provide clean energy for Washington families grants for public and private electric utilities to provide bill credits for low-income and moderate-income residential electricity customers to help with the clean energy transition in the amount of $200 per household, by September 15, 2024. Low and moderate-income is defined as less than 150 percent of area median income. Utilities must prioritize customers in vulnerable populations in overburdened communities as defined under RCW 70A.02.010, such as those that have participated in the low-income home energy assistance program, utility payment plans, or ratepayer-funded assistance programs. Utilities must first prioritize bill credits for customers at or below 80 percent area median income and if funds remain, may expand bill credits for customers up to 150 percent of area median income. Utilities may qualify customers through self-attestation. Utilities may, but are not required to, work with community action agencies to administer these funds. Each utility shall disburse funds directly to customer accounts and adhere to program communications guidelines provided by the department. Utilities may use up to five percent of their grant funds for administrative costs associated with the disbursement of funds provided in this subsection. If Initiative Measure No. 2117 is approved in the 2024 general election, upon the effective date of the measure, funds from the consolidated climate account may not be used for the purposes in this subsection.(((30)))(27) $350,000 of the climate commitment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the authority to contract with Tacoma power, to conduct a feasibility study, including scoping project costs, on pumped storage at Tacoma power's Mossyrock dam. The contract is exempt from the competitive procurement requirements in chapter 39.26 RCW. Funds provided in this subsection may not be expended or obligated prior to January 1, 2025. If Initiative Measure No. 2117 is approved in the general election, this subsection is null and void upon the effective date of the measure.(((31)))(28) $1,000,000 of the natural climate solutions accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the department to provide grants to the following public utility districts for the costs of relocating utilities necessitated by fish barrier removal projects: Clallam, Grays Harbor, Jefferson, Kittitas, Mason public utility district no. 1, Mason public utility district no. 2, Skagit, and Thurston. Funds provided in this subsection may not be expended or obligated prior to January 1, 2025. If Initiative Measure No. 2117 is approved in the general election, this subsection is null and void upon the effective date of the measure.(((32)))(29)(a) $600,000 of the climate commitment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the department to administer a grant program for cities and counties to establish permitting processes that rely on the online automated permit processing software developed by the national renewable energy laboratory and that applies to any combination of the following permitting: Solar, energy storage, electric vehicle charging infrastructure, or other similar clean energy applications included within the suite of capabilities of the online automated permit processing software. To be eligible for grant funding under this subsection, a city or county is only required to submit a notice of their intent to participate in the program.(b) The department must award grants of no less than $20,000 to each city or county that provides notice by December 1, 2024.(c) In the event that more than a total of 30 cities and counties notify the department of their intent to participate in the program, the department must prioritize jurisdictions based on:(i) The timeline on which the jurisdiction is willing to commit to transitioning to the online automated permit processing software; and(ii) The total number of covered permits expected to be issued by the jurisdiction, based on recent historical permit data submitted to the department by the city or county.(d) In the event that fewer than 30 cities and counties notify the department of their intent to participate in the program, the department may allocate a greater amount of financial assistance than a standard minimum grant of $20,000 to jurisdictions that expect to experience comparatively high costs to transition to the online automated permit processing software.(e) The department may use up to five percent of the amount provided in this subsection for administrative costs.(f) Funds provided in this subsection may not be expended or obligated prior to January 1, 2025. If Initiative Measure No. 2117 is approved in the general election, this subsection is null and void upon the effective date of the measure.(((33)))(30) $1,000,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for a grant to a nonprofit social service organization located in King county's Rainier Valley neighborhood with an innovative learning center. Funding must be used to support an electrification preapprenticeship program for formerly incarcerated individuals and community members who are low income or homeless that offers hands-on technical training targeting clean energy methods that will align the participant's qualifications with solar technician apprenticeships and employment opportunities.(((34)))(31) $250,000 of the climate commitment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the department to contract with a nonprofit entity that represents the maritime industry to develop and publish a strategic framework regarding the production, supply, and use of sustainable maritime fuels and deployment of low and zero-emissions vessel technologies in Washington. Funding under this subsection may be used for activities including, but not limited to, convening stakeholders and building organizational capacity. Stakeholder engagement pursuant to this subsection shall include, at a minimum, engagement with federal and state agencies, ports, industry, labor, research institutions, nongovernmental organizations, and relevant federally recognized tribes. The department shall submit a copy of the strategic framework and findings to the legislature and the governor by June 30, 2025. Funds provided in this subsection may not be expended or obligated prior to January 1, 2025. If Initiative Measure No. 2117 is approved in the general election, this subsection is null and void upon the effective date of the measure.(((35)))(32) $182,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 is provided solely for wildfire recovery costs from the Gray wildfire that impacted the city of Medical Lake. Recovery costs include procurement of water for firefighting, restoration of water and sewer infrastructure, replacement of water meters, emergency sewer capping, and various other costs associated with wildfire recovery.(((36)))(33) $500,000 of the climate commitment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the department to provide a grant to the Muckleshoot Indian tribe for high-speed charging stations for electric vehicles on highway 164 near Dogwood street. Funds provided in this subsection may not be expended or obligated prior to January 1, 2025. If Initiative Measure No. 2117 is approved in the general election, this subsection is null and void upon the effective date of the measure.(((37)))(34) $150,000 of the climate commitment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for a grant to the smart building center education program to develop a qualified energy manager training program. The program must be available on demand and at no cost to the owners and operators of all tier 2 buildings to assist in complying with Washington's clean buildings performance standards. Funds provided in this subsection may not be expended or obligated prior to January 1, 2025. If Initiative Measure No. 2117 is approved in the general election, this subsection is null and void upon the effective date of the measure.(((38)))(35) $150,000 of the climate commitment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for a grant to conduct up to three feasibility studies that will investigate the expansion of sewer heat recovery programs and pilots, within Washington state, to support decarbonization of the built environment. The feasibility studies will explore and review sewer heat recovery systems' potential benefits, implementation strategies, and necessary considerations to maximize decarbonization. The sites will be selected from the following: Decarbonization of a university campus district steam system, a rural community with agricultural and/or industrial focus, a tribal development, and/or another appropriate site. Funds provided in this subsection may not be expended or obligated prior to January 1, 2025. If Initiative Measure No. 2117 is approved in the general election, this subsection is null and void upon the effective date of the measure.(((39)))(36)(a) $500,000 of the climate commitment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for a grant to establish the Washington just and rapid transition climate tech program. The grant will provide funding for the recruitment, development, business training, and support of underserved climate technology innovators, entrepreneurs, and organizations developing or deploying solutions in the areas of renewable energy, energy efficiency, sustainable transportation, and other technology solving for the environmental challenges facing overburdened communities in Washington.(b) Activities may include supporting entrepreneurs in preparing for private investment; technical assistance for entrepreneurs receiving state directed federal equity and debt capital; assistance accessing or leveraging the use of federal funding; business coaching and mentoring; and connections to technical and business resources.(c) The grant recipient must be a nonprofit organization that has been awarded, from the state of Washington, federal state small business credit initiative funds for investment in Washington climate tech entrepreneurs, and must also have experience managing investment funding and providing entrepreneurial support programs and federal funding assistance to early-stage climate start-ups and businesses based in Washington. The grant recipient should have experience providing services to individuals and companies led by individuals from underrepresented groups, including BIPOC, women, and individuals residing in rural communities and have working partnerships with state research universities, climate tech industry associations, and community-based organizations serving underserved communities.(d) If Initiative Measure No. 2117 is approved in the 2024 general election, upon the effective date of the measure, funds from the consolidated climate account may not be used for the purposes in this subsection.(((40)))(37) $250,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for the department to provide a grant for a study on how other states regulate and permit agritourism and bring the advocates of interested groups together to resolve outstanding issues about permitting in agricultural areas, the sale of beer, wine, and cider, and the use of agricultural buildings for agritourism purposes. A report of the findings and recommendations must be submitted to the legislature in accordance with RCW 43.01.036 by June 30, 2025.(((41)))(38) $750,000 of the climate commitment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for a grant to the city of Ellensburg for decarbonization planning and implementation. The funding must be used by the city for staff or contractors to develop and implement strategies to comply with the requirements of climate commitment act and decarbonize their natural gas utility. Funds provided in this subsection may not be expended or obligated prior to January 1, 2025. If Initiative Measure No. 2117 is approved in the general election, this subsection is null and void upon the effective date of the measure.(((42)))(39) $199,000 of the climate commitment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 6039 (geothermal energy resources). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2024, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.)) Funds provided in this subsection may not be expended or obligated prior to January 1, 2025. ((If Initiative Measure No. 2117 is approved in the general election, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse upon the effective date of the measure.))(((43)))(40) $272,000 of the climate commitment accountâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Substitute House Bill No. 2131 (thermal energy networks). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2024, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.)) Funds provided in this subsection may not be expended or obligated prior to January 1, 2025. ((If Initiative Measure No. 2117 is approved in the general election, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse upon the effective date of the measure.(44)))(41) $1,850,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 1899 (wildfire reconstruction). Of the amount provided in this subsection, $1,700,000 is provided solely for grants. ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2024, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.(45)))(42)(a) $500,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for the department to contract with the Washington state academy of sciences to conduct a study to determine the value of distributed solar and storage in Washington state, including any factors the academy finds relevant, in order to create recommendations and options for a methodology or methodologies that utility regulators and governing bodies may use after the statutory four percent net metering threshold is met. In the course of their research and analysis, the academy shall engage relevant stakeholders focused on the value of distributed energy resources in Washington state, including solar, storage, vehicle to grid, and other resources. This shall include, but is not limited to, representatives from consumer-owned utilities, municipal-owned utilities, investor-owned utilities, utility regulators, the rooftop solar and storage industry, as well as advocacy organizations involved with consumer advocacy, environmental justice, clean energy, climate change, labor unions, and federally recognized Indian tribes.(b) The Washington state academy of sciences shall submit an interim report to the department and the utilities and transportation commission by June 30, 2025. This interim report must include a plan and cost estimates for further work in the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium to develop policy recommendations and submit a final report to the department and the utilities and transportation commission.(((46)))(43) $24,000 of the climate commitment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Substitute House Bill No. 1924 (fusion technology policies). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2024, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.)) Funds provided in this subsection may not be expended or obligated prior to January 1, 2025. ((If Initiative Measure No. 2117 is approved in the general election, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse upon the effective date of the measure.))Sec. 1119. 2024 c 376 s 131 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCEâPROGRAM SUPPORTGeneral FundâState Appropriation (FY 2024). . . .$24,818,000General FundâState Appropriation (FY 2025). . . .(($22,062,000))Â Â Â Â Â $21,462,000General FundâFederal Appropriation. . . .$8,035,000General FundâPrivate/Local Appropriation. . . .$2,129,000Dedicated Cannabis AccountâState Appropriation(FY 2024). . . .$5,000Dedicated Cannabis AccountâState Appropriation(FY 2025). . . .$7,000Affordable Housing for All AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$192,000Building Code Council AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$4,000Climate Commitment AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$253,000Community and Economic Development Fee AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$257,000Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery FundâFederalAppropriation. . . .$1,050,000Economic Development Strategic Reserve AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$47,000Energy Efficiency AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$19,000Financial Fraud and Identity Theft CrimesInvestigation and Prosecution AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$47,000Growth Management Planning and Environmental ReviewFundâState Appropriation. . . .$146,000Home Security Fund AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$1,449,000Lead Paint AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$31,000Liquor Excise Tax AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$397,000Liquor Revolving AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$18,000Low-Income Weatherization and StructuralRehabilitation Assistance AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$13,000Public Facilities Construction Loan RevolvingAccountâState Appropriation. . . .$330,000Public Works Assistance AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$2,044,000Washington Housing Trust AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$1,198,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($64,551,000))Â Â Â Â Â $63,951,000The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) $500,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $500,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for grants and associated technical assistance and administrative costs to foster collaborative partnerships that expand child care capacity in communities. Eligible applicants include nonprofit organizations, school districts, educational service districts, and local governments. These funds may be expended only after the approval of the director of the department of commerce and must be used to support planning and activities that help communities address the shortage of child care, prioritizing partnerships serving in whole or in part areas identified as child care access deserts. The department must submit a report to the legislature on the use of funds by June 30, 2025. The report shall include, but is not limited to:(a) The number and location of organizations, school districts, educational service districts, and local governments receiving grants;(b) The number of grants issued and their size; and(c) Any information from grantee organizations on outcomes.(2) $150,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $150,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for a grant to a nonprofit organization located in the city of Vancouver that is the lead organization in a collaborative partnership to expand child care capacity in southwest Washington, for activities that will increase access to affordable, high-quality child care and help meet community needs.(3) $50,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 is provided solely for the work group created in section 916 of this act to examine fire service delivery.(4)(a) $30,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 is provided solely for the department to produce a study of the retirement preparedness of Washington residents and the feasibility of establishing a portable individual retirement account savings program with automatic enrollment (auto-IRA) for private sector workers who do not have workplace retirement benefits. To conduct the study, the department shall enter into an agreement with a nonprofit, nonpartisan think tank and research center based in Washington, D.C. that is unaffiliated with any institution of higher education and with a mission to generate a foundation of facts that enriches the public dialog and supports sound decision making. This research center will be responsible for the production of the study to the department. The center shall not be reimbursed for costs nor shall it receive or retain any of the funds. With the advice and consent of the department, the center may select a research institution, entity, or individual located in Washington state with expertise and proficiency in demographic analysis, retirement systems, or retirement planning to collaborate with on this study. The appropriation may be used by the department to enter into a contract with this partner entity for the partner entity's contributions to the study. Any funds not provided to the partner entity or otherwise unused shall be returned.(b) The study must analyze current state and federal programs and recent state and federal statutory and rule changes that encourage citizens to save for retirement by participating in retirement savings plans, including plans pursuant to sections 401(k), 403(b), 408, 408(a), 408(k), 408(p), and 457(b) of the internal revenue code. The scope of the analysis must include:(i) An examination of potential retirement savings options for self-employed individuals, part-time employees, and full-time employees whose employers do not offer a retirement savings plan;(ii) Estimates of the impact on the state budget from shortfalls in retirement savings or income, including on public budgets from taxpayer-financed elderly assistance programs and a loss of economic activity by seniors;(iii) The level of interest by private sector Washington employers in participating in an auto-IRA program;(iv) A determination of how prepared financial institutions will be to offer these plans in compliance with federal requirements on all new retirement plans going into effect in 2025;(v) Findings that clarify the gaps in retirement savings services currently offered by financial institutions;(vi) An examination of the impact of retirement savings on income and wealth inequality;(vii) An estimate of the costs to start up an auto-IRA program, an estimate of the time for the program to reach self-sufficiency, and potential funding options;(viii) The experience of other states that have implemented or are implementing a similar auto-IRA program for employers and employees, as well as program impacts on the market for retirement plan products and services;(ix) An evaluation of the feasibility and benefits of interstate partnerships and cooperative agreements with similar auto-IRA programs established in other jurisdictions, including contracting with another state to use that state's auto-IRA program, partnering with one or more states to create a joint auto-IRA program, or forming a consortium with one or more other states in which certain aspects of each state's auto-IRA program are combined for administrative convenience and efficiency;(x) An assessment of potential changes in enrollment in a joint auto-IRA program if potential participants are concurrently enrolled in the federal "saver's credit" program;(xi) An assessment of how a range of individuals or communities view wealth, as well as ways to accumulate assets;(xii) The appropriate state agency and potential structure for implementing an auto-IRA program; and(xiii) Recommendations for statutory changes or appropriations for establishing an auto-IRA program.(c) By December 15, 2023, the department must submit a report to the appropriate committees of the legislature in compliance with RCW 43.01.036 on the study findings.(5) $750,000 of the coronavirus state fiscal recovery fundâfederal appropriation is provided solely for a nonprofit, tax-exempt charitable organization comprised of a coalition of over 90 nonprofit and business leaders located in King county working to include black, indigenous, and people of color in the region's COVID-19 pandemic recovery.(6) $253,000 of the climate commitment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the department to incorporate equity and environmental justice into agency grant programs with the goal of reducing programmatic barriers to vulnerable populations in overburdened communities in accessing department funds. The department shall prioritize grant programs receiving funds from the accounts established under RCW 70A.65.240, 70A.65.250, 70A.65.260, 70A.65.270, and 70A.65.280. If Initiative Measure No. 2117 is approved in the 2024 general election, upon the effective date of the measure, funds from the consolidated climate account may not be used for the purposes in this subsection.(7) (($325,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for the department to contract for and implement a pilot program for onsite or near-site child care facilities to serve children of construction workers. The pilot program must be administered as a competitive grant program and include at least one pilot site near a long-term construction project, onsite at construction companies, or onsite at places of apprenticeship training or worker dispatch. Eligible grant applicants for the program may include nonprofit organizations or employers in partnership with nonprofit organizations. To qualify for a grant, the applicant must be in partnership with one organization representing child care labor, and one organization representing construction labor or a registered apprenticeship program. Preference will be given to proposals that demonstrate commitment to providing nonstandard hours of care. Of the amounts provided in this subsection:(a) $300,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is for grants for the creation and implementation of the pilot site or sites. Grant funding may be used to acquire, renovate, or construct a child care facility, as well as for administrative start-up costs, licensing costs, reporting to the department, and creating a sustainability plan.(b)(i) $25,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for the department to contract with a nonprofit organization to provide technical assistance to grant awardees and for status reports to the department. The nonprofit organization must be headquartered in Tukwila and provide grassroots professional development opportunities to early care and education professionals throughout Washington state.(ii) The department must submit a report on the results of the pilot program to the legislature and the office of the governor by June 30, 2025.(8)))(a) $500,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for the department to examine allowable expenses and the contracting process of human service provider contracts that have been directly contracted by the department or have been contracted by an entity that received funding by these departments for human services. The department may contract with an external consultant to consult a work group and evaluate the following issues:(i) Assess if existing contracting structures for human service providers that utilize state funding are adequate for sustaining the human services sector;(ii) Assess alternative contracting structures for human service providers that may exist within the United States;(iii) Assess the viability of a lowest responsible bidder contracting structure for state human service providers contracts;(iv) Facilitate discussion amongst interested parties; and(v) Develop recommendations for necessary changes in state RCW or agency rule.(b) The department or consultant must engage with and seek recommendations from a work group representing diverse organizations from around the state and whose membership may include:(i) Human service provider organizations;(ii) State government agencies that manage human service contracts;(iii) The office of equity; and(iv) Local governments.(((d)))(c) The department must submit a final report to the governor and appropriate committees of the legislature by June 30, 2025. The final report must include:(i) An evaluation of existing contracting structures for human service provider contracts that utilize state funding are creating hardship for human service providers; and(ii) Recommendations for necessary changes in the Revised Code of Washington or agency rule to address structural hardships in human services contracting.Sec. 1120. 2024 c 376 s 133 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENTGeneral FundâState Appropriation (FY 2024). . . .$20,390,000General FundâState Appropriation (FY 2025). . . .(($24,967,000))Â Â Â Â Â $21,137,000General FundâFederal Appropriation. . . .$38,434,000General FundâPrivate/Local Appropriation. . . .$3,943,000Climate Investment AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$811,000Climate Commitment AccountâState Appropriation. . . .(($5,985,000))Â Â Â Â Â $4,485,000Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery FundâFederalAppropriation. . . .$656,000Personnel Service AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$27,396,000Higher Education Personnel Services AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$1,497,000Statewide 988 Behavioral Health Crisis Response LineAccountâState Appropriation. . . .$300,000Statewide Information Technology System DevelopmentRevolving AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$200,458,000Office of Financial Management Central ServiceAccountâState Appropriation. . . .$33,189,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($358,026,000))Â Â Â Â Â $352,696,000The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1)(a) The student achievement council and all institutions of higher education as defined in RCW 28B.92.030 and eligible for state financial aid programs under chapters 28B.92 and 28B.118 RCW shall ensure that data needed to analyze and evaluate the effectiveness of state financial aid programs are promptly transmitted to the education data center so that it is available and easily accessible. The data to be reported must include but not be limited to:(i) The number of Washington college grant and college bound recipients;(ii) Persistence and completion rates of Washington college grant recipients and college bound recipients, disaggregated by institution of higher education;(iii) Washington college grant recipients grade point averages; and(iv) Washington college grant and college bound scholarship program costs.(b) The student achievement council shall submit student unit record data for state financial aid program applicants and recipients to the education data center.(2)(a) $200,312,000 of the information technology system development revolving accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the one Washington enterprise resource planning statewide program phase 1A (agency financial reporting system replacement) and is subject to the conditions, limitations, and review requirements of section 701 of this act.(b) Of the amount provided in this subsection:(i) $64,780,000 of the information technology system development revolving accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for a technology pool to pay for phase 1A (agency financial reporting system replacementâcore financials) state agency costs due to legacy system remediation work associated with impacted financial systems and interfaces. The office of financial management must manage the pool, authorize funds, track costs by agency by fiscal month, and report after each fiscal month close on the agency spending to the consolidated technology services agency so that the spending is included in the statewide dashboard actual spending;(ii) $5,650,000 of the information technology system development revolving accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for organizational change management;(iii) $1,380,000 of the information technology system development revolving accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for an interagency agreement with consolidated technology services for one dedicated information technology consultant and two dedicated system architect staff to be contracted from the office of the chief information officer. These staff will work with state agencies to ensure preparation and timely decommission of information technology systems that will no longer be necessary post implementation of phase 1A (agency financial reporting system replacementâcore financials); and(iv) $1,854,000 of the information technology system development revolving accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for dedicated back office administrative support in fiscal year 2024. This includes resources for human resource staff, contract staff, information technology staff, and fiscal staff.(c) The one Washington team must include at least the chair and ranking member of the technology committees and fiscal committees of the senate and house of representatives in system demonstrations of at least these key deliverables:(i) Demonstration of integration build, which must be completed by July 31, 2023; and(ii) Demonstration of workday tenant, which must be completed by November 30, 2023.(d) The one Washington solution and team must use an agile development model holding live demonstrations of functioning software, developed using incremental user research, held at the end of two-week sprints.(e) The one Washington solution must be capable of being continually updated, as necessary.(f) Beginning July 1, 2023, the office of financial management shall provide written quarterly reports, within 30 calendar days of the end of each fiscal quarter, to legislative fiscal committees and the legislative evaluation and accountability program committee to include how funding was spent compared to the budget spending plan for the prior quarter by fiscal month and what the ensuing quarter budget will be by fiscal month. All reporting must be separated by phase of one Washington subprojects. The written report must also include:(i) A list of quantifiable deliverables accomplished and amount spent associated with each deliverable, by fiscal month;(ii) A report on the contract full-time equivalent charged compared to the budget spending plan by month for each contracted vendor, to include interagency agreements with other state agencies, and what the ensuing contract equivalent budget spending plan assumes by fiscal month;(iii) A report identifying each state agency that applied for and received technology pool resources, the staffing equivalent used, and the cost by fiscal month by agency compared to the budget spending plan by fiscal month;(iv) A report on budget spending plan by fiscal month by phase compared to actual spending by fiscal month, and the projected spending plan by fiscal month for the ensuing quarter; and(v) A report on current financial office performance metrics that at least 10 state agencies use, to include the monthly performance data, that began July 1, 2021.(g) Prior to the expenditure of the amounts provided in this subsection, the director of the office of financial management must review and approve the spending in writing.(h) The legislature intends to provide additional funding for fiscal year 2025 costs for phase 1A (agency financial reporting system replacement) to be completed, which is scheduled to be done by June 30, 2025.(3) $250,000 of the office of financial management central services accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for a dedicated information technology budget staff for the work associated with statewide information technology projects that at least are subject to the conditions, limitations, and review requirements of section 701 of this act and are under the oversight of the office of the chief information officer. The staff will be responsible for providing a monthly financial report after each fiscal month close to fiscal staff of the senate ways and means and house appropriations committees to reflect at least:(a) Fund balance of the information technology pool account after each fiscal month close;(b) Amount by information technology project, differentiated if in the technology pool or the agency budget, of what funding has been approved to date and for the last fiscal month;(c) Amount by agency of what funding has been approved to date and for the last fiscal month;(d) Total amount approved to date, differentiated if in the technology pool or the agency budget, and for the last fiscal month;(e) A projection for the information technology pool account by fiscal month through the 2023-2025 fiscal biennium close, and a calculation spent to date as a percentage of the total appropriation;(f) A projection of each information technology project spending compared to budget spending plan by fiscal month through the 2023-2025 fiscal biennium, and a calculation of amount spent to date as a percentage of total project cost; and(g) A list of agencies and projects that have not yet applied for nor been approved for funding by the office of financial management.(4) $250,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $250,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for implementation of chapter 245, Laws of 2022 (state boards, etc./stipends).(5) $39,000 of the climate investment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the office of financial management to complete an analysis of laws regulating greenhouse gas emissions as required by RCW 70A.65.200(10).(6) $3,060,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation and $4,485,000 of the climate commitment accountâstate appropriation are provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute House Bill No. 1176 (climate-ready communities). A minimum of 60 percent of climate service corps positions created pursuant to the bill shall be provided to members of vulnerable populations in overburdened communities as defined in RCW 70A.65.010, the climate commitment act.(7) $366,000 of the office of financial management central services accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5512 (higher ed. financial reports).(8) Within existing resources, the labor relations section shall produce a report annually on workforce data and trends for the previous fiscal year. At a minimum, the report must include a workforce profile; information on employee compensation, including salaries and cost of overtime; and information on retention, including average length of service and workforce turnover.(9) $298,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 is provided solely for the office of financial management to convene a task force created in section 913 of this act to identify, plan, and make recommendations on the conversion of the Naselle youth camp property and facilities to an alternate use. Staff support for the task force must be provided by the office of financial management.(10) Within existing resources, the office of financial management shall convene a work group with the goal to improve the state salary survey and provide employees with a voice in the process. The work group shall consist of five employees from the office of financial management, five representatives from employee labor organizations to act as a coalition on behalf of all labor organizations representing state employees, and one chairperson appointed by the director of the office of financial management, to share information and identify concerns with the state salary survey and benchmark job descriptions. By December 31, 2023, the work group shall provide a report of identified concerns to the fiscal and state government committees of the legislature and the director of the office of financial management.(11)(a) $410,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $615,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the office to establish a difficult to discharge task force to oversee a pilot program and make recommendations about how to address challenges faced with discharging patients from acute care settings and postacute care capacity by July 1, 2023.(b) The task force shall consist of six members, one from each of the following:(i) The governor's office;(ii) The health care authority;(iii) The department of social and health services;(iv) The Washington state hospital association;(v) Harborview medical center; and(vi) Postacute care provider organizations.(c) In consultation with stakeholder groups, the governor's office will identify task force members.(d) The task force shall provide recommendations to the governor and appropriate committees of the legislature on topics including, but not limited to:(i) Pilot program implementation and evaluation, and recommendations for statewide implementation;(ii) Available funding mechanisms;(iii) Postacute care and administrative day rates;(iv) Managed care contracting; and(v) Legal, regulatory, and administrative barriers to discharge.(e) The task force shall consult with stakeholders with relevant expertise to inform recommendations, including the health care authority, the department of social and health services, hospitals, postacute care providers, and medicaid managed care organizations.(f) The task force may assemble ad hoc subgroups of stakeholders as necessary to complete its work.(g) The task force and its operations, including any associated ad hoc subgroups, shall be organized and facilitated by the University of Washington through October 31, 2023. Beginning November 1, 2023, the office shall identify a contractor to undertake the following responsibilities, with oversight from the task force:(i) Organization and facilitation of the task force, including any associated subgroups;(ii) Management of task force process to ensure deliverables, including report writing;(iii) Oversight of the launch of a two-year pilot project based on a model created by Harborview medical center by November 1, 2023; and(iv) Coordination of pilot implementation, associated reports, and deliverables.(h) The task force shall provide recommendations to the governor and appropriate committees of the legislature outlining its initial recommendations by November 1, 2023. A report outlining interim recommendations and findings shall be provided by July 1, 2024, and a final report shall be provided by July 1, 2025.(12) $277,000 of the office of financial management central services accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of House Bill No. 1679 (student homelessness group).(13) $772,000 of the climate investment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the office to develop a data portal and other materials and strategies to improve public and community understanding of expenditures, funding opportunities, and grants, from climate commitment act accounts. The development of the data portal must be coordinated with the department of ecology and the expenditure tracking process described in section 302(13) of this act. "Climate commitment act accounts" means the carbon emissions reduction account created in RCW 70A.65.240, the climate commitment account created in RCW 70A.65.260, the natural climate solutions account created in RCW 70A.65.270, the climate investment account created in RCW 70A.65.250, the air quality and health disparities improvement account created in RCW 70A.65.280, the climate transit programs account created in RCW 46.68.500, and the climate active transportation account created in RCW 46.68.490.(14)(a) $250,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $250,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for a joint legislative and executive committee on behavioral health, with members as provided in this subsection:(i) The president of the senate shall appoint three legislative members, including a chair of a senate committee that includes behavioral health within its jurisdiction and a member of the children and youth behavioral health work group;(ii) The speaker of the house of representatives shall appoint three legislative members, including a chair of a house committee that includes behavioral health within its jurisdiction and a member of the children and youth behavioral health work group;(iii) The governor or his or her designee;(iv) The secretary of the department of social and health services or his or her designee;(v) The director of the health care authority or his or her designee;(vi) The insurance commissioner or his or her designee;(vii) The secretary of the department of health or his or her designee; and(viii) The secretary of the department of children, youth, and families or his or her designee;(ix) Other agency directors or designees as necessary;(x) Two individuals representing the interests of individuals living with behavioral health conditions; and(xi) The chief executive officer of a Washington nonprofit corporation wholly controlled by the tribes and urban Indian organizations in the state, or the commission delegate if applicable, or his or her designee.(b)(i) The committee must convene by September 1, 2023, and shall meet at least quarterly. The committee member described in (a)(xi) of this subsection must be appointed or selected no later than June 1, 2024. Cochairs shall be one legislative member selected by members of the committee at the first meeting and the representative of the governor's office. All meetings are open to the public.(ii) The office of financial management shall contract or hire dedicated staff to facilitate and provide staff support to the nonlegislative members and for facilitation and project management support of the committee. Senate committee services and the house of representatives office of program research shall provide staff support to the legislative members of the committee. The contractor shall support the work of all members of the committee, legislative and nonlegislative.(iii) Within existing appropriations, the cost of meetings must be paid jointly by the senate, house of representatives, and the office of financial management. Committee expenditures are subject to approval by the senate facilities and operations committee and the house of representatives executive rules committee, or their successor committees. Committee members may be reimbursed for travel expenses as authorized under RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060, and chapter 44.04 RCW as appropriate.(c) The purpose of the committee is to identify key strategic actions to improve access to behavioral health services, by conducting at least, but not limited to, the following tasks:(i) Establishing a profile of Washington's current population and its behavioral health needs and a projection of population growth and anticipated need through 2028;(ii) Establishing an inventory of existing and anticipated behavioral health services and supports for adults, children, and youth, including health care providers and facilities;(iii) Assessing the areas of the current system where additional support is needed for Washington's current population;(iv) Establishing an anticipated inventory of future services and supports that will be required to meet the behavioral health needs of the population in 2028 and beyond with a specific emphasis on prevention, early intervention, and home or community-based capacity designed to reduce reliance on emergency, criminal legal, crisis, and involuntary services;(v) Reviewing the integrated care initiative on access to timely and appropriate behavioral health services for individuals with acute behavioral health needs; and(vi)(A) Developing a strategy of actions that the state may take to prepare for the future demographic trends in the population and building the necessary capacity to meet these demands, including but not limited to:(I) Exploring the role that education, housing and homelessness response systems, the criminal legal system, primary health care, and insurance systems have in the identification and treatment of behavioral health issues;(II) Evaluating behavioral health workforce demand and workforce education, training, and continuing education requirements; and(III) Statutory and regulatory changes to promote the most efficient use of resources, such as simplifying administrative procedures, facilitating access to services and supports systems, and improving transitions between care settings.(B) Strategies must:(I) Be based on explicit and measurable actions;(II) Identify what must be done, by whom, and by when to assure implementation;(III) Estimate a cost to the party responsible for implementation;(IV) Recommend specific fiscal strategies that rely predominately on state and federal funding;(V) Include recommendations for needed and appropriate additional caseload forecasting for state-funded behavioral health services; and(VI) Incorporate and reconcile, where necessary, recommendations from past and current behavioral health work groups created by the legislature and network adequacy standards established by the health care authority.(d) The committee shall incorporate input from the office of the insurance commissioner, the caseload forecast council, the health care authority, and other appropriate entities with specialized knowledge of the needs and growth trends of the population and people with behavioral health issues. In the conduct of its business, the committee shall have access, upon request, to health-related data available to state agencies by statute, as allowed by state and federal law. All requested data or other relevant information maintained by an agency shall be provided in a timely manner.(e) The committee shall submit a sustainable five-year plan to substantially improve access to behavioral health for all Washington residents to the governor, the office of financial management, and the legislature by June 1, 2025.(15) The office of financial management must report to and coordinate with the department of ecology to track expenditures from climate commitment act accounts, as defined and described in RCW 70A.65.300 and section 302(13) of this act.(16) $300,000 of the statewide 988 behavioral health crisis response and suicide prevention line accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 1134 (988 system).(17) $50,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for the purchase and distribution of accessible technology and devices to support the employment and reasonable accommodation for state employees with disabilities. The office may use funds to purchase accessible technology and devices or the office may provide funds to agencies that employ persons with a disability to purchase accessibility devices such as screen readers, large button/print equipment, magnifiers, accessibility software, and other equipment.(18)(a) $274,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for the office of financial management to conduct an analysis of health care services for pregnancy-related health care, including preconception, prenatal, labor and delivery, and postpartum care. With regard to these types of services, the analysis shall include, but not be limited to:(i) Access to services and disparities in access;(ii) Cost;(iii) Location and type of provider; and(iv) Demographics of patients and providers.(b) The office of financial management shall submit a report to the governor and the appropriate committees of the legislature by June 30, 2025. The report shall include the analysis in (a) of this subsection and must identify and represent the following information in both table and geographical map view:(i) Community and hospital birth centers by name, city, and county;(ii) Annual births by geographical location to include community and hospital birth center, if known;(iii) Greatest gaps in service using data in this subsection.(c) The report required in (b) of this subsection must also include any recommendations for how to fill the gaps in service identified in the data and any recommendations for future analysis.(19) $298,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for the office of financial management to convene a task force created in section 905 of this act to identify, plan, and make recommendations on the future use of the Larch corrections center property and facilities to an alternate use. Staff support for the task force must be provided by the office of financial management.(20)(a) $20,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and (($120,000))$140,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the office to contract with a third party to complete market research on incarcerated individual communication rates in the United States. The market research must include:(i) Detail by state on the amount each state pays to the vendor contracted to provide communication service rates and rate structures for incarcerated individuals at discrete points of time to include, at least, January 1, 2024, January 1, 2020, and January 1, 2015 for, at least but not limited to:(A) Voice communication;(B) Video communication;(C) Email communication; and(D) Text messaging communication;(ii) The amount families paid in total for a state's contracted telecom vendor each state fiscal year for at least fiscal years 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, and 2023;(iii) Comparative market research analysis on rate structures over time, how those rates compare to the telecommunication fees over the same time, and how the market is anticipated to change by calendar year from calendar year 2024 through calendar year 2030;(iv) Analysis on how many states provide at least voice communication services or any other communication services free of charge to the person initiating and the person receiving the communication and what calendar date that began; and(v) Comparative analysis of any impacted rate structures, and at least those in (a)(i) of this subsection, before communication services are made free of charge to the person initiating and the person receiving the communication compared to the new negotiated rate structures, and at least those in (a)(i) of this subsection, after communication services are made free of charge to the person initiating and the person receiving the communication.(b) The report must be submitted to the governor and the appropriate policy and fiscal committees of the legislature by December 31, 2024.(21) (($200,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for the office of financial management to evaluate the timeline and effectiveness of services supporting agency requests to downsize, acquire, expand, or relocate state facilities. The office, in collaboration with the department of enterprise services, will contract with an independent entity for the analysis and mapping of service delivery workflow and timeline, with the goal of identifying gaps and opportunities to improve efficiency by June 30, 2025. The contract is exempt from the competitive procurement requirements in chapter 39.26 RCW. The report must be submitted to the governor and the appropriate policy and fiscal committees of the legislature by June 30, 2025.(23)))(a) $140,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $210,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the office, in coordination with the department of revenue, to conduct a study of costs to the state, whether actual spending or foregone revenue collections, related to nonprofit health care providers, facilities, and insurers.(b) The study shall quantify the value of state and federal tax preferences, tax-preferred capital financing such as financing available through the Washington health care facilities authority, and other public reimbursement streams available to nonprofit health care providers, facilities, and insurers outside of payment for health care claims.(c) The office must submit a report to the governor and the relevant policy and fiscal committees of the legislature by October 1, 2024.(((24)))(22)(a) $350,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $900,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the office of financial management to conduct a study of the future long-term uses of the Olympic heritage behavioral health campus. The study must assess the options for maximizing the facility's ability to receive federal matching funds for services provided while contributing to the health of the entire state behavioral health system based on community needs. The study must examine Washington behavioral health system trends, including demand and capacity for voluntary and involuntary behavioral health in-patient treatment, forecasted bed need and current and planned statewide capacity for civil and forensic state hospital populations, short-term civil commitment capacity trends, and trends in prosecutorial forensic referrals. The study must also consider area provider admittance and refusal rates. The study must include:(i) An analysis on the types of services which could be provided at the property, including but not limited to:(A) Voluntary behavioral health treatment services, including diversion, prediversion, and specialty services for people with co-occurring conditions including substance use disorders, intellectual or developmental disabilities, traumatic brain disorders, or dementia;(B) Services for patients that are deemed not guilty by reason of insanity;(C) Integrated service approaches that address medical, housing, vocational, and other needs of behaviorally disabled individuals with criminal legal involvement or likelihood of criminal legal involvement;(D) Long-term involuntary treatment services for specialized populations such as those with developmental disabilities or dementia;(E) Short-term involuntary treatment services;(F) Long-term involuntary treatment services for civil conversion patients;(G) Out-patient intensive behavioral health treatment including partial hospitalization and intensive outpatient care;(H) Crisis response services; and(I) Other services that will increase the state's ability to comply with requirements for providing timely admission of competency restoration patients into treatment beds;(ii) Review of potential for additional capacity or services on the entirety of the property, including any capital improvements needed to expand services under the options described in (a)(i) of this subsection;(iii) Identification and evaluation of strategies to obtain federal matching funding opportunities, specifically focusing on innovative medicaid framework adjustments and the consideration of necessary state plan amendments;(iv) Estimated costs, required staffing and workforce availability for each of the recommended types of services if available; and(v) Consideration of options for providers that can provide the different services recommended at the facility and an analysis on the cost differential and potential federal reimbursement for the different providers. The office of financial management may consider a variety of provider types or partners, including, but not limited to:(A) Tribal or local governments;(B) Acute care hospitals already providing similar care;(C) Providers contracted by the health care authority; and(D) State-operated options.(b) The office of financial management shall consult with the University of Washington school of medicine, the health care authority, and the department of social and health services in developing and conducting the study.(c) The office of financial management shall submit a report with its findings and recommendations to the governor and the appropriate policy and fiscal committees of the legislature by June 30, 2025.(d) The office of financial management may contract with one or more third parties and consult with other state entities to conduct the study. The contract is exempt from the competitive procurement requirements in chapter 39.26 RCW.(((25)))(23)(a) $400,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for the office to contract with a consultant to collect, review, and analyze data related to vehicular pursuits and to compile a report. The report must include recommendations to the legislature on what data should be collected by law enforcement agencies throughout the state so that the legislature and other policymakers have consistent and uniform information necessary to evaluate policies on vehicular pursuits. The contractor must gather input from individuals and families with lived experience interacting with law enforcement, including Black, indigenous, and communities of color, and incorporate this information into the report and recommendations. The report must:(i) Review available data on vehicular pursuits from those agencies accredited by the Washington association of sheriffs and police chiefs, and review a stratified sample of nonaccredited agencies for as many years as their data have been collected, including:(A) The date, time, location, maximum speed, and duration of the incident;(B) The reason for initiating a pursuit;(C) Whether the pursuing officer sought authorization for the pursuit, or only gave notice of the pursuit, and whether authorization for the pursuit was granted;(D) Whether a supervisor denied authorization for the pursuit and the reason for the denial;(E) The number of vehicles and officers involved in the pursuit;(F) The number of law enforcement agencies involved in the pursuit;(G) Whether pursuit intervention techniques were employed, and if so, which ones;(H) Whether the pursuit was terminated at any point, and if so, the reason for termination;(I) The officer's perception of the age, gender, race, ethnicity, or applicable tribal affiliation of the driver and any passengers of the motor vehicle being pursued;(J) Whether the pursuit resulted in no action, termination, apprehension, warning, citation, arrest and grounds for the arrest, or other action;(K) Whether the pursuit resulted in any property damage, injury, or death, and to whom and what, including law enforcement, drivers, passengers, and bystanders;(L) Copies of reports, annual or other frequencies, used for internal review of pursuit statistics; and(M) Whether the law enforcement agency has a record-keeping system for pursuits, and if so, what that system is, how long it has been in place, and whether the system and the data collected has changed over time;(ii) Provide recommendations on what data elements law enforcement agencies should collect, in relation to the list identified in (a)(i) of this subsection, and provide rationale for the recommendations;(iii) Develop a protocol for data collection by law enforcement agencies and provide a statement regarding the use of such data and the purpose for its collection and analysis;(iv) Make the data readily available to the public using standard open data protocols;(v) Recommend an entity to collect and manage this data on a statewide basis;(vi) Review existing statewide police data reporting systems, including:(A) The national incident based reporting system program, which is for the federal uniform crime reporting program;(B) The Washington technology solutions police traffic collision reporting system, which is used for both state systems and the federal fatality analysis reporting system; and(C) The statewide use of force data program established in RCW 10.118.030;(vii) Assess the benefits and drawbacks of each of the existing systems in (a)(vi) of this subsection as a possible platform for collecting, reporting, and hosting pursuit open source downloadable data from agencies, and recommend whether any of these, or another system, would be most appropriate; and(viii) Recommend any changes in state law to accomplish and facilitate the collection and analysis of the data, including whether to align or integrate the data collection with the use of force data under chapter 10.118 RCW.(b) The report and recommendations are due to the governor and the appropriate committees of the legislature by June 30, 2025.(((26) $500,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 and $1,500,000 of the climate commitment accountâstate appropriation are provided solely for the office to build a grant writing, tracking, and management database for state acquisition of federal funds, and to support development of state strategies for successfully bringing specific types of federal funding to Washington. If Initiative Measure No. 2117 is approved in the 2024 general election, upon the effective date of the measure, funds from the consolidated climate account may not be used for the purposes of this subsection.(27)))(24)(a) $250,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for the office of financial management to provide recommendations on the method and format for studying a transition to a department of housing. In developing the recommendations, previous efforts to establish new entities or programs should be considered, such as the office of equity task force, the social equity in cannabis task force, the blue ribbon commission on delivery of services to children and families, and methods used by other jurisdictions.(b) The recommendations must include:(i) Which entity should lead the study, such as an agency, a contractor, or a task force;(ii) Which entities should consult and collaborate on the study, such as legislators, agencies, nonprofit organizations, businesses, and local jurisdictions;(iii) Which programs across state agencies should be considered by the study for possible incorporation into a department of housing;(iv) What housing types and financing structures should be identified and considered by the study;(v) What gaps and barriers to establishing a department of housing should be identified and considered by the study; and(vi) An estimate of the costs and possible timeline for the recommended method and format of the study.(c) The recommendations are due to the governor and the appropriate policy and fiscal committees of the legislature by December 1, 2024.(25) The general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 in this section reflects a reduction in funding for, but not limited to, contract costs to evaluate the timeline and effectiveness of services supporting agency requests to downsize, acquire, expand, or relocate state facilities, programmatic costs for the AmeriCorps equity fund, and general vacancies across the agency.Sec. 1121. 2024 c 376 s 138 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF RETIREMENT SYSTEMSâOPERATIONSGeneral FundâState Appropriation (FY 2024). . . .$387,000Department of Retirement Systems Expense AccountâState Appropriation. . . .(($117,209,000))Â Â Â Â Â $117,246,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($117,596,000))Â Â Â Â Â $117,633,000The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) $34,491,000 of the department of retirement systems expense accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for pension system modernization, and is subject to the conditions, limitations, and review requirements of section 701 of this act.(2) $143,000 of the department of retirement systems expense accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Substitute House Bill No. 1007 (military service credits).(3) $1,172,000 of the department of retirement systems expense accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5538 (postretirement nursing).(4) $1,058,000 of the department of retirement systems expense accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Substitute House Bill No. 1056 (postretirement employment).(5) $199,000 of the department of retirement systems expense accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of House Bill No. 1055 (public safety telecommunicators).(6) $536,000 of the department of retirement systems expense accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of House Bill No. 1481 (tribal peace officers/LEOFF).(7) $116,000 of the department of retirement systems expense accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 6106 (DSHS workers/PSERS). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2024, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.))(8) $265,000 of the department of retirement systems expense accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 6197 (LEOFF plan 2 provisions). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2024, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.))(9) $36,000 of the department of retirement systems expense accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute House Bill No. 2014 (definition of a veteran). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2024, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.))(10) $99,000 of the department of retirement systems expense accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5424 (flexible work/peace officers). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2024, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.))(11) $37,000 of the department of retirement systems expense accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of House Bill No. 1936 (retired employees/work). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2025, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.Sec. 1122. 2024 c 376 s 139 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF REVENUEGeneral FundâState Appropriation (FY 2024). . . .$358,141,000General FundâState Appropriation (FY 2025). . . .(($398,865,000))Â Â Â Â Â $422,085,000Climate Commitment AccountâState Appropriation. . . .(($895,000))Â Â Â Â Â $565,000Timber Tax Distribution AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$8,136,000Business License AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$19,886,000Waste Reduction, Recycling, and Litter ControlAccountâState Appropriation. . . .$183,000Model Toxics Control Operating AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$127,000Financial Services Regulation ((Account))Nonappropriated FundâState Appropriation. . . .$5,000,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($791,233,000))Â Â Â Â Â $814,123,000The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) $1,669,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $1,661,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the implementation of chapter 196, Laws of 2021 (capital gains tax).(2) $181,639,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and (($221,768,000))$245,768,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for implementation of chapter 195, Laws of 2021 (working families tax exempt.). Of the total amounts provided in this subsection:(a) $16,639,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $15,768,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for administration of the working families tax exemption program; and(b) $165,000,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and (($206,000,000))$230,000,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for remittances under the working families tax exemption program.(3) $2,408,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $780,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and (($895,000))$565,000 of the climate commitment accountâstate appropriation are provided solely for the department to implement 2023 revenue legislation.(4) $250,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 is provided solely for the department to develop an implementation plan for an online searchable database of all taxes and tax rates in the state for each taxing district. A report summarizing options, estimated costs, and timelines to implement each option must be submitted to the appropriate committees of the legislature by June 30, 2024. The implementation plan must include an array of options, including low cost options that may change the scope of the database. However, each low cost option must still provide ease of public access to state and local tax information that is currently difficult for the public to collect and efficiently navigate.(5) $19,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 is provided solely for implementation of House Bill No. 1303 (property tax administration).(6) $3,639,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $3,582,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute House Bill No. 1477 (working families' tax credit).(7) $48,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Substitute House Bill No. 1175 (petroleum storage tanks).(8) $31,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 is provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5565 (tax and revenue laws).(9)(a) $150,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $150,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the department to research and analyze wealth taxes imposed in other countries and wealth tax legislation recently proposed by other states and the United States. At a minimum, the department must examine how existing and proposed wealth taxes are structured, compliance and administrative challenges of wealth taxes, best practices in the design and administration of wealth taxes, and potential data sources to aid the department in estimating the revenue impacts of future wealth tax proposals for this state or assisting the department in the administration of a wealth tax. As part of its examination and analysis, the department must seek to consult with relevant subject matter experts from within and outside of the United States.(b) The department may contract with one or more institutions of higher education as defined in RCW 28B.10.016 for assistance in carrying out its obligations under this subsection.(c) The department must submit a status report to the appropriate fiscal committees of the legislature by January 1, 2024, and a final report to the appropriate fiscal committees of the legislature by November 1, 2024. The final report must include the department's findings.(10) $42,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 is provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5448 (delivery of alcohol).(11) $100,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for the department to study how to collect race and ethnicity information from organizations or entities that receive tax preferences, as defined in RCW 43.136.021.(a) The department may contract with third parties and consult with other state entities to conduct all or any portion of the study.(b) The department must submit a report to appropriate committees of the legislature by June 30, 2025. The report must include cost and timeline estimates for collecting the race and ethnicity information. The department must consult with the office of equity to ensure that data collection is consistent with other efforts. The report must also include, but is not limited to, the following information:(i) The cost and time required for the department to revise current reporting requirements to include race and ethnicity data;(ii) The cost and time required for the department to incorporate the collection of race and ethnicity data into future reporting;(iii) The cost and time required for the department to incorporate the collection of race and ethnicity data into its existing information technology systems;(iv) Recommendations on any exclusions from the requirement to report race and ethnicity data; and(v) Any statutory changes necessary to collect race and ethnicity data.(12) (($181,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely to support the underground economy task force created in section 906 of this act.(13))) $274,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $217,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the department to implement 2024 revenue legislation.(((14)))(13) $4,000 of the business license accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5897 (business license services). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2024, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.(15)))(14)(a) $200,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for the department to conduct a study and provide a report to the legislature on royalty receipts apportionment for local business taxes throughout the state. The study must:(i) Examine how gross income derived as royalties from the granting of intangible rights in RCW 35.102.130 could be apportioned uniformly by local jurisdictions. The department must consider apportionment options described in RCW 82.04.462(3)(b) (i) through (vii) as well as other options; and(ii) Identify issues surrounding the definition of "customer" as applied to royalties and payments made or received for the use of the taxpayer's intangible property in RCW 35.102.130, and how it could be brought into conformity with the definition in RCW 82.04.462(3)(b)(viii) and applied uniformly throughout the state.(b) The study must document and evaluate the approaches to apportionment of royalties that have been adopted in other states and examine the administrative feasibility of applying interstate apportionment methodologies to local business taxes. The department must submit a report on the study and any findings and recommendations to the governor and the appropriate policy and fiscal committees of the legislature by December 31, 2024.(((16)))(15) $1,000,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for the department to conduct outreach activities for the working families' tax credit established in RCW 82.08.0206, including but not limited to grants for community-based organizations to conduct outreach activities, marketing activities, and establishing a mobile unit.Sec. 1123. 2024 c 376 s 141 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE OFFICE OF MINORITY AND WOMEN'S BUSINESS ENTERPRISESGeneral FundâState Appropriation (FY 2024). . . .$3,837,000General FundâState Appropriation (FY 2025). . . .(($6,382,000))Â Â Â Â Â $4,882,000Minority and Women's Business Enterprises AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$6,113,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($16,332,000))Â Â Â Â Â $14,832,000The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) The office of minority and women's business enterprises shall consult with the Washington state office of equity on the Washington state toolkit for equity in public spending.(2) $540,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $529,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5268 (public works procurement).(3) $151,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $151,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for a policy analyst position.(4) $941,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $900,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the office to expand its outreach and communications department.Sec. 1124. 2024 c 376 s 142 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE INSURANCE COMMISSIONERGeneral FundâFederal Appropriation. . . .(($4,723,000))Â Â Â Â Â $5,736,000Insurance Commissioner's Regulatory AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$82,830,000Insurance Commissioner's Fraud AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$4,284,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($91,837,000))Â Â Â Â Â $92,850,000The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) $52,000 of the insurance commissioner's regulatory accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Senate Bill No. 5242 (abortion cost sharing).(2) $63,000 of the insurance commissioner's regulatory accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of House Bill No. 1120 (annuity transactions).(3) $72,000 of the insurance commissioner's regulatory accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Senate Bill No. 5036 (audio-only telemedicine).(4) $55,000 of the insurance commissioner's regulatory accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5300 (behavioral health continuity).(5) $19,000 of the insurance commissioner's regulatory accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5189 (behavioral health support).(6) $52,000 of the insurance commissioner's regulatory accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5396 (breast exam cost sharing).(7) $260,000 of the insurance commissioner's regulatory accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of chapter 87, Laws of 2023 (SSB 5338).(8) $1,206,000 of the insurance commissioner's regulatory accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Senate Bill No. 5066 (health care benefit managers).(9) $9,000 of the insurance commissioner's regulatory accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of chapter 16, Laws of 2023 (SSB 5729).(10) $272,000 of the insurance commissioner's regulatory accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5581 (maternal support services).(11) $237,000 of the insurance commissioner's regulatory accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of chapter 42, Laws of 2023 (SB 5319).(12) $25,000 of the insurance commissioner's regulatory accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5720 (risk mitigation).(13)(a) $700,000 of the insurance commissioner's regulatory accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the commissioner, in collaboration with the office of the attorney general, to study approaches to improve health care affordability including, but not limited to:(i) Health provider price or rate regulation policies or programs, other than traditional health plan rate review, in use or under consideration in other states to increase affordability for health insurance purchasers and enrollees. At a minimum, this shall include:(A) Analysis of payment rate or payment rate increase caps and reference pricing strategies;(B) Analysis of research or other findings related to the outcomes of the policy or program, including experience in other states;(C) A preliminary analysis of the regulatory authority and administrative capacity necessary to implement each policy or program reviewed in Washington state;(D) Analysis of such approaches used in Washington state, including but not limited to the operation of the hospital commission, formerly established under chapter 70.39 RCW; and(E) A feasibility analysis of implementing a global hospital budget strategy in one or more counties or regions in Washington state, including potential impacts on spending and access to health care services if such a strategy were adopted;(ii) Regulatory approaches in use or under consideration by other states to address any anticompetitive impacts of horizontal consolidation and vertical integration in the health care marketplace to supplement federal antitrust law. At a minimum, this regulatory review shall include:(A) Analysis of research, case law, or other findings related to the outcomes of the state's activities to encourage competition, including implementation experience;(B) A preliminary analysis of regulatory authority and administrative capacity necessary to implement each policy or program reviewed in Washington state; and(C) Analysis of recent health care consolidation and vertical consolidation activity in Washington state, to the extent information is available;(iii) Recommended actions based on other state approaches and Washington data, if any; and(iv) Additional related areas of data or study needed, if any.(b) The office of the insurance commissioner or office of the attorney general may contract with third parties and consult with other state entities to conduct all or any portion of the study.(c) The office of the insurance commissioner and office of the attorney general shall submit a preliminary report to the relevant policy and fiscal committees of the legislature by December 1, 2023, and a final report by August 1, 2024.(14) $190,000 of the insurance commissioner's regulatory accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of chapter 27, Laws of 2023 (SHB 1266).(15) $66,000 of the insurance commissioner's regulatory accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Substitute House Bill No. 1222 (hearing instruments coverage).(16) $25,000 of the insurance commissioner's regulatory accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of chapter 21, Laws of 2023 (HB 1061).(17) $14,000 of the insurance commissioner's regulatory accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Substitute House Bill No. 1060 (mutual insurer reorg.).(18) $132,000 of the insurance commissioner's regulatory accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 1357 (prior authorization).(19)(a) $50,000 of the insurance commissioner's regulatory accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for an analysis of how health plans define, cover, and reimburse for maternity care services, including prenatal, delivery, and postpartum care. The commissioner shall:(i) Obtain necessary information regarding health plans offered by carriers with more than one percent accident and health market share based upon the commissioner's most recent annual market information report and health plans offered to public employees under chapter 41.05 RCW to evaluate:(A) How health plan benefit designs define maternity care services;(B) Whether and to what extent maternity care services are subject to deductibles and other cost-sharing requirements;(C) Which maternity care services are considered preventive services under section 2713 of the federal public health service act and are therefore exempt from cost sharing;(D) The five most used maternity care reimbursement methodologies used by each carrier; and(E) With respect to reimbursement methodologies that bundle payment for maternity care services, which specific services are included in the bundled payment;(ii) Estimate the total and per member per month impact on health plan rates of eliminating cost sharing for maternity care services in full, or for prenatal care only, for the following markets:(A) Individual health plans other than Cascade select plans;(B) Cascade select health plans;(C) Small group health plans;(D) Large group health plans;(E) Health plans offered to public employees under chapter 41.05 RCW; and(F) All health plans in the aggregate; and(iii) Submit a report on the findings and cost estimate to the appropriate committees of the legislature by July 1, 2024.(b) The commissioner may contract for all or a portion of the analysis required in this subsection.(20) $86,000 of the insurance commissioner's regulatory accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Senate Bill No. 5821 (audio-only telemedicine). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2024, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.))(21) $549,000 of the insurance commissioner's regulatory accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5986 (out-of-network health costs). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2024, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.))(22) $228,000 of the insurance commissioner's regulatory accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5936 (palliative care work group). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2024, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.))(23) $195,000 of the insurance commissioner's regulatory accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 6228 (substance use treatment). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2024, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.))(24) $175,000 of the insurance commissioner's regulatory accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5213 (health care benefit managers). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2024, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.))(25) $12,000 of the insurance commissioner's regulatory accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 6127 (HIV prophylaxis). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2024, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.))(26) $578,000 of the insurance commissioner's regulatory accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the commissioner to continue its work on behavioral health parity compliance, enforcement, and provider network oversight. The commissioner may use internal staff and contracted experts to oversee provider directories and evaluate consumer access to services for mental health and substance use disorders in state-regulated individual, small group, and large group health plans.(27)(a) $250,000 of the insurance commissioner's regulatory accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the commissioner, in consultation with the department of social and health services and the health care authority, to submit to the relevant policy and fiscal committees of the legislature by June 30, 2025, a feasibility analysis of expanding or modifying the program described in section 204(48) of this act to include additional groups of essential workers whose employers receive significant public funding to provide direct services to vulnerable populations, including but not limited to behavioral health services, housing and homelessness services, and child care workers. The evaluation must consider:(i) Current sources, benefits, and costs of health care coverage for these essential workers including but not limited to employer-sponsored coverage, medicaid, and individual health plans purchased through the health benefit exchange;(ii) Policy options to increase health care benefit funding to employers of these essential workers, including maximizing nongeneral fund state sources while ensuring costs are not shifted to employees;(iii) The appropriate structure and oversight of the newly established health benefits fund, including the use of fully insured health coverage, a self-funded multiemployer welfare arrangement, the health benefit exchange, or another entity to offer health benefits comparable to the platinum metal level under the affordable care act, and meet defined plan design, consumer protection, and solvency requirements.(b) The commissioner must consult with interested organizations and may establish subgroups to conduct this work based on distinct industries of different essential workers.(c) The commissioner may contract with third parties and consult with other state entities to conduct all or any portion of the study, including actuarial analysis.(28)(a) $400,000 of the insurance commissioner's regulatory accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the commissioner to convene and chair an adult family home liability insurance work group. The work group shall consist of members with a representative from, but not limited to:(i) The office of the attorney general;(ii) The office of the governor;(iii) The adult family home industry;(iv) The Washington state long-term care ombudsman;(v) The department of social and health services' aging and long-term support administration's residential care services;(((v)))(vi) The department of social and health services' aging and long-term support administration's home and community services;(((vi)))(vii) The department of social and health service's aging and long-term support administration's developmental disability administration;(((vii)))(viii) Insurance producers;(((viii)))(ix) Insurance underwriters;(((ix)))(x) The Washington surplus line association;(((x)))(xi) Risk retention groups; and(((xi)))(xii) Other state agency representatives or stakeholder group representatives, as deemed necessary.(b) The work group shall:(i) Review the availability and cost of liability insurance for adult family homes;(ii) Identify obstacles to adult family homes access to liability insurance including underwriting restrictions, market conditions, as well as legal and regulatory requirements;(iii) Evaluate the financial risk to adult family homes, their residents, the state medicaid program, and others that exist as a result of the increased cost of insurance, or in the event adult family homes are uninsured due to a lack of access to coverage; and(iv) Make policy recommendations to improve access to liability insurance coverage for adult family homes.(c) The work group must submit a preliminary report to the relevant policy and fiscal committees of the legislature by December 31, 2024, and a final report by June 30, 2025, with review findings, recommendations, and data on claims experience, costing, and policy or budget underwriting restrictions related to liability policies covering adult family homes.(d) The commissioner shall collect the information required from entities transacting insurance with adult family home providers. Any identified authorized insurers, unauthorized insurers, and risk retention groups are required to provide the requested information to the commissioner.(e) The commissioner may contract with a vendor to conduct an actuarial analysis if necessary to facilitate the development of recommendations concerning liability insurance in adult family homes.(29)(a) $350,000 of the insurance commissioner's regulatory accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the commissioner to study approaches to increasing the availability of health care malpractice liability coverage or other liability protection options for community-based health care providers delivering transition of care services to incarcerated individuals. The commissioner must provide an initial report to the office of financial management and appropriate committees of the legislature by December 31, 2024. The study must include:(i) A review of the state's commitments to facilitating safe transitions of care for incarcerated individuals through medicaid coverage of health services under the 2023 medicaid transformation waiver;(ii) An analysis of the barriers to accessing liability coverage for community-based health care providers on the private market;(iii) An actuarial analysis of the potential risk to be incurred by providing health care malpractice liability coverage for transition of care services to individuals who are incarcerated and near release; and(iv) Policy options and recommendations, if any, for consideration by the legislature regarding provision of or increasing the availability of health care malpractice liability coverage or other liability protection options for community-based health care providers delivering these services.(b) In conducting this study, the commissioner shall convene interested organizations including but not limited to representatives of:(i) The office of the attorney general;(ii) The health care authority;(iii) The department of corrections;(iv) The department of enterprise services' office of risk management;(v) The Washington association of sheriffs and police chiefs;(vi) Local governments;(vii) Medical malpractice liability underwriters; and(viii) Community-based health care providers, including but not limited to representatives of federally qualified health centers and providers of health care services in incarceration settings.(c) The commissioner may contract for actuarial or other analysis if necessary to facilitate development of the study or policy options.(30) $315,000 of the insurance commissioner's regulatory accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Substitute House Bill No. 2329 (insurance market/housing). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2024, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.))(31) $49,000 of the insurance commissioner's regulatory accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Substitute House Bill No. 1957 (preventive service coverage). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2024, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.))(32) $84,000 of the insurance commissioner's regulatory accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5798 (insurance notices). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2024, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.))Sec. 1125. 2024 c 376 s 144 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE LIQUOR AND CANNABIS BOARDGeneral FundâState Appropriation (FY 2024). . . .$2,501,000General FundâState Appropriation (FY 2025). . . .(($1,545,000))Â Â Â Â Â $1,095,000General FundâFederal Appropriation. . . .$3,187,000General FundâPrivate/Local Appropriation. . . .$75,000Dedicated Cannabis AccountâState Appropriation(FY 2024). . . .$13,481,000Dedicated Cannabis AccountâState Appropriation(FY 2025). . . .$14,055,000Liquor Revolving AccountâState Appropriation. . . .(($126,281,000))Â Â Â Â Â $112,331,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($161,125,000))Â Â Â Â Â $146,725,000The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) The liquor and cannabis board may require electronic payment of the cannabis excise tax levied by RCW 69.50.535. The liquor and cannabis board may allow a waiver to the electronic payment requirement for good cause as provided by rule.(2) Of the liquor revolving accountâstate appropriation, (($35,278,000))$22,528,000 is provided solely for the modernization of regulatory systems and are subject to the conditions, limitations, and review requirements of section 701 of this act.(3) $1,526,000 of the liquor revolving accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5448 (delivery of alcohol).(4) $42,000 of the dedicated cannabis accountâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $42,000 of the dedicated cannabis accountâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5263 (psilocybin).(5) $250,000 of the dedicated cannabis accountâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $159,000 of the dedicated cannabis accountâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5367 (products containing THC).(6) $1,622,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $357,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025, $2,255,000 of the dedicated cannabis accountâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024, and $1,463,000 of the dedicated cannabis accountâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5080 (cannabis social equity).(7) $35,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 is provided solely for the liquor and cannabis board to conduct an agency analysis of commercial tobacco and vaping enforcement actions from fiscal year 2018 through fiscal year 2022 involving youth under the age of 18. This analysis shall be submitted to the appropriate committees of the legislature by December 1, 2023, and must include:(a) The total number of such interactions by fiscal year;(b) Information on the nature of those interactions;(c) How many interactions convert to administrative violation notices (AVNs);(d) How many of those interactions and AVNs convert to retailer education and violations; and(e) Descriptions of training for liquor and cannabis board officers, and the number of officers trained on interacting with youth, particularly LGBTQ youth and youth of color.(8) $4,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5365 (vapor and tobacco/minors).(9) $225,000 of the liquor revolving accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Substitute House Bill No. 1731 (short-term rentals/liquor).(10) $99,000 of the liquor revolving accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 6105 (adult entertainment workers). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2024, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.))(11) $245,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5376 (cannabis waste). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2024, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.))(12) $63,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute House Bill No. 2320 (high THC cannabis products). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2024, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.))(13) $136,000 of the liquor revolving accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of House Bill No. 2204 (emergency liquor permits). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2024, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.))(14) $25,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $25,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for implementation of Substitute House Bill No. 1453 (medical cannabis/tax). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2024, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.))(15) $75,000 of the liquor revolving accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for reviewing all the Washington Administrative Code provisions promulgated by the board for potentially discriminatory language or interpretation that may highlight personal bias. The board must issue a report to the legislature on its findings by September 30, 2024.Sec. 1126. 2024 c 376 s 146 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE MILITARY DEPARTMENTGeneral FundâState Appropriation (FY 2024). . . .$16,720,000General FundâState Appropriation (FY 2025). . . .(($19,489,000))Â Â Â Â Â $18,169,000General FundâFederal Appropriation. . . .$146,290,000911 AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$54,306,000Disaster Response AccountâState Appropriation. . . .(($62,179,000))Â Â Â Â Â $80,762,000Disaster Response AccountâFederal Appropriation. . . .(($1,905,453,000))Â Â Â Â Â $812,062,000Military Department Rent and Lease AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$1,009,000Military Department Active State Service AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$400,000Natural Climate Solutions AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$113,000Oil Spill Prevention AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$1,040,000Worker and Community Right to Know FundâStateAppropriation. . . .$2,041,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($2,209,040,000))Â Â Â Â Â $1,132,912,000The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) The military department shall submit a report to the office of financial management and the legislative fiscal committees by February 1st and October 31st of each year detailing information on the disaster response account, including: (a) The amount and type of deposits into the account; (b) the current available fund balance as of the reporting date; and (c) the projected fund balance at the end of the 2023-2025 fiscal biennium based on current revenue and expenditure patterns.(2) $40,000,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation is provided solely for homeland security, subject to the following conditions: Any communications equipment purchased by local jurisdictions or state agencies shall be consistent with standards set by the Washington state interoperability executive committee.(3) $11,000,000 of the 911 accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for financial assistance to counties.(4) $784,000 of the disaster response accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for fire suppression training, equipment, and supporting costs to national guard soldiers and airmen.(5) $876,000 of the disaster response accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for a dedicated access and functional needs program manager, access and functional need services, and a dedicated tribal liaison to assist with disaster preparedness and response.(6) $136,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $132,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5518 (cybersecurity).(7) $750,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $750,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the department to provide a grant to Whatcom county for disaster relief and recovery activities in response to the November 2021 flooding and mudslides presidentially-declared disaster.(8) $625,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $625,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute House Bill No. 1728 (statewide resiliency program).(9) $113,000 of the natural climate solutions accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 1170 (climate response strategy).(10)(a) $300,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 is provided solely for the department to administer grants to local governments and federally recognized tribes for costs to respond to community needs during periods of extremely hot or cold weather or in situations of severe poor air quality from wildfire smoke.(b) To qualify for a grant under (a) of this subsection, a local government or federally recognized tribe must:(i) Be located in a geographic area where vulnerable populations face combined, multiple environmental harms and health impacts, as determined by the department;(ii) Have demonstrated a lack of local resources to address community needs; and(iii) Have incurred eligible costs as described in (c) of this subsection for the benefit of vulnerable populations.(c) Costs eligible for reimbursement under (a) of this subsection include:(i) Establishing and operating warming and cooling centers, including rental of equipment, purchase of supplies and water, staffing, and other associated costs;(ii) Transporting individuals and their pets to warming and cooling centers;(iii) Purchasing fans or other supplies needed for cooling of congregate living settings;(iv) Providing emergency temporary housing such as rental of a hotel or convention center;(v) Retrofitting or establishing facilities within warming and cooling centers that are pet friendly in order to permit individuals to evacuate with their pets; and(vi) Other activities necessary for life safety during a period of extremely hot or cold weather or in situations of severe poor air quality from wildfire smoke, as determined by the department.(11) The department must report to and coordinate with the department of ecology to track expenditures from climate commitment act accounts, as defined and described in RCW 70A.65.300 and section 302(13) of this act.(12) (($23,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5803 (national guard recruitment). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2024, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.(13))) $250,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for implementation of Substitute House Bill No. 2020 (public infra. assistance prg.). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2024, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.(14) $1,500,000))(13) $1,080,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for implementation of Substitute House Bill No. 1012 (extreme weather events). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2024, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.(15)))(14)(a) (($361,000))$86,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for the department to conduct a study regarding statewide building code and construction standards pertaining to earthquake and tsunami resilience as well as recommendations for functional recovery of buildings and critical infrastructure directly following an earthquake. In conducting the study, the department must request input from the state building code council and representatives of appropriate public and private sector entities. The department may contract for all or a portion of the study. The study must, at a minimum, include an assessment of:(i) Functional recovery building code standards that are being developed at the federal level, have been proposed or adopted in other countries, states, or local jurisdictions with a high risk of earthquakes, or are developed by public or private organizations with expertise in earthquake performance standards and safety;(ii) The levels of functional recovery supported by current state and local building and construction codes;(iii) The objectives, feasibility, necessary measures, and estimated costs of adopting and implementing statewide functional recovery building code standards, and how this assessment is impacted by whether the standards:(A) Are mandatory or voluntary;(B) Apply to only certain types of structures and infrastructure or prioritize certain types of structures and infrastructure;(C) Apply to existing structures and infrastructure in addition to new construction;(D) Are intended to apply to only specific seismic hazard levels; or(E) Include nonstructural components as well as structural systems;(iv) How statewide standards for functional recovery would fit into an all hazards approach for state emergency response and recovery;(v) Funding opportunities that provide for the coordination of state and federal funds for the purposes of improving the state's preparedness for functional recovery following a significant earthquake or tsunami; and(vi) Equity considerations for the development of statewide building code standards for functional recovery.(b) The department must submit a preliminary report with interim findings to the appropriate committees of the legislature by June 1, 2025. The department must submit a final report summarizing the study's findings and including policy recommendations relating to statewide building code standards for functional recovery to the appropriate committees of the legislature by May 1, 2026. It is the intent of the legislature to provide funding to complete the final report in the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium.Sec. 1127. 2024 c 376 s 149 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE BOARD FOR VOLUNTEER FIREFIGHTERSVolunteer Firefighters' and Reserve Officers'Administrative AccountâState Appropriation. . . .(($3,679,000))Â Â Â Â Â $4,329,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($3,679,000))Â Â Â Â Â $4,329,000The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) (($2,403,000))$3,103,000 of the volunteer firefighters' and reserve officers' administrative accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for a benefits management system, and is subject to the conditions, limitations, and review requirements of section 701 of this act.(2) $91,000 of the volunteer firefighters' and reserve officers' administrative accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for contracting for small agency budget and accounting services with the department of enterprise services.(3) $50,000 of the volunteer firefighters' and reserve officers' administrative accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the board to conduct a study on the extension of duty-related occupational disease presumptions to participants in the volunteer firefighters' relief and pension system. The study must examine the presumptions in RCW 51.32.185, and report to the fiscal committees of the legislature by June 30, 2025, on the prevalence of these conditions among volunteer firefighters, and the fiscal impact of extending additional relief and pension benefits to participants.Sec. 1128. 2024 c 376 s 150 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE FORENSIC INVESTIGATION COUNCILDeath Investigations AccountâState Appropriation. . . .(($821,000))Â Â Â Â Â $836,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($821,000))Â Â Â Â Â $836,000The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1)(a) $250,000 of the death investigations accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for providing financial assistance to local jurisdictions in multiple death investigations. The forensic investigation council shall develop criteria for awarding these funds for multiple death investigations involving an unanticipated, extraordinary, and catastrophic event or those involving multiple jurisdictions.(b) Of the amount provided in this subsection, $30,000 of the death investigations accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the Adams county crime lab to investigate a double homicide that occurred in fiscal year 2021.(2) $210,000 of the death investigations accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for providing financial assistance to local jurisdictions in identifying human remains.(3) Within the amount appropriated in this section, the forensic investigation council may enter into an interagency agreement with the department of enterprise services for the department to provide services related to public records requests, to include responding to, or assisting the council in responding to, public disclosure requests received by the council.Sec. 1129. 2024 c 376 s 153 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE CONSOLIDATED TECHNOLOGY SERVICES AGENCYGeneral FundâState Appropriation (FY 2024). . . .$7,623,000General FundâState Appropriation (FY 2025). . . .(($30,310,000))Â Â Â Â Â $6,278,000General FundâFederal Appropriation. . . .(($134,292,000))Â Â Â Â Â $2,777,000((Consolidated Technology Services RevolvingAccountâState Appropriation. . . .$136,308,000))Washington Technology Solutions Revolving AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$136,308,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($308,533,000))Â Â Â Â Â $152,986,000The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) $2,000,000 of the consolidated technology services revolving accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for experienced information technology project managers to provide critical support to agency IT projects that are under oversight from the office of the chief information officer. The staff or vendors will:(a) Provide master level project management guidance to agency IT stakeholders;(b) Consider statewide best practices from the public and private sectors, independent review and analysis, vendor management, budget and timing quality assurance and other support of current or past IT projects in at least Washington state and share these with agency IT stakeholders and legislative fiscal staff at least twice annually and post these to the statewide IT dashboard; and(c) Provide independent recommendations to legislative fiscal committees by December of each calendar year on oversight of IT projects to include opportunities for accountability and performance metrics.(2) $2,226,000 of the consolidated technology services revolving accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the enterprise data management pilot project, and is subject to the conditions, limitations, and review requirements of section 701 of this act.(3) $16,939,000 of the consolidated technology services revolving accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the office of cyber security.(4) $2,737,000 of the consolidated technology services revolving accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the office of privacy and data protection.(5) The consolidated technology services agency shall work with customer agencies using the Washington state electronic records vault (WASERV) to identify opportunities to:(a) Reduce storage volumes and costs associated with vault records stored beyond the agencies' record retention schedules; and(b) Assess a customized service charge as defined in chapter 304, Laws of 2017 for costs of using WASERV to prepare data compilations in response to public records requests.(6)(a) In conjunction with the office of the chief information officer's prioritization of proposed information technology expenditures, agency budget requests for proposed information technology expenditures must include the following:(i) The agency's priority ranking of each information technology request;(ii) The estimated cost by fiscal year and by fund for the current biennium;(iii) The estimated cost by fiscal year and by fund for the ensuing biennium;(iv) The estimated total cost for the current and ensuing biennium;(v) The total cost by fiscal year, by fund, and in total, of the information technology project since it began;(vi) The estimated cost by fiscal year and by fund over all biennia through implementation and close out and into maintenance and operations;(vii) The estimated cost by fiscal year and by fund for service level agreements once the project is implemented;(viii) The estimated cost by fiscal year and by fund for agency staffing for maintenance and operations once the project is implemented; and(ix) The expected fiscal year when the agency expects to complete the request.(b) The office of the chief information officer and the office of financial management may request agencies to include additional information on proposed information technology expenditure requests.(7) The consolidated technology services agency must not increase fees charged for existing services without prior approval by the office of financial management. The agency may develop fees to recover the actual cost of new infrastructure to support increased use of cloud technologies.(8) Within existing resources, the agency must provide oversight of state procurement and contracting for information technology goods and services by the department of enterprise services.(9) Within existing resources, the agency must host, administer, and support the state employee directory in an online format to provide public employee contact information.(10) The health care authority, the health benefit exchange, the department of social and health services, the department of health, the department of corrections, and the department of children, youth, and families shall work together within existing resources to establish the health and human services enterprise coalition (the coalition). The coalition, led by the health care authority, must be a multi-organization collaborative that provides strategic direction and federal funding guidance for projects that have cross-organizational or enterprise impact, including information technology projects that affect organizations within the coalition. The office of the chief information officer shall maintain a statewide perspective when collaborating with the coalition to ensure that the development of projects identified in this report are planned for in a manner that ensures the efficient use of state resources and maximizes federal financial participation. The work of the coalition and any project identified as a coalition project is subject to the conditions, limitations, and review provided in section 701 of this act.(11) $7,088,000 of the consolidated technology services revolving accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the creation and ongoing delivery of information technology services tailored to the needs of small agencies. The scope of services must include, at a minimum, full-service desktop support, service assistance, security, and consultation.(12) $82,811,000 of the consolidated technology services revolving accountâstate appropriation ((is))and $2,322,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the procurement and distribution of Microsoft 365 licenses which must include advanced security features and cloud-based private branch exchange capabilities for state agencies. The office must report annually to fiscal committees of the legislature each December 31, on the count and type of licenses distributed by consolidated technology services to each state agency. The report must also separately report on the count and type of Microsoft 365 licenses that state agencies have in addition to those that are distributed by consolidated technology services so that the total count, type of license, and cost is known for statewide Microsoft 365 licenses.(13) The office of the chief information officer shall maintain an information technology project dashboard that, at minimum, provides updated information each fiscal month on the projects subject to section 701 of this act.(a) The statewide information technology dashboard must include, at a minimum, the:(i) Start date of the project;(ii) End date of the project, when the project will close out and implementation will commence;(iii) Term of the project in state fiscal years across all biennia to reflect the start of the project through the end of the project;(iv) Total project cost from start date through the end date of the project in total dollars, and a subtotal of near general fund outlook;(v) Near general fund outlook budget and actual spending in total dollars and by fiscal month for central service agencies that bill out project costs;(vi) Start date of maintenance and operations;(vii) Estimated annual state fiscal year cost of maintenance and operations after implementation and close out;(viii) Actual spending by state fiscal year and in total for state fiscal years that have closed;(ix) Date a feasibility study was completed or note if none has been completed to date;(x) Monthly project status assessments on scope, schedule, budget, and overall by the:(A) Office of the chief information officer;(B) Quality assurance vendor, if applicable; and(C) Agency project team;(xi) Monthly quality assurance reports, if applicable;(xii) Monthly office of the chief information officer status reports on budget, scope, schedule, and overall project status; and(xiii) Historical project budget and expenditures through fiscal year 2023.(b) The statewide dashboard must retain a roll up of the entire project cost, including all subprojects, that can display subproject detail. This includes coalition projects that are active. For projects that include multiple agencies or subprojects and roll up, the dashboard must display:(i) A separate technology budget and investment plan for each impacted agency; and(ii) A statewide project technology budget roll up that includes each affected agency at the subproject level.(c) The office of the chief information officer may recommend additional elements to include but must have agreement with legislative fiscal committees and the office of financial management prior to including additional elements.(d) The agency must ensure timely posting of project data on the statewide information technology dashboard for at least each project funded in the budget and those projects subject to the conditions of section 701 of this act to include, at a minimum, posting on the dashboard:(i) The budget funded level by project for each project under oversight within 30 calendar days of the budget being signed into law;(ii) The project historical expenditures through completed fiscal years by December 31; and(iii) Whether each project has completed a feasibility study.(e) The office of the chief information officer must post to the statewide dashboard a list of funding received by fiscal year by enacted session law, and how much was received citing chapter law as a list of funding provided by fiscal year.(14) Within existing resources, consolidated technology services must collaborate with the department of enterprise services on the annual contract report that provides information technology contract information. Consolidated technology services will:(a) Provide data to the department of enterprise services annually by September 1 of each year; and(b) Provide analysis on contract information for all agencies comparing spending across state fiscal years by, at least, the contract spending towers.(15) $8,666,000 of the consolidated technology services revolving accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of the enterprise cloud computing program as outlined in the December 2020 Washington state cloud readiness report. Funding provided includes, but is not limited to, cloud service broker resources, cloud center of excellence, cloud management tools, a network assessment, cybersecurity governance, and a cloud security roadmap.(16) $3,498,000 of the consolidated technology services revolving accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of the recommendations of the cloud transition task force report to include:(a) A cloud readiness program to help agencies plan and prepare for transitioning to cloud computing;(b) A cloud retraining program to provide a coordinated approach to skills development and retraining; and(c) Staffing to define career pathways and core competencies for the state's information technology workforce.(17) $5,926,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024, (($27,110,000))$756,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and (($134,292,000))$2,777,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely for statewide electronic health records projects, which must comply with the approved statewide electronic health records plan. The purpose of the plan is to implement a common technology solution to leverage shared business processes and data across the state in support of client services.(a) The statewide electronic health records plan must include, but is not limited to, the following elements:(i) A proposed governance model for the electronic health records solution;(ii) An implementation plan for the technology solution from kickoff through five years maintenance and operations post implementation;(iii) A technology budget to include estimated budget and resources needed to implement the electronic health records solution by agency and across the state, including fund sources and all technology budget element requirements as outlined in section 701(4) of this act;(iv) A licensing plan in consultation with the department of enterprise services that seeks to utilize the state data center;(v) A procurement approach, in consultation with the department of enterprise services;(vi) A system that must be capable of being continually updated, as necessary;(vii) A system that will use an agile development model holding live demonstrations of functioning software, developed using incremental user research, held at the end of every two-week sprint;(viii) A system that will deploy usable functionality into production for users within 180 days from the date there is an executed procurement contract after a competitive request for proposal is closed;(ix) A system that uses quantifiable deliverables that must include live, accessible demonstrations of software in development to program staff and end users at each sprint or at least monthly;(x) A requirement that the agency implementing its electronic health record solution must invite the office and the agency comptrollers or their designee to sprint reviews;(xi) A requirement that there is an annual independent audit of the system to evaluate compliance of the software solution vendor's performance standards and contractual requirements and technical code quality, and that it meets user needs;(xii) A recommended program structure for implementing a statewide electronic health records solution;(xiii) A list of individual state agency projects that will need to implement a statewide electronic health records solution and the readiness of each agency to successfully implement;(xiv) The process for agencies to request funding from the consolidated technology services for their electronic health records projects. The submitted application must:(A) Include at least a technology budget in compliance with the requirements of section 701(4) of this act that each agency budget office will assist with; and(B) Be posted to the statewide information technology dashboard and meet all dashboard posting requirements as outlined in section 153(13) of this act; and(xv) The approval criteria for agencies to receive funds for their electronic health records project. The approval may not be given without an approved current technology budget, and the office must notify the fiscal committees of the legislature. The office may not approve funding for the project any earlier than 10 business days from the date of notification to the fiscal committees of the legislature.(b) The plan described in (a) of this subsection:(i) Must be submitted to the office of financial management, the chair and ranking member of the senate environment, energy, and information technology policy committee, the chairs and ranking members of the fiscal committees of the legislature, and the technology services board by July 1, 2023; and(ii) Must be approved by the office of financial management and the technology services board established in RCW 43.105.285.(c) $5,926,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024, (($27,110,000))$756,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and (($134,292,000))$2,777,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely for state agency electronic health record projects at the department of corrections, the department of social and health services, and the health care authority in accordance with the approved statewide electronic health record plan requirements in (a) of this subsection. For the amount provided in this subsection (17):(i) Funding may not be released until the office of financial management and the technology services board have approved the statewide electronic health record plan.(ii) As required in section 701(2) of this act, consolidated technology services may not approve funding for the project any earlier than 10 business days from the date of notification to the fiscal committees of the legislature.(iii) Funding may not cover any costs incurred by the state agencies for services or project costs prior to the date of statewide electronic health record plan approval.(iv) State agencies must submit their proposed electronic health records project and technology budget to the office of the chief information officer for approval. The submitted application must:(A) Include at least a technology budget in compliance with the requirements of section 701(4) of this act that each agency budget office will assist with; and(B) Be posted to the statewide information technology dashboard and meet all dashboard posting requirements as outlined in section 153(13) of this act.(v) When a funding request is approved, consolidated technology services will transfer the funds to the agency to execute their electronic health records project.(vi) The office must enter into an interagency agreement with the health care authority who is, and will be, the reporting entity to the federal government on the application for and use of the federal funding.(vii) Consolidated technology services must include this enterprise electronic health records program on the statewide information technology program dashboard and must ensure that the program detail will roll up the below required subprojects:(A) Enterprise foundational electronic health records system;(B) Department of corrections electronic health records;(C) Department of social and health services electronic health records; and(D) Health care authority electronic health records.(18) $134,000 of the consolidated technology services revolving accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5518 (cybersecurity).(19) The office of the chief information officer must collaborate with the office of the secretary of state in the evaluation of the office of the secretary of state's information technology infrastructure and applications in determining the appropriate candidates for the location of data and the systems that could be exempt from consolidated technology services oversight.(20) $1,500,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $3,000,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for innovative technology solutions and modernization of legacy systems within state government. This funding is to be used for projects at other state agencies to improve the health of the state's overall information technology portfolio. Submitted projects are subject to review and approval by the technology services board as established in RCW 43.105.285. The agency must report to the office of financial management and the fiscal committees of the legislature within 90 days of the close of fiscal year 2024 with the following information to measure the quantity of projects considered for this purpose and use of this funding:(a) The agency name, project name, estimated time duration, estimated cost, and technology service board recommendation result of each project submitted for funding;(b) The actual length of time and cost of the projects approved by the technology services board, from start to completion; and(c) Any other information or metric the agency determines is appropriate to measure the quantity and use of the funding in this subsection.(21) In collaboration with the department of health and the health care authority, consolidated technology services must actively consult and provide oversight over:(a) The department of health 988 technology platform that must provide interoperable capabilities between the 988 call center platform and the health care authority's 988-related system;(b) The health care authority 988 technology platform that must provide interoperable capabilities between the 988-related system and the department of health's 988 call center platform; and(c) How the platforms in (a) and (b) of this subsection will meet statutory requirements for technology platform functionality and implementation dates as established in Senate Bill No. 6308 (988 system timeline) and must report on the progress of both platforms' budget, scope, and schedule at a technology services board meeting by December 31, 2024.(End of part)PART XIIHUMAN SERVICESSec. 1201. 2024 c 376 s 201 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES(1) The appropriations to the department of social and health services in this act shall be expended for the programs and in the amounts specified in this act. Appropriations made in this act to the department of social and health services shall initially be allotted as required by this act. Subsequent allotment modifications shall not include transfers of moneys between sections of this act except as expressly provided in this act, nor shall allotment modifications permit moneys that are provided solely for a specified purpose to be used for other than that purpose.(2) The department of social and health services shall not initiate any services that require expenditure of state general fund moneys unless expressly authorized in this act or other law. The department may seek, receive, and spend, under RCW 43.79.260 through 43.79.282, federal moneys not anticipated in this act as long as the federal funding does not require expenditure of state moneys for the program in excess of amounts anticipated in this act. If the department receives unanticipated unrestricted federal moneys, those moneys shall be spent for services authorized in this act or in any other legislation providing appropriation authority, and an equal amount of appropriated state general fund moneys shall lapse. Upon the lapsing of any moneys under this subsection, the office of financial management shall notify the legislative fiscal committees. As used in this subsection, "unrestricted federal moneys" includes block grants and other funds that federal law does not require to be spent on specifically defined projects or matched on a formula basis by state funds.(3) The legislature finds that medicaid payment rates, as calculated by the department pursuant to the appropriations in this act, bear a reasonable relationship to the costs incurred by efficiently and economically operated facilities for providing quality services and will be sufficient to enlist enough providers so that care and services are available to the extent that such care and services are available to the general population in the geographic area. The legislature finds that cost reports, payment data from the federal government, historical utilization, economic data, and clinical input constitute reliable data upon which to determine the payment rates.(4) The department shall to the maximum extent practicable use the same system for delivery of spoken-language interpreter services for social services appointments as the one established for medical appointments in the health care authority. When contracting directly with an individual to deliver spoken language interpreter services, the department shall only contract with language access providers who are working at a location in the state and who are state-certified or state-authorized, except that when such a provider is not available, the department may use a language access provider who meets other certifications or standards deemed to meet state standards, including interpreters in other states.(5) Information technology projects or investments and proposed projects or investments impacting time capture, payroll and payment processes and systems, eligibility, case management, and authorization systems within the department of social and health services are subject to technical oversight by the office of the chief information officer.(6)(a) The department shall facilitate enrollment under the medicaid expansion for clients applying for or receiving state funded services from the department and its contractors. Prior to open enrollment, the department shall coordinate with the health care authority to provide referrals to the Washington health benefit exchange for clients that will be ineligible for medicaid.(b) To facilitate a single point of entry across public and medical assistance programs, and to maximize the use of federal funding, the health care authority, the department of social and health services, and the health benefit exchange will coordinate efforts to expand HealthPlanfinder access to public assistance and medical eligibility staff. The department shall complete medicaid applications in the HealthPlanfinder for households receiving or applying for public assistance benefits.(7) The health care authority, the health benefit exchange, the department of social and health services, the department of health, the department of corrections, and the department of children, youth, and families shall work together within existing resources to establish the health and human services enterprise coalition (the coalition). The coalition, led by the health care authority, must be a multi-organization collaborative that provides strategic direction and federal funding guidance for projects that have cross-organizational or enterprise impact, including information technology projects that affect organizations within the coalition. The office of the chief information officer shall maintain a statewide perspective when collaborating with the coalition to ensure that projects are planned for in a manner that ensures the efficient use of state resources, support the adoption of a cohesive technology and data architecture, and maximize federal financial participation. The work of the coalition is subject to the conditions, limitations, and review provided in section 701 of this act.(8)(a) The appropriations to the department of social and health services in this act must be expended for the programs and in the amounts specified in this act. However, after May 1, ((2024))2025, unless prohibited by this act, the department may transfer general fundâstate appropriations for fiscal year ((2024))2025 among programs and subprograms after approval by the director of the office of financial management. However, the department may not transfer state appropriations that are provided solely for a specified purpose except as expressly provided in (b) of this subsection.(b) To the extent that transfers under (a) of this subsection are insufficient to fund actual expenditures in excess of fiscal year ((2024))2025 caseload forecasts and utilization assumptions in the long-term care, developmental disabilities, and public assistance programs, the department may transfer state appropriations that are provided solely for a specified purpose.(c) Within the mental health program, the department may transfer appropriations that are provided solely for a specified purpose within and between subprograms as needed to fund actual expenditures through the end of fiscal year 2025.(d) The department may not transfer funds, and the director of the office of financial management may not approve the transfer, unless the transfer is consistent with the objective of conserving, to the maximum extent possible, the expenditure of state funds. The director of the office of financial management shall notify the appropriate fiscal committees of the legislature in writing seven days prior to approving any allotment modifications or transfers under this subsection. The written notification shall include a narrative explanation and justification of the changes, along with expenditures and allotments by budget unit and appropriation, both before and after any allotment modifications or transfers.(9) The department may not transfer appropriations for the developmental disabilities program to any other program of the department of social and health services((, or between subprograms of the developmental disabilities program itself)).Sec. 1202. 2024 c 376 s 202 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICESâMENTAL HEALTH PROGRAMGeneral FundâState Appropriation (FY 2024). . . .$808,569,000General FundâState Appropriation (FY 2025). . . .(($781,930,000))Â Â Â Â Â $722,713,000General FundâFederal Appropriation. . . .(($168,601,000))Â Â Â Â Â $193,022,000General FundâPrivate/Local Appropriation. . . .(($6,500,000))Â Â Â Â Â $6,009,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($1,765,600,000))Â Â Â Â Â $1,730,313,000The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) The state psychiatric hospitals and residential treatment facilities may use funds appropriated in this subsection to purchase goods, services, and supplies through hospital group purchasing organizations when it is cost-effective to do so.(2) $311,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $311,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for a community partnership between western state hospital and the city of Lakewood to support community policing efforts in the Lakewood community surrounding western state hospital. The amounts provided in this subsection are for the salaries, benefits, supplies, and equipment for the city of Lakewood to produce incident and police response reports, investigate potential criminal conduct, assist with charging consultations, liaison between staff and prosecutors, provide staff training on criminal justice procedures, assist with parking enforcement, and attend meetings with hospital staff.(3) $45,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $45,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for payment to the city of Lakewood for police services provided by the city at western state hospital and adjacent areas.(4) $311,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $311,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the salaries, benefits, supplies, and equipment for one full-time investigator, one full-time police officer, and one full-time community services officer for policing efforts at eastern state hospital. The department must collect data from the city of Medical Lake on the use of the funds and the number of calls responded to by the community policing program and submit a report with this information to the office of financial management and the appropriate fiscal committees of the legislature each December of the fiscal biennium.(5) $25,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $25,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for payment to the city of Medical Lake for police services provided by the city at eastern state hospital and adjacent areas.(6) $250,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $250,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the department, in collaboration with the health care authority, to develop and implement a predictive modeling tool which identifies clients who are at high risk of future involvement with the criminal justice system and for developing a model to estimate demand for civil and forensic state hospital bed needs pursuant to the following requirements.(a) By the first day of each December during the fiscal biennium, the department, in coordination with the health care authority, must submit a report to the office of financial management and the appropriate committees of the legislature that summarizes how the predictive modeling tool has been implemented and includes the following: (i) The number of individuals identified by the tool as having a high risk of future criminal justice involvement; (ii) the method and frequency for which the department is providing lists of high-risk clients to contracted managed care organizations and behavioral health administrative services organizations; (iii) a summary of how the managed care organizations and behavioral health administrative services organizations are utilizing the data to improve the coordination of care for the identified individuals; and (iv) a summary of the administrative data to identify whether implementation of the tool is resulting in increased access and service levels and lower recidivism rates for high-risk clients at the state and regional level.(b) The department must provide staff support for the forensic and long-term civil commitment bed forecast which must be conducted under the direction of the office of financial management. The forecast methodology, updates, and methodology changes must be conducted in coordination with staff from the department, the health care authority, the office of financial management, and the appropriate fiscal committees of the state legislature. The model shall incorporate factors for capacity in state hospitals as well as contracted facilities, which provide similar levels of care, referral patterns, wait lists, lengths of stay, and other factors identified as appropriate for estimating the number of beds needed to meet the demand for civil and forensic state hospital services. Factors should include identification of need for the services and analysis of the effect of community investments in behavioral health services and other types of beds that may reduce the need for long-term civil commitment needs. The forecast must be updated each February, June, and November during the fiscal biennium and the department must submit a report to the legislature and the appropriate committees of the legislature summarizing the updated forecast based on the caseload forecast council's schedule for entitlement program forecasts.(7) $9,119,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $9,145,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the phase-in of the settlement agreement under Trueblood, et al. v. Department of Social and Health Services, et al., United States District Court for the Western District of Washington, Cause No. 14-cv-01178-MJP. The department, in collaboration with the health care authority and the criminal justice training commission, must implement the provisions of the settlement agreement pursuant to the timeline and implementation plan provided for under the settlement agreement. This includes implementing provisions related to competency evaluations, competency restoration, forensic navigators, crisis diversion and supports, education and training, and workforce development.(8) $7,147,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $7,147,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely to maintain implementation of efforts to improve the timeliness of competency evaluation services for individuals who are in local jails pursuant to chapter 5, Laws of 2015 (timeliness of competency treatment and evaluation services). This funding must be used solely to maintain increases in the number of competency evaluators that began in fiscal year 2016 pursuant to the settlement agreement under Trueblood, et al. v. Department of Social and Health Services, et al., United States District Court for the Western District of Washington, Cause No. 14-cv-01178-MJP.(9) $71,690,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $77,825,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for implementation of efforts to improve the timeliness of competency restoration services pursuant to chapter 5, Laws of 2015 (timeliness of competency treatment and evaluation services) and the settlement agreement under Trueblood, et al. v. Department of Social and Health Services, et al., United States District Court for the Western District of Washington, Cause No. 14-cv-01178-MJP. These amounts must be used to maintain increases that were implemented between fiscal year 2016 and fiscal year 2021, and further increase the number of forensic beds at western state hospital during the 2023-2025 fiscal biennium. Pursuant to chapter 7, Laws of 2015 1st sp. sess. (timeliness of competency treatment and evaluation services), the department may contract some of these amounts for services at alternative locations if the secretary determines that there is a need.(10) $84,565,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $77,343,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $960,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely for the department to continue to implement an acuity based staffing tool at western state hospital and eastern state hospital in collaboration with the hospital staffing committees. The staffing tool must be used to identify, on a daily basis, the clinical acuity on each patient ward and determine the minimum level of direct care staff by profession to be deployed to meet the needs of the patients on each ward. The department must evaluate interrater reliability of the tool within each hospital and between the two hospitals. The department must also continue to update, in collaboration with the office of financial management's labor relations office, the staffing committees, and state labor unions, an overall state hospital staffing plan that looks at all positions and functions of the facilities.(a) Within the amounts provided in this section, the department must establish, monitor, track, and report monthly staffing and expenditures at the state hospitals, including overtime and use of locums, to the functional categories identified in the recommended staffing plan. The allotments and tracking of staffing and expenditures must include all areas of the state hospitals, must be done at the ward level, and must include contracted facilities providing forensic restoration services as well as the office of forensic mental health services.(b) By December 1, 2023, and December 1, 2024, the department must submit reports to the office of financial management and the appropriate committees of the legislature that provide a comparison of monthly spending, staffing levels, overtime, and use of locums for the prior year compared to allotments and to the recommended state hospital staffing model. The format for these reports must be developed in consultation with staff from the office of financial management and the appropriate committees of the legislature. The reports must include a summary of the results of the evaluation of the interrater reliability in use of the staffing acuity tool and an update from the hospital staffing committees.(c) Monthly staffing levels and related expenditures at the state hospitals must not exceed official allotments without prior written approval from the director of the office of financial management. In the event the director of the office of financial management approves an increase in monthly staffing levels and expenditures beyond what is budgeted, notice must be provided to the appropriate committees of the legislature within 30 days of such approval. The notice must identify the reason for the authorization to exceed budgeted staffing levels and the time frame for the authorization. Extensions of authorizations under this subsection must also be submitted to the director of the office of financial management for written approval in advance of the expiration of an authorization. The office of financial management must notify the appropriate committees of the legislature of any extensions of authorizations granted under this subsection within 30 days of granting such authorizations and identify the reason and time frame for the extension.(11) $5,083,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $7,535,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $583,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely for the department to establish a violence reduction team at western state hospital to improve patient and staff safety at eastern and western state hospitals. A report must be submitted by December 1, 2023, and December 1, 2024, which includes a description of the violence reduction or safety strategy, a profile of the types of patients being served, the staffing model being used, and outcomes associated with each strategy. The outcomes section should include tracking data on facility-wide metrics related to patient and staff safety as well as individual outcomes related to the patients served.(12) $2,593,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $2,593,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the department to increase services to patients found not guilty by reason of insanity under the Ross v. Lashway settlement agreement.(13) Within the amounts provided in this subsection, the department must develop and submit an annual state hospital performance report for eastern and western state hospitals. Each measure included in the performance report must include baseline performance data, agency performance targets, and performance for the most recent fiscal year. The performance report must include a one page dashboard as well as charts for each fiscal year and quality of care measure broken out by hospital and including but not limited to: (a) Monthly FTE expenditures compared to allotments; (b) monthly dollar expenditures compared to allotments; (c) monthly FTE expenditures per thousand patient bed days; (d) monthly dollar expenditures per thousand patient bed days; (e) percentage of FTE expenditures for overtime; (f) average length of stay by category of patient; (g) average monthly civil wait list; (h) average monthly forensic wait list; (i) rate of staff assaults per thousand patient bed days; (j) rate of patient assaults per thousand patient bed days; (k) average number of days to release after a patient has been determined to be clinically ready for discharge; and (l) average monthly vacancy rates for key clinical positions. The department must submit the state hospital performance report to the office of financial management and the appropriate committees of the legislature by the first day of each December of the biennium.(14) (($546,000))$566,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $566,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for design and planning activities for the new forensic hospital being constructed on the grounds of western state hospital.(15) $135,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $135,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the department to maintain an on-site safety compliance officer, stationed at western state hospital, to provide oversight and accountability of the hospital's response to safety concerns regarding the hospital's work environment.(16) $10,364,000 of the general fund stateâappropriation for fiscal year 2024 ((are))is provided solely for the department to provide behavioral health and stabilization services at the King county south correctional entity to class members of Trueblood, et al. v. Department of Social and Health Services, et al., United States district court for the western district of Washington, cause no. 14-cv-01178-MJP.(17) $2,619,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and (($5,027,000))$4,524,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the department to hire additional forensic evaluators to provide in-jail competency evaluations and community-based evaluations.(18) $100,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $100,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the department to track compliance with the requirements of RCW 71.05.365 for transition of state hospital patients into community settings within 14 days of the determination that they no longer require active psychiatric treatment at an inpatient level of care. The department must use these amounts to track the following elements related to this requirement: (a) The date on which an individual is determined to no longer require active psychiatric treatment at an inpatient level of care; (b) the date on which the behavioral health entities and other organizations responsible for resource management services for the person is notified of this determination; and (c) the date on which either the individual is transitioned to the community or has been reevaluated and determined to again require active psychiatric treatment at an inpatient level of care. The department must provide this information in regular intervals to behavioral health entities and other organizations responsible for resource management services. The department must summarize the information and provide a report to the office of financial management and the appropriate committees of the legislature on progress toward meeting the 14 day standard by December 1, 2023, and December 1, 2024.(19) $2,190,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and (($28,742,000))$19,742,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the department to operate the 48 bed Clark county facility to provide long-term inpatient care beds as defined in RCW 71.24.025. The department must use this facility to provide treatment services for individuals who have been committed to a state hospital pursuant to the dismissal of criminal charges and civil evaluation ordered under RCW 10.77.086 or 10.77.088. In considering placements at the facility, the department must maximize forensic bed capacity at the state hospitals for individuals in jails awaiting admission that are class members of Trueblood, et al. v. Department of Social and Health Services, et al., United States district court for the western district of Washington, cause no. 14-cv-01178-MJP. The department must submit a report to the office of financial management and the appropriate committees of the legislature by December 1, 2023, and December 1, 2024, providing a status update on progress toward opening the new facility.(20) $8,048,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $7,677,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the department to reopen and operate a 30 bed ward for civil patients at western state hospital. The department must prioritize placements on this ward for individuals currently occupying beds on forensic wards at western state hospital who have been committed to a state hospital pursuant to the dismissal of criminal charges and a civil evaluation ordered under RCW 10.77.086 or 10.77.088, in order to maximize forensic bed capacity for individuals in jails awaiting admission that are class members of Trueblood, et al. v. Department of Social and Health Services, et al., United States district court for the western district of Washington, cause no. 14-cv-01178-MJP.(21) $14,466,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and (($51,582,000))$28,234,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the department to operate the maple lane campus as described in (a) and (b) of this subsection.(a) The department shall operate the Oak, Columbia, and Cascade cottages to provide:(i) Treatment services to individuals committed to a state hospital under chapter 71.05 RCW pursuant to the dismissal of criminal charges and a civil evaluation ordered under RCW 10.77.086 or 10.77.088;(ii) Treatment services to individuals acquitted of a crime by reason of insanity and subsequently ordered to receive treatment services under RCW 10.77.120; and(iii) Through fiscal year 2024, competency restoration services at the Cascade cottage to individuals under RCW 10.77.086 or 10.77.088.(b) The department shall open and operate the Baker ((and Chelan cottages))cottage to provide treatment services to individuals committed to a state hospital under chapter 71.05 RCW pursuant to the dismissal of criminal charges and a civil evaluation ordered under RCW 10.77.086 or 10.77.088.(c) In considering placements at the maple lane campus, the department must maximize forensic bed capacity at the state hospitals for individuals in jails awaiting admission that are class members of Trueblood, et al. v. Department of Social and Health Services, et al., United States district court for the western district of Washington, cause no. 14-cv-01178-MJP.(22) $1,412,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $1,412,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for relocation, storage, and other costs associated with building demolition on the western state hospital campus.(23) $455,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $455,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for western state hospital's vocational rehabilitation program and eastern state hospital's work readiness program to pay patients working in the programs an hourly wage that is equivalent to the state's minimum hourly wage under RCW 49.46.020.(24) $4,054,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and (($5,236,000))$3,017,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5440 (competency evaluations).(25) $2,283,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024, (($4,118,000))$3,706,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $247,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely for the department to address delays in patient discharge as provided in this subsection.(a) The department shall hire staff dedicated to discharge reviews, including psychologists to complete reviews and staff for additional discharge review work, including, but not limited to, scheduling, planning, and providing transportation; and establish and implement a sex offense and problematic behavior program as part of the sex offense review and referral team program.(b) Of the amounts provided in this subsection, $504,000 per year shall be used for bed fees for patients who are not guilty by reason of insanity.(c) The department shall track data as it relates to this subsection and, where available, compare it to historical data. The department will provide a report to the appropriate fiscal and policy committees of the legislature. A preliminary report is due by December 1, 2023, and the final report is due by September 15, 2024, and at a minimum must include the:(i) Volume of patients discharged;(ii) Volume of patients in a sex offense or problematic behavior program;(iii) Number of beds held for not guilty by reason of insanity patients;(iv) Average and median duration to complete discharges;(v) Staffing as it relates to this subsection; and(vi) Average discharge evaluation caseload.(26)(a) $5,000,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $5,000,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the department to pursue immediate strategies to maximize existing forensic bed capacity for individuals in jails awaiting admission to the state hospitals that are class members of Trueblood, et al. v. Department of Social and Health Services, et al., United States district court for the western district of Washington, cause no. 14-cv-01178-MJP. The immediate strategies must include, but are not limited to:(i) Additional approaches to resolving barriers to discharge for civil patients, including:(A) In coordination with the behavioral health teaching facility at the University of Washington, identification of civil patients in the state hospitals that could receive appropriate treatment at the facility and work to resolve any barriers in such placement;(B) Identification of civil patients in the state hospitals that could receive appropriate treatment at an enhanced services facility or any other community facility and work to resolve any barriers in such placement; and(C) Coordination with the aging and long-term care administration and the office of public guardianship on the provision of qualified guardians for civil patients in need of guardianship that are otherwise eligible for discharge; and(ii) Additional approaches to resolving any barriers to maximizing the use of existing civil wards at eastern state hospital for individuals currently occupying beds on forensic wards at western state hospital who have been committed to a state hospital pursuant to the dismissal of criminal charges and a civil evaluation ordered under RCW 10.77.086 or 10.77.088.(b) By December 1, 2023, the department must submit a preliminary report to the appropriate committees of the legislature and to the office of financial management that provides:(i) The number of individuals currently occupying beds on forensic wards at western state hospital who have been committed to a state hospital pursuant to the dismissal of criminal charges and a civil evaluation ordered under RCW 10.77.086 or 10.77.088; and(ii) The department's plan for utilizing the funds provided in this subsection and estimated outcomes.(c) By September 1, 2024, the department must submit a final report to the appropriate committees of the legislature and to the office of financial management that provides:(i) The number of individuals currently occupying beds on forensic wards at western state hospital who have been committed to a state hospital pursuant to the dismissal of criminal charges and a civil evaluation ordered under RCW 10.77.086 or 10.77.088; and(ii) Detailed reporting on how the funds provided in this subsection were used and the associated outcomes.(27) $76,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $53,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $71,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute House Bill No. 1580 (children in crisis).(28) Within the amounts provided in this section, the department is provided funding to operate civil long-term inpatient beds at the state hospitals as follows:(a) Funding is sufficient for the department to operate 192 civil beds at eastern state hospital in ((both)) fiscal year 2024 and 162 civil beds in fiscal year 2025.(b) Funding is sufficient for the department to operate 287 civil beds at western state hospital in both fiscal year 2024 and fiscal year 2025.(c) The department shall fully operate funded civil capacity at eastern state hospital, including reopening and operating civil beds that are not needed for eastern Washington residents to provide services for western Washington residents.(d) The department shall coordinate with the health care authority toward increasing community capacity for long-term inpatient services required under section 215(50) of this act.(29)(a) $60,426,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and (($74,538,000))$59,350,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the department to operate 72 beds in three wards in the Olympic heritage behavioral health facility.(b) The department may not use the remaining 40 beds at the facility for any purpose and must permit the contractor selected by the health care authority to utilize the beds pursuant to and upon completion of the contracted process outlined in section 215 of this act.(30) $100,318,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 is provided solely for the department to pay the court order filed July 7, 2023, issued in the case of Trueblood, et al. v. Department of Social and Health Services, et al., United States district court for the western district of Washington, cause no. 14-cv-01178-MJP, which requires the department to "pay all fines held in abeyance from September 2022 through May 2023, which totals $100,318,000.00."(31) $6,900,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $13,610,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the department to operate an additional 30 beds at western state hospital.(32) $3,228,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $6,088,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the department to operate an additional eight beds at eastern state hospital.(((34)))(33) $1,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 6106 (DSHS workers/PSERS). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2024, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.))Sec. 1203. 2024 c 376 s 203 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICESâDEVELOPMENTAL DISABILITIES PROGRAM(1) COMMUNITY SERVICESGeneral FundâState Appropriation (FY 2024). . . .$1,130,054,000General FundâState Appropriation (FY 2025). . . .(($1,210,591,000))Â Â Â Â Â $1,249,487,000General FundâFederal Appropriation. . . .(($2,436,767,000))Â Â Â Â Â $2,475,743,000General FundâPrivate/Local Appropriation. . . .$4,058,000Developmental Disabilities Community ServicesAccountâState Appropriation. . . .$32,120,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($4,813,590,000))Â Â Â Â Â $4,891,462,000The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(a) Individuals receiving services as supplemental security income (SSI) state supplemental payments may not become eligible for medical assistance under RCW 74.09.510 due solely to the receipt of SSI state supplemental payments.(b) In accordance with RCW 18.51.050, 18.20.050, 70.128.060, and 43.135.055, the department is authorized to increase nursing facility, assisted living facility, and adult family home fees as necessary to fully support the actual costs of conducting the licensure, inspection, and regulatory programs. The license fees may not exceed the department's annual licensing and oversight activity costs and shall include the department's cost of paying providers for the amount of the license fee attributed to medicaid clients.(i) The current annual renewal license fee for adult family homes is $225 per bed beginning in fiscal year 2024 and $225 per bed beginning in fiscal year 2025. A processing fee of $2,750 must be charged to each adult family home when the home is initially licensed. This fee is nonrefundable. A processing fee of $700 must be charged when adult family home providers file a change of ownership application.(ii) The current annual renewal license fee for assisted living facilities is $116 per bed beginning in fiscal year 2024 and $116 per bed beginning in fiscal year 2025.(iii) The current annual renewal license fee for nursing facilities is $359 per bed beginning in fiscal year 2024 and $359 per bed beginning in fiscal year 2025.(c) $32,240,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $52,060,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $108,994,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely for the rate increase for the new consumer-directed employer contracted individual providers as set by the consumer-directed employer rate setting board in accordance with RCW 74.39A.530.(d) $5,095,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $7,299,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $16,042,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely for the homecare agency parity consistent with the rate set by the consumer-directed employer rate setting board in accordance with RCW 74.39A.530.(e) $1,099,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $2,171,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $5,515,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely for administrative costs of the consumer-directed employer as set by the consumer-directed employer rate setting board in accordance with RCW 74.39A.530.(f) $328,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $444,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $998,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely to increase the administrative rate for home care agencies by 56 cents per hour effective July 1, 2023.(g) $9,371,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $10,798,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $25,267,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely for the implementation of an agreement reached between the governor and the adult family home council under the provisions of chapter 41.56 RCW for the 2023-2025 fiscal biennium, as provided in section 907 of this act.(h) The department may authorize a one-time waiver of all or any portion of the licensing and processing fees required under RCW 70.128.060 in any case in which the department determines that an adult family home is being relicensed because of exceptional circumstances, such as death or incapacity of a provider, and that to require the full payment of the licensing and processing fees would present a hardship to the applicant. In these situations the department is also granted the authority to waive the required residential administrator training for a period of 120 days if necessary to ensure continuity of care during the relicensing process.(i) Community residential cost reports that are submitted by or on behalf of contracted agency providers are required to include information about agency staffing including health insurance, wages, number of positions, and turnover.(j) Sufficient appropriations are provided to continue community alternative placement beds that prioritize the transition of clients who are ready for discharge from the state psychiatric hospitals, but who have additional long-term care or developmental disability needs.(i) Community alternative placement beds include enhanced service facility beds, adult family home beds, skilled nursing facility beds, shared supportive housing beds, state operated living alternative beds, and assisted living facility beds.(ii) Each client must receive an individualized assessment prior to leaving one of the state psychiatric hospitals. The individualized assessment must identify and authorize personal care, nursing care, behavioral health stabilization, physical therapy, or other necessary services to meet the unique needs of each client. It is the expectation that, in most cases, staffing ratios in all community alternative placement options described in (j)(i) of this subsection will need to increase to meet the needs of clients leaving the state psychiatric hospitals. If specialized training is necessary to meet the needs of a client before he or she enters a community placement, then the person centered service plan must also identify and authorize this training.(iii) When reviewing placement options, the department must consider the safety of other residents, as well as the safety of staff, in a facility. An initial evaluation of each placement, including any documented safety concerns, must occur within thirty days of a client leaving one of the state psychiatric hospitals and entering one of the community placement options described in (j)(i) of this subsection. At a minimum, the department must perform two additional evaluations of each placement during the first year that a client has lived in the facility.(iv) In developing bed capacity, the department shall consider the complex needs of individuals waiting for discharge from the state psychiatric hospitals.(k) Sufficient appropriations are provided for discharge case managers stationed at the state psychiatric hospitals. Discharge case managers will transition clients ready for hospital discharge into less restrictive alternative community placements. The transition of clients ready for discharge will free up bed capacity at the state psychiatric hospitals.(l) $476,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $481,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for implementation of House Bill No. 1128 (personal needs allowance).(m) The annual certification renewal fee for community residential service businesses is $859 per client in fiscal year 2024 and $859 per client in fiscal year 2025. The annual certification renewal fee may not exceed the department's annual licensing and oversight activity costs.(n) $2,648,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024, (($2,631,000))$1,464,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and (($2,293,000))$1,782,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely for enhanced respite beds across the state for children. These services are intended to provide families and caregivers with a break in caregiving, the opportunity for behavioral stabilization of the child, and the ability to partner with the state in the development of an individualized service plan that allows the child to remain in his or her home. The department must provide the legislature with a respite utilization report in January of each year that provides information about the number of children who have used enhanced respite in the preceding year, as well as the location and number of days per month that each respite bed was occupied.(o) $2,173,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and (($2,154,000))$1,836,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for 13 community respite beds across the state for adults. These services are intended to provide families and caregivers with a break in caregiving and the opportunity for stabilization of the individual in a community-based setting as an alternative to using a residential habilitation center to provide planned or emergent respite. The department must provide the legislature with a respite utilization report by January of each year that provides information about the number of individuals who have used community respite in the preceding year, as well as the location and number of days per month that each respite bed was occupied.(p) $144,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 and $181,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely for funding the unfair labor practice settlement in the case of Adult Family Home Council v Office of Financial Management, PERC case no. 135737-U-22. If the settlement agreement is not reached by June 30, 2024, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.(q) $351,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $570,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $1,158,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely for rate adjustments for assisted living providers. Of the amounts provided in this subsection:(i) $351,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $428,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $970,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely to increase funding of the assisted living medicaid methodology established in RCW 74.39A.032 to 79 percent of the labor component and 68 percent of the operations component, effective July 1, 2023; and to 82 percent of the labor component and 68 percent of the operations component, effective July 1, 2024.(ii) $142,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 and $188,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely for a one-time bridge rate for assisted living facilities, enhanced adult residential centers, and adult residential centers, with high medicaid occupancy. The bridge rate does not replace or substitute the capital add-on rate found in RCW 74.39A.320 and the same methodology from RCW 74.39A.320 shall be used to determine each facility's medicaid occupancy percentage for the purposes of this one-time bridge rate add-on. Facilities with a medicaid occupancy level of 75 percent or more shall receive a $20.99 add-on per resident day effective July 1, 2024.(r) The appropriations in this section include sufficient funding to implement chapter 220, Laws of 2020 (adult family homes/8 beds). A nonrefundable fee of $485 shall be charged for each application to increase bed capacity at an adult family home to seven or eight beds.(s) The appropriations in this section include sufficient funding to provide access to the individual and family services waiver and the basic plus waiver to those individuals on the service request list as forecasted by the caseload forecast council. For subsequent policy level budgets, the department shall submit a request for funding associated with individuals requesting to receive the individual and family services waiver and the basic plus waiver in accordance with the courtesy forecasts provided by the caseload forecast council.(t) $1,729,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024, (($2,669,000))$1,945,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and (($4,206,000))$3,458,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely to operate intensive habilitation services and enhanced out-of-home services facilities.(u) $1,363,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $1,363,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $2,092,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely for additional staff to reduce the timeline for completion of financial eligibility determinations. No later than December 31, 2024, the department of social and health services shall submit a final report to the appropriate committees of the legislature that details how the funds were utilized and the associated outcomes, including, but not limited to, a description of how the timeline for completion of these determinations has changed.(v) $485,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $484,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely for a feasibility study of the developmental disabilities assessment tool and is subject to the conditions, limitations, and review requirements of section 701 of this act. The resulting study must determine whether the assessment and its technology can be improved to meet regulatory obligations, be quicker and person-centered, reduce manual notations, and maintain viability across age groups and settings.(w) $1,223,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $2,763,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $3,248,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely for supported employment and community inclusion services for those individuals with intellectual or developmental disabilities who are transitioning from high school in the 2023-2025 fiscal biennium and are anticipated to utilize these services.(x) $11,074,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $13,222,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $19,206,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely to increase rates paid to supported employment and community inclusion providers. Within amounts appropriated in this section and no later than October 1, 2024, the department shall submit to the governor and the appropriate committees of the legislature:(i) A forecast of the caseload of individuals anticipated to utilize supported employment and community inclusion services in order to inform operating budget development for the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium. This forecast shall include data that begins with fiscal year 2018 and that delineates the community inclusion caseload from the supported employment caseload and incorporates actual entries and exits; and(ii) An analysis of the county supported employment and community inclusion programs in fiscal years 2018 through 2024 that includes:(A) Data that illustrates, by county and fiscal year, the number of clients served and the number of available providers;(B) Identification of the counties that have an insufficient number of providers with the identification occurring by zip code to the maximum extent possible;(C) Identification of any additional barriers that prevent achieving the anticipated level of service delivery anticipated with chapter 142, Laws of 2022; and(D) Recommendations for resolving the issues noted in (ii)(B) and (C) of this subsection (x).(y)(i) $79,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $76,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $121,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely for the department to develop a plan for implementing an enhanced behavior support specialty contract for community residential supported living, state-operated living alternative, or a group training home to provide intensive behavioral services and support to adults with intellectual and developmental disabilities who require enhanced services and support due to challenging behaviors that cannot be safely and holistically managed in an exclusively community setting, and who are at risk of institutionalization or out-of-state placement, or are transitioning to the community from an intermediate care facility, hospital, or other state-operated residential facility. The enhanced behavior support specialty contract shall be designed to ensure that enhanced behavior support specialty settings serve a maximum capacity of four clients and that they have the adequate levels of staffing to provide 24-hour nonmedical care and supervision of residents.(ii) No later than June 30, 2025, the department must submit to the governor and the appropriate committees of the legislature a report that includes:(A) A detailed description of the design of the enhanced behavior support specialty contract and setting, including a description of and the rationale for the number of staff required within each behavior support specialty setting and the necessary qualifications of these staff;(B) A detailed description of and the rationale for the number of department staff required to manage the enhanced behavior support specialty program;(C) A plan for implementing the enhanced behavior support specialty contracts that includes:(I) An analysis of areas of the state where enhanced behavior support specialty settings are needed, including recommendations for how to phase in the enhanced behavior support specialty settings in these areas; and(II) An analysis of the sufficiency of the provider network to support a phase in of the enhanced behavior support specialty settings, including recommendations for how to further develop this network; and(D) An estimate of the costs to implement the enhanced behavior support specialty settings and program and any necessary recommendations for legislative actions to facilitate the ability of the department to:(I) Enter into contracts and payment arrangements with providers choosing to provide the enhanced behavior support specialty setting and to supplement care in all community-based residential settings with experts trained in enhanced behavior support so that state-operated living alternatives, supported living facilities, and other community-based settings can specialize in the needs of individuals with developmental disabilities who are living with high, complex behavioral support needs;(II) Enter into funding agreements with the health care authority for the provision of applied behavioral analysis and other applicable health care services within the community-based residential setting; and(III) Provide the enhanced behavior support specialty through a medicaid waiver or other federal authority administered by the department, to the extent consistent with federal law and federal funding requirements to receive federal matching funds.(z) $2,494,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $3,345,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the department to provide personal care services for up to 33 clients who are not United States citizens and who are ineligible for medicaid upon their discharge from an acute care hospital. The department must prioritize the funding provided in this subsection for such clients in acute care hospitals who are also on the department's wait list for services.(aa) $2,605,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $2,402,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $3,840,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely to establish transition coordination teams to coordinate transitions of care for clients who move from one care setting to another. The department of social and health services shall submit annual reports no later than December 1, 2023, and December 1, 2024, to the appropriate committees of the legislature that detail how the funds were utilized and the associated outcomes including, but not limited to:(i) A detailed reporting of the number of clients served, the settings in which clients received care, and the progress made toward increasing stability of client placements;(ii) A comparison of these outcomes against the outcomes achieved in prior fiscal years;(iii) A description of lessons learned since the transition coordination teams were first implemented, including an identification of what processes were improved to reduce the timelines for completion; and(iv) Recommendations for changes necessary to the transition coordination teams to improve increasing stability of client placements.(bb) $1,448,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $1,807,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $3,626,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely to pilot a specialty rate for adult family homes to serve up to 100 individuals with intellectual or developmental disabilities who also have co-occurring health or behavioral health diagnoses. No later than December 1, 2024, the department of social and health services shall submit a report to the governor and the appropriate committees of the legislature that details how the funds were utilized and the associated outcomes including, but not limited to:(i) A detailed reporting of the number of clients served and the setting from which each client entered the adult family home receiving this specialty rate;(ii) A comparison of the rate of admissions to the adult family homes receiving this specialty rate against the rate of admissions to other state-operated settings including, but not limited to, state-operated living alternatives, enhanced services facilities, and the transitional care center of Seattle; and(iii) A comparison of the length of stay in the setting from which the client entered the adult family home receiving this specialty rate against the average length of stay in settings prior to entering other state-operated settings including, but not limited to, state-operated living alternatives, enhanced services facilities, and the transitional care center of Seattle.(cc) $2,856,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $3,104,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $5,948,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely to pilot a program that provides a specialty rate for community residential providers who receive additional training to support individuals with complex physical and behavioral health needs.(i) Of the amounts provided in this subsection, $2,453,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $2,705,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $5,259,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely for the specialty rate for community residential providers to serve up to 30 individuals.(ii) Of the amounts provided in this subsection, $403,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $399,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $689,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely for the department to hire staff to support this specialty program, including expanding existing training programs available for community residential providers and to support providers in locating affordable housing.(iii) No later than December 1, 2024, the department of social and health services shall submit a report to the governor and the appropriate committees of the legislature that details how the funds were utilized and the associated outcomes including, but not limited to:(A) A detailed reporting of the number of clients served and the setting from which each client entered the community residential setting receiving this specialty rate;(B) A comparison of the rate of admissions to the community residential setting receiving this specialty rate against the rate of admissions to other community residential settings not receiving this specialty rate as well as against the rate of admissions to other state-operated settings including, but not limited to, state-operated living alternatives, enhanced services facilities, and the transitional care center of Seattle; and(C) A comparison of the length of stay in the setting from which the client entered the community residential setting receiving this specialty rate against the average length of stay in settings prior to entering other community residential settings not receiving this specialty rate as well as prior to entering other state-operated settings including, but not limited to, state-operated living alternatives, enhanced services facilities, and the transitional care center of Seattle.(dd)(i) $104,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 is provided solely for the department to contract with the Ruckleshaus center for a progress report on the recommendations in the December 2019 report, "Rethinking Intellectual and Developmental Disability Policy to Empower Clients, Develop Providers and Improve Services."(ii) By February 29, 2024, a final report shall be submitted to the governor and the appropriate committees of the legislature that includes:(A) Detailed information about the successes and barriers related to meeting the recommendations in the December 2019 report;(B) Identification of other potential issues or options for meeting the recommendations in the December 2019 report, including but not limited to, an exploration of the enhanced behavioral support homes concept;(C) A review of other state's approaches and innovations regarding any of the recommendations in the December 2019 report;(D) Identification of any emergent issues; and(E) Identification or recommendation for the organization of focus groups of state agencies and respective stakeholders.(iii) In compiling the final report, members of the previous workgroup, as well as other interested parties, should be consulted for their feedback and to identify areas where there is potential for agreement to move forward and to make process recommendations if applicable.(ee) $127,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $28,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $55,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely for adult day respite. Of the amounts appropriated in this subsection:(i) $27,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $28,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $55,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely to increase adult day respite rates from $3.40 to $5.45 per 15-minute unit to expand and ensure the sustainability of respite services for clients with intellectual or developmental disabilities and their family caregivers.(ii) $100,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 is provided solely for the department to hire a project position to conduct a study and submit a report by December 1, 2023 to the governor and the appropriate committees of the legislature that examines the feasibility and operational resources needed to add adult day services to a state plan 1915(i) option or to the existing basic plus and core 1915(c) waivers.(ff) $2,500,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $4,284,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $4,178,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely for the department to add 10 adult stabilization beds by June 2025, increase rates for existing adult stabilization beds by 23 percent, and expand mobile crisis diversion services to cover all three regions of the state.(gg)(i) $250,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 is provided solely for the department to study opportunities to enhance data collection on clients in family units with at least one parent having a developmental or intellectual disability. The study must identify:(A) Opportunities to improve the existing assessment form and information technology systems by adding questions about clients' children, such as their ages, the number of children, and the K-12 enrollment status of each child;(B) Ways to strengthen data sharing agreements with other departments, including the department of children, youth, and families, and local school districts;(C) Strategies for surveying clients to collect information on their parenting and living arrangements, including support from other family members;(D) Methods for analyzing new and existing data to determine and identify the total number of children with parents that have a developmental or intellectual disability, their needs, and access to specialized services;(E) An inventory of existing support programs designed for families with a parent having a developmental or intellectual disability and their children, including educational support, financial assistance, and access to specialized services.(ii) The department shall report its findings to the governor and appropriate committees of the legislature by June 30, 2024.(hh) $81,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $219,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $371,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely to implement House Bill No. 1407 (dev. disability/eligibility).(ii) $62,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $72,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $116,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely to implement Second Substitute House Bill No. 1580 (children in crisis).(jj) $63,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $73,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $136,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely for the department to conduct a study to explore opportunities to restructure services offered under the medicaid waivers for individuals with developmental disabilities served by the department. The plan should propose strategies to enhance service accessibility across the state and align services with the needs of clients, taking into account current and future demand. It must incorporate valuable input from knowledgeable stakeholders and a national organization experienced in home and community-based waivers in other states. This plan must be submitted to the governor and relevant legislative committees by December 1, 2024.(kk) $5,431,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $16,626,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $22,279,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely to increase rates by 2.5 percent, effective January 1, 2024, and an additional 2.5 percent, effective January 1, 2025, for community residential service providers offering supported living, group home, group training home, licensed staff residential services, community protection, and children's out-of-home services to individuals with developmental disabilities.(ll) $456,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $898,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $416,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 1188 (child welfare services/DD).(mm) $446,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024, (($5,274,000))$2,974,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and (($2,089,000))$1,037,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5440 (competency evaluations).(nn)(((a)))(i) $2,214,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024((, $10,104,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $2,934,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are))is provided solely for the department to operate a staff-secure, voluntary, and transitional treatment facility specializing in services for adolescents over the age of 13 who have complex developmental, intellectual disabilities, or autism spectrum disorder and may also have a mental health or substance use diagnosis. These individuals require intensive behavioral supports and may also be in need of behavioral health services. Services must be provided at a leased property in Lake Burien, serve no more than 12 youth at one time, and be implemented in a way that prioritizes transition to less restrictive community-based settings. The department shall collaborate with the department of children, youth, and families to identify youth for placement in this setting and regarding appropriate discharge options with a focus on less restrictive community-based settings. Youth shall enter the facility only by their own consent or the consent of their guardian.(((b)))(ii) $13,038,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for the department to operate a transitional facility specializing in treatment for youth aged 13-17 who have intellectual and developmental disabilities, or autism spectrum disorder, and a severe psychiatric diagnosis requiring 24/7 care under the direction of a physician. Youth admitted to the facility require health services wherein treatment modalities and interventions are adapted to specifically provide youth with I/DD benefits from the level of care provided. Services must be provided at a leased property in Burien, serve no more than 12 youth at one time, and be implemented in a way that prioritizes transition to less restrictive community-based settings. Youth shall be voluntarily admitted to the facility by their own consent or the consent of their guardian or legal representative. The department shall collaborate with the department of children, youth, and families to identify youth for placement in this setting and regarding appropriate discharge options with a focus on less restrictive community-based settings.(iii) The department and health care authority shall collaborate in the identification and evaluation of strategies to obtain federal matching funding opportunities, specifically focusing on innovative medicaid framework adjustments and the consideration of necessary state plan amendments. This collaborative effort aims not only to enhance the funding available for the operation of the facility but also to maintain adherence to its fundamental objective of offering voluntary, transitional services. These services are designed to facilitate the transition of youth to community-based settings that are less restrictive, aligning with the facility's commitment to supporting youth with complex needs in a manner that encourages their movement toward independence.(((c)))(iv) By November 1, 2024, the department shall report to the governor and appropriate committees of the legislature on the program's design, results of preliminary implementation, financing opportunities, and recommendations. By June 30, 2025, the department shall report to the governor and appropriate committees of the legislature its initial findings, demographics on children served, and recommendations for program design and expansion.(oo) $175,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 and $175,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely for guardianship fee parity for individuals moving from residential habilitation centers to community supported living programs. This funding aims to maintain equal guardianship fees compared to those moving to adult family homes.(pp) $108,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 and $92,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely to convene a work group to study day habilitation services, ensuring that work group includes individuals with lived experience. The work group must submit a final report to the governor and appropriate committees of the legislature by October 1, 2024, detailing recommendations for the establishment of community-contracted day habilitation services statewide and their inclusion in the medicaid state plan.(qq) $1,260,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 and $970,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely for hiring additional staff to reduce the current caseload ratio, targeting a move from one case manager per 75 clients to one case manager per 66 clients by June 2027.(rr)(i) $361,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 and $387,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided for rates paid, effective January 1, 2025, to independent contractor nurses and agency-employed nurses providing private duty nursing, skilled nursing, and private duty nursing in adult family homes.(ii) The department must adopt a payment model that incorporates the following adjustments for independent contractor nurses:(A) Private duty nursing services shall be $56.58 per hour by a registered nurse and $46.49 per hour by a licensed practical nurse.(B) Skilled nursing services shall be $62.93 per day by a registered nurse.(iii) The department must adopt a payment model that incorporates the following adjustments for agency-employed nurses:(A) Private duty nursing services shall be $67.89 per hour by a registered nurse and $55.79 per hour by a licensed practical nurse.(B) Skilled nursing services shall be $75.52 per day by a registered nurse.(iv) Private duty nursing services in an adult family home shall be $898.95 per day.(ss) $350,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely to establish respite care beds for individuals with intellectual and developmental disabilities in the Tri-Cities.(2) INSTITUTIONAL SERVICESGeneral FundâState Appropriation (FY 2024). . . .$138,715,000General FundâState Appropriation (FY 2025). . . .(($141,014,000))Â Â Â Â Â $141,490,000General FundâFederal Appropriation. . . .(($255,118,000))Â Â Â Â Â $260,541,000General FundâPrivate/Local Appropriation. . . .$19,488,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($554,335,000))Â Â Â Â Â $560,234,000The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(a) Individuals receiving services as supplemental security income (SSI) state supplemental payments may not become eligible for medical assistance under RCW 74.09.510 due solely to the receipt of SSI state supplemental payments.(b) $495,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 ((and $495,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are))is for the department to fulfill its contracts with the school districts under chapter 28A.190 RCW to provide transportation, building space, and other support services as are reasonably necessary to support the educational programs of students living in residential habilitation centers.(c) The residential habilitation centers may use funds appropriated in this subsection to purchase goods, services, and supplies through hospital group purchasing organizations when it is cost-effective to do so.(d) $61,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $61,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $117,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely for implementation of House Bill No. 1128 (personal needs allowance).(e) $73,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 and $73,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 6125 (Lakeland Village records). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2024, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.))(3) PROGRAM SUPPORTGeneral FundâState Appropriation (FY 2024). . . .$3,582,000General FundâState Appropriation (FY 2025). . . .$3,660,000General FundâFederal Appropriation. . . .$4,249,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$11,491,000(4) SPECIAL PROJECTSGeneral FundâState Appropriation (FY 2024). . . .$66,000General FundâState Appropriation (FY 2025). . . .$66,000General FundâFederal Appropriation. . . .$1,094,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$1,226,000Sec. 1204. 2024 c 376 s 204 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICESâAGING AND ADULT SERVICES PROGRAMGeneral FundâState Appropriation (FY 2024). . . .$2,168,094,000General FundâState Appropriation (FY 2025). . . .(($2,415,596,000))Â Â Â Â Â $2,497,282,000General FundâFederal Appropriation. . . .(($5,672,133,000))Â Â Â Â Â $5,787,707,000General FundâPrivate/Local Appropriation. . . .$53,719,000Traumatic Brain Injury AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$4,486,000Skilled Nursing Facility Safety Net Trust AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$133,360,000Long-Term Services and Supports Trust AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$53,701,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($10,501,089,000))Â Â Â Â Â $10,698,349,000The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1)(a) For purposes of implementing chapter 74.46 RCW, the weighted average nursing facility payment rate may not exceed $341.41 for fiscal year 2024 and may not exceed (($364.67))$376.54 for fiscal year 2025. The weighted average nursing facility payment rates in this subsection (1)(a) include the following:(i) $17,361,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $17,361,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $34,722,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely to maintain rate add-ons funded in the 2021-2023 fiscal biennium to address low-wage equity for low-wage direct care workers. To the maximum extent possible, the facility-specific wage rate add-on shall be equal to the wage payment received on June 30, 2023.(ii) $2,227,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $2,227,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $4,456,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely to maintain rate add-ons funded in the 2021-2023 fiscal biennium to address low-wage equity for low-wage indirect care workers. To the maximum extent possible, the facility-specific wage rate add-on shall be equal to the wage payment received on June 30, 2023.(b) The department shall provide a medicaid rate add-on to reimburse the medicaid share of the skilled nursing facility safety net assessment as a medicaid allowable cost. The nursing facility safety net rate add-on may not be included in the calculation of the annual statewide weighted average nursing facility payment rate.(2) In accordance with RCW 18.51.050, 18.20.050, 70.128.060, and 43.135.055, the department is authorized to increase nursing facility, assisted living facility, and adult family home fees as necessary to fully support the actual costs of conducting the licensure, inspection, and regulatory programs. The license fees may not exceed the department's annual licensing and oversight activity costs and shall include the department's cost of paying providers for the amount of the license fee attributed to medicaid clients.(a) The current annual renewal license fee for adult family homes is $225 per bed beginning in fiscal year 2024 and $225 per bed beginning in fiscal year 2025. A processing fee of $2,750 must be charged to each adult family home when the home is initially licensed. This fee is nonrefundable. A processing fee of $700 shall be charged when adult family home providers file a change of ownership application.(b) The current annual renewal license fee for assisted living facilities is $116 per bed beginning in fiscal year 2024 and $116 per bed beginning in fiscal year 2025.(c) The current annual renewal license fee for nursing facilities is $359 per bed beginning in fiscal year 2024 and $359 per bed beginning in fiscal year 2025.(3) The department is authorized to place long-term care clients residing in nursing homes and paid for with state-only funds into less restrictive community care settings while continuing to meet the client's care needs.(4) $69,777,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $113,969,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $237,558,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely for the rate increase for the new consumer-directed employer contracted individual providers as set by the consumer-directed rate setting board in accordance with RCW 74.39A.530.(5) $19,044,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $30,439,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $63,986,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely for the homecare agency parity consistent with the rate set by the consumer-directed employer rate setting board in accordance with RCW 74.39A.530.(6) $2,385,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $4,892,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $12,502,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely for administrative costs of the consumer-directed employer as set by the consumer-directed employer rate setting board in accordance with RCW 74.39A.530.(7) $2,547,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $3,447,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $7,762,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely to increase the administrative rate for home care agencies by 56 cents per hour effective July 1, 2023.(8) $425,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 and $542,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely for funding the unfair labor practice settlement in the case of Adult Family Home Council v Office of Financial Management, PERC case no. 135737-U-22. If the settlement agreement is not reached by June 30, 2024, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.(9) The department may authorize a one-time waiver of all or any portion of the licensing and processing fees required under RCW 70.128.060 in any case in which the department determines that an adult family home is being relicensed because of exceptional circumstances, such as death or incapacity of a provider, and that to require the full payment of the licensing and processing fees would present a hardship to the applicant. In these situations the department is also granted the authority to waive the required residential administrator training for a period of 120 days if necessary to ensure continuity of care during the relicensing process.(10) In accordance with RCW 18.390.030, the biennial registration fee for continuing care retirement communities shall be $900 for each facility.(11) Within amounts appropriated in this subsection, the department shall assist the legislature to continue the work of the joint legislative executive committee on planning for aging and disability issues.(a) A joint legislative executive committee on aging and disability is continued, with members as provided in this subsection.(i) Four members of the senate, with the leaders of the two largest caucuses each appointing two members, and four members of the house of representatives, with the leaders of the two largest caucuses each appointing two members;(ii) A member from the office of the governor, appointed by the governor;(iii) The secretary of the department of social and health services or his or her designee;(iv) The director of the health care authority or his or her designee;(v) A member from disability rights Washington and a member from the office of long-term care ombuds;(vi) The insurance commissioner or his or her designee, who shall serve as an ex officio member; and(vii) Other agency directors or designees as necessary.(b) The committee must make recommendations and continue to identify key strategic actions to prepare for the aging of the population in Washington and to serve people with disabilities, including state budget and policy options, and may conduct, but are not limited to, the following tasks:(i) Identify strategies to better serve the health care needs of an aging population and people with disabilities to promote healthy living and palliative care planning;(ii) Identify strategies and policy options to create financing mechanisms for long-term service and supports that allow individuals and families to meet their needs for service;(iii) Identify policies to promote financial security in retirement, support people who wish to stay in the workplace longer, and expand the availability of workplace retirement savings plans;(iv) Identify ways to promote advance planning and advance care directives and implementation strategies for the Bree collaborative palliative care and related guidelines;(v) Identify ways to meet the needs of the aging demographic impacted by reduced federal support;(vi) Identify ways to protect the rights of vulnerable adults through assisted decision-making and guardianship and other relevant vulnerable adult protections;(vii) Identify options for promoting client safety through residential care services and consider methods of protecting older people and people with disabilities from physical abuse and financial exploitation; and(viii) Identify other policy options and recommendations to help communities adapt to the aging demographic in planning for housing, land use, and transportation.(c) Staff support for the committee shall be provided by the office of program research, senate committee services, the office of financial management, and the department of social and health services.(d) Within existing appropriations, the cost of meetings must be paid jointly by the senate, house of representatives, and the office of financial management. Joint committee expenditures and meetings are subject to approval by the senate facilities and operations committee and the house of representatives executive rules committee, or their successor committees. Meetings of the task force must be scheduled and conducted in accordance with the rules of both the senate and the house of representatives. The joint committee members may be reimbursed for travel expenses as authorized under RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060, and chapter 44.04 RCW as appropriate. Advisory committee members may not receive compensation or reimbursement for travel and expenses.(12) Appropriations in this section are sufficient to fund discharge case managers stationed at the state psychiatric hospitals. Discharge case managers will transition clients ready for hospital discharge into less restrictive alternative community placements. The transition of clients ready for discharge will free up bed capacity at the state psychiatric hospitals.(13) Appropriations in this section are sufficient to fund financial service specialists stationed at the state psychiatric hospitals. Financial service specialists will help to transition clients ready for hospital discharge into alternative community placements. The transition of clients ready for discharge will free up bed capacity at the state hospitals.(14) The department shall continue to administer tailored support for older adults and medicaid alternative care as described in initiative 2 of the 1115 demonstration waiver. This initiative will be funded by the health care authority through the medicaid quality improvement program. The secretary in collaboration with the director of the health care authority shall report to the office of financial management all expenditures of this subsection and shall provide such fiscal data in the time, manner, and form requested. The department shall not increase general fundâstate expenditures on this initiative.(15) $61,209,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $70,352,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $161,960,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely for the implementation of an agreement reached between the governor and the adult family home council under the provisions of chapter 41.56 RCW for the 2023-2025 fiscal biennium, as provided in section 907 of this act.(16) $1,761,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $1,761,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $4,162,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely for case managers at the area agencies on aging to coordinate care for medicaid clients with mental illness who are living in their own homes. Work shall be accomplished within existing standards for case management and no requirements will be added or modified unless by mutual agreement between the department of social and health services and area agencies on aging.(17) Appropriations provided in this section are sufficient for the department to contract with an organization to provide educational materials, legal services, and attorney training to support persons with dementia. The funding provided in this subsection must be used for:(a) An advance care and legal planning toolkit for persons and families living with dementia, designed and made available online and in print. The toolkit should include educational topics including, but not limited to:(i) The importance of early advance care, legal, and financial planning;(ii) The purpose and application of various advance care, legal, and financial documents;(iii) Dementia and capacity;(iv) Long-term care financing considerations;(v) Elder and vulnerable adult abuse and exploitation;(vi) Checklists such as "legal tips for caregivers," "meeting with an attorney," and "life and death planning;"(vii) Standardized forms such as general durable power of attorney forms and advance health care directives; and(viii) A selected list of additional resources.(b) Webinars about the dementia legal and advance care planning toolkit and related issues and topics with subject area experts. The subject area expert presenters must provide their services in-kind, on a volunteer basis.(c) Continuing legal education programs for attorneys to advise and assist persons with dementia. The continuing education programs must be offered at no cost to attorneys who make a commitment to participate in the pro bono program.(d) Administrative support costs to develop intake forms and protocols, perform client intake, match participating attorneys with eligible clients statewide, maintain records and data, and produce reports as needed.(18) Appropriations provided in this section are sufficient to continue community alternative placement beds that prioritize the transition of clients who are ready for discharge from the state psychiatric hospitals, but who have additional long-term care or developmental disability needs.(a) Community alternative placement beds include enhanced service facility beds, adult family home beds, skilled nursing facility beds, shared supportive housing beds, state operated living alternative beds, assisted living facility beds, adult residential care beds, and specialized dementia beds.(b) Each client must receive an individualized assessment prior to leaving one of the state psychiatric hospitals. The individualized assessment must identify and authorize personal care, nursing care, behavioral health stabilization, physical therapy, or other necessary services to meet the unique needs of each client. It is the expectation that, in most cases, staffing ratios in all community alternative placement options described in (a) of this subsection will need to increase to meet the needs of clients leaving the state psychiatric hospitals. If specialized training is necessary to meet the needs of a client before he or she enters a community placement, then the person centered service plan must also identify and authorize this training.(c) When reviewing placement options, the department must consider the safety of other residents, as well as the safety of staff, in a facility. An initial evaluation of each placement, including any documented safety concerns, must occur within thirty days of a client leaving one of the state psychiatric hospitals and entering one of the community placement options described in (a) of this subsection. At a minimum, the department must perform two additional evaluations of each placement during the first year that a client has lived in the facility.(d) In developing bed capacity, the department shall consider the complex needs of individuals waiting for discharge from the state psychiatric hospitals.(19) The annual certification renewal fee for community residential service businesses is $859 per client in fiscal year 2024 and $859 per client in fiscal year 2025. The annual certification renewal fee may not exceed the department's annual licensing and oversight activity costs.(20) $5,094,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $5,094,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for services and support to individuals who are deaf, hard of hearing, or deaf-blind.(21)(a) $63,938,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $40,714,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $110,640,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely for rate adjustments for skilled nursing facilities.(b) Of the amounts provided in (a) of this subsection, $7,700,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 and $7,700,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5802 (nursing rate calculation). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2024, the amounts provided in (b) of this subsection shall lapse.))(22) $32,470,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $44,250,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $84,550,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely for rate adjustments for assisted living providers. Of the amounts provided in this subsection:(a) $23,751,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $29,399,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $59,215,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely to increase funding of the assisted living medicaid methodology established in RCW 74.39A.032 to 79 percent of the labor component and 68 percent of the operations component, effective July 1, 2023; and to 82 percent of the labor component and 68 percent of the operations component, effective July 1, 2024. The department of social and health services shall report, by December 1st of each year, on medicaid resident utilization of and access to assisted living facilities.(b) $5,505,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $6,671,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $13,051,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely for a specialty dementia care rate add-on for all assisted living facilities of $43.48 per patient per day in fiscal year 2024 and $50.00 per patient per day in fiscal year 2025.(c) $2,573,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $7,539,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $10,922,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely for a one-time bridge rate for assisted living facilities, enhanced adult residential centers, and adult residential centers, with high medicaid occupancy. The bridge rate does not replace or substitute the capital add-on rate found in RCW 74.39A.320 and the same methodology from RCW 74.39A.320 shall be used to determine each facility's medicaid occupancy percentage for the purposes of this one-time bridge rate add-on. Facilities with a medicaid occupancy level of 90 percent or more shall receive a $20.99 add-on per resident day effective July 1, 2023, and facilities with a medicaid occupancy level of 75 percent or more shall receive a $20.99 add-on per resident day effective July 1, 2024.(d) $641,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $641,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $1,362,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely to increase the rate add-on for expanded community services by 5 percent.(23) Within available funds, the aging and long term support administration must maintain a unit within adult protective services that specializes in the investigation of financial abuse allegations and self-neglect allegations.(24) The appropriations in this section include sufficient funding to implement chapter 220, Laws of 2020 (adult family homes/8 beds). A nonrefundable fee of $485 shall be charged for each application to increase bed capacity at an adult family home to seven or eight beds.(25) $1,858,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $1,857,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for operation of the volunteer services program. Funding must be prioritized towards serving populations traditionally served by long-term care services to include senior citizens and persons with disabilities.(26) $479,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $989,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the kinship navigator program in the Colville Indian reservation, Yakama Nation, and other tribal areas.(27) The traumatic brain injury council shall collaborate with other state agencies in their efforts to address traumatic brain injuries to ensure that efforts are complimentary and continue to support the state's broader efforts to address this issue.(28) $1,297,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $1,297,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for community-based dementia education and support activities in three areas of the state, including dementia resource catalyst staff and direct services for people with dementia and their caregivers.(29) $5,410,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $9,277,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $14,909,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely for the operating costs associated with the phase-in of enhanced services facilities and specialized dementia care beds that were established with behavioral health community capacity grants.(30)(a) $71,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $68,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $141,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely for the department to develop a plan for implementing an enhanced behavior support specialty contract for community residential supported living, state-operated living alternative, or a group training home to provide intensive behavioral services and support to adults with intellectual and developmental disabilities who require enhanced services and support due to challenging behaviors that cannot be safely and holistically managed in an exclusively community setting, and who are at risk of institutionalization or out-of-state placement, or are transitioning to the community from an intermediate care facility, hospital, or other state-operated residential facility. The enhanced behavior support specialty contract shall be designed to ensure that enhanced behavior support specialty settings serve a maximum capacity of four clients and that they have the adequate levels of staffing to provide 24-hour nonmedical care and supervision of residents.(b) No later than June 30, 2025, the department must submit to the governor and the appropriate committees of the legislature a report that includes:(i) A detailed description of the design of the enhanced behavior support specialty contract and setting, including a description of and the rationale for the number of staff required within each behavior support specialty setting and the necessary qualifications of these staff;(ii) A detailed description of and the rationale for the number of department staff required to manage the enhanced behavior support specialty program;(iii) A plan for implementing the enhanced behavior support specialty contracts that includes:(A) An analysis of areas of the state where enhanced behavior support specialty settings are needed, including recommendations for how to phase in the enhanced behavior support specialty settings in these areas; and(B) An analysis of the sufficiency of the provider network to support a phase in of the enhanced behavior support specialty settings, including recommendations for how to further develop this network; and(iv) An estimate of the costs to implement the enhanced behavior support specialty settings and program and any necessary recommendations for legislative actions to facilitate the ability of the department to:(A) Enter into contracts and payment arrangements with providers choosing to provide the enhanced behavior support specialty setting and to supplement care in all community-based residential settings with experts trained in enhanced behavior support so that state-operated living alternatives, supported living facilities, and other community-based settings can specialize in the needs of individuals with developmental disabilities who are living with high, complex behavioral support needs;(B) Enter into funding agreements with the health care authority for the provision of applied behavioral analysis and other applicable health care services within the community-based residential setting; and(C) Provide the enhanced behavior support specialty through a medicaid waiver or other federal authority administered by the department, to the extent consistent with federal law and federal funding requirements to receive federal matching funds.(31) $2,551,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $3,134,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $70,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely for the kinship care support program. Of the amounts provided in this subsection:(a) $1,344,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $1,944,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the kinship care support program.(b) $344,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $323,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely to continue the kinship navigator case management pilot program.(c) $863,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $867,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $70,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely for kinship navigators, including an increase in the number of kinship navigators so that each area agency on aging has one kinship navigator and King county has two kinship navigators.(32) $2,574,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $2,567,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the department to provide personal care services for up to 40 clients who are not United States citizens and who are ineligible for medicaid upon their discharge from an acute care hospital. The department must prioritize the funding provided in this subsection for such clients in acute care hospitals who are also on the department's wait list for services.(33) $691,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $658,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $1,347,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely for the department to provide staff support to the difficult to discharge task force described in section 133(11) of this act, including any associated ad hoc subgroups, and to develop home and community services assessment timeliness requirements for pilot participants in cooperation with the health care authority as described in section 211(64) of this act.(34) $125,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $125,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for a study of functional assessments conducted by the department prior to acute care hospital discharge and placement in a post-acute facility. No later than June 30, 2025, a report must be submitted to the governor and the appropriate committees of the legislature that evaluates:(a) The timeliness of the completion of these assessments;(b) How requiring these assessments impacts:(i) The length of a patient's hospital stay;(ii) The patient's medical, emotional, and mental well-being;(iii) The hospital staff who care for these patients; and(iv) Access to inpatient and emergency beds for other patients;(c) Best practices from other states for placing hospitalized patients in post-acute care settings in a timely and effective manner that includes:(i) Identification of the states that require these assessments prior to post-acute placement; and(ii) An analysis of a patient's hospital length of stay and a patient's medical, emotional, and mental well-being in states that require these assessments compared to the states that do not; and(d) The potential benefits of, and barriers to, outsourcing some or all of the functional assessment process to hospitals. Barriers evaluated must include department policies regarding staff workloads, outsourcing work, and computer system access.(35) $63,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $73,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $136,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely to employ and train staff for outreach efforts aimed at connecting adult family home owners and their employees with health care coverage through the adult family home training network as outlined in RCW 70.128.305. These outreach activities must consist of:(a) Informing adult family home owners and their employees about various health insurance options;(b) Creating and distributing culturally and linguistically relevant materials to assist these individuals in accessing affordable or free health insurance plans;(c) Offering continuous technical support to adult family home owners and their employees regarding health insurance options and the application process; and(d) Providing technical assistance as a certified assister for the health benefit exchange, enabling adult family home owners and their employees to comprehend, compare, apply for, and enroll in health insurance via Washington healthplanfinder. Participation in the certified assister program is dependent on meeting contractual, security, and other program requirements set by the health benefit exchange.(36) $300,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 is provided solely for the department, in collaboration with the office of the insurance commissioner and the office of the attorney general, to create a regulatory oversight plan for continuing care retirement communities, focusing primarily on establishing and implementing resident consumer protections, as recommended in the 2022 report of the office of the insurance commissioner. As part of the process, the agencies must engage with relevant stakeholder groups for consultation. The final plan must be submitted to the health care committees of the legislature by December 1, 2024.(37) $11,509,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024, (($15,363,000))$12,834,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and (($27,344,000))$24,815,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely for nursing home services and emergent building costs at the transitional care center of Seattle. No later than December 1, 2024, the department must submit to the appropriate fiscal committees of the legislature a report that includes, but is not limited to:(a) An itemization of the costs associated with providing direct care services to residents and managing and caring for the facility; and(b) An examination of the impacts of this facility on clients and providers of the long-term care and medical care sectors of the state that includes, but is not limited to:(i) An analysis of areas that have realized cost containment or savings as a result of this facility;(ii) A comparison of individuals transitioned from hospitals to this facility compared to other skilled nursing facilities over the same period of time; and(iii) Impacts of this facility on lengths of stay in acute care hospitals, other skilled nursing facility, and transitions to home and community-based settings.(38) $911,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $935,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $365,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely for implementation of House Bill No. 1128 (personal needs allowance).(39) $562,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $673,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $1,244,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely to increase rates for long-term care case management services offered by area agencies on aging. The department must include this adjustment in the monthly per client rates paid to these agencies for case management services in the governor's projected maintenance level budget process, in accordance with RCW 43.88.030.(40) $500,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $1,000,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $1,500,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely to contract with an organization to design and deliver culturally and linguistically competent training programs for home care workers, including individual providers. Of the amounts provided in this subsection, $500,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 and $500,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely to develop and implement training programs on emergency preparedness related to climate-related events.(41) $200,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $200,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $400,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely for a pilot project focused on providing translation services for interpreting mandatory training courses offered through the adult family home training network. The department of social and health services must collaborate with the adult family home council and the adult family home training network to assess the pilot project's outcomes. The department of social and health services shall submit a comprehensive report detailing the results to the governor and the appropriate committees of the legislature no later than September 30, 2025.(42) $635,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $635,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely to continue the current pilot projects to provide personal care services to homeless seniors and people with disabilities from the time the person presents at a shelter to the time they become eligible for medicaid.(43) $75,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $72,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $147,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 1188 (child welfare services/DD).(44) $125,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $125,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $250,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely for the department, in collaboration with the consumer directed employer and home care agencies, to establish guidelines, collect and analyze data, and research the reasons and timing behind home care workers leaving the workforce.(45) $703,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024, (($3,297,000))$176,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and (($2,735,000))$671,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5440 (competency evaluations).(46)(a) $4,792,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $4,894,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $9,881,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely to support providers that are ready to accept patients who are in acute care beds and no longer require inpatient care, but are unable to be transitioned to appropriate postacute care settings. These patients are generally referred to as difficult to discharge hospital patients because of their behaviors.(i) The department shall broaden the current discharge and referral case management practices for difficult to discharge hospital patients waiting in acute care hospitals to include referrals to all long-term care behavioral health settings, including enhanced services facilities, enhanced adult residential care, and enhanced adult residential care with community stability supports contracts or community behavioral health support services, including supportive supervision and oversight and skills development and restoration. These home and community-based providers are contracted to provide various levels of personal care, nursing, and behavior supports for difficult to discharge hospital patients with significant behavior support needs.(ii) Patients ready to discharge from acute care hospitals with diagnosed behaviors or behavior history, and a likelihood of unsuccessful placement in other licensed long-term care facilities, a history of rejected applications for admissions, or a history of unsuccessful placements shall be fully eligible for referral to available beds in enhanced services facilities or enhanced adult residential care with contracts that adequately meet the patient's long-term care needs.(iii) Previous or current detainment under the involuntary treatment act shall not be a requirement for individuals in acute care hospitals to be eligible for these specialized settings. The department shall develop a standard process for acute care hospitals to refer patients to the department for placement in enhanced services facilities and enhanced adult residential care with contracts to provide behavior support.(b) The department must adopt a payment model that incorporates the following adjustments:(i) The enhanced behavior services plus and enhanced behavior services respite rates for skilled nursing facilities shall be converted to $175 per patient per day add-on in addition to daily base rates to recognize additional staffing and care needs for patients with behaviors.(ii) Enhanced behavior services plus with specialized services rates for skilled nursing facilities shall be converted to $235 per patient per day add-on on top of daily base rates.(iii) The ventilator rate add-on for all skilled nursing facilities shall be $192 per patient per day.(iv) The tracheotomy rate add-on for all skilled nursing facilities shall be $123 per patient per day.(c) Of the amounts provided in (a) of this subsection, $3,838,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $3,917,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $7,911,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely for an increase in the daily rate for enhanced services facilities to $596.10 per patient per day.(47) $926,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for the office of the deaf and hard of hearing within the department to establish a work group to address the statewide shortage of qualified and certified American sign language interpreters and protactile interpreters. The work group shall focus on developing training and certification standards, developing strategies for increasing interpreter numbers across all communities, for enhancing professional development, and for creating pathways to allow interpreters to be financially supported to work statewide. The work group shall primarily be comprised of individuals who identify as deaf, deafblind, and hard of hearing who use American sign language or protactile, with priority for members from historically marginalized communities. The work group shall provide a final report, including recommendations and a plan for implementation, to the governor and appropriate committees of the legislature by June 30, 2025.(48) $830,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 and $80,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely for the department, in collaboration with the office of the insurance commissioner and the health care authority, to develop a plan for a phase-in of an essential worker health benefits program.(a) By December 15, 2024, the department must submit to the appropriate policy and fiscal committees of the legislature an implementation plan to provide nursing home workers with high quality, affordable health coverage through participating nursing home employers beginning January 1, 2026. The implementation plan should address:(i) The likelihood that the state can obtain approval of supplemental medicaid payments for the program;(ii) As assessment of current employee health benefit spending by nursing homes participating in the medicaid program, including current health benefit plan eligibility, plan design, employee cost-sharing, and employer premium contributions;(iii) A mechanism to ensure that nursing home employers participating in the program maintain spending on health benefits such that medicaid payments supplement and do not supplant their health benefit spending;(iv) The appropriate structure and oversight of the newly established health benefits fund, including the use of an established Taft-Hartley fund, fully insured health coverage, or a self-funded multiemployer welfare arrangement that offers health benefits comparable to the platinum metal level under the affordable care act, including any statutory or regulatory changes necessary to ensure that the plan meets defined plan design, consumer protection, and solvency requirements.(b) In preparing the implementation plan, the department, commissioner, and authority must review the design and impacts of the essential worker health care trust in Oregon and other similar publicly supported programs from other jurisdictions.(c) The department must consult with interested organizations in development of the implementation plan.(d) The department may contract with third parties and consult with other state entities to conduct all or any portion of the study, including actuarial analysis.(e) A minimum of $750,000 of the amounts provided in this subsection (48) must be contracted with an entity that is managed through a labor-management partnership. This entity must already be providing health care benefits to no fewer than 20,000 long-term care workers in the state of Washington and should have at least five years of experience in administering health care benefits to this workforce. Their joint efforts will focus on examining the health care needs specific to the nursing home workforce in the state, formulating a benefit plan that effectively addresses these needs, determining the financial requirement to offer such benefits, developing informational materials on health benefits tailored for nursing home workers, and establishing procedures and systems necessary for enrolling employees in the plan, subject to legislative appropriation for implementation.(49) $25,990,000 of the long-term services and supports trust accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the information technology project for the long-term services and supports trust program, and is subject to the conditions, limitations, and review requirements of section 701 of this act.(50) $12,000,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for the area agencies on aging to maintain senior nutrition services. This includes, but is not limited to, meals at sites, through pantries, and home-delivery.(51) $125,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for the Washington traumatic brain injury strategic partnership advisory council to support at least one in-person support group in each region of the state served by an accountable community of health as defined in RCW 82.04.43395. The council shall provide recommendations to the department on the criteria to be used in selecting the programs to receive funding. The criteria must reflect the diversity of individuals with traumatic brain injuries, including the range of cognitive and financial barriers that individuals with traumatic brain injuries may experience when accessing web-based services. Preference must be given to programs that facilitate support groups led by individuals with direct lived experience with traumatic brain injuries or individuals certified as brain injury specialists. Each program that receives funding under this section must ensure that the in-person or virtual support groups meet at least quarterly and are free of charge. The department must approve at least one facilitation training curriculum specific to brain injury to be used by the programs that receive funding under this section.(52) $440,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 and $560,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely for implementation of Substitute House Bill No. 1942 (long-term care providers). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2024, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.))(53) $843,000 of the long-term services and supports trust accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the department to create a secure online portal to allow program participants to view a summary statement of their benefits.(54) $641,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 and $641,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely for a 20 percent increase in the rates for adult day care and adult day health.(55)(a) $408,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 and $438,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided for rates paid, effective January 1, 2025, to independent contractor nurses and agency-employed nurses providing private duty nursing, skilled nursing, and private duty nursing in adult family homes.(b) The department must adopt a payment model that incorporates the following adjustments for independent contractor nurses:(i) Private duty nursing services shall be $56.58 per hour by a registered nurse and $46.49 per hour by a licensed practical nurse.(ii) Skilled nursing services shall be $62.93 per day by a registered nurse.(c) The department must adopt a payment model that incorporates the following adjustments for agency-employed nurses:(i) Private duty nursing services shall be $67.89 per hour by a registered nurse and $55.79 per hour by a licensed practical nurse.(ii) Skilled nursing services shall be $75.52 per day by a registered nurse.(d) Private duty nursing services in an adult family home shall be $898.95 per day.(56) $38,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 and $39,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute House Bill No. 1941 (health home serv./children). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2024, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.))(57)(a) Within amounts appropriated in this section, the department shall convene a work group comprised of representatives from the department of social and health services, the department of commerce, the health care authority, and organizations representing relevant assisted living and housing providers utilizing department of housing and urban development housing choice vouchers in assisted living facilities to examine how assisted living facilities can use these vouchers for medicaid residents in a manner that aligns with federal requirements and does not negatively impact receipt of federal medicaid funding.(b) The work group shall submit a preliminary report by December 1, 2024, to the governor and the appropriate committees of the legislature that includes any findings and policy recommendations for how to use housing and urban development project-based rental vouchers for medicaid residents living in licensed assisted living facilities. The work group findings must identify any barriers within the state and federal systems that would prevent the use of housing and urban development project-based rental vouchers for medicaid residents, including, but not limited to, licensing requirements and duplication of services.(c) It is the intent of the legislature that this work group will continue its work through September 30, 2025, in order to facilitate completion of a final report to the governor and the appropriate committees of the legislature at that time.Sec. 1205. 2024 c 376 s 205 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICESâECONOMIC SERVICES PROGRAMGeneral FundâState Appropriation (FY 2024). . . .$679,581,000General FundâState Appropriation (FY 2025). . . .(($771,647,000))Â Â Â Â Â $1,130,866,000General FundâFederal Appropriation. . . .(($1,694,306,000))Â Â Â Â Â $1,921,249,000General FundâPrivate/Local Appropriation. . . .$5,274,000Domestic Violence Prevention AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$2,404,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($3,153,212,000))Â Â Â Â Â $3,739,374,000The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1)(a) $177,407,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024, (($199,303,000))$202,559,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and (($853,786,000))$854,033,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely for all components of the WorkFirst program. Within the amounts provided for the WorkFirst program, the department may provide assistance using state-only funds for families eligible for temporary assistance for needy families. The department must create a WorkFirst budget structure that allows for transparent tracking of budget units and subunits of expenditures where these units and subunits are mutually exclusive from other department budget units. The budget structure must include budget units for the following: Cash assistance, child care, WorkFirst activities, and administration of the program. Within these budget units, the department must develop program index codes for specific activities and develop allotments and track expenditures using these codes. The department shall report to the office of financial management and the relevant fiscal and policy committees of the legislature prior to adopting a structure change.(b) (($482,615,000))$500,478,000 of the amounts in (a) of this subsection is for assistance to clients, including grants, diversion cash assistance, and additional diversion emergency assistance including but not limited to assistance authorized under RCW 74.08A.210. The department may use state funds to provide support to working families that are eligible for temporary assistance for needy families but otherwise not receiving cash assistance. Of the amounts provided in this subsection (1)(b):(i) $17,315,000 of the ((general fundâfederal appropriation))amount in this subsection (1)(b) is provided solely to increase the temporary assistance for needy families and state family assistance cash grants by $100 per month for households with a child under the age of three, effective November 1, 2023. The funding is intended to assist families with the cost of diapers as described in chapter 100, Laws of 2022.(ii) $3,060,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $4,665,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $19,000,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely for the department to increase temporary assistance for needy families grants by eight percent, effective January 1, 2024.(iii) $296,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $5,293,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $1,089,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute House Bill No. 1447 (assistance programs).(iv) $632,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for the replacement of skimmed or cloned cash benefits for impacted recipients. Benefits may be replaced up to two times each federal fiscal year for the temporary assistance for needy families and the state family assistance program. The replacement of stolen benefits shall align with the supplemental food assistance program benefit replacement guidelines in the consolidated appropriations act, 2023 (136 Stat. 4459). Any unspent funds in this subsection (1)(b)(iv) shall lapse on September 30, 2024, or on the date that the federal government ends the requirement that stolen supplemental nutrition assistance program benefits must be replaced, whichever is later.(v) $656,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for implementation of Substitute House Bill No. 2007 (cash assistance time limits). ((If this bill is not enacted by June 30, 2024, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.))(c) (($167,762,000))$165,510,000 of the amounts in (a) of this subsection is for WorkFirst job search, education and training activities, barrier removal services, limited English proficiency services, and tribal assistance under RCW 74.08A.040. The department must allocate this funding based on client outcomes and cost effectiveness measures. Within amounts provided in this subsection (1)(c), the department shall implement the working family support program.(i) $2,474,000 of the amounts provided in this subsection (1)(c) is for enhanced transportation assistance. The department must prioritize the use of these funds for the recipients most in need of financial assistance to facilitate their return to work. The department must not utilize these funds to supplant repayment arrangements that are currently in place to facilitate the reinstatement of drivers' licenses.(ii) $482,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $1,417,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the costs associated with increasing the temporary assistance for needy families grants by eight percent, effective January 1, 2024.(iii) $185,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $1,820,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute House Bill No. 1447 (assistance programs).(iv) $52,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for implementation of Substitute House Bill No. 2007 (cash assistance time limits). ((If this bill is not enacted by June 30, 2024, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.))(d) Of the amounts in (a) of this subsection, $353,402,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation is for the working connections child care program under RCW 43.216.020 within the department of children, youth, and families. The department is the lead agency for and recipient of the federal temporary assistance for needy families grant. A portion of this grant must be used to fund child care subsidies expenditures at the department of children, youth, and families.(i) The department of social and health services shall work in collaboration with the department of children, youth, and families to determine the appropriate amount of state expenditures for the working connections child care program to claim towards the state's maintenance of effort for the temporary assistance for needy families program. The departments will also collaborate to track the average monthly child care subsidy caseload and expenditures by fund type, including child care development fund, general fundâstate appropriation, and temporary assistance for needy families for the purpose of estimating the annual temporary assistance for needy families reimbursement from the department of social and health services to the department of children, youth, and families.(ii) Effective December 1, 2023, and annually thereafter, the department of children, youth, and families must report to the governor and the appropriate fiscal and policy committees of the legislature the total state contribution for the working connections child care program claimed the previous fiscal year towards the state's maintenance of effort for the temporary assistance for needy families program and the total temporary assistance for needy families reimbursement from the department of social and health services for the previous fiscal year.(e) Of the amounts in (a) of this subsection, $68,496,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation is for child welfare services within the department of children, youth, and families.(f) Of the amounts in (a) of this subsection, (($158,221,000))$146,114,000 is for WorkFirst administration and overhead. Of the amounts provided in this subsection (1)(f):(i) $147,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $69,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for costs associated with increasing the temporary assistance for needy families grants by eight percent, effective January 1, 2024.(ii) $204,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $179,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $575,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute House Bill No. 1447 (assistance programs).(iii) $10,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely to process skimmed or cloned cash benefits for impacted recipients of the temporary assistance for needy families or state family assistance programs. Any unspent funds in this subsection (1)(f)(iii) shall lapse on September 30, 2024, or on the date that the federal government ends the requirement that stolen supplemental nutrition assistance program benefits must be replaced, whichever is later.(iv) $352,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for implementation of Substitute House Bill No. 2007 (cash assistance time limits). ((If this bill is not enacted by June 30, 2024, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.))(v) $407,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Substitute House Bill No. 1652 (child support pass through). ((If this bill is not enacted by June 30, 2024, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.))(g)(i) The department shall submit quarterly expenditure reports to the governor, the fiscal committees of the legislature, and the legislative WorkFirst poverty reduction oversight task force under RCW 74.08A.341. In addition to these requirements, the department must detail any fund transfers across budget units identified in (a) through (e) of this subsection. The department shall not initiate any services that require expenditure of state general fund moneys that are not consistent with policies established by the legislature.(ii) The department may transfer up to 10 percent of funding between budget units identified in (b) through (f) of this subsection. The department shall provide notification prior to any transfer to the office of financial management and to the appropriate legislative committees and the legislative-executive WorkFirst poverty reduction oversight task force. The approval of the director of financial management is required prior to any transfer under this subsection.(h) On January 2nd and July 1st of each year, the department shall provide a maintenance of effort and participation rate tracking report for temporary assistance for needy families to the office of financial management, the appropriate policy and fiscal committees of the legislature, and the legislative-executive WorkFirst poverty reduction oversight task force. The report must detail the following information for temporary assistance for needy families:(i) An overview of federal rules related to maintenance of effort, excess maintenance of effort, participation rates for temporary assistance for needy families, and the child care development fund as it pertains to maintenance of effort and participation rates;(ii) Countable maintenance of effort and excess maintenance of effort, by source, provided for the previous federal fiscal year;(iii) Countable maintenance of effort and excess maintenance of effort, by source, for the current fiscal year, including changes in countable maintenance of effort from the previous year;(iv) The status of reportable federal participation rate requirements, including any impact of excess maintenance of effort on participation targets;(v) Potential new sources of maintenance of effort and progress to obtain additional maintenance of effort;(vi) A two-year projection for meeting federal block grant and contingency fund maintenance of effort, participation targets, and future reportable federal participation rate requirements; and(vii) Proposed and enacted federal law changes affecting maintenance of effort or the participation rate, what impact these changes have on Washington's temporary assistance for needy families program, and the department's plan to comply with these changes.(i) In the 2023-2025 fiscal biennium, it is the intent of the legislature to provide appropriations from the state general fund for the purposes of (a) of this subsection if the department does not receive additional federal temporary assistance for needy families contingency funds in each fiscal year as assumed in the budget outlook.(2) $3,545,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $3,545,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for naturalization services.(3) $2,366,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 is provided solely for employment services for refugees and immigrants, of which $1,774,000 is provided solely for the department to pass through to statewide refugee and immigrant assistance organizations for limited English proficiency pathway services; and $2,366,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for employment services for refugees and immigrants, of which $1,774,000 is provided solely for the department to pass through to statewide refugee and immigrant assistance organizations for limited English proficiency pathway services.(4) On January 1, 2024, and January 1, 2025, the department must report to the governor and the legislature on all sources of funding available for both refugee and immigrant services and naturalization services during the current fiscal year and the amounts expended to date by service type and funding source. The report must also include the number of clients served and outcome data for the clients.(5) To ensure expenditures remain within available funds appropriated in this section, the legislature establishes the benefit under the state food assistance program, pursuant to RCW 74.08A.120, to be 100 percent of the federal supplemental nutrition assistance program benefit amount.(6) The department shall review clients receiving services through the aged, blind, or disabled assistance program, to determine whether they would benefit from assistance in becoming naturalized citizens, and thus be eligible to receive federal supplemental security income benefits. Those cases shall be given high priority for naturalization funding through the department.(7) The department shall continue the interagency agreement with the department of veterans' affairs to establish a process for referral of veterans who may be eligible for veterans' services. This agreement must include out-stationing department of veterans' affairs staff in selected community service office locations in King and Pierce counties to facilitate applications for veterans' services.(8) $1,500,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $2,500,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for operational support of the Washington information network 211 organization.(9) $377,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 ((and $377,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are))is provided solely for the consolidated emergency assistance program.(10) $560,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $560,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for a state-funded employment and training program for recipients of the state's food assistance program.(11) $4,999,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $6,843,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $27,765,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely for the integrated eligibility and enrollment modernization project to create a comprehensive application and benefit status tracker for multiple programs, an application and enrollment portal for multiple programs, and to establish a foundational platform. Funding is subject to the conditions, limitations, and review requirements of section 701 of this act.(12) $1,993,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $1,230,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $7,576,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely for the integrated eligibility and enrollment modernization project for the discovery, innovation, and customer experience phase. Funding is subject to the conditions, limitations, and review requirements of section 701 of this act.(13) $2,267,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $2,638,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $11,481,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely for the integrated eligibility and enrollment modernization project office.(14) $1,965,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 and $3,634,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely for the integrated eligibility and enrollment modernization project for the alignment of eligibility rules in accordance with the federal center for medicare and medicaid services' regulations in 42 C.F.R. Sec. 433.112(b) and in coordination with the health benefit exchange. Funding is subject to the conditions, limitations, and review requirements of section 701 of this act.(15) $189,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $953,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the expansion of the ongoing additional requirements program, effective April 1, 2024. Of the amount provided in this subsection, the maximum amount that may be expended on new items added to the ongoing additional requirements program is $53,000 in fiscal year 2024 and $710,000 in fiscal year 2025.(((15)))(16)(a) $500,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $500,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for sponsorship stabilization funds for eligible unaccompanied children and their sponsors and a study to assess needs and develop recommendations for ongoing supports for this population.(b) Of the amounts provided in (a) of this subsection, $350,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $350,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for sponsorship stabilization funds for eligible unaccompanied children and their sponsors in order to address financial hardship and support household well-being. Stabilization funds can be used to support the sponsorship household with costs of housing, childcare, transportation, internet and data services, household goods, and other unmet needs. The funds may be provided on behalf of an unaccompanied child when the following eligibility criteria are met:(i) The unaccompanied child is between the ages of 0-17, has been placed in Washington under the care of a nonparental sponsor following release from the United States office of refugee resettlement custody, and has not been reunified with a parent; and(ii) The sponsorship household demonstrates financial need and has an income below 250 percent of the federal poverty level. A sponsorship household receiving stabilization funds on behalf of a child who turns 18 may continue to receive funds for an additional 60 days after the child reaches 18 years of age.(c) The department may work with community-based organizations to administer sponsorship stabilization supports. Up to 10 percent of the amounts provided in (b) of this subsection may be used by the community-based organizations to cover administrative expenses associated with the distribution of these supports.(d) Of the amounts provided in (a) of this subsection, $150,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $150,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely to cover the administrative resources necessary for the department to administer the sponsorship stabilization program and to convene a work group with the department of children, youth, and families, department of commerce's office of homeless youth prevention and programs, stakeholders, and community-based organization who have pertinent information regarding sponsorship households. The work group shall identify and analyze the resource and service needs for unaccompanied children and their sponsors, including the types and levels of financial supports and related services that will promote stability of sponsorship placements for this population.(i) The department must produce a report that includes an overview of the number of impacted children and sponsors, existing services and supports that are available, any gaps in services, and potential changes to federal programs and policies that could impact unaccompanied children. The report shall include recommendations for how state agencies and community organizations can partner with the federal government to support sponsorship households, proposed services and supports that the state could provide to promote the ongoing stability of sponsorship households, and a recommended service delivery model.(ii) The department shall submit the report required by (d)(i) of this subsection (((15)))(16) to the governor and appropriate legislative committees no later than June 30, 2025.(((16)))(17) $111,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $1,016,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $21,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute House Bill No. 1447 (assistance programs) for the aged, blind, or disabled, refugee cash assistance, pregnant women assistance, and consolidated emergency assistance programs.(((17)))(18) $500,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 is provided solely for the department to contract with an organization located in Seattle with expertise in culturally and linguistically appropriate communications and outreach to conduct an outreach, education, and media campaign related to communities significantly impacted by or at risk for benefits trafficking, skimming, or other fraudulent activities, with particular focus on immigrant, refugee, migrant, and senior populations. This campaign must provide community-focused, culturally and linguistically appropriate education and assistance targeted to meet the needs of each community and related to safeguarding public assistance benefits provided through an electronic benefit card and how to avoid the trafficking or skimming of benefits. To the extent practical, the department must make available information and data to refine this campaign for those communities most impacted to ensure inclusion of any relevant groups not already identified in this provision. The contracted organization, in collaboration with the department, must focus its outreach in highly impacted geographic areas including, but not limited to, Burien, Federal Way, Kent, Lynnwood, White Center, West Seattle, Seattle's International District, Chinatown, and the Central District, Yakima and other identified locations.(((18)))(19) $10,881,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $10,416,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025, $6,734,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation, and $2,404,000 of the domestic violence prevention accountâstate appropriation are provided solely for domestic violence victim services. Of the amounts provided in this subsection:(a) $750,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 must be distributed to domestic violence services providers proportionately, based upon bed capacity; and(b) $285,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 must be distributed to domestic violence emergency shelters that are experiencing a reduction in compensation/FTE enhancements funding from the department of social and health services, and funding must be used to continue current service levels to survivors of domestic violence. Funding in this subsection (b) must be allocated as follows:(i) $70,000 is for a department-contracted shelter providing services in Thurston county;(ii) $50,000 is for a department-contracted shelter providing services in Spokane county;(iii) $45,000 is for a department-contracted shelter providing services in Lewis county;(iv) $40,000 is for a department-contracted shelter providing services in eastern Clallam county;(v) $30,000 is for a department-contracted shelter providing services in northern Yakima county;(vi) $25,000 is for a department-contracted shelter providing services in Mason county; and(vii) $25,000 is for a department-contracted shelter providing services in Cowlitz county.(((19)))(20) $1,100,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and (($715,000))$976,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the department to meet the terms of its settlement agreement with the United States department of agriculture (USDA).(a) Of the amounts provided in this subsection, $500,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 is provided solely for the department to repay USDA as part of the settlement agreement.(b) Of the amounts provided in this subsection, $600,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and (($715,000))$976,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the department to fund employment and training program services and activities targeted to able-bodied adults without dependents receiving food benefits from the USDA supplemental nutrition assistance program, but open to all basic food employment and training participants including participants who are not able-bodied adults without dependents.(((20)))(21) $3,844,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $7,921,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $1,374,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely for the department to increase the aged, blind, or disabled, refugee cash assistance, pregnant women assistance, and consolidated emergency assistance grants by eight percent, effective January 1, 2024.(((21)))(22) $950,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $950,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for a nonprofit organization in Pierce county to continue the operation of the guaranteed basic income program in Tacoma.(((22)))(23) $58,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $59,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely to implement Substitute Senate Bill No. 5398 (domestic violence funding).(((23)))(24) $113,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024, (($1,487,000))$429,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and (($1,599,000))$540,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely to fully integrate the asset verification system into the automated client eligibility system (ACES).(((24)))(25) $16,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $34,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely to implement the changes made to the state supplemental payment program in chapter 201, Laws of 2023.(((25)))(26) $51,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $178,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the staffing necessary to process medical assistance cases resulting from the July 1, 2024, implementation for the apple health expansion program.(((26)))(27) $1,393,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024, (($5,888,000))$7,043,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and (($6,995,000))$7,338,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely for the transition of the automated client eligibility system (ACES) mainframe hardware operations to cloud technologies, using an enterprise contracted service through the consolidated technology services agency. Funding is subject to the conditions, limitations, and review requirements of section 701 of this act.(((27)))(28) $5,024,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024, (($7,206,000))$7,931,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and (($12,230,000))$12,956,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely for the implementation of the summer electronic benefit transfer program for the summer break months following the 2023-2024 and 2024-2025 school years. The program implementation must align with the federal summer electronic benefit program requirements defined in the consolidated appropriations act, 2023 (136 Stat. 4459). The department may use a third-party entity to administer the program.(((28)))(29) $10,904,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024, (($464,000))$490,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and (($10,921,000))$10,895,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely to cover the increased costs of the maintenance and operations of the automated client eligibility system (ACES), including but not limited to a one-time vendor transition.(((29)))(30) $251,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 and $21,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely to process and replace skimmed or cloned cash and food benefits for impacted recipients. Benefits may be replaced up to two times each federal fiscal year for the pregnant women assistance, refugee cash assistance, aged, blind, or disabled assistance, and state food assistance program. The replacement of stolen cash and food benefits shall align with the supplemental food assistance program benefit replacement guidelines in the consolidated appropriations act, 2023 (136 Stat. 4459). Any unspent funds in this subsection shall lapse on September 30, 2024, or on the date that the federal government ends the requirement that stolen supplemental nutrition assistance program benefits must be replaced, whichever is later.(((30)))(31)(a) $250,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $25,000,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely to the office of refugee and immigrant assistance to expand support services for individuals newly arriving to the United States and Washington who do not qualify for federal refugee resettlement program services. Support services include, but are not limited to, housing assistance, food, transportation, childhood education services, education and employment supports, connection to legal services, and social services navigation.(b) Of the amounts in (a) of this subsection, $250,000 for fiscal year 2024 and $750,000 for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for school districts who have seen a significant increase in McKinney-Vento students seeking asylum with the opportunity to receive grants that provide students in their district with additional education opportunities and family supports.(c) Of the amounts in (a) of this subsection, $700,000 for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for members of the Sub-Saharan African community.(d) Of the amounts in (a) of this subsection, $810,000 for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for staffing at the office of refugee and immigrant assistance to cover the administrative expenses of implementing this subsection.(((31)))(32)(a) $593,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $1,406,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $193,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely to implement changes made through the fiscal responsibility act of 2023 (137 Stat. 10) for the supplemental nutrition assistance program's work requirements for able-bodied adults without dependents, and the corresponding impacts to the state food assistance program.(b) Of the amounts in (a) of this subsection, $104,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $115,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $193,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely for administrative and information technology expenses.(((32)))(33)(a) $236,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $3,367,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $1,329,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely for the department to hire additional public benefit specialists to help reduce the call center and lobby wait times within the community services division.(b) $1,878,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024, (($3,660,000))$3,780,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and (($3,541,000))$2,746,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely for technology enhancements and project governance necessary to create efficiencies that will reduce call center and lobby wait times for customers of the community services division. Enhancements include, but are not limited to, ((chatbots, robotic process automation,)) interactive voice response((,)) and document upload. The amounts provided in this subsection (((32)))(33)(b) are subject to the conditions, limitations, and review requirements of section 701 of this act.(c) By June 30, 2025, the department must submit a report to the governor and the legislature that shows the prior fiscal year's call and lobby wait times by month and queue, number of customer contacts by month and queue, processing times for the various queues for the three most recent fiscal years along with an explanation for any changes to the most recent year's processing times, number of filled public benefit specialists 3 positions and vacancies by month, any available wait time impacts associated with the individual technology solution enhancements, any telephonic savings experienced due to fewer customers waiting on hold, and recommendations to continue reducing customer wait times.(34) $270,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 and $272,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely to support the expansion of the federal supplemental nutrition assistance program (SNAP) tribal eligibility determination project to an additional five tribes.Sec. 1206. 2024 c 376 s 206 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICESâVOCATIONAL REHABILITATION PROGRAMGeneral FundâState Appropriation (FY 2024). . . .$26,677,000General FundâState Appropriation (FY 2025). . . .(($26,976,000))Â Â Â Â Â $26,162,000General FundâFederal Appropriation. . . .(($110,047,000))Â Â Â Â Â $118,047,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($163,700,000))Â Â Â Â Â $170,886,000Sec. 1207. 2024 c 376 s 207 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICESâSPECIAL COMMITMENT PROGRAMGeneral FundâState Appropriation (FY 2024). . . .$81,273,000General FundâState Appropriation (FY 2025). . . .(($80,519,000))Â Â Â Â Â $78,805,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($161,792,000))Â Â Â Â Â $160,078,000The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) The special commitment center may use funds appropriated in this subsection to purchase goods and supplies through hospital group purchasing organizations when it is cost-effective to do so.(2)(a) $125,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 is provided solely for the department to:(i) Explore regulatory framework options for conditional release less restrictive alternative placements and make recommendations for a possible future framework. This exploration shall include collaboration with the department of corrections regarding their community custody programs;(ii) Review and refine agency policies regarding communication and engagement with impacted local governments related to less restrictive alternatives, including exploring options for public facing communications on current county fair share status and any projected future need;(iii) Identify opportunities for greater collaboration and possible fiscal support for local government entities regarding placements of conditional release less restrictive alternatives; and(iv) Provide recommendations to improve cost-effectiveness of all less restrictive alternative placements.(b) The department shall submit a report to the governor and appropriate fiscal and policy committees of the legislature by December 1, 2023, with a summary of the results and provide any additional recommendations to the legislature that the department identifies. The report shall also include a summary of costs to the department for contracted and uncontracted less restrictive alternatives.(3) $150,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 is provided solely for the department to conduct an assessment of wireless internet implementation needs and options, and must include an assessment of satellite and fiber options. The department shall provide a report that includes the assessment and estimated implementation time frame and costs to the appropriate committees of the legislature by December 15, 2023.(4) $189,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for the department to establish one position for a special commitment center communications manager to support information sharing to the public related to conditional release for less restrictive alternative placements.(5) $2,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 6106 (DSHS workers/PSERS). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2024, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.))Sec. 1208. 2024 c 376 s 208 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICESâADMINISTRATION AND SUPPORTING SERVICES PROGRAMGeneral FundâState Appropriation (FY 2024). . . .$50,946,000General FundâState Appropriation (FY 2025). . . .(($62,924,000))Â Â Â Â Â $55,117,000General FundâFederal Appropriation. . . .(($62,593,000))Â Â Â Â Â $62,982,000Climate Commitment AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$2,000,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($178,463,000))Â Â Â Â Â $171,045,000The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) Within amounts appropriated in this section, the department shall provide to the department of health, where available, the following data for all nutrition assistance programs funded by the United States department of agriculture and administered by the department. The department must provide the report for the preceding federal fiscal year by February 1, 2024, and February 1, 2025. The report must provide:(a) The number of people in Washington who are eligible for the program;(b) The number of people in Washington who participated in the program;(c) The average annual participation rate in the program;(d) Participation rates by geographic distribution; and(e) The annual federal funding of the program in Washington.(2) $5,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $22,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $14,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely for the implementation of an agreement reached between the governor and the Washington federation of state employees for the language access providers under the provisions of chapter 41.56 RCW for the 2023-2025 fiscal biennium as provided in section 907 of this act.(3) $85,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $85,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely to support the joint legislative and executive committee on behavioral health established in section 133 of this act.(4) $115,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $111,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $64,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute House Bill No. 1745 (diversity in clinical trials).(5) $100,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $96,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $149,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely for implementation of Senate Bill No. 5497 (medicaid expenditures).(6) $231,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $65,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5304 (language access/testing).(7)(a) $4,876,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 and $2,961,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely for the system for integrated leave, attendance, and scheduling (SILAS) project and is subject to the conditions, limitations, and review requirements of section 701 of this act. Funding is provided solely for continued project expansion at the:(i) Yakima Valley school;(ii) Maple Lane campus;(iii) Brockmann campus;(iv) Rainier school; and(v) Fircrest school.(b) By July 1, 2024, the department must submit a report to the appropriate committees of the legislature to include, at least, the implementation schedule and budget plans by facility deployment for each of the facilities listed in (a) of this subsection.(c) By June 30, 2025, the department must submit a report to the appropriate committees of the legislature to include, but not be limited to, how funding was spent compared to the spending plan and the actual roll out by facility compared to the implementation schedule for each facility that the SILAS solution was planned and/or implemented at in the prior 12 calendar months.(8) $100,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for the research and data analysis division of the department to analyze historical trends of admissions for felony civil conversion cases based on behavioral health administrative service organization regions. The research and data analysis division must create a report that provides information on the monthly averages for admission by region and any information about trends or cycles, and shall make a recommendation about how best to predict and model future admissions for this population by region. The report must be submitted to the governor, office of financial management, and appropriate committees of the legislature no later than November 1, 2024.(9) $2,000,000 of the climate commitment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the department to pilot a statewide network of community assemblies fully centered on overburdened communities as defined in RCW 70A.02.010. The department must select topics for community assemblies that fall within its authority or must consult and coordinate with the agency who has authority on the proposed topic before selection. These assemblies will elevate community expertise and solutions to budget and policy makers on sustainable investments to create a more climate resilient Washington. If Initiative Measure No. 2117 is approved in the 2024 general election, upon the effective date of the measure, funds from the consolidated climate account may not be used for the purposes in this subsection.(10) $20,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $70,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the research and data analysis division of the department to conduct a study of the costs to expand apple health categorically needy coverage for SSI-related individuals who meet the criteria in WAC 182-512-0050. The study shall provide the cost of expanding medicaid services to individuals at the following percentages of the federal poverty level: 75 percent, 80 percent, 85 percent, 90 percent, 95 percent, and 100 percent. The study should also provide the cost of eliminating the state asset limits at each of these income increments. The study must be submitted to the appropriate committees of the legislature by December 1, 2024.(11)(a) $250,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for the department to complete a gap analysis of the existing housing and health care system and provide a report to the legislature detailing its findings. This report shall include, but not be limited to, a review of existing models related to individuals experiencing:(i) Housing instability who have significant medical and/or behavioral health needs, including the inability to stay in or return to their current housing;(ii) Homelessness and/or a significant history of being unhoused, including permanent supportive housing residents; and(iii) Significant health-related social needs that are not severe enough to qualify for placement in existing facilities, but are too significant to be met in a shelter or permanent supportive housing.(b) The gap analysis shall also include a review of:(i) Hospitals with patients that have resolved the acute hospital-level needs of the patient, but cannot discharge patients to the community because there is no appropriate lower level of care available; and(ii) Permanent supportive housing and shelter providers with residents whose medical needs exceed the location's ability to provide care.(c) The department shall provide recommendations to fill the gaps identified in (a) and (b) of this subsection, which may include creation of complex care locations and enhanced behavioral health supports until an individual qualifies for either a higher or lower level of care.(d) This report must be submitted to the appropriate committees of the legislature by December 1, 2024.Sec. 1209. 2024 c 376 s 209 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICESâPAYMENTS TO OTHER AGENCIES PROGRAMGeneral FundâState Appropriation (FY 2024). . . .$66,435,000General FundâState Appropriation (FY 2025). . . .(($85,489,000))Â Â Â Â Â $82,847,000General FundâFederal Appropriation. . . .(($62,969,000))Â Â Â Â Â $62,706,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($214,893,000))Â Â Â Â Â $211,988,000The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: Within the amounts appropriated in this section, the department must extend master property insurance to all buildings owned by the department valued over $250,000 and to all locations leased by the department with contents valued over $250,000.Sec. 1210. 2024 c 376 s 210 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE STATE HEALTH CARE AUTHORITY(1)(a) During the 2023-2025 fiscal biennium, the health care authority shall provide support and data as required by the office of the state actuary in providing the legislature with health care actuarial analysis, including providing any information in the possession of the health care authority or available to the health care authority through contracts with providers, plans, insurers, consultants, or any other entities contracting with the health care authority.(b) Information technology projects or investments and proposed projects or investments impacting time capture, payroll and payment processes and systems, eligibility, case management, and authorization systems within the health care authority are subject to technical oversight by the office of the chief information officer.(2) The health care authority shall not initiate any services that require expenditure of state general fund moneys unless expressly authorized in this act or other law. The health care authority may seek, receive, and spend, under RCW 43.79.260 through 43.79.282, federal moneys not anticipated in this act as long as the federal funding does not require expenditure of state moneys for the program in excess of amounts anticipated in this act. If the health care authority receives unanticipated unrestricted federal moneys, those moneys shall be spent for services authorized in this act or in any other legislation providing appropriation authority, and an equal amount of appropriated state general fund moneys shall lapse. Upon the lapsing of any moneys under this subsection, the office of financial management shall notify the legislative fiscal committees. As used in this subsection, "unrestricted federal moneys" includes block grants and other funds that federal law does not require to be spent on specifically defined projects or matched on a formula basis by state funds.(3)(a) The health care authority, the health benefit exchange, the department of social and health services, the department of health, the department of corrections, and the department of children, youth, and families shall work together within existing resources to establish the health and human services enterprise coalition (the coalition). The coalition, led by the health care authority, must be a multi-organization collaborative that provides strategic direction and federal funding guidance for projects that have cross-organizational or enterprise impact, including information technology projects that affect organizations within the coalition. The office of the chief information officer shall maintain a statewide perspective when collaborating with the coalition to ensure that projects are planned for in a manner that ensures the efficient use of state resources, supports the adoption of a cohesive technology and data architecture, and maximizes federal financial participation. The work of the coalition and any project identified as a coalition project is subject to the conditions, limitations, and review provided in section 701 of this act.(b) The health care authority must submit a report on November 1, 2023, and annually thereafter, to the fiscal committees of the legislature. The report must include, at a minimum:(i) A list of active coalition projects as of July 1st of the fiscal year. This must include all current and ongoing coalition projects, which coalition agencies are involved in these projects, and the funding being expended on each project, including in-kind funding. For each project, the report must include which federal requirements each coalition project is working to satisfy, and when each project is anticipated to satisfy those requirements; and(ii) A list of coalition projects that are planned in the current and following fiscal year. This must include which coalition agencies are involved in these projects, including the anticipated in-kind funding by agency, and if a budget request will be submitted for funding. This must reflect all funding required by fiscal year and by fund source and include the budget outlook period.(4) The appropriations to the health care authority in this act shall be expended for the programs and in the amounts specified in this act. However, after May 1, ((2024))2025, unless prohibited by this act, the authority may transfer general fundâstate appropriations for fiscal year ((2024))2025 among programs after approval by the director of the office of financial management. To the extent that appropriations in this section are insufficient to fund actual expenditures in excess of caseload forecast and utilization assumptions, the authority may transfer general fundâstate appropriations for fiscal year ((2024))2025 that are provided solely for a specified purpose. The authority may not transfer funds, and the director of the office of financial management shall not approve the transfer, unless the transfer is consistent with the objective of conserving, to the maximum extent possible, the expenditure of state funds. The director of the office of financial management shall notify the appropriate fiscal committees of the legislature in writing seven days prior to approving any allotment modifications or transfers under this subsection. The written notification must include a narrative explanation and justification of changes, along with expenditures and allotments by budget unit and appropriation, both before and after any allotment modifications and transfers.Sec. 1211. 2024 c 376 s 211 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE STATE HEALTH CARE AUTHORITYâMEDICAL ASSISTANCEGeneral FundâState Appropriation (FY 2024). . . .$2,853,617,000General FundâState Appropriation (FY 2025). . . .(($2,976,729,000))Â Â Â Â Â $3,361,744,000General FundâFederal Appropriation. . . .(($16,820,407,000))Â Â Â Â Â $17,692,697,000General FundâPrivate/Local Appropriation. . . .(($1,252,273,000))Â Â Â Â Â $1,246,242,000Dedicated Cannabis AccountâState Appropriation(FY 2024). . . .$24,105,000Dedicated Cannabis AccountâState Appropriation(FY 2025). . . .(($23,212,000))Â Â Â Â Â $18,016,000Emergency Medical Services and Trauma Care SystemsTrust AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$15,086,000Family Medicine Workforce Development AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$7,000,000Hospital Safety Net Assessment AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .(($1,517,493,000))Â Â Â Â Â $1,505,043,000Long-Term Services and Supports Trust AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$314,000Medical Aid AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$540,000Statewide 988 Behavioral Health Crisis Response LineAccountâState Appropriation. . . .(($11,624,000))Â Â Â Â Â $2,476,000Telebehavioral Health Access AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$8,318,000Ambulance Transport FundâState Appropriation. . . .(($14,316,000))Â Â Â Â Â $13,256,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($25,525,034,000))Â Â Â Â Â $26,748,454,000The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) The authority shall submit an application to the centers for medicare and medicaid services to renew the 1115 demonstration waiver for an additional five years as described in subsections (2), (3), and (4) of this section. The authority may not accept or expend any federal funds received under an 1115 demonstration waiver except as described in this section unless the legislature has appropriated the federal funding. To ensure compliance with legislative requirements and terms and conditions of the waiver, the authority shall implement the renewal of the 1115 demonstration waiver and reporting requirements with oversight from the office of financial management. The legislature finds that appropriate management of the renewal of the 1115 demonstration waiver as set forth in subsections (2), (3), and (4) of this section requires sound, consistent, timely, and transparent oversight and analytic review in addition to lack of redundancy with other established measures. The patient must be considered first and foremost in the implementation and execution of the demonstration waiver. To accomplish these goals, the authority shall develop consistent performance measures that focus on population health and health outcomes. The authority shall limit the number of projects that accountable communities of health may participate in under initiative 1 to a maximum of six and shall seek to develop common performance measures when possible. The joint select committee on health care oversight will evaluate the measures chosen: (a) For effectiveness and appropriateness; and (b) to provide patients and health care providers with significant input into the implementation of the demonstration waiver to promote improved population health and patient health outcomes. In cooperation with the department of social and health services, the authority shall consult with and provide notification of work on applications for federal waivers, including details on waiver duration, financial implications, and potential future impacts on the state budget to the joint select committee on health care oversight prior to submitting these waivers for federal approval. Prior to final approval or acceptance of funds by the authority, the authority shall submit the special terms and conditions as submitted to the centers for medicare and medicaid services and the anticipated budget for the duration of the renewed waiver to the governor, the joint select committee on health care, and the fiscal committees of the legislature. By federal standard any programs created or funded by this waiver do not create an entitlement. The demonstration period for the waiver as described in subsections (2), (3), and (4) of this section begins July 1, 2023.(2)(a) (($342,398,000))$394,249,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation and (($213,592,000))$195,181,000 of the general fundâlocal appropriation are provided solely for accountable communities of health described in initiative 1 of the 1115 demonstration waiver and this is the maximum amount that may be expended for this purpose. In renewing this initiative, the authority shall consider local input regarding community needs and shall limit total local projects to no more than six. To provide transparency to the appropriate fiscal committees of the legislature, the authority shall provide fiscal staff of the legislature query ability into any database of the fiscal intermediary that authority staff would be authorized to access. The authority shall not supplement the amounts provided in this subsection with any general fundâstate moneys appropriated in this section or any moneys that may be transferred pursuant to subsection (1) of this section. The director shall report to the fiscal committees of the legislature all expenditures under this subsection and provide such fiscal data in the time, manner, and form requested by the legislative fiscal committees.(b) (($467,787,000))$420,677,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation and (($191,068,000))$171,826,000 of the general fundâprivate/local appropriation are provided solely for the medicaid quality improvement program and this is the maximum amount that may be expended for this purpose. Medicaid quality improvement program payments do not count against the 1115 demonstration waiver spending limits and are excluded from the waiver's budget neutrality calculation. The authority may provide medicaid quality improvement program payments to apple health managed care organizations and their partnering providers as they meet designated milestones. Partnering providers and apple health managed care organizations must work together to achieve medicaid quality improvement program goals according to the performance period timelines and reporting deadlines as set forth by the authority. The authority may only use the medicaid quality improvement program to support initiatives 1, 2, and 3 as described in the 1115 demonstration waiver and may not pursue its use for other purposes. Any programs created or funded by the medicaid quality improvement program do not constitute an entitlement for clients or providers. The authority shall not supplement the amounts provided in this subsection with any general fundâstate, general fundâfederal, or general fundâlocal moneys appropriated in this section or any moneys that may be transferred pursuant to subsection (1) of this section. The director shall report to the joint select committee on health care oversight not less than quarterly on financial and health outcomes. The director shall report to the fiscal committees of the legislature all expenditures under this subsection and shall provide such fiscal data in the time, manner, and form requested by the legislative fiscal committees.(c) In collaboration with the accountable communities of health, the authority will submit a report to the governor and the joint select committee on health care oversight describing how each of the accountable community of health's work aligns with the community needs assessment no later than December 1, 2023.(d) Performance measures and payments for accountable communities of health shall reflect accountability measures that demonstrate progress toward transparent, measurable, and meaningful goals that have an impact on improved population health and improved health outcomes, including a path to financial sustainability. While these goals may have variation to account for unique community demographics, measures should be standardized when possible.(3) (($87,665,000))$63,677,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation and (($87,666,000))$63,684,000 of the general fundâlocal appropriation are provided solely for long-term support services as described in initiative 2 of the 1115 demonstration waiver as well as administrative expenses for initiative 3 and this is the maximum amount that may be expended for this purpose. The authority shall contract with and provide funding to the department of social and health services to administer initiative 2. The director in cooperation with the secretary of the department of social and health services shall report to the office of financial management all of the expenditures of this section and shall provide such fiscal data in the time, manner, and form requested. The authority shall not supplement the amounts provided in this subsection with any general fundâstate moneys appropriated in this section or any moneys that may be transferred pursuant to subsection (1) of this section.(4)(a) (($46,450,000))$61,782,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation and (($21,432,000))$28,451,000 of the general fundâlocal appropriation are provided solely for supported housing and employment services described in initiative 3a and 3b of the 1115 demonstration waiver and this is the maximum amount that may be expended for this purpose. Under this initiative, the authority and the department of social and health services shall ensure that allowable and necessary services are provided to eligible clients as identified by the department or its third-party administrator. The authority and the department, in consultation with the medical assistance expenditure forecast work group, shall ensure that reasonable reimbursements are established for services deemed necessary within an identified limit per individual. The authority shall not supplement the amounts provided in this subsection with any general fundâstate moneys appropriated in this section or any moneys that may be transferred pursuant to subsection (1) of this section. The director shall report to the joint select committee on health care oversight no less than quarterly on financial and health outcomes. The director shall also report to the fiscal committees of the legislature all of the expenditures of this subsection and shall provide such fiscal data in the time, manner, and form requested by the legislative fiscal committees.(b) (($28,156,000))$32,309,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation and (($22,067,000))$23,969,000 of the general fundâlocal appropriation are provided solely for additional housing supports described in the 1115 demonstration waiver and this is the maximum amount that may be expended for this purpose. The authority shall not supplement the amounts provided in this subsection with any general fundâstate moneys appropriated in this section or any moneys that may be transferred pursuant to subsection (1) of this section. The director shall report to the joint select committee on health care oversight no less than quarterly on financial and health outcomes. The director shall also report to the fiscal committees of the legislature all of the expenditures of this subsection and shall provide such fiscal data in the time, manner, and form requested by the legislative fiscal committees.(c) The director shall report to the joint select committee on health care oversight no less than quarterly on utilization and caseload statistics for both supportive housing and employment services and its progress toward increasing uptake and availability for these services.(5) $1,432,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and (($3,008,000))$250,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for supported employment services and $1,478,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and (($3,162,000))$750,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for supported housing services, similar to the services described in initiatives 3a and 3b of the 1115 demonstration waiver to individuals who are ineligible for medicaid. Under these initiatives, the authority and the department of social and health services shall ensure that allowable and necessary services are provided to eligible clients as identified by the authority or its third-party administrator. Before authorizing services, eligibility for initiative 3a or 3b of the 1115 demonstration waiver must first be determined.(6) Sufficient amounts are appropriated in this subsection to implement the medicaid expansion as defined in the social security act, section 1902(a)(10)(A)(i)(VIII).(7) The legislature finds that medicaid payment rates, as calculated by the health care authority pursuant to the appropriations in this act, bear a reasonable relationship to the costs incurred by efficiently and economically operated facilities for providing quality services and will be sufficient to enlist enough providers so that care and services are available to the extent that such care and services are available to the general population in the geographic area. The legislature finds that the cost reports, payment data from the federal government, historical utilization, economic data, and clinical input constitute reliable data upon which to determine the payment rates.(8) Based on quarterly expenditure reports and caseload forecasts, if the health care authority estimates that expenditures for the medical assistance program will exceed the appropriations, the health care authority shall take steps including but not limited to reduction of rates or elimination of optional services to reduce expenditures so that total program costs do not exceed the annual appropriation authority.(9) In determining financial eligibility for medicaid-funded services, the health care authority is authorized to disregard recoveries by Holocaust survivors of insurance proceeds or other assets, as defined in RCW 48.104.030.(10) The legislature affirms that it is in the state's interest for Harborview medical center to remain an economically viable component of the state's health care system.(11) When a person is ineligible for medicaid solely by reason of residence in an institution for mental diseases, the health care authority shall provide the person with the same benefits as he or she would receive if eligible for medicaid, using state-only funds to the extent necessary.(12) $4,261,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $4,261,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $8,522,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely for low-income disproportionate share hospital payments.(13) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, the health care authority shall provide disproportionate share hospital payments to hospitals that provide services to children in the children's health program who are not eligible for services under Title XIX or XXI of the federal social security act due to their citizenship status.(14) $7,000,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation is provided solely for supplemental payments to nursing homes operated by public hospital districts. The public hospital district shall be responsible for providing the required nonfederal match for the supplemental payment, and the payments shall not exceed the maximum allowable under federal rules. It is the legislature's intent that the payments shall be supplemental to and shall not in any way offset or reduce the payments calculated and provided in accordance with part E of chapter 74.46 RCW. It is the legislature's further intent that costs otherwise allowable for rate-setting and settlement against payments under chapter 74.46 RCW shall not be disallowed solely because such costs have been paid by revenues retained by the nursing home from these supplemental payments. The supplemental payments are subject to retrospective interim and final cost settlements based on the nursing homes' as-filed and final medicare cost reports. The timing of the interim and final cost settlements shall be at the health care authority's discretion. During either the interim cost settlement or the final cost settlement, the health care authority shall recoup from the public hospital districts the supplemental payments that exceed the medicaid cost limit and/or the medicare upper payment limit. The health care authority shall apply federal rules for identifying the eligible incurred medicaid costs and the medicare upper payment limit.(15) The health care authority shall continue the inpatient hospital certified public expenditures program for the 2023-2025 fiscal biennium. The program shall apply to all public hospitals, including those owned or operated by the state, except those classified as critical access hospitals or state psychiatric institutions. The health care authority shall submit reports to the governor and legislature by November 1, 2023, and by November 1, 2024, that evaluate whether savings continue to exceed costs for this program. If the certified public expenditures (CPE) program in its current form is no longer cost-effective to maintain, the health care authority shall submit a report to the governor and legislature detailing cost-effective alternative uses of local, state, and federal resources as a replacement for this program. During fiscal year 2024 and fiscal year 2025, hospitals in the program shall be paid and shall retain 100 percent of the federal portion of the allowable hospital cost for each medicaid inpatient fee-for-service claim payable by medical assistance and 100 percent of the federal portion of the maximum disproportionate share hospital payment allowable under federal regulations. For the purpose of determining the amount of any state grant under this subsection, payments will include the federal portion of medicaid program supplemental payments received by the hospitals. Inpatient medicaid payments shall be established using an allowable methodology that approximates the cost of claims submitted by the hospitals. Payments made to each hospital in the program in each fiscal year of the biennium shall be compared to a baseline amount. The baseline amount will be determined by the total of (a) the inpatient claim payment amounts that would have been paid during the fiscal year had the hospital not been in the CPE program based on the reimbursement rates developed, implemented, and consistent with policies approved in the 2023-2025 biennial operating appropriations act and in effect on July 1, 2015, (b) one-half of the indigent assistance disproportionate share hospital payment amounts paid to and retained by each hospital during fiscal year 2005, and (c) all of the other disproportionate share hospital payment amounts paid to and retained by each hospital during fiscal year 2005 to the extent the same disproportionate share hospital programs exist in the 2019-2021 fiscal biennium. If payments during the fiscal year exceed the hospital's baseline amount, no additional payments will be made to the hospital except the federal portion of allowable disproportionate share hospital payments for which the hospital can certify allowable match. If payments during the fiscal year are less than the baseline amount, the hospital will be paid a state grant equal to the difference between payments during the fiscal year and the applicable baseline amount. Payment of the state grant shall be made in the applicable fiscal year and distributed in monthly payments. The grants will be recalculated and redistributed as the baseline is updated during the fiscal year. The grant payments are subject to an interim settlement within 11 months after the end of the fiscal year. A final settlement shall be performed. To the extent that either settlement determines that a hospital has received funds in excess of what it would have received as described in this subsection, the hospital must repay the excess amounts to the state when requested.(16) The health care authority shall seek public-private partnerships and federal funds that are or may become available to provide ongoing support for outreach and education efforts under the federal children's health insurance program reauthorization act of 2009.(17) The health care authority shall target funding for maternity support services towards pregnant women with factors that lead to higher rates of poor birth outcomes, including hypertension, a preterm or low birth weight birth in the most recent previous birth, a cognitive deficit or developmental disability, substance abuse, severe mental illness, unhealthy weight or failure to gain weight, tobacco use, or African American or Native American race. The health care authority shall prioritize evidence-based practices for delivery of maternity support services. To the extent practicable, the health care authority shall develop a mechanism to increase federal funding for maternity support services by leveraging local public funding for those services.(18) The authority shall submit reports to the governor and the legislature by September 15, 2023, and no later than September 15, 2024, that delineate the number of individuals in medicaid managed care, by carrier, age, gender, and eligibility category, receiving preventative services and vaccinations. The reports should include baseline and benchmark information from the previous two fiscal years and should be inclusive of, but not limited to, services recommended under the United States preventative services task force, advisory committee on immunization practices, early and periodic screening, diagnostic, and treatment (EPSDT) guidelines, and other relevant preventative and vaccination medicaid guidelines and requirements.(19) Managed care contracts must incorporate accountability measures that monitor patient health and improved health outcomes, and shall include an expectation that each patient receive a wellness examination that documents the baseline health status and allows for monitoring of health improvements and outcome measures.(20) Sufficient amounts are appropriated in this section for the authority to provide an adult dental benefit.(21) The health care authority shall coordinate with the department of social and health services to provide referrals to the Washington health benefit exchange for clients that will be ineligible for medicaid.(22) To facilitate a single point of entry across public and medical assistance programs, and to maximize the use of federal funding, the health care authority, the department of social and health services, and the health benefit exchange will coordinate efforts to expand HealthPlanfinder access to public assistance and medical eligibility staff. The health care authority shall complete medicaid applications in the HealthPlanfinder for households receiving or applying for medical assistance benefits.(23) $90,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $90,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $180,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely to continue operation by a nonprofit organization of a toll-free hotline that assists families to learn about and enroll in the apple health for kids program.(24) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, the authority shall reimburse for primary care services provided by naturopathic physicians.(25) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, the authority shall continue to provide coverage for pregnant teens that qualify under existing pregnancy medical programs, but whose eligibility for pregnancy related services would otherwise end due to the application of the new modified adjusted gross income eligibility standard.(26) Sufficient amounts are appropriated in this section to remove the mental health visit limit and to provide the shingles vaccine and screening, brief intervention, and referral to treatment benefits that are available in the medicaid alternative benefit plan in the classic medicaid benefit plan.(27) The authority shall use revenue appropriated from the dedicated cannabis account for contracts with community health centers under RCW 69.50.540 in lieu of general fundâstate payments to community health centers for services provided to medical assistance clients, and it is the intent of the legislature that this policy will be continued in subsequent fiscal biennia.(28) Beginning no later than July 1, 2018, for any service eligible under the medicaid state plan for encounter payments, managed care organizations at the request of a rural health clinic shall pay the full published encounter rate directly to the clinic. At no time will a managed care organization be at risk for or have any right to the supplemental portion of the claim. Payments will be reconciled on at least an annual basis between the managed care organization and the authority, with final review and approval by the authority.(29) Sufficient amounts are appropriated in this section for the authority to provide a medicaid equivalent adult dental benefit to clients enrolled in the medical care service program.(30) During the 2023-2025 fiscal biennium, sufficient amounts are provided in this section for the authority to provide services identical to those services covered by the Washington state family planning waiver program as of August 2018 to individuals who:(a) Are 19 years of age;(b) Are at or below 260 percent of the federal poverty level as established in WAC 182-505-0100;(c) Are not covered by other public or private insurance; and(d) Need family planning services and are not currently covered by or eligible for another medical assistance program for family planning.(31)(a) The authority shall ensure that appropriate resources are dedicated to implementing the recommendations of the centers for medicare and medicaid services center for program integrity as provided to the authority in the January 2019 Washington focused program integrity review final report. Additionally, the authority shall:(i) Work to ensure the efficient operations of the managed care plans, including but not limited to, a deconflicting process for audits with and among the managed care plans and the medicaid fraud division at the attorney general's office, to ensure the authority staff perform central audits of cases that appear across multiple managed care plans, versus the audits performed by the individual managed care plans or the fraud division;(ii) Remain accountable for operating in an effective and efficient manner, including performing program integrity activities that ensure high value in the medical assistance program in general and in medicaid managed care specifically;(iii) Work with its contracted actuary and the medical assistance expenditure forecast work group to develop methods and metrics related to managed care program integrity activity that shall be incorporated into annual rate setting; and(iv) Work with the medical assistance expenditure forecast work group to ensure the results of program integrity activity are incorporated into the rate setting process in a transparent, timely, measurable, quantifiable manner.(b) $50,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $50,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $100,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely for the authority to consider, as part of its program integrity activities, whether it is providing economical, efficient, and quality prescription drug services through its administrative services model and the quantifiable cost and benefit of this service delivery method. The authority must establish an annual reporting requirement for all covered entities participating in the 340B drug pricing program that receive medicaid funds under this section; and the authority shall provide at an aggregate level, broken down by covered entities defined by 42 U.S.C. Â§256b(a)(4)(A)-(O), the following minimum information to the governor and fiscal committees of the legislature no later than October 15, 2023:(i) The cost and benefits of providing these prescription drug benefits through a carved-out fee-for-service benefit, both total cost and net of rebates;(ii) The cost and benefits of providing these prescription drug benefits through a carved-in managed care benefit, both total cost and net of rebates;(iii) The cost and benefits of providing these prescription drug benefits through the administrative services model, both total and net of rebates;(iv) The community benefit attributable to 340B providers as a result of the administrative services or carved-in model as compared to each other and as compared to the carved-out model; and(v) The federal financial participation provided to the state under each of these models.(c) The authority shall submit a report to the governor and appropriate committees of the legislature by October 1, 2023, that includes, but is not limited to:(i) Specific, quantified actions that have been taken, to date, related to the recommendations of the centers for medicare and medicaid services center for program integrity as provided to the authority in the January 2019 Washington focused program integrity review final report;(ii) Specific, quantified information regarding the work done with its contracted actuary and the medical assistance expenditure forecast expenditure work group to develop methods and metrics related to managed care program integrity activity that shall be incorporated into annual rate setting;(iii) Specific, quantified information regarding the work done with the medical assistance expenditure forecast work group to ensure the results of program integrity activity are incorporated into the rate setting process in a transparent, timely, measurable, quantifiable manner;(iv) Accounting by fiscal year, medicaid eligibility group, and service beginning with state fiscal year 2020 to include all program integrity recoveries attributable to the authority, including how these recoveries are categorized, to which year they are reported, how these recoveries are applied against legislative savings requirements, and what recoveries are attributable to the office of the attorney general's medicaid fraud control division and how these recoveries are considered when reporting program integrity activity and determining managed care rates; and(v) Information detailing when the agency acquired a new fraud and abuse detection system and to what extent this system is being utilized.(32)(a) The authority shall not enter into any future value-based arrangements with federally qualified health centers or rural health clinics prior to receiving approval from the office of financial management and the appropriate committees of the legislature.(b) The authority shall not modify the reconciliation process with federally qualified health centers or rural health clinics without notification to and the opportunity to comment from the office of financial management.(c) The authority shall require all managed care organizations to provide information to the authority to account for all payments to rural health clinics and federally qualified health centers to include how payments are made, including any additional payments and whether there is a sub-capitation arrangement or value-based purchasing arrangement.(d) Beginning with fiscal year 2021 and for each subsequent year thereafter, the authority shall reconcile on an annual basis with rural health clinics and federally qualified health centers.(e) Beginning with fiscal year 2021 and for each subsequent year thereafter, the authority shall properly accrue for any anticipated reconciliations with rural health clinics and federally qualified health centers during the fiscal year close process following generally accepted accounting practices.(33) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, the authority is to include allergen control bed and pillow covers as part of the durable medical equipment benefit for children with an asthma diagnosis enrolled in medical assistance programs.(34) $23,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $324,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $469,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely for the reimbursement of services provided by doulas for apple health clients consistent with utilization and uptake assumptions anticipated by the authority in its report to the legislature on December 1, 2020. The centers for medicare and medicaid services must approve a state plan amendment to reimburse for doula services prior to the implementation of this policy.(35) Sufficient funds are provided in this section for the authority to extend continuous eligibility for apple health to children ages zero to six with income at or below 215 percent of the federal poverty level. The centers for medicare and medicaid services must approve the 1115 medicaid waiver prior to the implementation of this policy.(36) Sufficient funds are provided to continue reimbursing dental health aid therapists for services performed in tribal facilities for medicaid clients. The authority must leverage any federal funding that may become available as a result of appeal decisions from the centers for medicare and medicaid services or the United States court of appeals for the ninth circuit.(37) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, the authority shall implement the requirements of RCW 74.09.830 (postpartum health care) and the American rescue plan act of 2021, P.L. 117-2, in extending health care coverage during the postpartum period. The authority shall make every effort to expedite and complete eligibility determinations for individuals who are likely eligible to receive health care coverage under Title XIX or Title XXI of the federal social security act to ensure the state is receiving maximum federal match. This includes, but is not limited to, working with managed care organizations to provide continuous outreach in various modalities until the individual's eligibility determination is completed. Beginning June 1, 2022, the authority must submit quarterly reports to the caseload forecast work group on the number of individuals who are likely eligible to receive health care coverage under Title XIX or Title XXI of the federal social security act but are waiting for the authority to complete eligibility determination, the number of individuals who were likely eligible but are now receiving health care coverage with the maximum federal match under Title XIX or Title XXI of the federal social security act, and outreach activities including the work with managed care organizations.(38) $500,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $500,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the perinatal support warm line to provide peer support, resources, and referrals to new and expectant parents and people in the emotional transition to parenthood experiencing, or at risk of, postpartum depression or other mental health issues.(39) Sufficient funding is provided to remove the asset test from the medicare savings program review process.(40) Sufficient funding is provided to eliminate the mid-certification review process for the aged, blind, or disabled and housing and essential needs referral programs.(41) (($403,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 and $1,185,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely for an adult acupuncture benefit beginning January 1, 2025.(42) $581,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 and $1,706,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely for an adult chiropractic benefit beginning January 1, 2025.(43)))(a) $4,109,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $4,204,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $1,214,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely for the authority to continue the grant program for reimbursement for services to patients up to age 18 provided by community health workers in primary care clinics whose patients are significantly comprised of pediatric patients enrolled in medical assistance under chapter 74.09 RCW until June 30, 2025. Community health workers may receive merit increases within this funding. Community health workers funded under this subsection may provide outreach, informal counseling, and social supports for health-related social needs. Within the amounts provided in this subsection, the authority will provide a final report by June 30, 2025. The report shall include, but not be limited to:(i) The quantitative impacts of the grant program;(ii) How many community health workers are participating in the grant program;(iii) How many clinics these community health workers represent;(iv) How many clients are being served;(v) Evaluation of any measurable health outcomes identified in the planning period prior to January 2023; and(vi) The number of children who received community health worker services between June 1, 2023, and June 30, 2024. For the children who received community health worker services within this period, the authority must compare the following data to children of the same ages and languages receiving coverage through apple health: Well-child visits; mental health services when a need is identified; and emergency department utilization.(b) To the extent that funds are appropriated, the authority must establish a community health worker benefit under the medical assistance program, as codified at Title XIX of the federal social security act, the state children's health insurance program, as codified at Title XXI of the federal social security act, and any other federal funding sources that are now available or may become available, pursuant to approval from the center for medicare and medicaid services.(((44)))(42) $1,635,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $1,024,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $1,765,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely for a technology solution for an authoritative client identifier, or master person index, for state programs within the health and human services coalition to uniformly identify clients across multiple service delivery systems. The coalition will clearly identify all state programs impacted by and all fund sources used in development and implementation of this project. This subsection is subject to the conditions, limitations, and review requirements of section 701 of this act.(((45)))(43)(a) Sufficient amounts are appropriated in this section for the authority to provide coverage for all federal food and drug administration-approved HIV antiviral drugs without prior authorization. This coverage must be provided to apple health clients enrolled in both fee-for-service and managed care programs.(b) Beginning July 1, 2023, upon initiation or renewal of a contract with the authority to administer a medicaid managed care plan, a managed care health care system shall provide coverage without prior authorization for all federal food and drug administration-approved HIV antiviral drugs.(c) By December 1, 2023, and December 1, 2024, the authority must submit to the fiscal committees of the legislature the projected and actual expenditures and percentage of medicaid clients who switch to a new drug class without prior authorization as described in (a) and (b) of this subsection.(((46)))(44) The authority shall consider evidence-based recommendations from the Oregon health evidence review commission when making coverage decisions for the treatment of pediatric autoimmune neuropsychiatric disorders associated with streptococcal infections and pediatric acute-onset neuropsychiatric syndrome.(((47)))(45) $2,120,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $2,120,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $9,012,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely to increase advanced life support code A0426 by 64 percent, basic life support base rates for nonemergency ambulance transports code A0428 by 80 percent, and mileage for both nonemergency and emergency ambulance transportation code A0425 by 35 percent, beginning July 1, 2023.(((48)))(46) $2,047,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $3,390,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $5,135,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely to increase reimbursement rates by 20 percent for applied behavior analysis codes 0362T and 0373T for individuals with complex behavioral health care needs; and by 15 percent for all other applied behavior analysis codes with the exception of Q3014, beginning January 1, 2024.(((49)))(47) $280,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $1,992,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely for modular replacement costs of the ProviderOne pharmacy point of sale system and are subject to the conditions, limitations, and review provided in section 701 of this act.(((50)))(48) $709,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $1,410,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $4,075,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely to maintain and increase access for behavioral health services through increased provider rates. The rate increases are effective January 1, 2024, and must be applied to the following codes for children and adults enrolled in the medicaid program: 90785, 90791, 90832, 90833, 90834, 90836, 90837, 90838, 90845, 90846, 90847, 90849, 90853, 96156, 96158, 96159, 96164, 96165, 96167, 96168, 96170, 96171, H0004, H0023, H0036, and H2015. The authority may use a substitute code in the event that any of the codes identified in this subsection are discontinued and replaced with an updated code covering the same service. Within the amounts provided in this subsection the authority must:(a) Implement this rate increase in accordance with the process established in RCW 71.24.885 (medicaid rate increases);(b) Raise the state fee-for-service rates for these codes by up to 7 percent, except that the state medicaid rate may not exceed the published medicare rate or an equivalent relative value unit rate if a published medicare rate is not available;(c) Require in contracts with managed care organizations that, beginning January 2024, managed care organizations pay no lower than the fee-for-service rate for these codes, and adjust managed care capitation rates accordingly; and(d) Not duplicate rate increases provided in subsection (((51)))(49) of this section.(((51)))(49) $1,055,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 and $2,046,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely to maintain and increase access for primary care services for medicaid-enrolled patients through increased provider rates beginning January 1, 2025. Within the amounts provided in this subsection the authority must:(a) Increase the medical assistance rates for adult primary care services that are reimbursed solely at the existing medical assistance rates on a fee-for-service basis, as well as through managed care plans, by at least 2 percent above medical assistance rates in effect on January 1, 2023;(b) Increase the medical assistance rates for pediatric primary care services that are reimbursed solely at the existing medical assistance rates on a fee-for-service basis, as well as through managed care plans, by at least 2 percent above medical assistance rates in effect on January 1, 2023;(c) Increase the medical assistance rates for pediatric critical care, neonatal critical care, and neonatal intensive care services that are reimbursed solely at the existing medical assistance rates on a fee-for-service basis, as well as through managed care plans, by at least 2 percent above medical assistance rates in effect on January 1, 2023;(d) Apply reimbursement rates required under this subsection to payment codes in a manner consistent with the temporary increase in medicaid reimbursement rates under federal rules and guidance in effect on January 1, 2014, implementing the patient protection and affordable care act, except that the authority may not require provider attestations;(e) Pursue state plan amendments to require medicaid managed care organizations to increase rates under this subsection through adoption of a uniform percentage increase for network providers pursuant to 42 C.F.R. Sec. 438.6(c)(1)(iii)(B), as existing on January 1, 2023; and(f) Not duplicate rate increases provided in subsection (((50)))(48) of this section.(((52)))(50) The authority shall seek a waiver from the federal department of health and human services necessary to implement the requirements of RCW 74.09.670 (medical assistance benefitsâincarcerated or committed personsâsuspension). Additionally, the authority shall implement its waiver application for prerelease services up to 90 days; and provide the governor and fiscal committees of the legislature estimates of costs for implementation or maintenance of effort requirements of this expansion prior to entering into agreement with the centers for medicare and medicaid services.(a) $124,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025, $60,925,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation, and $60,785,000 of the general fundâprivate/local appropriation are provided solely for prerelease services including, but not limited to, case management, clinical consultations, medication assisted therapy, community health worker services, 30-day supply of medications, durable medical equipment, medications, laboratory services, and radiology services.(b) The authority shall coordinate with the department of corrections for prison reentry implementation pursuant to the waiver terms. The authority will coordinate with tribes, other state agencies, and jail administrations as necessary to achieve the terms of the 1115 medicaid transformation waiver. The authority shall use its statutory reentry advisory work group and subgroups as necessary to coordinate with partners to achieve these goals.(((53)))(51) Within the amounts appropriated in this section the authority in collaboration with UW Medicine shall explore funding options for clinical training programs including, but not limited to, family medical practice, psychiatric residencies, advanced registered nurse practitioners, and other primary care providers. Options should include, but not be limited to, shifting direct medicaid graduate medical education payments or indirect medicaid graduate medical education payments, or both, from rates to a standalone program. The authority in collaboration with UW Medicine shall submit a report outlining its findings to the office of financial management and the fiscal committees of the legislature no later than December 1, 2023.(((54)))(52) $143,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 is provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5263 (psilocybin).(((55)))(53) $100,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5532 (small rural hospital payment).(((56)))(54) $56,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $111,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $166,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely for the authority to increase pediatric palliative care rates to the equivalent medicare rates paid for hospice care in effect October 1, 2022, beginning January 1, 2024.(((57)))(55) $598,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $591,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for work required of the authority as specified in RCW 41.05.840 (universal health care commission). Of the amounts provided in this subsection:(((i)))(a) $216,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $216,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are for staff dedicated to contract procurement, meeting coordination, legislative reporting, federal application requirements, and administrative support;(((ii)))(b) $132,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $125,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are for additional staff dedicated to the work of the finance technical advisory committee; and(((iii)))(c) $250,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $250,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are for consultant services, dedicated actuarial support, and economic modeling.(((58)))(56) $2,395,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $2,395,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $10,178,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely to increase air ambulance-fixed wing code A0430 by 189 percent, air ambulance-rotary wing code A0431 by 265 percent, fixed wing air mileage code A0435 by 57 percent, and rotary wing air mileage code A0436 by 68 percent, beginning July 1, 2023.(((59)))(57) $37,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $73,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $218,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely for the authority to increase the allowable number of periodontal treatments to up to four per 12 month period for apple health eligible adults, ages 21 and over, with a current diagnosis of diabetes, beginning January 1, 2024.(((60)))(58)(a) $8,000,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $3,960,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for one-time bridge grants to hospitals or birth centers in financial distress or at risk of limiting access to labor and delivery services due to a low-volume of deliveries at the hospital.(b) To qualify for these grants, a hospital or birth center must:(i) Be located in Washington and not be part of a system of three or more hospitals;(ii) Serve individuals enrolled in state and federal medical assistance programs;(iii) Continue to maintain a medicaid population at similar utilization levels as the most current complete calendar year data;(iv) Be necessary for an adequate provider network for the medicaid program;(v) Demonstrate a plan for long-term financial sustainability; and(vi) Meet one of the following criteria:(A) Lack adequate cash-on-hand to remain financially solvent;(B) Have experienced financial losses during the most current complete calendar year data;(C) Be at risk of bankruptcy;(D) Be at risk of closing labor and delivery services; or(E) Be at risk of limiting access to labor and delivery services due to a low-volume of deliveries at the hospital as defined in (f)(i) and (ii) of this subsection.(c) Of the amounts provided in this subsection for fiscal year 2024, $4,000,000 must be distributed to a hospital that meets the qualifications in ((subsection)) (b) of this subsection and is located on tribal land.(d) Of the amounts provided in this subsection for fiscal year 2025, $1,360,000 must be distributed to a hospital that:(i) Is certified by the centers for medicare and medicaid services as sole community hospitals as of January 1, 2014;(ii) Had fewer than 150 acute care licensed beds in fiscal year 2011;(iii) Has a level III adult trauma service designation from the department of health as of January 1, 2014; and(iv) Is owned and operated by the state or a political subdivision.(e) Of the amounts provided in this subsection for fiscal year 2025, $1,000,000 must be distributed to birth centers that meet the qualification in (b)(vi)(D) of this subsection. Facilities receiving funding under this subsection (58)(e) shall provide the authority with a documented plan for how the funds will be invested in labor and delivery services and an accounting at the end of the fiscal year for how the funds were expended.(f) Of the amounts provided in this subsection for fiscal year 2025, $1,600,000 must be distributed in grant amounts not to exceed $200,000 per hospital to a hospital that:(i) Has had fewer than 200 births funded by medicaid in the hospital's labor and delivery unit in the previous calendar year according to health care authority records; and(ii) Is located in a municipality with a population of less than 50,000.(((61)))(59)(a) Sufficient funds are provided in this section for an outpatient directed payment program.(b) The authority shall:(i) Maintain the program to support the state's access and other quality of care goals and to not increase general fundâstate expenditures;(ii) Seek approval from the centers for medicare and medicaid services to expand the medicaid outpatient directed payment program for hospital outpatient services provided to medicaid program managed care recipients by UW Medicine hospitals and, at their option, UW Medicine affiliated hospitals;(iii) Direct managed care organizations to make payments to eligible providers at levels required to ensure enrollees have timely access to critical high-quality care as allowed under 42 C.F.R. 438.6(c); and(iv) Increase medicaid payments for hospital outpatient services provided by UW Medicine hospitals and, at their option, UW Medicine affiliated hospitals to the average payment received from commercial payers.(c) Any incremental costs incurred by the authority in the development, implementation, and maintenance of this program shall be the responsibility of the participating hospitals.(d) Participating hospitals shall retain the full amount of payments provided under this program.(((62)))(60)(a) No more than $200,661,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation and no more than $91,430,000 of the general fundâlocal appropriation may be expended for an inpatient directed payment program.(b) The authority shall:(i) Design the program to support the state's access and other quality of care goals and to not increase general fundâstate expenditures;(ii) Seek approval from the centers for medicare and medicaid services to create a medicaid inpatient directed payment program for hospital inpatient services provided to medicaid program managed care recipients by UW Medicine hospitals and, at their option, UW Medicine affiliated hospitals;(iii) Upon approval, direct managed care organizations to make payments to eligible providers at levels required to ensure enrollees have timely access to critical high-quality care as allowed under 42 C.F.R. 438.6(c); and(iv) Increase medicaid payments for hospital inpatient services provided by UW Medicine and, at their option, UW Medicine affiliated hospitals to the average payment received from commercial payers.(c) Any incremental costs incurred by the authority in the development, implementation, and maintenance of this program shall be the responsibility of the participating hospitals.(d) Participating hospitals shall retain the full amount of payments provided under this program.(e) Participating hospitals will provide the local funds to fund the required nonfederal contribution.(f) This program shall be effective as soon as administratively possible.(((63)))(61) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, the authority shall maintain and increase access for family planning services for patients seeking services through department of health sexual and reproductive health program family planning providers based on the rates in effect as of July 1, 2022.(((64)))(62)(a) $5,063,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $17,227,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $259,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely for the authority to implement a pilot program for difficult to discharge individuals as described in section 133(11) of this act.(b) The authority shall work in collaboration with the contractor and task force identified in section 133(11) of this act to carry out the goals and objectives of the pilot program, including but not limited to:(i) Providing enhanced care management and wraparound services that shall be provided by or delegated by managed care pilot participants, based on services currently provided by the Harborview medical center program;(ii) Providing incentive payments to participating post acute care providers;(iii) Developing home and community services assessment timeliness requirements for pilot participants in cooperation with the department of social and health services; and(iv) Providing reimbursement for administrative support through Harborview medical center for the duration of the pilot project, including training and education to support pilot participants.(c) Of the amounts provided in this subsection, $44,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $42,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $259,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely for the authority to provide staff support to the difficult to discharge task force described in section 133(11) of this act, including any associated ad hoc subgroups.(((65)))(63)(a) Within the amounts ((appropriated in this section))provided in this subsection the authority, in consultation with the health and human services enterprise coalition, community-based organizations, health plans, accountable communities of health, and safety net providers, shall determine the cost and implementation impacts of a statewide community information exchange (CIE). A CIE platform must serve as a tool for addressing the social determinants of health, defined as nonclinical community and social factors such as housing, food security, transportation, financial strain, and interpersonal safety, that affect health, functioning, and quality-of-life outcomes.(b) Prior to issuing a request for proposals or beginning this project, the authority must work with stakeholders in (a) of this subsection to determine which platforms already exist within the Washington public and private health care system to determine interoperability needs and fiscal impacts to both the state and impacted providers and organizations that will be using a single statewide community information exchange platform.(c) The authority shall provide the office of financial management and fiscal committees of the legislature a proposal to leverage medicaid enterprise financing or other federal funds prior to beginning this project and shall not expend funds under a 1115 waiver or any other waiver without legislative authorization.(d) (($4,817,000))$298,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation and (($4,817,000))$298,000 of the general fundâprivate/local appropriation are provided solely for the authority to implement the community information exchange program. The technology solution chosen by the health care authority should be capable of interoperating with other state funded systems in Washington and should be able to electronically refer individuals to services using a closed-loop referral process. Funding for the community information exchange program is subject to the conditions, limitations, and review requirements of section 701 of this act.(((66)))(64) $252,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $252,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for staff dedicated to data review, analysis, and management, and policy analysis in support of the health care cost transparency board as described in chapter 70.390 RCW.(((67)))(65) $76,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $76,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025, $152,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation, and $606,000 of the telebehavioral health access accountâstate appropriation are provided solely for additional staff support for the mental health referral service for children and teens.(((68)))(66) $1,608,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $2,015,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $3,681,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely for a rate increase for the health homes program for fee-for-service enrollees, beginning July 1, 2023.(((69)))(67) $295,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $307,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $123,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely for the first approach skills training program through the partnership access line.(((70)))(68)(a) $362,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $482,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $895,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 1357 (prior authorization) and the center for medicare and medicaid services' interoperability and prior authorization final rule (CMS-0057-F).(b) The authority, in collaboration with managed care organizations, must provide a report to the office of financial management and the fiscal committees of the legislature no later than December 1, 2023, outlining any challenges experienced by carriers in hiring sufficient numbers and types of staff to comply with the prior authorization response times required by Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 1357 (prior authorization).(((71)))(69) $9,369,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 and $22,611,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely for an increase in medicaid reimbursement rates for professional services, beginning July 1, 2024, as follows:(a) Service categories including diagnostics, intense outpatient, opioid treatment programs, emergency room, inpatient and outpatient surgery, inpatient visits, low-level behavioral health, office administered drugs, and other physician services are increased up to 50 percent of medicare rates.(b) Service categories including office and home visits and consults are increased up to 65 percent of medicare rates.(c) Service categories including maternity services are increased up to 100 percent of medicare rates.(((72) $11,624,000))(70) $2,476,000 of the statewide 988 behavioral health crisis response line accountâstate appropriation and (($1,151,000))$2,419,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely for the planning phase of the 988 technology platform implementation project as described in RCW 71.24.890 (5) and (6). These amounts are subject to the conditions, limitations, and review requirements provided in section 701 of this act and any requirements as established in Senate Bill No. 6308 (extending timelines for implementation of the 988 system). The authority must actively collaborate with consolidated technology services and the department of health so that the statewide 988 technology solutions will be coordinated and interoperable.(((73)))(71) $969,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $1,938,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $3,024,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely for the authority, beginning January 1, 2024, to increase the children's dental rate for procedure code D1120 by at least 40 percent above the medical assistance fee-for-service rate in effect on January 1, 2023.(((74)))(72) $300,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 is provided solely for a grant to the nonprofit foundation managing the Washington patient safety coalition to support the communication and resolution programs certification program to improve outcomes for patients by providing in-depth feedback to health care organizations.(((75)))(73) $250,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $250,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the authority to continue a public-private partnership with a state-based oral health foundation to connect medicaid patients to dental services and reduce barriers to accessing care. The authority shall submit a progress report to the appropriate committees of the legislature by June 30, 2024.(((76)))(74) $103,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $205,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $442,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely to increase birth center facility fee reimbursement to $2,500 and home birth kit reimbursement to $500 for providers approved by the authority within the planned home births and births in birth centers program.(((77)))(75) $90,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $45,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $133,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely for implementation of Substitute House Bill No. 1435 (home care safety net assess.).(((78)))(76) $194,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024, (($1,724,000))$120,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 and (($1,918,000))$314,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely for the authority in coordination with the department of social and health services to develop and implement a Katie Beckett 1115 demonstration waiver. The authority shall limit enrollment to 1,000 clients during the waiver period. Based upon the experience developed during the waiver period, the authority shall make recommendations to the legislature for a future tax equity and fiscal responsibility act state plan option.(((79)))(77) $1,089,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $2,231,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $2,657,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely for kidney dialysis services for medicaid-enrolled patients through increased reimbursement rates beginning January 1, 2024. Within the amounts provided in this subsection, the authority must increase the medical assistance rates for revenue code 0821 billed with procedure code 90999 and revenue codes 0831, 0841, and 0851, when reimbursed on a fee-for-service basis or through managed care plans, by at least 30 percent above the fee-for-service composite rates in effect on January 1, 2023.(((80)))(78) $1,360,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $3,252,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely to increase the rates paid to rural hospitals that meet the criteria in (a) through (d) of this subsection. Payments for state and federal medical assistance programs for services provided by such a hospital, regardless of the beneficiary's managed care enrollment status, must be increased to 150 percent of the hospital's fee-for-service rates. The authority must discontinue this rate increase after June 30, 2024, and return to the payment levels and methodology for these hospitals that were in place as of January 1, 2018. Hospitals participating in the certified public expenditures program may not receive increased reimbursement for inpatient services. Hospitals qualifying for this rate increase must:(a) Be certified by the centers for medicare and medicaid services as sole community hospitals as of January 1, 2014;(b) Have had less than 150 acute care licensed beds in fiscal year 2011;(c) Have a level III adult trauma service designation from the department of health as of January 1, 2014; and(d) Be owned and operated by the state or a political subdivision.(((81)))(79) $55,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $110,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the authority to contract with a medicaid managed care organization for continuous coverage beginning January 1, 2024, for individuals under age 26 that were enrolled in the unaccompanied refugee minor program as authorized by the office of refugee and immigrant assistance. There are no residency, social security number, or citizenship requirements to receive the continuous coverage as described in this subsection.(((82)))(80)(a) $221,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and (($71,037,000))$64,622,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the authority, beginning July 1, 2024, to implement a program with coverage comparable to the amount, duration, and scope of care provided in the categorically needy medicaid program for adult individuals who:(i) Have an immigration status making them ineligible for federal medicaid or federal subsidies through the health benefit exchange;(ii) Are age 19 and older, including over age 65, and have countable income of up to 138 percent of the federal poverty level; and(iii) Are not eligible for another full scope federally funded medical assistance program, including any expansion of medicaid coverage for deferred action for childhood arrivals recipients.(b) Within the amounts provided in this subsection, the authority shall use the same eligibility, enrollment, redetermination and renewal, and appeals procedures as categorically needy medicaid, except where flexibility is necessary to maintain privacy or minimize burden to applicants or enrollees.(c) The authority in collaboration with the health benefit exchange, the department of social and health services, and community organizations must develop and implement an outreach and education campaign.(d) The authority must provide the following information to the governor's office and appropriate committees of the legislature by February 1st and November 1st of each year:(i) Actual and forecasted expenditures;(ii) Actual and forecasted data from the caseload forecast council; and(iii) The availability and impact of any federal program or proposed rule that expands access to health care for the population described in this subsection, such as the expansion of medicaid coverage for deferred action for childhood arrivals recipients.(e) The amount provided in this subsection is the maximum amount allowable for the purposes of this program.(((83)))(81)(a) $604,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $2,528,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $3,132,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely for the authority to increase the eligibility threshold for the qualified medicare beneficiary program to up to 110 percent of the federal poverty level.(b) The authority shall seek to maximize the availability of the qualified individual program through the centers for medicare and medicaid services.(c) The authority may adopt any rules necessary to administer this subsection. Nothing in this subsection limits the authority's existing rule-making authority related to medicare savings programs.(((84)))(82) $361,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $766,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $2,093,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely for the costs of, and pursuant to the conditions prescribed for, implementing the rate increase directed in section 215(44) for children for whom base funding for community behavioral health services is provided within this section.(((85)))(83)(a) $1,301,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for the health care cost transparency board and the implementation of Second Engrossed Substitute House Bill No. 1508 (health care cost board).(b) Of the amounts provided in this subsection, $100,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for the health care cost transparency board, in conjunction with the health care authority, to study:(i) Regulatory approaches to encouraging compliance with the health care cost growth benchmark established under chapter 70.390 RCW; and(ii) Best practices from other states regarding the infrastructure of state health care cost growth programs, including the scope, financing, staffing, and agency structure of such programs.(c) The board may conduct all or part of the study through the authority, by contract with a private entity, or by arrangement with another state agency conducting related work.(d) The study, as well as any recommendations for changes to the health care cost transparency board arising from the study, must be submitted by the board as part of the annual report required under RCW 70.390.070, no later than December 1, 2024.(((86)))(84) The authority must enter into an interagency agreement with consolidated technology services for the federal funding authority for the electronic health records statewide solution given the authority is the single state agency responsible for reporting to the federal government on the application for and use of the federal funding.(((87)))(85) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, the authority shall make administrative and system changes in anticipation of receiving federal authority to provide continuous eligibility for children ages zero to six covered though the apple health children's health insurance program. The centers for medicare and medicaid services must approve the section 1115 medicaid waiver prior to the implementation of this policy.(((88)))(86)(a) No more than $42,809,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation and no more than $13,314,000 of the general fundâlocal appropriation may be expended for a medicaid managed care multidisciplinary graduate medical education direct payment program.(b) Participating hospitals are:(i) University of Washington medical center, a state-owned and operated teaching hospital; and(ii) Harborview medical center, a state-operated teaching hospital.(c) The authority shall:(i) Design the program to support the state's access and other quality of care goals and to not increase general fundâstate expenditures;(ii) Seek approval from the centers for medicare and medicaid services to create a medicaid managed care direct payment program for hospital multidisciplinary graduate medical education program for state-owned and state-operated teaching hospitals;(iii) Reimburse participating hospitals for the medicaid managed care program's share of the unfunded costs incurred in providing graduate medical education training; and(iv) Make payments directly to participating hospitals.(d) Participating hospitals shall continue to be paid for inpatient and outpatient services provided to fee-for-service clients according to fee-for-service policies and rates, including payments under the certified public expenditure program.(e) Payments shall be additional and separate from any graduate medical education funding included in managed care capitation payments.(f) The authority shall calculate the medicaid managed care graduate medical education direct payments using cost and utilization data from the participating hospital's most recently filed medicare cost report to identify the participating hospital's total graduate medical education cost.(g) Total allowable graduate medical education costs shall be calculated using medicare methodologies and must:(i) Exclude medicare full-time equivalent and per resident amount limits;(ii) Include indirect medical education costs related to both outpatient and inpatient services; and(iii) Include other reimbursable training costs incurred by participating hospitals.(h) The authority shall:(i) Use ProviderOne as the primary source for fee-for-service and managed care claims and encounter data;(ii) Calculate the medicaid managed care program's share of the total allowable graduate medical education cost as the participating hospital's total allowable graduate medical education cost, as derived from the medicare cost report, times the total managed care charges divided by total medicaid fee-for-service charges plus managed care charges, as derived from ProviderOne data;(iii) Reduce the medicaid managed care graduate medical education direct payments by the fee-for-service equivalent graduate medical education payment included in managed care organization payments by applying the fee-for-service APR-DRG and EAPG conversion factors and rate adjustments applicable to the same year as the medicare cost report used to calculate allowable graduate medical education costs; and(iv) Calculate the medicaid managed care graduate medical education direct payments as graduate medical education allowable cost less fee-for-service equivalent graduate medical education payment for managed care services.(i) Medicaid managed care graduate medical education direct payments must be calculated prior to the beginning of the payment year.(j) Medicaid managed care graduate medical education direct payments must be made quarterly.(k) Any incremental costs incurred by the authority in the development, implementation, and maintenance of this program shall be the responsibility of the participating hospitals up to an amount not to exceed $150,000 per year.(l) Participating hospitals shall retain the full amount of payments provided under this program.(m) Payments received by hospitals and nonhospital participants in this program shall be in addition to all other payments received and shall not be used to supplant payments received through other programs.(n) Participating hospitals shall provide the local funds to fund the required nonfederal contribution through intergovernmental transfer.(o) The authority shall amend its current interagency agreement for funding and administration of similar programs to include the medicaid managed care graduate medical education direct payment program.(p) This program shall be effective as soon as administratively possible.(((89)))(87)(a) $69,957,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $111,234,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $290,634,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely for apple health managed care medical assistance. The authority must not change its risk sharing requirements without first providing notice to the governor and fiscal committees of the legislature detailing anticipated and potential fiscal impacts, unless required by the centers for medicare and medicaid services.(b) The authority must conduct annual retrospective rate acuity analyses to ensure that managed care rates have been set using practicable acuity assumptions. Adjustments must be made as appropriate.(c) For managed care plan year 2024 only, the authority must conduct a midyear acuity review to ensure that managed care rates for plan year 2024 were set using appropriate acuity assumptions and make any adjustments as appropriate reflective of the unique challenges of eligibility redeterminations and posteligibility review after the end of the public health emergency.(d) The authority must provide information about any potential changes to rates or acuity assumptions to the medicaid expenditure forecast work group at the same time or before providing this information to managed care organizations.(e) The authority may update managed care contracts as practicable.(f) The authority must review national best practices for risk sharing to determine if its contracting methods should be updated. If the authority, in consultation with its contracted actuary, determines it is appropriate to update any risk sharing agreements with managed care organizations, it must share its findings with the governor and fiscal committees of the legislature detailing anticipated and potential fiscal impacts prior to implementing these changes.(((90)))(88)(a) $100,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 and $100,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely for the authority to contract with an external organization for participatory and equity-focused engagement with doulas and doula partners across the state of Washington. This organization must work in collaboration with community partners who advance equitable access to improve perinatal outcomes and care through holistic services for multiracial communities.(b) The external organization will be responsible for:(i) Creating a design and implementation plan for a statewide doula hub and referral system; and(ii) Drafting a report, in partnership with the authority, summarizing the design and implementation plan, outlining ongoing funding required to support the doula workforce and clients accessing doula services through apple health, and providing any recommendations for both the doula hub and referral system.(c) The report will include, but not be limited to, prioritized recommendations on how to:(i) Provide statewide professional and workforce development support for birth doulas;(ii) Increase statewide access to doula services for apple health birthing people;(iii) Assist doulas with department of health credentialing requirements;(iv) Assist doulas with the medicaid provider enrollment process, including, but not limited to, support with:(A) Provider enrollment with the authority;(B) Contracting with medicaid managed care organizations;(C) Provider billing and claims submission processes;(D) Provider payment requirements; and(E) Eligibility support within ProviderOne; and(v) Establish communications with birthing people, families, birth workers, and healthcare providers who are seeking to connect with state-certified and medicaid-enrolled birth doulas through a statewide directory or referral system.(d) The report required in (c) of this subsection is due to the governor and appropriate committees of the legislature no later than June 30, 2025.(((91) $2,548,000))(89) $1,208,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 and (($2,964,000))$821,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely for implementation of Second Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5580 (maternal health outcomes). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2024, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.(92)))(90)(a) $7,000,000 of the family medicine workforce development accountâstate appropriation and $12,834,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely for the authority, in collaboration with the family medicine residency network and UW medicine, to establish a medicaid direct payment program to supplement family medicine provider graduate medical education funding in Washington state.(b) The medicaid family medicine graduate medical education direct payment program shall:(i) Support graduate medical education training;(ii) Improve access to quality healthcare services;(iii) Improve the state's ability to ensure that medicaid graduate medical education funding supports the state's workforce development goals; and(iv) Focus on improving underserved populations' and regions' access to health care.(c) The medicaid family medicine graduate medical education direct payment program participants shall include teaching sites that pay resident full-time equivalent costs that are eligible for federal financial participation.(d) The authority must seek any necessary state plan amendments or waivers from the centers for medicare and medicaid services that are necessary to implement this program and receive federal financial participation at the earliest possible date, but no later than January 1, 2025.(e) Any incremental costs incurred by the authority in the development, implementation, and maintenance of this program shall be the responsibility of the medicaid family medicine graduate medical education direct payment program up to an amount not to exceed $100,000 per year.(f) The family medicine family education advisory board created in RCW 70.112.080 will have administrative oversight, including the amount and methodologies used to distribute funds deposited within the family medicine workforce development account, subject to the conditions described in this subsection (((92)))(90).(g) Of the amounts provided in this section, $150,000 of the family medicine workforce development accountâstate appropriation is provided for consultant assistance, including program design and a payment model to estimate the effect of family medicine family education advisory board allocation decisions on all family medicine residency network participants.(h) Annual allocations from the family medicine workforce development accountâstate appropriation will be determined by the family medicine family education advisory board.(i) Participants in the medicaid family medicine graduate medical education direct payment program shall retain the full amount of payments provided under this program.(j) Payments received by participants in the medicaid family medicine graduate medical education direct payment program shall be in addition to all other payments received and shall not be used to supplant payments received through other programs.(((93)))(91)(a) $481,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 and $489,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely for the authority to conduct internal assessment of indirect costs and staff attrition trends to inform administrative needs. The assessment shall include, but not be limited to:(i) Reconciliation of full time equivalent positions as provided by the legislature for fiscal year 2024, agency financial reporting system allotments, and vacancies as of June 30, 2024;(ii) A comparison of current needs in relation to current vacancies;(iii) An analysis of costs and benefits of reallocating positions, as appropriate, to meet immediate staffing needs, especially if positions have remained historically, or long-term vacant; and(iv) A detailed description of assumptions related to indirect costs used in budget requests to the office of financial management.(b) The authority shall report its findings to the governor and fiscal committees of the legislature no later than December 31, 2024.(((94)))(92)(a) $1,615,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 and $3,911,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely for the authority to increase inpatient per diem rates for inpatient prospective payment system hospitals providing services under the substance using pregnant people program beginning July 1, 2024. Hospitals participating in the certified public expenditures program or the sole community hospital program may not receive increased reimbursement under this subsection.(b) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, the authority will review the rates for the substance using pregnant person program to determine if rebasing is appropriate and what rates would be required to sustain the program at current utilization levels.(c) If the authority determines that rates require rebasing for this program, the authority will submit a request to the legislature through its normal budget process.(((95)))(93) $314,000 of the long-term services and supports trust accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Substitute House Bill No. 2467 (LTSS trust access). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2024, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.(96)))(94) The authority and department of social and health services must collaborate in the identification and evaluation of strategies to obtain federal matching funding opportunities, specifically focusing on innovative medicaid framework adjustments and the consideration of necessary state plan amendments for the treatment facility described in section 203(1)(nn) of this act.(((97)))(95) $2,854,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 and $4,208,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely for the authority to increase the nonemergency medical transportation broker administrative rate to ensure access to health care services for medicaid patients.(((98)))(96)(a) $266,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 and $348,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely for rate increases, effective January 1, 2025, for private duty nursing, home health, and the medically intensive children's group home program services.(b) The authority must adopt a payment model that incorporates the following adjustments:(i) A 7.5 percent rate increase for home health and the medically intensive children's group home program services; and(ii) Private duty nursing services shall be $67.89 per hour by a registered nurse and (($55.70))$55.79 per hour by a licensed practical nurse.(((99)))(97) $50,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 and $450,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely for the authority to contract for the development of an application programming interface or software to streamline eligibility and provider payments for the foundational community supports program. In developing the software design, the authority must consult with current and prospective foundational community supports providers. A report on the status of implementation and an end-user satisfaction survey shall be submitted to the office of financial management and appropriate committees of the legislature by December 1, 2024.(((100)))(98) $300,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $400,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the Bree collaborative to support collaborative learning and targeted technical assistance for quality improvement initiatives.(((101)))(99) $500,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 and $500,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely for the authority to contract with access to baby and child dentistry local programs for the purpose of maintaining and expanding capacity for local program coordinators.(((102)))(100) $91,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 and $91,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely to increase funding for the existing contract with the University of Washington to support primary care providers that are designated as an autism spectrum disorder (ASD) center of excellence.(((103)))(101) $1,750,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 and $3,250,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely for the authority to:(a) Increase screening reimbursement rates for primary care providers, beginning January 1, 2025, for postnatal, child, and adolescent mental health screenings sufficient to provide follow up and coordination in primary care settings for children aged 0-21 years and their families, per the American academy of pediatrics' bright futures guidelines; and(b) To implement a funding mechanism using code G0136 for a social determinants of health risk assessment benefit for children and their families.(((104)))(102) $23,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 and $20,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Substitute House Bill No. 2041 (physician assistant practice). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2024, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.(105)))(103) $181,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 and $162,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute House Bill No. 1941 (health home serv./children). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2024, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.))(104) $1,246,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation is provided solely for the department of health's statewide 988 technology solution and is subject to the conditions, limitations, and review requirements of section 701, chapter 376, Laws of 2024. The state match is appropriated to the department of health, see section 1220(130) of this act, and the authority must use the same program index as the department of health and the appropriation index assigned to the authority for this proviso when allotting and recording expenditures. This federal funding must be reflected in the department of health's technology budget, which will show both the federal funding from the authority and the state funding from the department of health.Sec. 1212. 2024 c 376 s 212 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE STATE HEALTH CARE AUTHORITYâPUBLIC EMPLOYEES' BENEFITS BOARD AND EMPLOYEE BENEFITS PROGRAMState Health Care Authority Administrative AccountâState Appropriation. . . .(($44,982,000))Â Â Â Â Â $45,334,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($44,982,000))Â Â Â Â Â $45,334,000The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) Any savings from reduced claims costs must be reserved for funding employee benefits during future fiscal biennia and may not be used for administrative expenses. The health care authority shall deposit any moneys received on behalf of the uniform medical plan resulting from rebates on prescription drugs, audits of hospitals, subrogation payments, or any other moneys received as a result of prior uniform medical plan claims payments, in the public employees' and retirees' insurance account to be used for insurance benefits.(2) Any changes to benefits must be approved by the public employees' benefits board. The board shall not make any changes to benefits without considering a comprehensive analysis of the cost of those changes, and shall not increase benefits unless offsetting cost reductions from other benefit revisions are sufficient to fund the changes. The board shall not make any change in retiree eligibility criteria that reestablishes eligibility for enrollment in retiree benefits.(3) Except as may be provided in a health care bargaining agreement pursuant to RCW 41.80.020, to provide benefits within the level of funding provided in part IX of this bill, the public employees' benefits board shall require: Employee premium copayments, increases increase in point-of-service cost sharing, the implementation of managed competition, or make other changes to benefits consistent with RCW 41.05.065.(4) The board shall collect a surcharge payment of not less than $25 dollars per month from members who use tobacco products, and a surcharge payment of not less than $50 per month from members who cover a spouse or domestic partner where the spouse or domestic partner has chosen not to enroll in another employer-based group health insurance that has benefits and premiums with an actuarial value of not less than 95 percent of the actuarial value of the public employees' benefits board plan with the largest enrollment. The surcharge payments shall be collected in addition to the member premium payment.(5) $78,000 of the health care authority administrative accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for administrative costs associated with extending retiree coverage under Substitute House Bill No. 1804 (PEBB/subdivision retirees).(6) $500,000 of the state health care authority administrative accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for consultation with retirees, including conducting listening sessions and facilitating public forums to gather feedback about retiree needs. By December 1, 2023, the authority must report to the legislature with its findings, including an analysis of government self-insured plans with benefits that are equal to or richer, and with more affordable premiums, than uniform medical plan classic medicare. The legislature intends that the results of stakeholder engagements will be used to inform future health care plan selections.(7) During the 2023-2025 fiscal biennium, the health care authority, in consultation with the office of financial management, shall review consolidating the administrative sections of the operating budget for the public employees' and school employees' benefits boards. Any change in budget structure must not result in changes to board or benefit policies. A budget structure change developed under this subsection may be included in the 2024 supplemental or the 2025-2027 biennial governor's budget submittal without being subject to the legislative evaluation and accountability program committee approval under RCW 43.88.030(7).(8)(a) $100,000 of the health care authority administrative accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for a study on consolidating the public employees' benefits board (PEBB) and school employees' benefits board (SEBB) programs. By December 1, 2024, the authority must report to the legislature the necessary statutory and program changes required to achieve consolidation of:(i) The public employees' benefits board and school employees' benefits board into a single governing board;(ii) The current risks pools described in RCW 41.05.022 (2) and (3);(iii) The existing eligibility provisions of the PEBB and SEBB programs; and(iv) Benefit offerings into more aligned plans.(b) In considering statutory and program changes, the authority must consider:(i) Ways to engage with impacted participants to understand their priorities related to consolidation;(ii) Options that maintain benefit eligibility for current participants;(iii) Options for ensuring equity among participants in a consolidated program; and(iv) Data and findings from previous reports related to consolidating PEBB and SEBB plans.(9) By December 1, 2024, the authority shall submit a report to the legislature describing options, and a recommendation, for possible future coverage in the uniform medical plan for food and drug administration approved glucagon-like peptide 1 agonists for the treatment of obesity and weight loss.Sec. 1213. 2024 c 376 s 213 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE STATE HEALTH CARE AUTHORITYâSCHOOL EMPLOYEES' BENEFITS BOARDSchool Employees' Insurance Administrative AccountâState Appropriation. . . .(($33,739,000))Â Â Â Â Â $33,981,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($33,739,000))Â Â Â Â Â $33,981,000The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) $324,000 of the school employees' insurance administrative accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5275 (SEBB benefit access).(2) By December 1, 2024, the authority shall submit a report to the legislature describing options, and a recommendation, for possible future coverage in the uniform medical plan for food and drug administration approved glucagon-like peptide 1 agonists for the treatment of obesity and weight loss.Sec. 1214. 2024 c 376 s 214 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE STATE HEALTH CARE AUTHORITYâHEALTH BENEFIT EXCHANGEGeneral FundâState Appropriation (FY 2024). . . .$9,671,000General FundâState Appropriation (FY 2025). . . .(($7,156,000))Â Â Â Â Â $7,616,000General FundâFederal Appropriation. . . .(($67,396,000))Â Â Â Â Â $69,055,000Education Legacy Trust AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$350,000Health Benefit Exchange AccountâState Appropriation. . . .(($83,528,000))Â Â Â Â Â $81,409,000State Health Care Affordability AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$125,000,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$293,101,000The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) The receipt and use of medicaid funds provided to the health benefit exchange from the health care authority are subject to compliance with state and federal regulations and policies governing the Washington apple health programs, including timely and proper application, eligibility, and enrollment procedures.(2)(a) By July 15th, October 15th, and January 15th of each year, the authority shall make a payment of 30 percent of the general fundâstate appropriation, 30 percent of the health benefit exchange accountâstate appropriation, and 30 percent of the health care affordability accountâstate appropriation to the exchange. By April 15th of each year, the authority shall make a payment of 10 percent of the general fundâstate appropriation, 10 percent of the health benefit exchange accountâstate appropriation, and 10 percent of the health care affordability accountâstate appropriation to the exchange.(b) The exchange shall monitor actual to projected revenues and make necessary adjustments in expenditures or carrier assessments to ensure expenditures do not exceed actual revenues.(c) Payments made from general fundâstate appropriation and health benefit exchange accountâstate appropriation shall be available for expenditure for no longer than the period of the appropriation from which it was made. When the actual cost of materials and services have been fully determined, and in no event later than the lapsing of the appropriation, any unexpended balance of the payment shall be returned to the authority for credit to the fund or account from which it was made, and under no condition shall expenditures exceed actual revenue.(3) $1,939,000 of the health benefit exchange accountâstate appropriation and $6,189,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely for the modernizing healthplanfinder project. These amounts are subject to the conditions, limitations, and review provided in section 701 of this act.(4)(a) $115,000,000 of the state health care affordability accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the exchange to administer a premium assistance program, beginning for plan year 2023, as established in RCW 43.71.110. An individual is eligible for the premium assistance provided if the individual: (i) Has income up to 250 percent of the federal poverty level; and (ii) meets other eligibility criteria as established in RCW 43.71.110(4)(a).(b) $260,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 is provided solely for a study, in consultation with the health care authority and office of the insurance commissioner, of how the exchange's current section 1332 waiver could be amended to generate federal pass-through funding to support the affordability programs established in RCW 43.71.110. The actuarial study must focus on methods that could be most readily leveraged in Washington, considering those being used in other public option programs. Study findings must be reported to the appropriate committees of the legislature by December 1, 2023.(5) $10,000,000 of the state health care affordability accountâstate appropriation is provided solely to provide premium assistance for customers ineligible for federal premium tax credits who meet the eligibility criteria established in subsection (4)(a) of this section, and is contingent upon continued approval of the applicable waiver described in RCW 43.71.120.(6) $102,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $865,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation, and $123,000 of the health benefit exchange accountâstate appropriation are provided solely for a technology solution for an authoritative client identifier, or master person index, in Healthplanfinder to support the health and human services coalition in uniformly identifying clients across multiple state service delivery systems. These amounts are subject to the conditions, limitations, and review requirements of section 701 of this act.(7) $200,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $200,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the exchange, in collaboration with the department of social and health services and the home training network as described in RCW 70.128.305, to provide educational resources and trainings to help connect owners and employees of adult family homes to health care coverage.(8) $299,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $299,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $202,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely for pass-through funding in the annual amount of $100,000 for each lead navigator organization in the four regions with the highest concentration of citizens of the compact of free association (COFA) to:(a) Support a staff position within the COFA community to provide enrollment assistance to the COFA community beyond the scope of the current COFA program; and(b) Support COFA community-led outreach and enrollment activities.(9)(a) $300,000 of the health benefit exchange accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for staff and consultants to complete a study of options and recommendations for the state to ensure continuous health care coverage through qualified health plans for medicaid beneficiaries losing medicaid coverage through Washington Healthplanfinder. In coordination with the health care authority and department of social and health services, the study must include, but not be limited to:(i) An analysis of transitional solutions used in other states to continue coverage for individuals losing medicaid eligibility;(ii) In coordination with the department of social and health services' research and data analysis division, an analysis of monthly enrollment rates for persons who are determined no longer eligible for medicaid, including demographic and employment information, and those who enroll in qualified health plans, including demographic and employment information; and(iii) A feasibility analysis of auto-enrolling clients that lose medicaid eligibility and are eligible for a no-premium qualified health plan through Washington Healthplanfinder.(b) The study must be submitted to the office of financial management and appropriate committees of the legislature by December 31, 2024.Sec. 1215. 2024 c 376 s 215 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE STATE HEALTH CARE AUTHORITYâCOMMUNITY BEHAVIORAL HEALTH PROGRAMGeneral FundâState Appropriation (FY 2024). . . .$1,025,616,000General FundâState Appropriation (FY 2025). . . .(($1,226,089,000))Â Â Â Â Â $1,172,621,000General FundâFederal Appropriation. . . .(($3,078,664,000))Â Â Â Â Â $3,102,474,000General FundâPrivate/Local Appropriation. . . .(($38,904,000))Â Â Â Â Â $38,969,000Criminal Justice Treatment AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$22,001,000Problem Gambling AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$3,738,000Dedicated Cannabis AccountâState Appropriation(FY 2024). . . .$28,498,000Dedicated Cannabis AccountâState Appropriation(FY 2025). . . .$28,501,000Opioid Abatement Settlement AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .(($78,744,000))Â Â Â Â Â $74,877,000Statewide 988 Behavioral Health Crisis Response LineAccountâState Appropriation. . . .(($33,499,000))Â Â Â Â Â $18,786,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($5,564,254,000))Â Â Â Â Â $5,516,081,000The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) For the purposes of this section, "behavioral health entities" means managed care organizations and behavioral health administrative services organizations that reimburse providers for behavioral health services.(2) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, funding is provided for implementation of the settlement agreement under Trueblood, et al. v. Department of Social and Health Services, et al., United States District Court for the Western District of Washington, Cause No. 14-cv-01178-MJP. In addition to amounts provided solely for implementation of the settlement agreement, class members must have access to supports and services funded throughout this section for which they meet eligibility and medical necessity requirements. The authority must include language in contracts that requires regional behavioral health entities to develop and implement plans for improving access to timely and appropriate treatment for individuals with behavioral health needs and current or prior criminal justice involvement who are eligible for services under these contracts.(3)(a) $43,429,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024, (($48,634,000))$45,404,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $15,538,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely to continue the phase-in of the settlement agreement under Trueblood, et al. v. Department of Social and Health Services, et al., United States District Court for the Western District of Washington, Cause No. 14-cv-01178-MJP. The authority, in collaboration with the department of social and health services and the criminal justice training commission, must implement the provisions of the settlement agreement pursuant to the timeline and implementation plan provided for under the settlement agreement. This includes implementing provisions related to competency evaluations, competency restoration, crisis diversion and supports, education and training, and workforce development. Within these amounts, sufficient funding is provided to implement Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5440 (competency evaluations).(b) Of the amounts provided in this subsection, $5,108,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $6,341,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5440 (competency evaluations). Of these amounts, $186,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $186,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely to increase compensation for staff in outpatient competency restoration programs pursuant to Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5440 (competency evaluations).(c) By December 1, 2024, the authority must provide notification to the office of financial management and the appropriate committees of the legislature of the estimated opening date and operating costs for the Trueblood phase three crisis stabilization center.(4) $8,000,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $8,000,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely to continue diversion grant programs funded through contempt fines pursuant to Trueblood, et al. v. Department of Social and Health Services, et al., United States District Court for the Western District of Washington, Cause No. 14-cv-01178-MJP. The authority must consult with the plaintiffs and court monitor to determine, within the amounts provided, which of the programs will continue to receive funding through this appropriation. The programs shall use this funding to provide assessments, mental health treatment, substance use disorder treatment, case management, employment, and other social services. By December 1, 2023, the authority, in consultation with the plaintiffs and the court monitor, must submit a report to the office of financial management and the appropriate fiscal committees of the legislature which includes: Identification of the programs that receive funding through this subsection; a narrative description of each program model; the number of individuals being served by each program on a monthly basis; metrics or outcomes reported as part of the contracts; and recommendations related to further support of these programs in the 2023-2025 fiscal biennium.(5) $12,359,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $24,187,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $28,598,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely for the authority and behavioral health entities to continue to contract for implementation of high-intensity programs for assertive community treatment (PACT) teams. In determining the proportion of medicaid and nonmedicaid funding provided to behavioral health entities with PACT teams, the authority shall consider the differences between behavioral health entities in the percentages of services and other costs associated with the teams that are not reimbursable under medicaid. The authority may allow behavioral health entities which have nonmedicaid reimbursable costs that are higher than the nonmedicaid allocation they receive under this section to supplement these funds with local dollars or funds received under subsection (7) of this section. The authority and behavioral health entities shall maintain consistency with all essential elements of the PACT evidence-based practice model in programs funded under this section. Of the amounts provided in this subsection:(a) $4,628,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 and $920,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely for two new programs for assertive community treatment teams.(b) $6,032,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 and $2,907,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely for current assertive community treatment teams contingent upon a plan submitted to and approved by the authority to increase and maintain average monthly caseloads to no less than 80 percent of the maximum capacity for full and half teams as established in the WA-PACT program standards.(c) $669,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 and $994,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely for a rate increase for existing programs for assertive community treatment teams. The rate increase must be implemented to provide the same percentage increase to all providers and the authority must employ mechanisms such as directed payment or other options allowable under federal medicaid law to assure funding provided through managed care organizations must be used to increase rates for their contracted assertive community treatment team providers.(d) $399,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 and $333,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely for administrative costs related to assertive community treatment teams including contracted training, technical assistance, and assessment services.(e) $100,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for the authority to contract for an assessment on the access of young adults to assertive community treatment team services. The study must include identification of: (i) The number and percentage of young adults receiving services through assertive community treatment teams; (ii) barriers and strategies for increasing access to assertive community treatment team services for young adults; and (iii) identification of evidence-based alternative models for providing high intensity wraparound services that may be more appropriate for some young adult populations. The authority must submit a report to the office of financial management and the appropriate committees of the legislature summarizing the findings and recommendations of the study by December 1, 2024.(6) $1,668,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 and $3,280,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely for the authority to maintain a pilot project to incorporate peer bridging staff into behavioral health regional teams that provide transitional services to individuals returning to their communities.(7) $144,519,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $139,238,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for persons and services not covered by the medicaid program. To the extent possible, levels of behavioral health entity spending must be maintained in the following priority order: Crisis and commitment services; community inpatient services; and residential care services, including personal care and emergency housing assistance. These amounts must be distributed to behavioral health entities as follows:(a) $108,803,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $124,713,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the authority to contract with behavioral health administrative service organizations for behavioral health treatment services not covered under the medicaid program. Within these amounts, behavioral health administrative service organizations must provide a 15 percent rate increase to providers receiving state funds for nonmedicaid services under this section effective January 1, 2024.(b) $35,716,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $14,525,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the authority to contract with medicaid managed care organizations for wraparound services to medicaid enrolled individuals that are not covered under the medicaid program. Within the amounts provided in this subsection:(i) Medicaid managed care organizations must provide a 15 percent rate increase to providers receiving state funding for nonmedicaid services under this section effective January 1, 2024.(ii) Pursuant to RCW 41.56.029, during fiscal year 2024, the authority may work with the office of financial management to negotiate a tiered rate structure for behavioral health personal care services for adult family home providers serving medicaid enrollees. An agreement reached with the adult family home council must be submitted to the director of financial management by October 1, 2023, and certified as financially feasible in order to be considered for funding during the 2024 legislative session. Upon completion of bargaining, the authority shall coordinate with the department of social and health services to develop and submit to the centers for medicare and medicaid services an application to provide a 1915(i) state plan home and community-based services benefit. The application shall be developed to allow for the delivery of wraparound supportive behavioral health services for individuals with mental illnesses who also have a personal care need. The 1915(i) state plan shall be developed to standardize coverage and administration, improve the current benefit design, and clarify roles in administration of the behavioral health personal care services benefit.(8) The authority is authorized to continue to contract directly, rather than through contracts with behavioral health entities for children's long-term inpatient facility services.(9) $1,204,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and (($1,204,000))$1,529,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely to reimburse Pierce and Spokane counties for the cost of conducting 180-day commitment hearings at the state psychiatric hospitals.(10) Behavioral health entities may use local funds to earn additional federal medicaid match, provided the locally matched rate does not exceed the upper-bound of their federally allowable rate range, and provided that the enhanced funding is used only to provide medicaid state plan or waiver services to medicaid clients. Additionally, behavioral health entities may use a portion of the state funds allocated in accordance with subsection (7) of this section to earn additional medicaid match, but only to the extent that the application of such funds to medicaid services does not diminish the level of crisis and commitment, community inpatient, residential care, and outpatient services presently available to persons not eligible for medicaid.(11) $2,291,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $2,291,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for mental health services for mentally ill offenders while confined in a county or city jail and for facilitating access to programs that offer mental health services upon release from confinement. The authority must collect information from the behavioral health entities on their plan for using these funds, the numbers of individuals served, and the types of services provided.(12) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, funding is provided for the authority to develop and phase in intensive mental health services for high needs youth consistent with the settlement agreement in T.R. v. Dreyfus and Porter.(13)(a) The authority must establish minimum and maximum funding levels for all reserves allowed under behavioral health administrative service organization contracts and include contract language that clearly states the requirements and limitations. The reserve levels must be informed by the types of risk carried by behavioral health administrative service organizations for mandatory services and also consider reasonable levels of operating reserves. The authority must monitor and ensure that behavioral health administrative service organization reserves do not exceed maximum levels. The authority must monitor revenue and expenditure reports and must require a behavioral health administrative service organization to submit a corrective action plan on how it will spend its excess reserves within a reasonable period of time, when its reported reserves exceed maximum levels established under the contract. The authority must review and approve such plans and monitor to ensure compliance. If the authority determines that a behavioral health administrative service organization has failed to provide an adequate excess reserve corrective action plan or is not complying with an approved plan, the authority must reduce payments to the entity in accordance with remedial actions provisions included in the contract. These reductions in payments must continue until the authority determines that the entity has come into substantial compliance with an approved excess reserve corrective action plan. The authority must submit to the office of financial management and the appropriate committees of the legislature, each December of the biennium, the minimum and maximum reserve levels established in contract for each of the behavioral health administrative service organizations for the prior fiscal year and the actual reserve levels reported at the end of the fiscal year.(b) In contracts effective during fiscal year 2025, the authority must allow the north sound behavioral health administrative services organization to pilot reserve funding flexibility by allowing the north sound behavioral health administrative services organization to utilize, for other purposes, 30 percent of funding received prior to that contract period currently in reserves and that was received pursuant to a specific legislative proviso. Funding repurposed under this subsection must be used to support the duties of the administrative services organization under RCW 71.24.045 through programs serving individuals with severe and persistent behavioral health conditions and behavioral health services that promote stability and recovery within their regional service area. Expenditures pursuant to this pilot program may include, but are not limited to, crisis wraparound services, jail transition and diversion services, court costs, and coresponder programs. The authority, in partnership with the north sound behavioral health administrative services organization, must provide a report to the appropriate committees of the legislature by December 31, 2024, describing the impacts of this pilot program to the regional crisis continuum of care. The report must also include information on which specific legislative provisos north sound behavioral health administrative services organization repurposed funding from under this subsection and for what purpose those funds were used.(14) During the 2023-2025 fiscal biennium, any amounts provided in this section that are used for case management services for pregnant and parenting women must be contracted directly between the authority and pregnant and parenting women case management providers.(15) $3,500,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation is provided solely for the continued funding of existing county drug and alcohol use prevention programs.(16) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, the authority may contract with the University of Washington and community-based providers for the provision of the parent-child assistance program or other specialized chemical dependency case management providers for pregnant, postpartum, and parenting women. For all contractors: (a) Service and other outcome data must be provided to the authority by request; and (b) indirect charges for administering the program must not exceed 10 percent of the total contract amount.(17) Within the amounts provided in this section, behavioral health entities must provide outpatient chemical dependency treatment for offenders enrolled in the medicaid program who are supervised by the department of corrections pursuant to a term of community supervision. Contracts with behavioral health entities must require that behavioral health entities include in their provider network specialized expertise in the provision of manualized, evidence-based chemical dependency treatment services for offenders. The department of corrections and the authority must develop a memorandum of understanding for department of corrections offenders on active supervision who are medicaid eligible and meet medical necessity for outpatient substance use disorder treatment. The agreement will ensure that treatment services provided are coordinated, do not result in duplication of services, and maintain access and quality of care for the individuals being served. The authority must provide all necessary data, access, and reports to the department of corrections for all department of corrections offenders that receive medicaid paid services.(18) The criminal justice treatment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for treatment and treatment support services for offenders with a substance use disorder pursuant to RCW 71.24.580. The authority must offer counties the option to administer their share of the distributions provided for under RCW 71.24.580(5)(a). If a county is not interested in administering the funds, the authority shall contract with behavioral health entities to administer these funds consistent with the plans approved by local panels pursuant to RCW 71.24.580(5)(b). Funding from the criminal justice treatment account may be used to provide treatment and support services through the conclusion of an individual's treatment plan to individuals participating in a drug court program as of February 24, 2021, if that individual wishes to continue treatment following dismissal of charges they were facing under RCW 69.50.4013(1). Such participation is voluntary and contingent upon substantial compliance with drug court program requirements. The authority must provide a report to the office of financial management and the appropriate committees of the legislature that identifies the distribution of criminal justice treatment account funds by September 30, 2023.(19)(a) $11,426,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $15,651,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $21,554,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely for crisis triage facilities, crisis relief centers, or crisis stabilization units. Services in these facilities may include crisis stabilization and intervention, individual counseling, peer support, medication management, education, and referral assistance. The authority shall monitor each center's effectiveness at lowering the rate of state psychiatric hospital admissions.(b) Within these amounts, the health care authority shall convene representatives from medicaid managed care organizations, behavioral health administrative organizations, private insurance carriers, self-insured organizations, crisis providers, and the office of the insurance commissioner to assess gaps in the current funding model for crisis and co-response services and recommend options for addressing these gaps including, but not limited to, an alternative funding model for crisis and co-response services. The assessment must consider available data to determine to what extent the costs of crisis and co-response services for clients of private insurance carriers, medicaid managed care organizations, and individuals enrolled in medicaid fee-for-service are being subsidized through state funded behavioral health administrative services organization contracts. The analysis shall examine crisis and co-response services provided by mobile crisis teams and co-response teams as well as facility-based services such as crisis triage and crisis stabilization units. In the development of an alternative funding model, the authority and office of the insurance commissioner must explore mechanisms that: (i) Determine the annual cost of operating crisis and co-response services and collect a proportional share of the program cost from each health insurance carrier; (ii) differentiate between crisis and co-response services eligible for medicaid funding from other nonmedicaid eligible activities; and (iii) simplify administrative complexity of billing for service providers such as the use of a third party administrator. The authority must submit a preliminary report to the office of financial management and the appropriate committees of the legislature by December 1, 2023, and a final report by December 1, 2024. Up to $300,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024, and $450,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 may be used for the assessment and reporting activities required under this subsection.(c) Sufficient funding is provided in this subsection to implement Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5120 (crisis relief centers).(20) $9,795,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $10,015,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $15,025,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely for the operation of secure withdrawal management and stabilization facilities. The authority may not use any of these amounts for services in facilities that are subject to federal funding restrictions that apply to institutions for mental diseases, unless they have received a waiver that allows for full federal participation in these facilities. Within these amounts, funding is provided to increase the fee for service rate for these facilities up to $650 per day. The authority must require in contracts with behavioral health entities that they pay no lower than the fee for service rate. The authority must coordinate with regional behavioral health entities to identify and implement purchasing strategies or regulatory changes that increase access to services for individuals with complex behavioral health needs at secure withdrawal management and stabilization facilities.(21) $1,401,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $1,401,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $3,210,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely for the implementation of intensive behavioral health treatment facilities within the community behavioral health service system pursuant to chapter 324, Laws of 2019 (2SHB 1394).(22)(a) $12,878,000 of the dedicated cannabis accountâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $12,878,000 of the dedicated cannabis accountâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for:(i) A memorandum of understanding with the department of children, youth, and families to provide substance abuse treatment programs;(ii) A contract with the Washington state institute for public policy to conduct a cost-benefit evaluation of the implementations of chapter 3, Laws of 2013 (Initiative Measure No. 502);(iii) Designing and administering the Washington state healthy youth survey and the Washington state young adult behavioral health survey;(iv) Maintaining increased services to pregnant and parenting women provided through the parent child assistance program;(v) Maintaining increased prevention and treatment service provided by tribes and federally recognized American Indian organization to children and youth;(vi) Maintaining increased residential treatment services for children and youth;(vii) Training and technical assistance for the implementation of evidence-based, research based, and promising programs which prevent or reduce substance use disorder;(viii) Expenditures into the home visiting services account; and(ix) Grants to community-based programs that provide prevention services or activities to youth.(b) The authority must allocate the amounts provided in (a) of this subsection amongst the specific activities proportionate to the fiscal year 2021 allocation.(23)(a) $1,125,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $1,125,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for Spokane behavioral health entities to implement services to reduce utilization and the census at eastern state hospital. Such services must include:(i) High intensity treatment team for persons who are high utilizers of psychiatric inpatient services, including those with co-occurring disorders and other special needs;(ii) Crisis outreach and diversion services to stabilize in the community individuals in crisis who are at risk of requiring inpatient care or jail services;(iii) Mental health services provided in nursing facilities to individuals with dementia, and consultation to facility staff treating those individuals; and(iv) Services at the 16-bed evaluation and treatment facility.(b) At least annually, the Spokane county behavioral health entities shall assess the effectiveness of these services in reducing utilization at eastern state hospital, identify services that are not optimally effective, and modify those services to improve their effectiveness.(24) $1,850,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $1,850,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $13,312,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely for substance use disorder peer support services included in behavioral health capitation rates in accordance with section 213(5)(ss), chapter 299, Laws of 2018. The authority shall require managed care organizations to provide access to peer support services for individuals with substance use disorders transitioning from emergency departments, inpatient facilities, or receiving treatment as part of hub and spoke networks.(25) $1,423,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $1,423,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $5,908,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely for the authority to continue to implement discharge wraparound services for individuals with complex behavioral health conditions transitioning or being diverted from admission to psychiatric inpatient programs. The authority must coordinate with the department of social and health services in establishing the standards for these programs.(26) $500,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $500,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $1,000,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely for the authority to maintain a memorandum of understanding with the criminal justice training commission to provide funding for community grants pursuant to RCW 36.28A.450.(27) $350,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation and $300,000 of the opioid abatement settlement accountâstate appropriation are provided solely to contract with a nationally recognized recovery residence organization and to provide technical assistance to operators of recovery residences seeking certification in accordance with chapter 264, Laws of 2019 (2SHB 1528).(28) $3,396,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $3,396,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $16,200,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely for support of and to continue to increase clubhouse programs across the state. The authority shall work with the centers for medicare and medicaid services to review opportunities to include clubhouse services as an optional "in lieu of" service in managed care organization contracts in order to maximize federal participation.(29) $708,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $708,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $1,598,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely for implementing mental health peer respite centers and a pilot project to implement a mental health drop-in center in accordance with chapter 324, Laws of 2019 (2SHB 1394).(30) $800,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $800,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $1,452,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely for the authority to implement strategies related to suicide prevention and treatment.(31) $446,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $446,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $178,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely for the University of Washington's evidence-based practice institute which supports the identification, evaluation, and implementation of evidence-based or promising practices. The institute must work with the authority to develop a plan to seek private, federal, or other grant funding in order to reduce the need for state general funds. The authority must collect information from the institute on the use of these funds and submit a report to the office of financial management and the appropriate fiscal committees of the legislature by December 1st of each year of the biennium.(32) As an element of contractual network adequacy requirements and reporting, the authority shall direct managed care organizations to make all reasonable efforts to develop or maintain contracts with provider networks that leverage local, federal, or philanthropic funding to enhance effectiveness of medicaid-funded integrated care services. These networks must promote medicaid clients' access to a system of services that addresses additional social support services and social determinants of health as defined in RCW 43.20.025 in a manner that is integrated with the delivery of behavioral health and medical treatment services.(33) $9,000,000 of the criminal justice treatment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the authority to maintain funding for new therapeutic courts created or expanded during fiscal year 2021, or to maintain the fiscal year 2021 expansion of services being provided to an already existing therapeutic court that engages in evidence-based practices, to include medication assisted treatment in jail settings pursuant to RCW 71.24.580. Funding provided under this subsection shall not supplant existing funds utilized for this purpose.(34) In establishing, re-basing, enhancing, or otherwise updating medicaid rates for behavioral health services, the authority and contracted actuaries shall use a transparent process that provides an opportunity for medicaid managed care organizations, behavioral health administrative service organizations, and behavioral health provider agencies, and their representatives, to review and provide data and feedback on proposed rate changes within their region or regions of service operation. The authority and contracted actuaries shall transparently incorporate the information gained from this process and make adjustments allowable under federal law when appropriate.(35) The authority shall seek input from representatives of the managed care organizations (MCOs), licensed community behavioral health agencies, and behavioral health administrative service organizations to develop specific metrics related to behavioral health outcomes under integrated managed care. These metrics must include, but are not limited to: (a) Revenues and expenditures for community behavioral health programs, including medicaid and nonmedicaid funding; (b) access to services, service denials, and utilization by state plan modality; (c) claims denials and record of timely payment to providers; (d) client demographics; and (e) social and recovery measures and managed care organization performance measures. The authority must work with managed care organizations and behavioral health administrative service organizations to integrate these metrics into an annual reporting structure designed to evaluate the performance of the behavioral health system in the state over time. The authority must submit a report to the office of financial management and the appropriate committees of the legislature, before December 30th of each year during the fiscal biennium, that details the implemented metrics and relevant performance outcomes for the prior calendar year.(36) $4,061,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $3,773,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $6,419,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely for the authority to maintain pilot programs for intensive outpatient services and partial hospitalization services for certain children and adolescents and, pursuant to chapter 94, Laws of 2022 (2SSB 5736), add coverage for these services into the state medicaid program beginning January 1, 2024.(a) The authority must establish minimum standards, eligibility criteria, authorization and utilization review processes, and payment methodologies for the programs in contract.(b) Eligibility for the pilot sites is limited pursuant to the following:(i) Children and adolescents discharged from an inpatient hospital treatment program who require the level of services offered by the pilot programs in lieu of continued inpatient treatment;(ii) Children and adolescents who require the level of services offered by the pilot programs in order to avoid inpatient hospitalization; and(iii) Services may not be offered if there are less costly alternative community-based services that can effectively meet the needs of an individual referred to the program.(c) Eligibility for services through the state medicaid program shall be consistent with criteria approved by the centers for medicare and medicaid services pursuant to implementation of chapter 94, Laws of 2022 (2SSB 5736).(d) The authority must collect data on the program sites and work with the actuaries responsible for establishing managed care rates for medicaid enrollees to develop and submit an annual report to the office of financial management and the appropriate committees of the legislature each December of the fiscal biennium that includes the following information:(i) A narrative description of the services provided at each program site and identification of any specific gaps the sites were able to fill in the current continuum of care;(ii) Clinical outcomes and estimated reductions in psychiatric inpatient costs associated with each of the program sites;(iii) Recommendations for whether the pilot models should be expanded statewide, whether modifications should be made to the models to better address gaps in the continuum identified through the pilot sites, whether the models could be expanded to community behavioral health providers, and whether statewide implementation should be achieved through a state plan amendment or some other mechanism for leveraging federal medicaid match;(iv) Actuarial projections on the statewide need for services related to the pilot sites and estimated costs of adding each of the services to the medicaid behavioral health benefit for children and adolescents and adults; and(v) Annual costs and any quantifiable cost offsets associated with the program sites.(37) $25,587,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation (ARPA) and $9,828,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely to promote the recovery of individuals with substance use disorders through expansion of substance use disorder services. The authority shall implement this funding to promote integrated, whole-person care to individuals with opioid use disorders, stimulant use disorders, and other substance use disorders. The authority shall use this funding to support evidence-based and promising practices as follows:(a) $8,500,000 of the amounts provided in this subsection is provided solely for treatment services to low-income individuals with substance use disorders who are not eligible for services under the medicaid program and for treatment services that are not covered under the medicaid program. A minimum of $7,500,000 of this amount must be contracted through behavioral health administrative services organizations. The amounts in this subsection may be used for services including, but not limited to, outpatient treatment, residential treatment, mobile opioid use disorder treatment programs, law enforcement assisted diversion programs, contingency management interventions, modified assertive community treatment, trauma informed care, crisis respite, and for reimbursement of one-time start-up operating costs for opening new beds in withdrawal management treatment programs.(b) $2,015,000 of the amounts provided in this subsection is provided solely for outreach programs that link individuals with substance use disorders to treatment options to include medication for opioid use disorder. The authority must contract for these services with programs that use interdisciplinary teams, which include peer specialists, to engage and facilitate linkage to treatment for individuals in community settings such as homeless encampments, shelters, emergency rooms, harm reduction programs, churches, community service offices, food banks, libraries, legal offices, and other settings where individuals with substance use disorders may be engaged. The services must be coordinated with emergency housing assistance and other services administered by the authority to promote access to a full continuum of treatment and recovery support options.(c) $7,500,000 of the amounts provided in this subsection is provided solely for substance use disorder recovery support services not covered by the medicaid program including, but not limited to, emergency housing, recovery housing vouchers, supported employment, skills training, peer support, peer drop-in centers, and other community supports.(d) $3,550,000 of the amounts provided in this subsection is provided solely for efforts to support the recovery of American Indians and Alaska natives with substance use disorders. This funding may be used for grants to urban Indian organizations, tribal opioid prevention media campaigns, and support for government to government communication, planning, and implementation of opioid use disorder related projects.(e) $5,000,000 of the amounts provided in this subsection is provided solely for the authority, in coordination with the department of health, to expand the distribution of naloxone through the department's overdose education and naloxone distribution program. Funding must be prioritized to fill naloxone access gaps in community behavioral health and other community settings, including providing naloxone for agency staff in organizations such as syringe service programs, housing providers, and street outreach programs, and for law enforcement and emergency responders.(f) $7,100,000 of the amounts provided in this subsection is provided solely for community services grants that support the implementation and evaluation of substance use disorder prevention services.(g) Up to $1,750,000 of the amounts provided in this subsection may be used for the authority's administrative costs associated with services funded in this subsection.(38) $3,109,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $3,109,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for short-term rental subsidies for individuals with mental health or substance use disorders. This funding may be used for individuals enrolled in the foundational community support program while waiting for a longer term resource for rental support or for individuals transitioning from behavioral health treatment facilities or local jails. Individuals who would otherwise be eligible for the foundational community support program but are not eligible because of their citizenship status may also be served. Each December of the fiscal biennium, the authority must submit a report identifying the expenditures and number of individuals receiving short-term rental supports through the agency budget during the prior fiscal year broken out by region, treatment need, and the demographics of those served, including but not limited to age, country of origin within racial/ethnic categories, gender, and immigration status.(39) $25,332,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation (ARPA) is provided solely to promote the recovery of individuals with mental health disorders through expansion of mental health services. The authority shall implement this funding to promote integrated, whole-person care through evidence based and promising practices as follows:(a) $8,153,000 of the amounts provided in this subsection is provided solely for treatment services to low-income individuals with mental health disorders who are not eligible for services under the medicaid program and for treatment services that are not covered under the medicaid program. A minimum of $7,000,000 of this amount must be contracted through behavioral health administrative services organizations. The amounts in this subsection may be used for services including, but not limited to, outpatient treatment, residential treatment, law enforcement assisted diversion programs, modified assertive community treatment, and trauma informed care.(b) $8,200,000 of the amounts provided in this subsection is provided solely for mental health recovery support services not covered by the medicaid program including, but not limited to, supportive housing, emergency housing vouchers, supported employment, skills training, peer support, peer drop-in centers, and other community supports.(c) $2,553,000 of the amounts provided in this subsection is provided solely for efforts to support the recovery of American Indians and Alaska natives with mental health disorders.(d) $1,300,000 of the amounts provided in this subsection is provided solely to enhance crisis services and may be used for crisis respite care.(e) $2,600,000 of the amounts provided in this subsection is provided solely for the expansion of first episode psychosis programs.(f) Up to $1,279,000 of the amounts provided in this subsection may be used for the authority's administrative costs associated with services funded in this subsection.(40) The authority must pursue opportunities for shifting state costs to the state's unused allocation of federal institutions for mental disease disproportionate share hospital funding.(41) $500,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation is provided solely to establish an emotional support network program for individuals employed as peer specialists. The authority must contract for these services which shall include, but not be limited to, facilitating support groups for peer specialists, support for the recovery journeys of the peer specialists themselves, and targeted support for the secondary trauma inherent in peer work.(42) $1,500,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation is provided solely for the authority to contract on a one-time basis with the University of Washington behavioral health institute to continue and enhance its efforts related to training and workforce development. This funding may be used for the following activities:(a) Making substance use disorder training content accessible to all community behavioral health providers;(b) Refining and implementing a substance use disorder provider needs assessment to advance best practice implementation for treatment in inpatient and outpatient settings;(c) Disseminating innovative best practices through training and technical assistance;(d) Developing and launching a telebehavioral health training series, providing webinars and packaging the training content so that it is accessible to all community behavioral health providers;(e) Planning for advanced telebehavioral health training and support to providers;(f) Convening a race, equity, and social justice in behavioral health conference annually;(g) Developing training and technical assistance opportunities for an annual series that translates lessons learned in behavioral health equity into actionable and sustainable change at the provider, organizational, and system levels;(h) Developing recommendations for reducing health disparities and training the workforce in culturally and linguistically relevant practices to achieve improved outcomes;(i) Increasing the number of community substance use providers that are trained in best practice assessment and treatment models;(j) Convening a telebehavioral health summit of leading experts regarding long-term provider telebehavioral health training and workforce needs;(k) Creating a behavioral health workforce strategy plan that identifies gaps that are not being addressed and suggests system improvements to address those gaps;(l) Working with community partners and key stakeholders to identify best practice strategies to evaluate and measure equity and health disparities within the behavioral health system and make recommendations regarding potential metrics to help advance system change; and(m) Developing metrics and evaluating telebehavioral health training needs and the impact of telebehavioral health training on provider knowledge and treatment protocols.(43) $1,250,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $1,250,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the authority to contract with the King county behavioral health administrative services organization to maintain children's crisis outreach response system services that were previously funded through the department of children, youth, and families. The authority, in consultation with the behavioral health administrative services organization, medicaid managed care organizations, and the actuaries responsible for developing medicaid managed care rates, must work to maximize federal funding provided for the children's crisis outreach response system program.(44) $31,891,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $63,395,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $172,425,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely to implement a 15 percent increase to medicaid reimbursement for community behavioral health providers contracted through managed care organizations to be effective January 1, 2024. The authority must employ mechanisms such as directed payment or other options allowable under federal medicaid law to assure the funding is used by the managed care organizations for a 15 percent provider rate increase as intended and verify this pursuant to the process established in chapter 285, Laws of 2020 (EHB 2584). The rate increase shall be implemented to all behavioral health nonhospital inpatient, residential, and outpatient providers contracted through the medicaid managed care organizations. Psychiatric hospitals and other providers receiving rate increases under other subsections of this section must be excluded from the rate increase directed in this subsection.(45) (($532,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $2,935,000))$8,843,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and (($3,467,000))$21,499,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely ((to increase the number of beds and rates)) for the community children's long-term inpatient program ((providers. The number of beds is increased on a phased in basis to 72 beds by the end of fiscal year 2024)). The bed day rates are increased from $1,030 per day to $1,121 per day effective July 1, 2023.(46) $505,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $1,011,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $1,095,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely to increase rates for parent child assistance program providers by 15 percent effective January 1, 2024.(47) $300,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation is provided solely for training of behavioral health consumer advocates. The authority must enter into a memorandum of understanding with the department of commerce to provide support for training of behavioral health consumer advocates pursuant to chapter 202, Laws of 2021 (E2SHB 1086).(48) $250,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $250,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the authority to contract with a statewide mental health nonprofit organization that provides free community and school-based mental health education and support programs for consumers and families. The contractor must use this funding to provide access to programs tailored to peers living with mental illness as well as family members of people with mental illness and the community at large. Services provided by the contracted program shall include education, support, and assistance to reduce isolation and help consumers and families understand the services available in their communities.(49) $15,474,000 of the generalfundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $17,125,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $14,562,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely for maintaining the expansion of local behavioral health mobile crisis response team capacity and ensuring each region has at least one adult and one children and youth mobile crisis team that is able to respond to calls coming into the 988 crisis hotline.(a) In prioritizing this funding, the health care authority shall assure that there are a minimum of six new children and youth mobile crisis teams in comparison to the number of teams at the end of fiscal year 2021 and that there is one children and youth mobile crisis team in each region.(b) In implementing funding for adult and youth mobile crisis response teams, the authority must establish standards in contracts with managed care organizations and behavioral health administrative services organizations for the services provided by these teams.(c) Of these amounts, $3,000,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $3,000,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $2,024,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely to maintain increased capacity for mobile crisis services in King county that was funded in fiscal year 2023. These amounts must supplement and not supplant funding to the county previously allocated by the authority under this subsection.(d) Of the amounts provided in this subsection, $1,651,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 and $250,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely for adding or increasing stabilization services provided through existing children and youth mobile crisis teams.(50) $45,094,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024, (($71,107,000))$45,736,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and (($69,409,000))$69,690,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely for the authority to contract with community hospitals or freestanding evaluation and treatment centers to provide long-term inpatient care beds as defined in RCW 71.24.025. Within these amounts, the authority must meet the requirements for reimbursing counties for the judicial services for patients being served in these settings in accordance with RCW 71.05.730. The authority must coordinate with the department of social and health services in developing the contract requirements, selecting contractors, and establishing processes for identifying patients that will be admitted to these facilities. Of the amounts in this subsection, sufficient amounts are provided in fiscal year 2024 and fiscal year 2025 for the authority to reimburse community hospitals and nonhospital residential treatment centers serving clients in long-term inpatient care beds as defined in RCW 71.24.025 as follows:(a) For a hospital licensed under chapter 70.41 RCW that requires a hospital specific medicaid inpatient psychiatric per diem payment rate for long-term civil commitment patients because the hospital has completed a medicare cost report, the authority shall analyze the most recent medicare cost report of the hospital after a minimum of 200 medicaid inpatient psychiatric days. The authority shall establish the inpatient psychiatric per diem payment rate for long-term civil commitment patients for the hospital at 100 percent of the allowable cost of care, based on the most recent medicare cost report of the hospital.(b) For a hospital licensed under chapter 70.41 RCW that has not completed a medicare cost report with more than 200 medicaid inpatient psychiatric days, the authority shall establish the medicaid inpatient psychiatric per diem payment rate for long-term civil commitment patients for the hospital at the higher of the hospital's current medicaid inpatient psychiatric rate; or the annually updated statewide average of the medicaid inpatient psychiatric per diem payment rate of all acute care hospitals licensed under chapter 70.41 RCW providing long-term civil commitment services.(c) For a hospital licensed under chapter 71.12 RCW and currently providing long-term civil commitment services, the authority shall establish the medicaid inpatient psychiatric per diem payment rate at $940 for fiscal year 2024 and $1,250 for fiscal year 2025 plus adjustments that may be needed to capture costs associated with long-term psychiatric patients that are not allowable on the medicare cost report or reimbursed separately. The hospital may provide the authority with supplemental data to be considered and used to make appropriate adjustments to the medicaid inpatient psychiatric per diem payment rate of the hospital. Adjustment of costs may include:(i) Costs associated with professional services and fees not accounted for in the hospital's medicare cost report or reimbursed separately;(ii) Costs associated with the hospital providing the long-term psychiatric patient access to involuntary treatment court services that are not reimbursed separately; and(iii) Other costs associated with caring for long-term psychiatric patients that are not reimbursed separately.(d) For a hospital licensed under chapter 71.12 RCW that requires an initial medicaid inpatient psychiatric per diem payment rate for long-term civil commitment services because it has not yet completed a medicare cost report, the authority shall establish the medicaid inpatient psychiatric per diem payment rate at the higher of:(i) The hospital's current medicaid inpatient psychiatric rate; or(ii) The annually updated statewide average of the medicaid long-term inpatient psychiatric per diem payment rate of all freestanding psychiatric hospitals licensed under chapter 71.12 RCW providing long-term civil commitment services.(e) For nonhospital residential treatment centers certified to provide long-term inpatient care beds as defined in RCW 71.24.025, the authority shall establish the medicaid psychiatric per diem payment rate at the fiscal year 2023 level for fiscal year 2024 and $1,250 per bed for fiscal year 2025.(f) Beginning in fiscal year 2024, the authority shall pay a rate enhancement for patients committed pursuant to the dismissal of criminal charges and a civil evaluation ordered under RCW 10.77.086 or 10.77.088. The enhancement shall be available to all hospital and nonhospital facilities providing services under this subsection except those whose rates are set at 100 percent of their most recent medicare cost report. The rate enhancement shall not exceed the tiered rate enhancements established under the 1915(i) state plan.(g) Beginning in fiscal year 2025, the authority may pay a rate enhancement of $500 per day for individuals with complex medical needs, challenging behaviors often diagnosed with co-occurring intellectual or developmental disability, traumatic brain injury, dementia, or significant medical issues requiring personal care. The rate enhancement shall be available to providers contracting directly with the authority.(h) Provider payments for vacant bed days shall not exceed six percent of their annual contracted bed days.(i) The authority, in coordination with the department of social and health services, the office of the governor, the office of financial management, and representatives from medicaid managed care organizations, behavioral health administrative service organizations, and community providers, must update its plan to continue the expansion of civil community long-term inpatient capacity. The plan shall identify gaps and barriers in the current array of community long-term inpatient beds in serving higher need individuals including those committed to a state hospital pursuant to the dismissal of criminal charges and a civil evaluation ordered under RCW 10.77.086 or 10.77.088. The plan shall identify strategies to overcome these barriers including, but not limited to, potential rate enhancements for high needs clients. The authority must submit its updated implementation plan to the office of financial management and the appropriate fiscal committees of the legislature by December 1, 2023, and submit a status update on the implementation plan by October 15, 2024.(51)(a) $200,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $400,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for a one-time grant to Island county to maintain support for a pilot program to improve behavioral health outcomes for young people in rural communities. In administering the pilot program, Island county shall coordinate with school districts, community groups, and health care providers to increase access to behavioral health programs for children and youth aged birth to 24 years of age. The grant funds shall be used to coordinate and expand behavioral health services. The grant funding must not be used to supplant funding from existing programs. No more than 10 percent of the funds may be used for administrative costs incurred by Island county in administering the program. Services that may be provided with the grant funding include, but are not limited to:(i) Support for children and youth with significant behavioral health needs to address learning loss caused by COVID-19 and remote learning;(ii) School based behavioral health education, assessment, and brief treatment;(iii) Screening and referral of children and youth to long-term treatment services;(iv) Behavioral health supports provided by community agencies serving youth year-round;(v) Expansion of mental health first aid, a program designed to prepare adults who regularly interact with youth for how to help people in both crisis and noncrisis mental health situations;(vi) Peer support services; and(vii) Compensation for the incurred costs of clinical supervisors and internships.(b) The authority, in coordination with Island county, must submit to the office of financial management and the appropriate committees of the legislature, a report summarizing how the funding was used and providing the number of children and youth served by the pilot during fiscal year 2024 by December 1, 2024.(52) $315,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $494,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $809,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely for the authority to contract with the University of Washington's project extension for community health outcomes (ECHO) and the systemic, therapeutic, assessment, resources, and treatment (START) programs for specialized training and consultation for physicians and professionals to support:(a) Children with developmental disabilities and behavioral health needs;(b) Applied behavior analysis provider training, education, and consultation; and(c) The screening and diagnosis ofâ¯autism spectrum disorder.(53) $2,262,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation and $2,262,000 of the general fundâlocal appropriation are provided solely for supported housing and employment services described in initiative 3a and 3b of the 1115 demonstration waiver and this is the maximum amount that may be expended for this purpose. Within these amounts, funding is provided for the authority to support community discharge efforts for patients at the state hospitals. Under this initiative, the authority and the department of social and health services shall ensure that allowable and necessary services are provided to eligible clients as identified by the authority or its providers or third party administrator. The department and the authority in consultation with the medicaid forecast work group, shall ensure that reasonable reimbursements are established for services deemed necessary within an identified limit per individual. The authority shall not increase general fundâstate expenditures above appropriated levels for this specific purpose. The secretary in collaboration with the director of the authority shall report to the joint select committee on health care oversight no less than quarterly on financial and health outcomes. The secretary in cooperation with the director shall also report to the fiscal committees of the legislature the expenditures of this subsection and shall provide such fiscal data in the time, manner, and form requested by the legislative fiscal committees.(54) $130,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation is provided solely for the authority to participate in efforts to ensure behavioral health agencies are compensated for their role as teaching clinics for students seeking professional education in behavioral health disciplines and for new graduates working toward licensure.(55) $250,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $934,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $1,447,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely for increasing case management services to pregnant and parenting women provided through the parent child assistance program and for increasing the number of residential treatment beds available for pregnant and parenting women.(56) Within the amounts provided in this section, sufficient funding is provided for the authority to maintain and increase the capabilities of a tool to track medication assisted treatment provider capacity.(57) $2,000,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation is provided solely for grants to law enforcement and other first responders to include a mental health professional on the team of personnel responding to emergencies.(58) (($855,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 and $1,149,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely for the authority to contract for long-term involuntary treatment services in a 16-bed residential treatment facility being developed by the Tulalip tribe in Stanwood.(59))) $956,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $956,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for wraparound with intensive services for youth ineligible for medicaid as outlined in the settlement agreement under AGC v. Washington State Health Care Authority, Thurston county superior court no. 21-2-00479-34.(((60)))(59) $14,637,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and (($14,637,000))$16,004,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for claims for services rendered to medicaid eligible clients admitted to institutions of mental disease that were determined to be unallowable for federal reimbursement due to medicaid's institutions for mental disease exclusion rules.(((61)))(60) $6,010,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $6,010,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $1,980,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely for the authority, in coordination with the department of health, to deploy an opioid awareness campaign and to contract with syringe service programs and other service settings assisting people with substance use disorders to: Prevent and respond to overdoses; provide other harm reduction services and supplies, including but not limited to distributing naloxone; fentanyl testing and other drug testing supplies; and for expanding contingency management services. The authority is encouraged to use these funds to leverage federal funding for this purpose to expand buying power when possible. The authority should prioritize funds for naloxone in coordination with the department of health, to expand the distribution of naloxone through the department's overdose education and naloxone distribution program. Funding must be prioritized to fill naloxone access gaps in community behavioral health and other community settings, including providing naloxone for agency staff in organizations such as syringe service programs, housing providers, and street outreach programs. Of the amounts provided in this subsection, $1,000,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $1,000,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the authority to deploy an opioid awareness campaign targeted at youth to increase the awareness of the dangers of fentanyl.(((62)))(61) $4,763,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $4,763,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $25,754,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely to maintain a rate increase authorized for opioid treatment providers on January 1, 2023.(((63)))(62) $2,387,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $2,387,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely to support individuals enrolled in the foundational community supports initiative who are transitioning from benefits under RCW 74.04.805 due to increased income or other changes in eligibility. The authority, department of social and health services, and department of commerce shall collaborate on this effort.(((64)))(63) $2,249,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $2,249,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the authority to contract with programs to provide medical respite care for individuals with behavioral health needs. The programs must serve individuals with complex medical issues, who may also have significant behavioral health needs who do not require hospitalization but are unable to provide adequate self-care for their medical conditions. The programs must prioritize services to individuals with complex medical and behavioral health issues who are homeless or who were recently discharged from a hospital setting. The services must meet quality standards and best practices developed by the national health care for the homeless council and may include, but are not limited to, medical oversight and health education; care transitions; and discharge planning to and from primary care, inpatient hospital, emergency rooms, and supportive housing. In selecting the contractors, the authority must prioritize projects that demonstrate the active involvement of an established medical provider that is able to leverage federal medicaid funding in the provision of these services. The authority must work with the medicaid managed care organizations to encourage their participation and assist the plans and the contractor in identifying mechanisms for appropriate use of medicaid reimbursement in this setting.(((65)))(64) $988,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $988,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $618,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely for the authority to contract for three regional behavioral health mobile crisis response teams focused on supported housing to prevent individuals with behavioral health conditions at high risk of losing housing from becoming homeless, identify and prioritize serving the most vulnerable people experiencing homelessness, and increase alternative housing options to include short-term alternatives which may temporarily deescalate situations where there is high risk of a household from becoming homeless.(((66)))(65) $5,623,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $5,623,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $3,748,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely to maintain and expand access to no barrier, and low-barrier programs using a housing first model designed to assist and stabilize housing supports for adults with behavioral health conditions. Housing supports and services shall be made available with no requirement for treatment for their behavioral health condition and must be individualized to the needs of the individual. The authority and department of commerce shall collaborate on this effort and must submit a status report to the office of financial management and the appropriate committees of the legislature by December 31, 2023.(((67)))(66) $675,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $675,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for a rental voucher and bridge program and to implement strategies to reduce instances where an individual leaves a state operated behavioral or private behavioral health facility directly into homelessness. The authority must prioritize this funding for individuals being discharged from state operated behavioral health facilities.(((68)))(67) $361,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $361,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $482,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely for the authority, in collaboration with the department of social and health services research and data analysis division, to implement community behavioral health service data into the existing executive management information system. Of these amounts, $288,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $288,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $384,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely for the authority to reimburse the research and data analysis division for staff costs associated with this project. The data elements shall be incorporated into the monthly executive management information system reports on a phased-in basis, allowing for elements which are readily available to be incorporated in the initial phase, and elements which require further definition and data collection changes to be incorporated in a later phase. The authority must collaborate with the research and data analysis division to ensure data elements are clearly defined and must include requirements in medicaid managed care organization and behavioral health administrative services organization contracts to provide the data in a consistent and timely manner for inclusion into the system. The community behavioral health executive management system information data elements must include, but are not limited to: Psychiatric inpatient bed days; evaluation and treatment center bed days; long-term involuntary community psychiatric inpatient bed days; children's long-term inpatient bed days; substance use disorder inpatient, residential, withdrawal evaluation and management, and secure withdrawal evaluation and management bed days; crisis triage and stabilization services bed days; mental health residential bed days; mental health and substance use disorder outpatient treatment services; opioid substitution and medication assisted treatment services; program of assertive treatment team services; wraparound with intensive services; mobile outreach crisis services; recovery navigator team services; foundational community supports housing and employment services; projects for assistance in transition from homelessness services; housing and recovery through peer services; other housing services administered by the authority; mental health and substance use disorder peer services; designated crisis responder investigations and outcomes; involuntary commitment hearings and outcomes; pregnant and parenting women case management services; and single bed certifications and no available bed reports. Wherever possible and practical, the data must include historical monthly counts and shall be broken out to distinguish services to medicaid and nonmedicaid individuals and children and adults. The authority and the research and data analysis division must consult with the office of financial management and staff from the fiscal committees of the legislature on the development and implementation of the community behavioral health data elements.(((69)))(68) $2,587,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $2,587,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the authority to support efforts by counties and cities to implement local response teams. Of these amounts:(a) $2,000,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $2,000,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the authority to provide a grant to the association of Washington cities to assist cities with the costs of implementing alternative response teams. This funding must be used to reimburse cities for documented costs associated with creating co-responder teams within different alternative diversion models including law enforcement assisted diversion programs, community assistance referral and education programs, and as part of mobile crisis teams. Cities are encouraged to partner with each other to create a regional response model. In awarding these funds, the association must prioritize applicants with demonstrated capacity for facility-based crisis triage and stabilization services. The association and authority must collect and report information regarding the number of facility-based crisis stabilization and triage beds available in the locations receiving funding through this subsection and submit a report to the office of financial management and the appropriate committees of the legislature with this information by December 1, 2023.(b) $587,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $587,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely to support the Whatcom county alternative response team.(((70)))(69) $500,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $500,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the authority to contract with the University of Washington addictions, drug, and alcohol institute. This funding must be used for advanced, evidence-based training for law enforcement to improve interactions with individuals who use drugs. The training must be developed so it can be adapted and used statewide to decrease stigmatizing beliefs among law enforcement through positive contact with people who use drugs and improve officer well-being and effectiveness by providing skills and techniques to address the drug overdose epidemic. The institute must develop and refine this training, leveraging prior work, and in partnership with a steering committee that includes people with lived or living experience of substance use disorder and criminal legal involvement, researchers, clinicians, law enforcement officers, and others. The training must complement, but not duplicate, existing curricula already provided by the criminal justice training commission. The institute must pilot the advanced training in a subset of regional law enforcement agencies and evaluate its acceptability and feasibility through participant interviews and pretraining and posttraining ratings of stigmatizing beliefs. The institute must incorporate feedback from the pilot training sessions into a final training program that it must make available to law enforcement agencies across the state.(((71)))(70) $400,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 ((and)), $600,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $350,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely for the authority to continue development and implementation of the certified community behavioral health clinic model for comprehensive behavioral health services. Funding must be used to secure actuarial expertise, conduct research into national data and other state models, including obtaining resources and expertise from the national council for mental well-being certified community behavioral health clinic success center; and engage stakeholders, including representatives of licensed community behavioral health agencies and medicaid managed care organizations, in the process. The authority must provide a report to the office of financial management and the appropriate committees of the legislature with findings, recommendations, and cost estimates by December 31, 2024. The study must build on the preliminary report submitted to the legislature in December 2022 and include:(a) Overviews of options and considerations for implementing the certified community behavioral health clinic model within Washington state, including participation as a certified community behavioral health clinic demonstration state or for independent statewide implementation;(b) An analysis of the impact of expanding the certified community behavioral health clinic model on the state's behavioral health systems;(c) Relevant federal regulations and options to implement the certified community behavioral health clinic model under those regulations;(d) Options for implementing a prospective payment system methodology;(e) An analysis of the benefits and potential challenges for integrating the certified community behavioral health clinic reimbursement model within an integrated care environment;(f) Actuarial analysis on the costs for implementing the certified community behavioral health clinic model, including opportunities for leveraging federal funding; and(g) Recommendations to the legislature on a pathway for statewide implementation including a plan for implementation no later than fiscal year 2027 that must include the following:(i) Implementation of the certified community behavioral health clinic model with clinics that adhere to the program standards under the federal substance abuse and mental health services administration demonstration program established under section 223 of the federal protecting access to medicare act of 2014 (42 U.S.C. Sec. 1396a note), as amended by the bipartisan safer communities act (P.L. 117-159);(ii) Incorporation in the planned funding model of at least one of the prospective payment system methodologies approved by the centers for medicare and medicaid services;(iii) The plan may allow for the certified community behavioral health clinic funding model to be implemented either by applying for and joining the federal demonstration program referenced in (g)(i) of this subsection, applying to the centers for medicare and medicaid services for a medicaid state plan waiver or amendment, or both;(iv) Continued consultation with the national council for mental wellbeing's certified community behavioral health clinic success center for technical assistance and meaningful opportunities for community behavioral health agencies to participate and offer feedback throughout the implementation process; and(v) Inclusion of services to children, youth, and families through the certified community behavioral health clinic funding model through providers that serve individuals of all ages as well as specialty providers that serve children, youth, and families.(((72) $1,135,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 and $568,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely to develop and operate a 16-bed substance use disorder inpatient facility in Grays Harbor county that specializes in treating pregnant and parenting women using a family preservation model. The authority must contract for these services through behavioral health entities in a manner that allows leveraging of federal medicaid funds to pay for a portion of the costs. The authority must consult with the department of children, youth, and families in the implementation of this funding. The facility must allow families to reside together while a parent is receiving treatment. Of these amounts, $568,000 may be used for documented startup costs including the recruitment, hiring, and training of staff. If the authority is able to identify a provider that can begin developing these services before July 2024, it must notify the office of financial management and the appropriate committees of the legislature and submit a request for funding in the fiscal year 2024 supplemental operating budget.(73)))(71) $160,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 is provided on a one-time basis solely for the authority to continue a grant to the city of Snoqualmie to pilot behavioral health emergency response and coordination services through a regional behavioral health coordinator. The regional behavioral health coordinator shall be a licensed mental health or substance use disorder professional who works directly with and accompanies law enforcement officers and fire and rescue first responders to help respond to crises involving persons with behavioral health needs. The coordinator shall plan, implement, and coordinate services related to crisis response and social service needs with the city of Snoqualmie, the city of North Bend, the Snoqualmie police and fire departments, and the eastside fire and rescue agency serving North Bend, and local community services, school districts, hospitals, and crisis response systems provided by King county for the region. The coordinator shall support the social services needs identified through police and fire response in the lower Snoqualmie valley and serve as a liaison between law enforcement, first responders, and persons accessing or requesting emergency services with social service needs. The authority shall collect information on the pilot project and, in coordination with the city of Snoqualmie, must submit a report to the office of financial management and the appropriate committees of the legislature by December 31, 2023, summarizing the services provided through the grant funds and identifying recommendations on how to implement effective, integrated, coordinated behavioral health emergency response and community care services. The authority must also provide the report to the criminal justice training commission, the Washington association of sheriffs and police chiefs, and the Washington fire commissioners association.(((74)))(72) $250,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $250,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the authority to contract for services with a statewide recovery community organization. The authority must award this funding to an organization that: (a) Has experience building the capacity of the recovery community to advance substance use recovery and mental health wellness by catalyzing public understanding and shaping public policy; (b) is led and governed by representatives of local communities of recovery; (c) centers the voices of people with lived experience who are touched by addiction and mental health challenges, and harnesses the power of story to drive change in the mental health and addiction treatment systems; and (d) provides free community education, skills trainings, events, and a conference in order to increase the understanding of issues around behavioral health and recovery. Services provided by the contracted program must include education, support, and assistance to increase connection of the recovery community, recovery capital, and knowledge about recovery and mental health resources. In conducting this work, the contractor must engage diverse individuals in recovery, impacted families, and providers from all regions of the state and leverage the assistance of affiliated groups and organizations. The organization must also prioritize diversity, equity, and justice in their work to eradicate health disparities of marginalized communities.(((75)))(73) $400,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $400,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the authority to continue and expand a contract with a Seattle based nonprofit organization with experience matching voluntary specialty care providers with patients in need of care to provide pro bono counseling and behavioral health services to uninsured and underinsured individuals with incomes below 300 percent of the federal poverty level. The authority may require the contractor to seek, document, and report to the authority on efforts to leverage local, federal, or philanthropic funding to provide sustained operational support for the program.(((76)))(74) $3,437,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $4,772,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $1,705,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely for the authority to contract for youth inpatient navigator services in seven regions of the state. The services must be provided through clinical response teams that receive referrals for children and youth inpatient services and manage a process to coordinate placements and alternative community treatment plans. Of these amounts for each fiscal year, $445,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation and $79,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely to contract for services through an existing program located in Pierce county.(((77)))(75) $7,601,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $7,601,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $2,820,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely for assisted outpatient treatment and other costs associated with implementation of chapter 210, Laws of 2022 (SHB 1773). Of the amount provided in this subsection, $1,000 is for implementation of Engrossed Senate Bill No. 5130 (assisted outpatient treatment).(((78)))(76) $1,664,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $2,883,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely to continue to support the children and youth behavioral health work group to consider and develop longer term strategies and recommendations regarding the delivery of behavioral health services for children, transitioning youth, and their caregivers pursuant to chapter 76, Laws of 2022 (2SHB 1890).(((79)))(77) Sufficient funding is provided for the authority to extend continuous eligibility for apple health to children ages zero to six with income at or below 215 percent of the federal poverty level. The centers for medicare and medicaid services must approve the 1115 medicaid waiver prior to the implementation of this policy.(((80)))(78) $500,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $500,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for contingency management resources in accordance with chapter 311, Laws of 2021 (ESB 5476).(((81)))(79) $100,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $100,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the authority to continue a contract for services funded in section 215(127), chapter 297, Laws of 2022 (ESSB 5693) to provide information and support related to safe housing and support services for youth exiting inpatient mental health and/or substance use disorder facilities to stakeholders, inpatient treatment facilities, young people, and other community providers that serve unaccompanied youth and young adults.(((82)))(80) $2,616,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $3,322,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025, $2,145,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation, and $2,624,000 of the opioid abatement settlement accountâstate appropriation are provided solely for the authority to contract with opioid treatment providers to operate mobile methadone units to address treatment gaps statewide. Within the amounts provided, the authority must provide service support subsidies to all mobile methadone units including those that began operations prior to fiscal year 2024. The authority must work with the actuaries responsible for setting medicaid managed care rates to explore options for creating a specific rate for mobile medication units that reflects the unique costs of these programs. The authority must provide a report to the office of financial management and the appropriate committees of the legislature which summarizes the analysis and identifies the options and related costs by December 1, 2024.(((83)))(81) $216,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $427,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $1,454,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely for the authority to increase fee for service rates for mental health and substance use disorder treatment by 22 percent. This rate increase shall be effective January 1, 2024. This rate increase does not apply to per diem costs for long-term civil commitment inpatient services or for services for which rate increases were provided under other subsections of this section. Services affected by the psychiatric rebase in subsection (((84)))(82) of this section are excluded from this rate increase. The authority must include the proportional costs of increasing fee-for-service rates for mental health and substance use disorder treatment paid on behalf of tribal members not electing enrollment in managed care plans in any agency request decision package it submits during the fiscal biennium for increasing provider rates in the managed care behavioral health program.(((84)))(82) Sufficient amounts are provided in this section for the authority to rebase community hospital psychiatric inpatient rates effective January 1, 2024. Rebasing adjustments shall be based on adjusted calendar year 2020 medicare cost reports.(((85)))(83)(a) $5,778,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for the authority, beginning July 1, 2024, to implement a program with coverage comparable to the amount, duration, and scope of care provided in the categorically needy medicaid program for adult individuals who:(i) Have an immigration status making them ineligible for federal medicaid or federal subsidies through the health benefit exchange;(ii) Are age 19 and older, including over age 65, and have countable income of up to 138 percent of the federal poverty level; and(iii) Are not eligible for another full scope federally funded medical assistance program, including any expansion of medicaid coverage for deferred action for childhood arrivals recipients.(b) Within the amount provided in this subsection, the authority shall use the same eligibility, enrollment, redetermination and renewal, and appeals procedures as categorically needy medicaid, except where flexibility is necessary to maintain privacy or minimize burden to applicants or enrollees.(c) The authority in collaboration with the health benefit exchange, the department of social and health services, and community organizations must develop and implement an outreach and education campaign.(d) The authority must provide the following information to the governor's office and appropriate committees of the legislature by February 1st and November 1st of each year:(i) Actual and forecasted expenditures;(ii) Actual and forecasted data from the caseload forecast council; and(iii) The availability and impact of any federal program or proposed rule that expands access to health care for the population described in this subsection, such as the expansion of medicaid coverage for deferred action for childhood arrivals recipients.(e) The amount provided in this subsection is the maximum amount that may be expended for the purposes of this program.(((86)))(84)(a) $2,317,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $4,433,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for a targeted grant program to three behavioral health administrative services organizations to transition persons who are either being diverted from criminal prosecution to behavioral health treatment services or are in need of housing upon discharge from crisis stabilization services. The authority must provide an opportunity for all of the behavioral health administrative service organizations to submit plans for consideration.(b) Grant criteria must include, but are not limited to:(i) A commitment to matching individuals with temporary lodging or permanent housing, including supportive housing services and supports, that is reasonably likely to fit their actual needs and situation, is noncongregate whenever possible, and takes into consideration individuals' immediate and long-term needs and abilities to achieve and maintain housing stability; and(ii) A commitment to transition individuals who are initially matched to temporary lodging into a permanent housing placement, including appropriate supportive housing supports and services, within six months except under unusual circumstances.(c) When awarding grants, the authority must prioritize applicants that:(i) Provide matching resources;(ii) Focus on ensuring an expeditious path to sustainable permanent housing solutions; and(iii) Demonstrate an understanding of working with individuals who experience homelessness or have interactions with the criminal legal system to understand their optimal housing type and level of ongoing services.(((87)))(85)(a) $2,266,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $14,151,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $19,269,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely for services to medicaid and state funded clients in behavioral health residential treatment facilities that are scheduled to open during the 2023-2025 fiscal biennium.(b) Within the amounts provided in this subsection, $125,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $125,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the authority to reimburse the department of social and health services for staffing costs related to tracking behavioral health community capacity through the community behavioral health executive management information system and providing annual reports on the implementation of new behavioral health community capacity.(c) The department of commerce, the department of health, and the authority must cooperate with the department of social and health services in collecting and providing the data necessary to incorporate tracking of behavioral health beds into the behavioral health executive management information system and to prepare the required reports. The agencies must work to ensure they are using consistent definitions in classifying behavioral health bed types for the purpose of reporting capacity and utilization.(d) The authority and the department of social and health services must begin tracking behavioral health bed utilization for medicaid and state funded clients by type of bed in the executive management information system by October 1, 2023. The department of commerce shall identify to the department of social and health services all providers that have received funding through their capital grant program since the 2013-2015 fiscal biennium. The department of social and health services must incorporate tracking of services by provider including an element to identify providers that have received funding through the capital budget so that reports can be provided related to the average daily client counts for medicaid and state funded clients being served by provider and by facility type.(e) By November 1, 2023, the department of social and health services, in coordination with the department of commerce, the department of health, and the authority, must submit an annual report to the office of financial management and the appropriate committees of the legislature. The first annual report must provide information on the facilities that received funding through the department of commerce's behavioral health community capacity grant funding since the 2013-2015 fiscal biennium and the utilization across all behavioral health facilities for medicaid and state funded clients. The report must provide the following information for each facility that has received funding through the capital budget: (i) The amount received by the state and the total project cost; (ii) the facility address; (iii) the number of new beds or additional bed capacity by the service type being provided; and (iv) the utilization of the additional beds by medicaid or state funded clients by service type.(f) By November 1, 2024, the department of social and health services must submit the second annual report to the office of financial management and the appropriate committees of the legislature. The second annual report must update the bed capacity and utilization information required in the first report and compare that capacity to demand by service type by geographical region of the state.(((88)))(86) $85,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $85,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely to support the efforts of the joint legislative and executive committee on behavioral health established in section 135 of this act.(((89)))(87) $500,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $500,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $1,000,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely to support the provision of behavioral health co-responder services on nonlaw enforcement emergency medical response teams.(((90)))(88) $250,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $250,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the authority to contract on a one-time basis with the King county behavioral health administrative services organization to expand medication for opioid use disorder treatment services in King county.(((91)))(89) $250,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 is provided solely for the authority to contract on a one-time basis with the behavioral health administrative services organization serving Kitsap county for crisis triage services in the county that are not being reimbursed through the medicaid program.(((92)))(90) $1,100,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $1,100,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the authority to contract on a one-time basis with the behavioral health administrative services organization serving Snohomish county for start-up costs in a new 32-bed community recovery center in Lynnwood that will provide crisis services to medicaid and other low income residents.(((93)))(91) $313,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation is provided solely to support a media campaign for Native Americans related to the prevention of substance abuse and suicide.(((94)))(92) $250,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $250,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the authority to contract with up to two behavioral health agencies that are interested in offering or expanding wraparound with intensive services for children and youth. The funds may be used to support costs associated with recruitment, training, technical assistance, or other appropriate costs required to develop the capacity to offer these specialized services.(((95)))(93) $22,000,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $24,500,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the authority to contract with behavioral health administrative service organizations to implement the statewide recovery navigator program established in chapter 311, Laws of 2021 (ESB 5476) and for related technical assistance to support this implementation. This includes funding for recovery navigator teams to provide community-based outreach and case management services based on the law enforcement assisted diversion model and for technical assistance support from the law enforcement assisted diversion national support bureau. The authority and technical assistance contractor must encourage recovery navigator programs to provide educational information and outreach regarding recovery navigator program services to local retailers that have high levels of retail theft. Of the amounts provided in this subsection:(a) $2,000,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $2,000,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 must be allocated to maintain recovery navigator services in King, Pierce, and Snohomish counties. These amounts must be in addition to the proportion of the allocation of the remaining funds in this subsection the regional behavioral health administrative services organizations serving those counties were allocated pursuant to section 22(1), chapter 311, Laws of 2021.(b) $2,500,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for expanding recovery navigator program services in regions where fiscal year 2025 projected expenditures will exceed revenues provided under this subsection. In allocating these amounts, the authority must prioritize regions where the combined fiscal year 2025 recovery navigator program allocations and recovery navigator program reserve balances are inadequate to cover estimated fiscal year 2025 expenditures.(((96)))(94) $3,114,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $3,114,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $5,402,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely for the authority to implement clubhouse services in every region of the state.(((97)))(95) $7,500,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $7,500,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the authority to implement homeless outreach stabilization teams pursuant to chapter 311, Laws of 2021 (ESB 5476).(((98)))(96) $2,500,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $2,500,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025, $81,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation, and (($12,280,000))$9,280,000 of the opioid abatement settlement accountâstate appropriation are provided solely for the authority to expand efforts to provide opioid use disorder and alcohol use disorder medication in city, county, regional, and tribal jails.(((99)))(97) $1,400,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $1,400,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for behavioral health administrative service organizations to develop regional recovery navigator program plans pursuant to chapter 311, Laws of 2021 (ESB 5476), and to establish positions focusing on regional planning to improve access to and quality of regional behavioral health services with a focus on integrated care.(((100)))(98) $75,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $75,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the authority to contract with an organization with expertise in supporting efforts to increase access to and improve quality in recovery housing and recovery residences. This funding shall be used to increase recovery housing availability through partnership with private landlords, increase accreditation of recovery residences statewide, operate a grievance process for resolving challenges with recovery residences, and conduct a recovery capital outcomes assessment for individuals living in recovery residences.(((101)))(99) $500,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024((, $500,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025,)) and (($4,000,000))$4,500,000 of the opioid abatement settlement accountâstate appropriation are provided solely for the authority to provide short-term housing vouchers for individuals with substance use disorders.(((102)))(100) $200,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $200,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the authority to convene and provide staff and contracted services support to the recovery oversight committee established in chapter 311, Laws of 2021 (ESB 5476).(((103)))(101) $2,565,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $2,565,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the authority to develop and implement the recovery services plan and to carry out other requirements of chapter 311, Laws of 2021 (ESB 5476). Within these amounts, funding is provided for the authority to:(a) Establish an occupational nurse consultant position within the authority to provide contract oversight, accountability, and performance improvement activities, and to ensure medicaid managed care organization plan compliance with provisions in law and contract related to care transitions work with local jails; and(b) Establish a position within the authority to create and oversee a program to initiate and support emergency department programs for inducing medications for patients with opioid use disorder paired with a referral to community-based outreach and case management programs.(((104)))(102) $400,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for the authority to continue work with the convener of the Washington state children's behavioral health statewide family network to develop a parent online platform, known as BH360, to continue work on ecosystem mapping, technical development of the portal platform, and to engage families with lived experience on strategic development of the platform.(((105) $23,148,000))(103) $25,522,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation is provided solely for the authority to contract with the University of Washington behavioral health teaching facility to provide long-term inpatient care beds as defined in RCW 71.24.025. The authority must coordinate with the department of social and health services and the University of Washington to evaluate and determine criteria for the current population of state hospital patients, committed pursuant to the dismissal of criminal charges and a civil evaluation ordered under RCW 10.77.086 or 10.77.088, who can be effectively treated at the University of Washington behavioral health teaching facility. The authority, in coordination with the department of social and health services and the University of Washington, must submit a report to the office of financial management and the appropriate committees of the legislature by December 1, 2023, summarizing the numbers and types of patients that are committed to the state hospitals pursuant to the dismissal of criminal charges and a civil evaluation ordered under RCW 10.77.086 or 10.77.088, the numbers and types that would be appropriate to be served at the University of Washington behavioral health teaching facility, and the criteria that was used to make the determination.(((106)))(104) $444,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $444,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $716,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 1515 (behavioral health contracts).(((107)))(105)(a) $320,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024, (($1,796,000))$1,347,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and (($1,196,000))$1,004,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute House Bill No. 1168 (prenatal substance exposure).(b) Of the amounts provided in (a) of this subsection, $500,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation is provided solely for the authority to contract with a statewide nonprofit entity with expertise in fetal alcohol spectrum disorders and experience in supporting parents and caregivers to offer free support groups for individuals living with fetal alcohol spectrum disorders and their parents and caregivers.(((108)))(106) $91,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $91,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $126,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute House Bill No. 1580 (children in crisis).(((109)))(107) $5,474,000 of the statewide 988 behavioral health crisis response line accountâstate appropriation and $210,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely for the authority to implement Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 1134 (988 system).(a) Within these amounts, $4,000,000 of the statewide 988 behavioral health crisis response line accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the authority to provide grants to new or existing mobile rapid response teams and to community-based crisis teams to support efforts for meeting the standards and criteria for receiving an endorsement pursuant to provisions of the bill. In awarding grants under this subsection, the authority must prioritize funding for proposals that demonstrate experience and strategies that prioritize culturally relevant services to community members with the least access to behavioral health services.(b) Within the remaining amounts, sufficient funding is provided for the authority to conduct the actuarial analysis and development of options for payment mechanisms for rate enhancements as directed in section 9, chapter 454, Laws of 2023 and to implement other activities required by the bill.(((110) $26,854,000))(108) $12,141,000 of the statewide 988 behavioral health crisis response line accountâstate appropriation and $17,636,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely for the authority to expand and enhance regional crisis services. These amounts must be used to expand services provided by mobile crisis teams and community-based crisis teams either endorsed or seeking endorsement pursuant to standards adopted by the authority. Beginning in fiscal year 2025, the legislature intends to direct amounts within this subsection to be used for performance payments to mobile rapid response teams and community-based crisis teams that receive endorsements pursuant to Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 1134 (988 system).(((111)))(109) $2,000,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $2,000,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for the authority to increase resources for behavioral health administrative service organizations and managed care organizations for the increased costs of room and board for behavioral health inpatient and residential services provided in nonhospital facilities.(((112)))(110) $6,000,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for youth behavioral health services in Clark and Spokane counties as follows:(a) $5,000,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for a contract with a youth behavioral inpatient and outpatient program which has taken ownership of and submitted a plan to the authority to reopen a facility in Clark county previously closed due to state licensing issues with the former owner. The facility must be developed to serve over 60 percent medicaid eligible clients for co-occurring substance use and mental health disorders and sexual exploitation behavioral health treatment. This funding is provided on a one-time basis and must be used consistent with the approved plan and contract for reopening costs, treatment, and services. The facility must submit a fiscal year 2025 assessment and future needs report to the authority that describes implementation strategies that ensure the programs plan to build the capacity to serve over 60 percent medicaid eligible clients for co-occurring substance use and mental health disorders and sexual exploitation behavioral health treatment, in line with funding solutions as they are developed.(b) $1,000,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for the authority to contract for behavioral health stabilization and support services for homeless youth in Spokane. The selected contractor must currently provide permanent supportive housing and services in Spokane and operate a low barrier homeless shelter for youth under the age of 18 and young adults aged 18 to 24.(((113) $18,868,000))(111) $18,303,000 of the opioid abatement settlement accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for prevention, treatment, and recovery support services to address and remediate the opioid epidemic. Of these amounts:(a) (($2,500,000))$2,139,000 is provided solely for the authority to provide or contract for opioid prevention, outreach, treatment, or recovery support services that are not reimbursable under the state medicaid plan.(b) $500,000 is provided solely for Spanish language opioid prevention services.(c) $2,000,000 is provided solely to maintain prevention services that address underage drinking, cannabis and tobacco prevention, and opioid, prescription, and other drug misuse among individuals between the ages of 12 and 25.(d) (($1,830,000))$1,626,000 is provided solely for programs to prevent inappropriate opioid prescribing.(e) $538,000 is provided solely for technical support to improve access to medications for opioid use disorder in jails.(f) $2,000,000 of the opioid abatement settlement accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the authority, in coordination with the department of health, to develop and implement a health promotion and education campaign, with a focus on synthetic drug supplies, including fentanyl, and accurate harm reduction messaging for communities, law enforcement, emergency responders, and others.(g) $3,500,000 of the opioid abatement settlement accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the authority to provide support funds to new and established clubhouses throughout the state.(h) $6,000,000 of the opioid abatement settlement accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the authority to provide grants for the operational costs of new staffed recovery residences which serve individuals with substance use disorders who require more support than a level 1 recovery residence.(i) Of the amounts provided in this subsection, the authority may use up to 10 percent for staffing and administrative expenses.(j) In contracting for programs and services under this subsection, the authority must consider data and implement strategies that prioritize culturally relevant services to community members with the least access to behavioral health services.(((114)))(112) $5,000,000 of the opioid abatement settlement accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the authority to maintain funding for ongoing grants to law enforcement assisted diversion programs outside of King county under RCW ((71.24.590))71.24.589.(((115)))(113) $5,500,000 of the opioid abatement settlement accountâstate appropriation is provided on a one-time basis solely for the authority to implement a pilot program to reimburse a licensed pediatric transitional care facility in Spokane county to provide neonatal abstinence syndrome services to infants who have prenatal substance exposure. The pilot program must study and evaluate the efficacy, outcomes, and impact of providing these services to avoid more costly medical interventions. Within these amounts, $190,000 is provided solely for the authority to contract with Washington State University to conduct research analyzing the prevalence of neonatal abstinence syndrome and infant and maternal health outcomes associated with neonatal transitional nurseries in Washington. The university must submit a report articulating findings to the appropriate committees of the legislature by December 1, 2024. The report must identify to what extent the federal medicaid program allows for reimbursement of these services and identify the barriers in leveraging federal medicaid funding for these services in Washington's state medicaid plan.(((116)))(114) $15,447,000 of the opioid abatement settlement accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the authority to pass through to tribes and urban Indian health programs for opioid and overdose response activities. The funding must be used for prevention, outreach, treatment, recovery support services, and other strategies to address and mitigate the effects of the misuse and abuse of opioid related products. The authority must provide the tribes and urban Indian health programs the latitude to use the funding as they see fit to benefit their communities, provided the activities are allowable under the terms of the opioid settlement agreements.(((117)))(115) $66,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $502,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $171,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5189 (behavioral health support).(((118)))(116) $190,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $354,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $1,106,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely for implementation of Senate Bill No. 5228 (behavioral health OT).(((119)))(117) $3,605,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $1,850,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $1,539,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5555 (certified peer specialists).(((120)))(118) $375,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $375,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for a grant to the city of Arlington in partnership with the north county regional fire authority for a mobile integrated health pilot project. The project shall provide mobile integrated health services for residents who cannot navigate resources through typical methods through brief therapeutic intervention, biopsychosocial assessment and referral, and community care coordination.(((121)))(119) $1,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 is for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5536 (controlled substances).(((122)))(120) $300,000 of the opioid abatement settlement accountâstate appropriation is provided for support of a statewide safe supply work group. The purpose of the work group is to evaluate potential models for safe supply services and make recommendations on inclusion of a safe supply framework in the Washington state substance use recovery services plan to provide a regulated, tested supply of controlled substances to individuals at risk of drug overdose. The work group membership shall be reflective of the community of individuals living with substance use disorder, including persons who are black, indigenous, and persons of color, persons with co-occurring substance use disorders and mental health conditions, as well as persons who represent the unique needs of rural communities.(a) The work group membership shall consist of, but is not limited to, members appointed by the governor representing the following:(i) At least one adult in recovery from substance use disorder;(ii) At least one youth in recovery from substance use disorder;(iii) One expert from the addictions, drug, and alcohol institute at the University of Washington;(iv) One outreach services provider;(v) One substance use disorder treatment provider;(vi) One peer recovery services provider;(vii) One recovery housing provider;(viii) One expert in serving persons with co-occurring substance use disorders and mental health conditions;(ix) One expert in antiracism and equity in health care delivery systems;(x) One employee who provides substance use disorder treatment or services as a member of a labor union representing workers in the behavioral health field;(xi) One representative of the association of Washington healthcare plans;(xii) One representative of sheriffs and police chiefs;(xiii) One representative of a federally recognized tribe; and(xiv) One representative of local government.(b) The work group's evaluation shall include, but is not limited to, the following:(i) Examining the concept of "safe supply," defined as a legal and regulated supply of mind or body altering substances that traditionally only have been accessible through illicit markets;(ii) Examining whether there is evidence that a proposed "safe supply" would have an impact on fatal or nonfatal overdose, drug diversion, or associated health and community impacts;(iii) Examining whether there is evidence that a proposed "safe supply" would be accompanied by increased risks to individuals, the community, or other entities or jurisdictions;(iv) Examining historical evidence regarding the overprescribing of opioids; and(v) Examining whether there is evidence that a proposed "safe supply" would be accompanied by any other benefits or consequences.(c) Staffing for the work group shall be provided by the authority.(d) The work group shall provide a preliminary report and recommendations to the governor and the appropriate committees of the legislature by December 1, 2023, and shall provide a final report by December 1, 2024.(((123)))(121) $1,450,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 and $26,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely for implementing a postinpatient housing program designed for young adults in accordance with the provisions of Second Substitute House Bill No. 1929 (postinpatient housing). Contracts with postinpatient housing providers are exempt from the competitive procurement requirements in chapter 39.26 RCW.(((124)))(122) Within existing resources, the authority shall collaborate with the department of social and health services to develop a new program for individuals admitted to a state hospital for purposes of civil commitment under RCW 10.77.086. The program must prioritize the use of assisted outpatient treatment resources for eligible individuals and draw upon existing programs, including the program of assertive community treatment and the governor's opportunity for supportive housing program to provide wraparound services for individuals who may be ready to quickly return to the community following an admission.(((125)))(123) $1,675,000 of the opioid abatement settlement accountâstate appropriation and $175,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely for the authority to contract for the support of an opioid recovery and care access center in Seattle. The contractor must be an established Seattle based behavioral health provider that has developed a partnership for the project and has leveraged additional operations and research funding from other sources. The contract is exempt from the competitive procurement requirements in chapter 39.26 RCW.(((126)))(124) $3,000,000 of the opioid abatement settlement accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the authority to increase access to long-acting injectable buprenorphine products.(a) The authority must use these funds to:(i) On a one-time basis, provide long-acting injectable buprenorphine products to small providers that are not financially affiliated with a hospital; and(ii) Cover the cost and administration of the drug for uninsured individuals that do not qualify for other state or federal health insurance programs.(b) The authority shall study alternative models that will ease access to long-acting injectable buprenorphine products and report recommendations to the office of financial management and the appropriate committees of the legislature by October 15, 2024.(((127)))(125) $400,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided on a one-time basis solely for the authority to enhance clinical best practices in addiction medicine across the medical field in Washington state. The authority must contract these amounts with a Washington state chapter of a national organization that provides a physician-led professional community for those who prevent, treat, and promote remission and recovery from the disease of addiction and whose comprehensive set of guidelines for determining placement, continued stay, and transfer or discharge of enrollees with substance use disorders and co-occurring disorders have been incorporated into medicaid managed care contracts. Priority for the activities established must be given to prescribers from a variety of settings including emergency rooms, primary care, and community behavioral health settings. The activities may include other licensed professionals as resources allow. At a minimum, the following activities must be supported: (a) An addiction medicine summit; (b) intermittent lunch and learn webinars that are partially presentation based and partially discussion based; and (c) establishment and operation of a mechanism for case consultation. Whenever feasible and appropriate, the activities should incorporate content specific to managing chronic pain patients.(((128) $561,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 and $184,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely for the authority to contract for a pilot program offering digital behavioral health services to school-aged youth. The authority must issue a request for interest or a request for proposals and evaluate all qualified responses before selecting a contractor. The authority must track data related to use and outcomes of the pilot project and submit a report to the office of financial management and the appropriate committees of the legislature that includes a summary of the services provided, outcomes, and recommendations related to continuation or expansion of the pilot program. The data elements and outcomes that must be tracked and reported include, but are not limited to:(a) The number of youth provided access to the digital service through the pilot program;(b) The number of pilot participants using the digital service;(c) The total and average number of hours pilot participants used the digital service;(d) Regional and demographic data on those provided access to and those using the pilot program services;(e) The number of participants and hours of direct counseling services provided through the pilot program;(f) The number of participant referrals to crisis services occurring through the pilot program; and(g) User satisfaction with the pilot program services.(129)))(126) $5,000,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for bridge funding grants to community behavioral health agencies participating in federal certified community behavioral health clinic expansion grant programs to sustain their continued level of operations following expiration of federal grant funding during the planning process for adoption of the certified community behavioral health clinic model statewide.(((130)))(127) $100,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and (($3,502,000))$465,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the authority to contract for community behavioral health services to be provided at the Olympic heritage behavioral health facility pursuant to the following requirements:(a) The authority must conduct a survey of provider interest to determine service options for operating up to 40 beds at the Olympic heritage behavioral health facility, with a target opening date of April 1, 2025.(b) The primary focus must be addressing the needs of adults with a history or likelihood of criminal legal involvement to reduce the number of people with behavioral health or other diagnoses accessing treatment through the criminal legal system.(c) The survey must seek information from providers, including tribal governments, interested in offering one or more, but not limited to, the following types of services:(i) Short-term or step down residential behavioral health care, particularly for individuals who may have received treatment or services through crisis stabilization or a 23-hour crisis facility;(ii) Residential, transitional, or supportive services that would divert individuals from the criminal legal system or emergency departments;(iii) Substance use or co-occurring treatment, including inpatient or outpatient programming as well as programs designed for the treatment of opioid use disorder; and(iv) Supportive and residential services for individuals in outpatient competency restoration, subject to assisted outpatient treatment orders, or released on personal recognizance while awaiting competency services.(d) The authority must provide a summary of the survey results to the office of financial management and the appropriate committees of the legislature.(e) Based upon a review of the survey results and in consultation with the department of social and health services, the authority must develop and submit a recommendation for approval to the office of financial management for issuing a request for proposals for specific beds to be contracted at the Olympic heritage behavioral health facility.(f) No later than August 1, 2024, and pursuant to approval from the office of financial management, the authority must release a request for proposals for contracted services at the Olympic heritage behavioral health facility that requires applicants to provide the following information:(i) A timeline and cost proposal for the operations of selected services;(ii) An explanation of how the proposal would reduce the number of individuals with behavioral health needs entering the criminal legal system; and(iii) Additional information as identified by the authority including relevant information identified in the survey of interest.(g) Of the amounts provided in this subsection, $100,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $150,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the authority to implement the survey under (a) of this subsection and the request for proposals under (f) of this subsection.(((131)))(128) $200,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for the authority to provide a one-time grant to the city of Maple Valley to support a project for a community resource coordinator position for the city of Maple Valley, Tahoma school district, and the greater Maple Valley area. This amount must be used to develop programs, projects, and training that specifically address behavioral health awareness and education and facilitate access to school-based and community behavioral health resources.(((132) $1,000,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for establishing grants to crisis services providers to establish and expand 23-hour crisis relief center capacity in accordance with the provisions of section 33, chapter 1, Laws of 2023 sp. sess. (2E2SSB 5536).(133)))(129) $500,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for a one-time grant to a nonprofit organization to provide services to medicaid clients and uninsured clients in a crisis stabilization and secure withdrawal management center located in Island county.(((134)))(130) $200,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for the authority to develop and issue a request for information to identify digital technologies that can be used for supporting youth and young adult behavioral health prevention, intervention, treatment, and recovery support services. In developing the request for information, the authority must convene a panel of experts in adolescent and young adult behavioral health prevention and treatment, suicide prevention and treatment, and digital behavioral health technologies. The panel must be used to evaluate responses to the request for information and make recommendations for technologies to pursue in future agency budget requests. The authority must submit a report to the children and youth behavioral health work group established pursuant to RCW 74.09.4951, the office of financial management, and the appropriate committees of the legislature, by June 30, 2025, identifying the technologies being recommended for implementation and the associated costs for piloting and/or statewide implementation.(((135) $3,000,000))(131) $2,198,000 of the opioid abatement settlement accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for establishing three additional health engagement hub pilot program sites in accordance with the provisions of chapter 1, Laws of 2023 sp. sess. (2E2SSB 5536). Prior to initiating another request for interest process, the authority must consider acceptable proposed projects from the request for interest survey initiated by the authority and the department of health in October 2023. In selecting proposals, the authority should consider geographic distribution across the state, and prioritize proposals that demonstrate an ability to serve communities disproportionately impacted by overdose, health issues, and other harms related to drugs, including American Indian/Alaska Native communities, Black/African American communities, Latino/Hispanic communities, Asian American and Native Hawaiian/Pacific Islander communities, people experiencing homelessness, and communities impacted by the criminal-legal system. When determining the contracts for direct services, priority may be given to BIPOC-led organizations, including Tribes.(((136)))(132) $1,500,000 of the opioid abatement settlement accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the authority to establish high-intensity community-based teams serving people with opioid use disorder. The funding must be used to significantly increase administration of long-acting injectable buprenorphine to people at highest risk for overdose. The authority must prioritize funding to augment existing field-based teams funded with federal state opioid response grants, such as opioid treatment network, low-barrier buprenorphine, or street medicine teams to enhance low-barrier services in areas with high rates of overdose. Funding must be used to engage people with opioid use disorder in nontraditional settings such as supportive housing, shelters, and encampments to provide low-barrier, immediate, and continual care for people with opioid use disorders to initiate and maintain buprenorphine, with preferential focus on long-acting injectable buprenorphine. The authority must submit a report to the office of financial management and the appropriate committees of the legislature summarizing the implementation of this funding and identifying barriers which impact treatment access for people at high risk for overdose including, but not limited to: (a) State and federal regulations; (b) managed care provider network adequacy; (c) contracting practices between managed care organizations and behavioral health providers, including delegation arrangements with provider networks; (d) reimbursement models and rate adequacy; (e) training and technical assistance needs; and (f) other factors identified by the authority. The report must include recommendations for reducing barriers to medication for opioid use disorder, including long-acting injectable buprenorphine.(((137)))(133) $328,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 and $328,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely for the authority to ((contract with the University of Washington addictions, drug, and alcohol institute for implementing))implement Second Substitute House Bill No. 2320 (high THC cannabis products). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2024, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.(((138)))(134) $893,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 and $722,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute House Bill No. 1877 (behavioral health/tribes). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2024, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.(((139)))(135) $900,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely to reimburse either King county or other legal services organizations, or both, for the cost of conducting ((180-day))involuntary treatment act commitment hearings at ((state operated)) facilities operating within King county. These amounts must be prioritized for the cost of conducting 180-day commitment hearings at state-operated facilities including facilities operated by the department of social and health services and the University of Washington center for behavioral health and learning. Any remaining amounts may be used to reimburse either King county or other legal services organizations for the cost of other involuntary treatment act commitment hearings provided in other facilities within King county.(((140)))(136) $250,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for the authority to contract with an entity that operates as a recovery resource center in north Kitsap county. This funding is provided on a one-time basis and must be used by the contracting entity to expand service hours, provide recovery cafÃ© services, and promote peer support and vocational, educational, and drug and alcohol-free social opportunities for the local recovery community.(((141)))(137) $250,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $750,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for a grant to a Seattle based opioid use disorder treatment provider in Seattle that experienced a severe flooding event in a clinic in January 2024. This funding is provided on a one-time basis and must be used to allow the clinic to continue to provide services by providing support for the increased per client costs resulting from temporarily delivering services to a smaller volume of clients while services are being re-established at the clinic and by supporting efforts to provide transitional services for clients in other settings while the facility is being restored.(((142)))(138) $900,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for the authority to purchase dispensing machines for distribution of naloxone, fentanyl test strips, and other public health supplies. In selecting a contractor for these machines, the authority must not provide any preference for machines that have the capacity to provide telehealth services.(((143) $2,000,000))(139) $500,000 of the opioid abatement settlement accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the authority to implement a rapid methadone induction pilot program. The pilot program must provide rapid methadone induction services to clients in hospitals electing to provide these services on an inpatient basis. Of these amounts, $250,000 is provided solely for the authority to contract for technical assistance to the hospitals participating in the pilot. The authority must contract the amounts provided for technical assistance to a Washington state chapter of a national organization that provides a physician-led professional community for those who prevent, treat, and promote remission and recovery from the disease of addiction and whose comprehensive set of guidelines for determining placement, continued stay, and transfer or discharge of enrollees with substance use disorders and co-occurring disorders have been incorporated into Washington state medicaid managed care contracts. The authority must develop procedures for incorporating this service through the apple health program including development of an amendment to the state medicaid plan or waiver if required. The authority must submit a preliminary report to the office of financial management and the appropriate committees of the legislature by June 30, 2025, which provides the status of the pilot project, identifies the mechanism that will be required to implement these services statewide through the apple health program, and provides estimates regarding the cost to implement the program statewide.(((144)))(140) $3,700,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for the authority to contract for five street medicine teams that rapidly assess and address the acute and chronic physical and behavioral health needs of homeless people. The teams must offer integrated, team-based medical, mental health, substance use, and infectious disease treatment and prevention, and navigation and case management services. One of the teams must provide services to people in Seattle and one of the teams must provide services to people in Spokane. The authority must submit a report to the office of financial management and the appropriate committees of the legislature on the implementation of this program with recommendations for maximizing leveraging of federal medicaid match and further expansion of the street medicine model by June 30, 2025. Of the amounts provided in this subsection:(a) $1,000,000 is provided solely for a grant to King county;(b) $1,000,000 is provided solely for a grant to the city of Spokane;(c) $1,000,000 is provided solely for a grant to the city of Tacoma;(d) $500,000 is provided solely for a grant to the city of Everett; and(e) $200,000 is provided solely for a grant to Kitsap county.(((145)))(141)(a) $480,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for a Washington state tribal opioid and fentanyl response task force with members as provided in this subsection:(i) The president of the senate shall appoint one member from each of the two largest caucuses of the senate;(ii) The speaker of the house of representatives shall appoint one member from each of the two largest caucuses of the house of representatives;(iii) Each federally recognized Indian tribe in Washington state may appoint one member through tribal resolution;(iv) The attorney general shall appoint one representative from the office of the attorney general;(v) The superintendent of public instruction shall appoint one representative from the office of the superintendent of public instruction; and(vi) The governor shall appoint the following members:(A) A member of the Seattle Indian health board;(B) A member of the NATIVE project;(C) One member of the executive leadership team from each of the following state agencies: The health care authority; the department of children, youth, and families; the department of commerce; the department of corrections; the department of health; the department of social and health services; the governor's office of Indian affairs; and the Washington state patrol;(D) Two indigenous members that have lived experience related to opioids or fentanyl; and(E) Two representatives of local governments.(b) Where feasible, the task force may invite and consult with representatives of:(i) The federal bureau of investigation;(ii) The offices of the United States attorneys;(iii) Federally recognized tribes in a state adjacent to Washington state;(iv) Tribal organizations with specific expertise including but not limited to tribal sovereignty, jurisdiction, cultural practices, and data; and(v) Any experts or professionals having expertise in the topics of prevention, treatment, harm reduction, and recovery support related to opioids or fentanyl in federal, tribal, and/or state jurisdiction.(c)(i) The legislative members must convene the initial meeting of the task force no later than August 1, 2024. Thereafter, the task force shall meet at least quarterly.(ii) The task force must be cochaired by one legislative member and four tribal leader members selected by members of the task force at the first meeting.(iii) The task force shall convene one summit in fiscal year 2025 with the state agencies identified in (a)(vi) of this subsection, federally recognized Indian tribes in Washington state, federally recognized tribes located in a state adjacent to Washington state, urban Indian organizations, and tribal organizations.(d)(i) Of the amounts provided in this subsection, $295,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for the authority to contract with the American Indian health commission, as defined in RCW 43.71B.010, to provide support for the Washington state tribal opioid and fentanyl response task force, committees, and work groups and to organize the annual summit, and oversee the development of the task force reports. The American Indian health commission may, when deemed necessary by the task force, retain consultants to provide data analysis, research, recommendations, and other services to the task force for the purposes provided in (e) of this subsection. The amounts within this subsection (d)(i) shall be used for the costs of meetings, the annual summit, American Indian health commission staff support, consultants as deemed necessary, and for stipends pursuant to (d)(v) of this subsection.(ii) Of the amounts provided in this subsection, $100,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for the authority to contract with tribes and urban Indian health organizations to provide stipends for participation and attendance at task force and committee meetings.(iii) Of the amounts provided in this subsection, $85,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for the authority to support the Washington state tribal opioid and fentanyl response task force.(iv) Legislative members of the task force are reimbursed for travel expenses in accordance with RCW 44.04.120. Nonlegislative members are not entitled to be reimbursed for travel expenses if they are elected officials or are participating on behalf of an employer, governmental entity, or other organization. Except as provided under (d)(v) of this subsection, any reimbursement for other nonlegislative members is subject to chapter 43.03 RCW.(v) Subject to the provisions of RCW 43.03.220, eligible task force members may be provided a stipend in an amount not to exceed $200 and other expenses for each day during which the member attends an official meeting of the task force.(e)(i) The task force shall review the laws and policies relating to opioid and fentanyl use, illicit sale of opioids and fentanyl, jurisdictional authority, tribal exclusionary authority, and any related impacts affecting American Indian and Alaska Native people. The task force shall develop recommendations including legislative and executive policy changes and budget initiatives for the purpose of addressing priority areas identified at the first annual Washington state tribal opioid and fentanyl summit in May of 2023 in the overarching topic areas of justice; prevention, treatment, and recovery; housing and homelessness; and community and family as well as additional topic areas included in subsequent summits.(ii) The task force may create subgroups and work with existing state or tribal work groups to develop recommendations to the task force on each of the topics listed in (e)(i) of this subsection.(iii) The task force, with the assistance of the American Indian health commission and the authority, must submit a status report including any initial findings, recommendations, and progress updates to the governor and the appropriate committees of the legislature by June 30, 2025. The report shall include but is not limited to recommendations related to proposed new statutes or amendment of current statutes, proposed executive branch action items or regulatory changes, and proposed funding and budget requests. To the extent possible, the report may include fiscal analysis related to the cost of implementing specific recommendations.(((146)))(142)(a) $250,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 and $250,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely for the authority to continue work on the behavioral health comparison rate project, including:(i) Developing phase 3 comparison rates for all major medicaid managed care behavioral health services not addressed in phase 1 or phase 2 of the behavioral health comparison rates project or through other work streams; and(ii) Preparing to implement a minimum fee schedule for behavioral health services, including developing solutions to resolve any current data and systems limitations.(b) By December 31, 2024, the authority must provide a preliminary report to the office of financial management and appropriate committees of the legislature that:(i) Estimates the cost and other impacts to fee for service and managed care programs of establishing a minimum fee schedule effective January 1, 2026, based on the comparison rates developed as part of phase 1 and phase 2 of the behavioral health comparison rates project;(ii) Identifies any data or other limitations that need to be resolved, and plans for addressing those limitations including funding needs if any, to implement the minimum fee schedule by January 1, 2026;(iii) Provides additional analysis of variation between the comparison rates and current payment levels at a service and regional level;(iv) Describes how the authority plans to propose to the legislature implementation of the phase 1 and phase 2 minimum fee schedule by January 1, 2026, to better match medicaid payments to the cost of care; and(v) Outlines options to periodically update the behavioral health fee schedules.(c) By October 1, 2025, the authority must provide a final report to the office of financial management and appropriate committees of the legislature that:(i) Summarizes the new comparison rates developed as part of phase 3;(ii) Updates comparison rates developed in phase 1 and phase 2 for new salary and wage information based on most current bureau of labor statistics data;(iii) Estimates the cost and other impacts to fee for service and managed care of incorporating additional behavioral health services developed as part of phase 3 of the behavioral health comparison rates project into a minimum fee schedule effective January 1, 2027;(iv) Identifies planned actions and funding needs if any to resolve any remaining limitations to implement the phase 3 minimum fee schedule by January 1, 2027;(v) Provides additional analysis of variation between the comparison rates developed as part of phase 3 and current payment levels at a service and regional level; and(vi) Describes how the authority plans to propose to the legislature implementation of the phase 3 minimum fee schedule by January 1, 2027, to better match medicaid payments to the cost of care.(d) It is the intent of the legislature to continue funding the study in the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium, with a final report due by October 1, 2025.(((147)))(143) $750,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for the authority to provide support to behavioral health agencies interested in establishing occupational therapy services for behavioral health clients. This funding must be used for establishing and integrating occupational therapy into behavioral health agency programs and operations. Funding may be used for occupational therapist and occupational therapy assistant services, recruitment, training, technical assistance, fieldwork opportunities, and for other approved activities targeted to increase access to occupational therapy services within behavioral health agency settings. The authority must submit a preliminary report to the legislature on the number of patients receiving occupational therapy through this initiative, the programs in which services were provided, and the number and type of fieldwork students trained in each participating behavioral health agency program by June 30, 2025.(((148)))(144)(a) (($39,101,000))$58,966,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 and (($33,435,000))$48,595,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely for the authority to implement supportive supervision and oversight services pursuant to a 1915(i) state plan amendment that is assumed to be effective on July 1, 2024. This reflects a change in purchasing structure and a transition of clients from behavioral health personal care services to the new services established under the 1915(i) state plan amendment. For medicaid clients enrolled in managed care, the authority must contract for these services through managed care organizations utilizing an actuarially sound rate structure as established by the authority and approved by the centers for medicare and medicaid services. The authority may not implement a skills development and restoration benefit until funding is provided for that specific purpose.(b) Of the amounts provided in this subsection, (($24,661,000))$33,893,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 and (($26,931,000))$37,013,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are for implementing supportive supervision and oversight services in adult family home settings in accordance with and contingent upon execution of the collective bargaining agreement negotiated between the state and the adult family homes and referenced in part IX of this act.(c) Of the amounts provided in this subsection, (($5,611,000))$10,262,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 and (($6,128,000))$11,207,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are for implementing supportive supervision and oversight services in assisted living or enhanced services facility settings.(d) Of the amounts provided in this subsection, (($8,453,000))$14,435,000 is for managed care organizations to provide reimbursement for the state share of exceptional behavioral health personal care services for individuals who have not transitioned into the new 1915(i) state plan services.(e) Of the amounts provided in this subsection, $376,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year ((2024))2025 and $376,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation is for administrative costs associated with implementation of the new 1915(i) state plan.(f) ((In the event that either the 1915(i) state plan amendment is not approved by the center for medicaid and medicare services or the collective bargaining agreement negotiated between the state and the adult family homes as referenced in part IX of this act is not executed in fiscal year 2025, then from the amounts provided in (a) of this subsection, up to $23,850,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 may be used for the authority to continue the reimbursement structure for behavioral health personal care services in place during fiscal year 2024.(g))) Within the amounts provided in this subsection, the authority must assure that managed care organizations reimburse the department of social and health services aging and long term support administration for the general fundâstate cost of exceptional behavioral health personal care services for medicaid enrolled individuals who require these services because of a psychiatric disability.(((149)))(145) $200,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for the authority to contract with a nonprofit organization to provide education on innovative care for individuals with mental illnesses. The contracting organization must:(a) Have experience holding mental health focused summits that bring together provider, advocacy communities, and other stakeholders; and in distributing mental health first aid manuals and online resources for mental health curricula;(b) Have a mission to (i) create an environment through education to eliminate stigma around mental illness; (ii) help to boost effectiveness of current treatment pathways through proactive care coordination and management; (iii) aid efforts in psychiatric research and innovations; and (iv) identify and elevate systems of excellence; and(c) Use this funding to support initiatives related to the distribution of mental health curricula and training manuals, and innovation in the identification and treatment of individuals with mental illnesses.(((150)))(146) $282,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 and $253,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 6251 (behavioral crisis coord.). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2024, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.(((151)))(147) $611,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 and $462,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 6228 (substance use treatment). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2024, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.(((152)))(148) $248,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 and $213,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5660 (mental health adv directives). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2024, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.(((153)))(149) $330,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5588 (mental health sentencing alt). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2024, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.(((154)))(150) $1,500,000 of the ((general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025))opioid abatement settlement accountâstate appropriation is provided solely to increase existing contracts for current community prevention and wellness initiative programs across the state.(((155)))(151) $750,000 of the opioid abatement settlement accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for additional outreach workers to support the expansion of oxford houses.(((156)))(152) $500,000 of the opioid abatement settlement accountâstate appropriation and $250,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely for support of a tribal fentanyl summit in fiscal years 2024 and 2025.(((157)))(153) $1,000,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for grants to tribes to implement the Icelandic model of prevention in their communities.(((158)))(154) $2,000,000 of the opioid abatement settlement accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for a tribal opioid prevention campaign to inform and educate tribal communities about opioid misuse prevention, overdose response, and treatment.(155) $67,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely to reimburse Thurston county for the cost of conducting 180-day commitment hearings at the Maple Lane facility.Sec. 1216. 2024 c 376 s 218 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE CRIMINAL JUSTICE TRAINING COMMISSIONGeneral FundâState Appropriation (FY 2024). . . .$55,098,000General FundâState Appropriation (FY 2025). . . .(($66,092,000))Â Â Â Â Â $66,178,000General FundâPrivate/Local Appropriation. . . .$8,328,000Death Investigations AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$1,708,000Municipal Criminal Justice Assistance AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$460,000Washington Auto Theft Prevention Authority AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$10,467,000Washington Internet Crimes Against Children AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$2,270,00024/7 Sobriety AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$20,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($144,443,000))Â Â Â Â Â $144,529,000The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) $5,000,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $5,000,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided to the Washington association of sheriffs and police chiefs solely to verify the address and residency of registered sex offenders and kidnapping offenders under RCW 9A.44.130.(2) Funding in this section is sufficient for 75 percent of the costs of providing 23 statewide basic law enforcement trainings in ((each)) fiscal year 2024 and 100 percent of the costs of providing 22 statewide basic law enforcement trainings in fiscal year 2025. The criminal justice training commission must schedule its funded classes to minimize wait times throughout each fiscal year and meet statutory wait time requirements. The criminal justice training commission must track and report the average wait time for students at the beginning of each class and provide the findings in an annual report to the legislature due in December of each year. At least three classes must be held in Spokane each year.(3) The criminal justice training commission may not run a basic law enforcement academy class of fewer than 30 students.(4) $2,270,000 of the Washington internet crimes against children accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of chapter 84, Laws of 2015.(5) $4,000,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $4,000,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the mental health field response team program administered by the Washington association of sheriffs and police chiefs. The association must distribute $7,000,000 in grants to the phase one and phase two regions as outlined in the settlement agreement under Trueblood, et. al. v. Department of Social and Health Services, et. al., U.S. District Court-Western District, Cause No. 14-cv-01178-MJP. The association must submit an annual report to the Governor and appropriate committees of the legislature by September 1st of each year of the biennium. The report shall include best practice recommendations on law enforcement and behavioral health field response and include outcome measures on all grants awarded.(6) $899,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $899,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for crisis intervention training for the phase one regions as outlined in the settlement agreement under Trueblood, et. al. v. Department of Social and Health Services, et. al., U.S. District Court-Western District, Cause No. 14-cv-01178-MJP.(7) $1,598,000 of the death investigations accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the commission to provide 240 hours of medicolegal forensic investigation training to coroners and medical examiners to meet the recommendations of the national commission on forensic science for certification and accreditation.(8) $346,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 is provided solely for implementation of chapter 321, Laws of 2021 (officer duty to intervene).(9) $30,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $30,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for additional grants to local jurisdictions to investigate instances where a purchase or transfer of a firearm was attempted by an individual who is prohibited from owning or possessing a firearm.(10) $2,500,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $2,500,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the criminal justice training commission to provide grant funding to local law enforcement agencies to support law enforcement wellness programs. Of the amount provided in this subsection:(a) $1,500,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $1,500,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the commission to provide grants to local law enforcement and corrections agencies for the purpose of establishing officer wellness programs. Grants provided under this subsection may be used for, but not limited to building resilience, injury prevention, peer support programs, physical fitness, proper nutrition, stress management, suicide prevention, and physical or behavioral health services. The commission must consult with a representative from the Washington association of sheriffs and police chiefs and a representative of the Washington state fraternal order of police and the Washington council of police and sheriffs in the development of the grant program.(b) $1,000,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $1,000,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the Washington association of sheriffs and police chiefs to establish and coordinate an online or mobile-based application for any Washington law enforcement officer; 911 operator or dispatcher; and any other current or retired employee of a Washington law enforcement agency, and their families, to anonymously access on-demand wellness techniques, suicide prevention, resilience, physical fitness, nutrition, and other behavioral health and wellness supports.(11) $290,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $290,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for academy training for limited authority Washington peace officers employed by the Washington state gambling commission, Washington state liquor and cannabis board, Washington state parks and recreation commission, department of natural resources, and the office of the insurance commissioner.(a) Up to 30 officers must be admitted to attend the basic law enforcement academy and up to 30 officers must be admitted to attend basic law enforcement equivalency academy.(b) Allocation of the training slots amongst the agencies must be based on the earliest application date to the commission. Training does not need to commence within six months of employment.(c) The state agencies must reimburse the commission for the actual cost of training.(12) $6,987,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and (($4,968,000))$4,212,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely to establish and provide basic law enforcement academy classes at three new regional training academies, one in Pasco, one in Snohomish county, and one in Clark county. Funding in this subsection is sufficient for 75 percent of the costs of providing six classes ((per year beginning)) in fiscal year 2024 and 100 percent of the costs of providing five classes in fiscal year 2025. The criminal justice training commission must schedule its funded classes to minimize wait times throughout each fiscal year and meet statutory wait time requirements. The criminal justice training commission must track and report the average wait time for students at the beginning of each class and provide the findings in an annual report to the legislature due in December of each year. The ((six)) classes ((per year))in this subsection are in addition to the classes in subsection (2) of this section.(13) $120,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $30,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the criminal justice training commission to develop plans for increasing training capacity. The planning process should include engagement with limited law enforcement agencies, tribal law enforcement representatives, and local law enforcement agencies and representatives. The criminal justice training commission will provide recommendations to the governor and the appropriate committees of the legislature in a preliminary report due November 15, 2023, and in a final report due September 30, 2024. The reports should include the following:(a) Identifying the demand for additional basic law enforcement academy courses to support law enforcement agencies and develop a proposal to meet any identified training needs, including basic law enforcement academy and advanced training needs;(b) A plan for how to provide basic law enforcement academy training to limited law enforcement officers and tribal law enforcement officers, including providing additional capacity for training classes. The plan should also consider alternatives for distribution of the costs of the training course; and(c) A plan for providing at least two basic law enforcement training academy classes per year to candidates who are not yet employed with a law enforcement agency. The plan should, at a minimum, include the following:(i) A recruitment strategy that emphasizes recruitment of diverse candidates from different geographic areas of the state; diverse race, ethnicity, gender, and sexual orientation; and candidates with diverse backgrounds and experiences including nontraditional educational programs or work experience;(ii) Pathways from training to employment with a law enforcement agency; and(iii) Plans to address capacity for and delivery of training.(14) $1,000,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $1,000,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the criminal justice training commission to provide accreditation incentive awards.(a) The commission may provide an accreditation incentive award totaling up to $50,000 to each law enforcement agency that receives an accreditation during the fiscal biennium from a national or state accrediting entity recognized by the commission. The commission must divide award amounts provided pursuant to this section equally among qualifying law enforcement agencies. A law enforcement agency may not receive more than one accreditation incentive award per fiscal biennium. Funds received by a law enforcement agency pursuant to this subsection must be made available to the law enforcement agency to which they are awarded and may not supplant or replace existing funding received by the law enforcement agency.(b) The commission must submit a report to the legislature by June 30th of each fiscal year during the biennium that lists each law enforcement agency that received an accreditation incentive award during the fiscal year.(15) $1,085,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $1,040,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute House Bill No. 1028 (crime victims & witnesses).(16) $236,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $226,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for implementation of Substitute House Bill No. 1132 (limited authority officers).(17) $1,200,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $400,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for body camera grant funding to local law enforcement agencies.(a) The Washington association of sheriffs and police chiefs shall develop and implement a body-worn camera grant program. The purpose of the program is to assist law enforcement agencies to establish and expand body-worn camera programs.(b) Law enforcement agencies may use the grants for: (i) The initial purchase, maintenance, and replacement of body-worn cameras; (ii) ongoing costs related to the maintenance and storage of data recorded by body worn cameras; (iii) costs associated with public records requests for body worn-camera footage; and (iv) hiring of personnel necessary to operate a body-worn camera program.(c) The Washington association of sheriffs and police chiefs shall develop and implement a grant application process and review applications from agencies based on locally developed proposals to establish or expand body-worn camera programs.(d) Law enforcement agencies that are awarded grants must:(i) Comply with the provisions of chapter 10.109 RCW;(ii) Demonstrate the ability to redact body-worn camera footage consistent with RCW 42.56.240 and other applicable provisions;(iii) Provide training to officers who will wear body-worn cameras and other personnel associated with implementation of the body-worn camera program; and(iv) Agree to comply with any data collection and reporting requirements that are established by the Washington association of sheriffs and police chiefs.(e) The Washington association of sheriffs and police chiefs must submit an annual report regarding the grant program to the governor and appropriate committees of the legislature by December 1st of each year the program is funded. The report must be submitted in compliance with RCW 43.01.036.(18) $381,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $628,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 1715 (domestic violence).(19) $280,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for confidential secretary staff for the training bureau director and the accountability bureau director.(20) $694,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5780 (public defense & prosecution) to contract out trial skills training for practitioners who are new to prosecution and to administer a law student rural prosecution program. ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2024, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.))(21) $50,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for the commission to provide training to the Okanogan county sheriff's office. The commission must coordinate with the sheriff's office to provide the training on a date or dates least likely to interrupt the operations of the sheriff's office and the training must take place virtually or at a suitable agreed upon location. The training must, at a minimum, include best practices for victim centered, trauma-informed policing practices, trauma-informed investigation and interviewing skills, understanding the lethality potentials of stalking, best practices in serving and enforcing protection orders, investigation of potential violations of protection orders, and assistance to and services for victims and children. The commission is encouraged to utilize existing relevant training materials assembled pursuant to RCW 10.99.033, RCW 43.101.276, and other evidence-based resources as deemed appropriate by the commission. The commission may not insinuate or otherwise communicate that the training is mandatory for any employee of the sheriff's office, but the commission must keep a detailed attendance and participation record for each employee of the sheriff's office who attends. The amounts provided in this subsection, not required for use by the commission to conduct the training listed above, must be made available to reimburse the sheriff's office for any reasonable and necessary overtime costs associated with participating in the training.(22) $2,500,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for the commission to support the law enforcement assisted diversion program for drug possession and public use in Seattle. These funds must supplement, not supplant, current levels of local funding in the city of Seattle budget.(23) $150,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for implementation of House Bill No. 1635 (police dogs/liability) for the commission to develop model standards for the training and certification of canine teams to detect fentanyl. ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2024, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.))(24) $1,384,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 2311 (first responder wellness) for the commission to convene a task force on first responder wellness and to contract with various entities to develop trainings. ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2024, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.))(25) $484,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $3,187,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $1,169,000 of the general fundâprivate/local appropriation are provided solely for the commission to conduct additional corrections officer academy classes. These classes may be conducted at the corrections officer academy in Burien or at a regional corrections officer academy established by the commission.(((26) $50,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for the commission to complete a study on establishing a regional basic law enforcement academy or a regional corrections officer academy, or both, on the Kitsap peninsula. At a minimum, the study must estimate the costs and identify a possible timeline for establishing one or both academies. A report providing recommendations is due to the governor and the appropriate policy and fiscal committees of the legislature by June 30, 2025.))Sec. 1217. 2024 c 376 s 219 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE OFFICE OF INDEPENDENT INVESTIGATIONSGeneral FundâState Appropriation (FY 2024). . . .$17,014,000General FundâState Appropriation (FY 2025). . . .(($20,196,000))Â Â Â Â Â $17,196,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($37,210,000))Â Â Â Â Â $34,210,000((The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) $9,383,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $9,383,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for dedicated staffing at regional offices to include at least regional investigator supervisors, investigators, forensic investigators, family liaisons, and evidence technicians.(2) $1,124,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $1,124,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely to contract with the Washington state patrol for laboratory-based testing and processing of crime scene evidence collected during investigations.(3) $251,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $251,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for contracted specialized training for investigators relating to death investigations in cases involving deadly force.(4) $2,257,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $2,057,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for training development, additional staff training costs, crime lab processing, and contract services to include polygraphs, background checks, personnel evaluations, contracted security, and software licensing.(5) $3,000,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for the office to pay for one-time tenant improvements necessary for a central evidence storage facility and regional offices.))Sec. 1218. 2024 c 376 s 220 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF LABOR AND INDUSTRIESGeneral FundâState Appropriation (FY 2024). . . .$17,526,000General FundâState Appropriation (FY 2025). . . .(($25,305,000))Â Â Â Â Â $20,846,000General FundâFederal Appropriation. . . .(($11,521,000))Â Â Â Â Â $12,473,000Asbestos AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$628,000Electrical License AccountâState Appropriation. . . .(($74,072,000))Â Â Â Â Â $74,037,000Farm Labor Contractor AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$28,000Opioid Abatement Settlement AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$250,000Worker and Community Right to Know FundâStateAppropriation. . . .$1,138,000Construction Registration Inspection AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .(($31,418,000))Â Â Â Â Â $31,427,000Public Works Administration AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .(($18,011,000))Â Â Â Â Â $17,999,000Manufactured Home Installation Training AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$454,000Accident AccountâState Appropriation. . . .(($437,590,000))Â Â Â Â Â $437,323,000Accident AccountâFederal Appropriation. . . .$19,953,000Medical Aid AccountâState Appropriation. . . .(($421,049,000))Â Â Â Â Â $420,819,000Medical Aid AccountâFederal Appropriation. . . .$3,920,000Plumbing Certificate AccountâState Appropriation. . . .(($3,649,000))Â Â Â Â Â $3,650,000Pressure Systems Safety AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$5,116,000Workforce Education Investment AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$20,500,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($1,092,128,000))Â Â Â Â Â $1,088,087,000The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) $6,756,000 of the accident accountâstate appropriation and $6,753,000 of the medical aid accountâstate appropriation are provided solely for the labor and industries workers' compensation information system replacement project and is subject to the conditions, limitations, and review provided in section 701 of this act. The department must:(a) Submit quarterly data within 30 calendar days of the end of each quarter, effective July 1, 2023, on:(i) The quantifiable deliverables accomplished and the amount spent by each deliverable in each of the following subprojects:(A) Business readiness;(B) Change readiness;(C) Commercial off the shelf procurement;(D) Customer access;(E) Program foundations;(F) Independent assessment; and(G) In total by fiscal year;(ii) All of the quantifiable deliverables accomplished by subprojects identified in (a)(i)(A) through (F) of this subsection and in total and the associated expenditures by each deliverable by fiscal month;(iii) The contract full time equivalent charged by subprojects identified in (a)(i)(A) through (F) of this subsection, and in total, compared to the budget spending plan by month for each contracted vendor and what the ensuing contract equivalent budget spending plan by subprojects identified in (a)(i)(A) through (F) of this subsection, and in total, assumes by fiscal month;(iv) The performance metrics by subprojects identified in (a)(i)(A) through (F) of this subsection, and in total, that are currently used, including monthly performance data; and(v) The risks identified independently by at least the quality assurance vendor and the office of the chief information officer, and how the project:(A) Has mitigated each risk; and(B) Is working to mitigate each risk, and when it will be mitigated;(b) Submit the report in (a) of this subsection to fiscal and policy committees of the legislature; and(c) Receive an additional gated project sign off by the office of financial management, effective September 1, 2023. Prior to spending any project funding in this subsection each quarter, there is an additional gate of approval required for this project. The director of financial management must agree that the project shows accountability, effective and appropriate use of the funding, and that risks are being mitigated to the spending and sign off on the spending for the ensuing quarter.(2) $250,000 of the medical aid accountâstate appropriation and $250,000 of the accident accountâstate appropriation are provided solely for the department of labor and industries safety and health assessment and research for prevention program to conduct research to address the high injury rates of the janitorial workforce. The research must quantify the physical demands of common janitorial work tasks and assess the safety and health needs of janitorial workers. The research must also identify potential risk factors associated with increased risk of injury in the janitorial workforce and measure workload based on the strain janitorial work tasks place on janitors' bodies. The department must conduct interviews with janitors and their employers to collect information on risk factors, identify the tools, technologies, and methodologies used to complete work, and understand the safety culture and climate of the industry. The department must produce annual progress reports through the year 2025 or until the tools are fully developed and deployed. The annual progress report must be submitted to the governor and legislature by December 1st of each year such report is due.(3) $258,000 of the accident accountâstate appropriation and $258,000 of the medical aid accountâstate appropriation are provided solely for the department of labor and industries safety and health assessment research for prevention program to conduct research to prevent the types of work-related injuries that require immediate hospitalization. The department will develop and maintain a tracking system to identify and respond to all immediate in-patient hospitalizations and will examine incidents in defined high-priority areas, as determined from historical data and public priorities. The research must identify and characterize hazardous situations and contributing factors using epidemiological, safety-engineering, and human factors/ergonomics methods. The research must also identify common factors in certain types of workplace injuries that lead to hospitalization. The department must submit a report to the governor and appropriate legislative committees by August 30, 2023, and annually thereafter, summarizing work-related immediate hospitalizations and prevention opportunities, actions that employers and workers can take to make workplaces safer, and ways to avoid severe injuries.(4)(a) $2,000,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and (($2,000,000))$1,940,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for grants to promote workforce development in aerospace and aerospace related supply chain industries by: Expanding the number of registered apprenticeships, preapprenticeships, and aerospace-related programs; and providing support for registered apprenticeships or programs in aerospace and aerospace-related supply chain industries.(b) Grants awarded under this section may be used for:(i) Equipment upgrades or new equipment purchases for training purposes;(ii) New training space and lab locations to support capacity needs and expansion of training to veterans and veteran spouses, and underserved populations;(iii) Curriculum development and instructor training for industry experts;(iv) Tuition assistance for degrees in engineering and high-demand degrees that support the aerospace industry; and(v) Funding to increase capacity and availability of child care options for shift work schedules.(c) An entity is eligible to receive a grant under this subsection if it is a nonprofit, nongovernmental, or institution of higher education that provides training opportunities, including apprenticeships, preapprenticeships, preemployment training, aerospace-related degree programs, or incumbent worker training to prepare workers for the aerospace and aerospace-related supply chain industries.(d) The department may use up to 5 percent of these funds for administration of these grants.(5) $3,774,000 of the accident accountâstate appropriation and $890,000 of the medical aid accountâstate appropriation are provided solely for the creation of an agriculture compliance unit within the division of occupational safety and health. The compliance unit will perform compliance inspections and provide bilingual outreach to agricultural workers and employers.(6) $1,642,000 of the medical aid accountâstate appropriation is provided solely to cover the overhead rent costs to increase the number of labor and industry vocational specialists embedded in WorkSource offices and to implement a comprehensive quality-assurance team to ensure the continuous improvement of vocational services for injured workers through the workers' compensation program.(7) $1,798,000 of the public works administration accountâstate appropriation is provided solely to maintain expanded capacity to investigate and enforce prevailing-wage complaints.(8) $2,500,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and (($2,500,000))$500,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the crime victims' compensation program to pay for medical exams for suspected victims of domestic violence. Neither the hospital, medical facility, nor victim is to pay for the cost of the medical exam. This funding must not supplant existing funding for sexual assault medical exams. If the cost of medical exams exceeds the funding provided in this subsection, the program shall not reduce the reimbursement rates for medical providers seeking reimbursement for other claimants, and instead the program shall return to paying for domestic violence medical exams after insurance.(9) (a) $1,209,000 of the construction registration inspection accountâstate appropriation, $66,000 of the accident accountâstate appropriation, and $14,000 of the medical aid accountâstate appropriation are provided solely for the conveyance management system replacement project and are subject to the conditions, limitations, and review provided in section 701 of this act.(b) $270,000 of the construction registration inspection accountâstate appropriation, $17,000 of the accident accountâstate appropriation, and $3,000 of the medical aid accountâstate appropriation are provided solely for the maintenance and operations of the conveyance management system replacement project.(10) $250,000 of the opioid abatement settlement accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the department to analyze patients who are maintained on chronic opioids. The department must submit an annual report of its findings to the governor and the appropriate committees of the legislature no later than October 1st of each year of the fiscal biennium. The report shall include analysis of patient data, describing the characteristics of patients who are maintained on chronic opioids and their clinical needs, and a preliminary evaluation of potential interventions to improve care and reduce harms in this population.(11) $1,363,000 of the medical aid accountâstate appropriation is provided solely to improve access to medical and vocational providers of the workers' compensation program by expanding the use of navigators to recruit and assist providers in underserved communities and by ensuring access to high quality and reliable interpreter services.(12) $3,000,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation, $1,870,000 of the accident accountâstate appropriation, and $330,000 of the medical aid accountâstate appropriation are provided solely for the department, in coordination with the Washington state apprenticeship council, to administer grants to continue the growth of behavioral health apprenticeship programs. Grants may be awarded for provider implementation costs, apprentice tuition and stipend costs, curriculum development, and program administration. Grant awardees must use a minimum of one-half of amounts provided to compensate behavioral health providers for employer implementation costs including mentor wage differentials, related instruction wages, and administrative costs. In awarding this funding, special preference must be given to entities with experience in implementation of behavioral health sector apprenticeships and labor-management partnerships. By June 30, 2024, and June 30, 2025, grantees must report to the department on the number of individuals that were recruited and upskilled in the preceding fiscal year. The department may use up to five percent of the amount provided in this subsection for administration of these grants.(13) $1,000,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the department, in coordination with the Washington state apprenticeship training council, to administer grants to address the behavioral health workforce shortage through behavioral health preapprenticeship and behavioral health entry level training, including nursing assistant certified programs. Grants may cover program costs including, but not limited to, provider implementation costs, apprentice tuition and stipend costs, curriculum development, and program administration. In awarding this funding, special preference must be given to entities with experience in implementation of behavioral health sector apprenticeships and labor-management partnerships. By June 30, 2024, and June 30, 2025, grantees must report to the department on the number of individuals that were recruited and upskilled in the preceding fiscal year. The department may use up to five percent of the amount provided in this subsection for administration of these grants.(14)(a) $300,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for certified construction trade preapprenticeship programs that use a nationally approved multicraft curriculum and emphasize construction math, tool use, job safety, equipment, life skills, and financial literacy. The preapprenticeship programs should focus on disadvantaged, nontraditional, and underrepresented populations, and on populations reentering the community from incarceration and houselessness. Funding provided in this subsection may be used to:(i) Provide incentives for participation in preapprenticeship programs, such as covering program costs, providing stipends to preapprentices, or covering the costs of construction tools; or(ii) Address barriers for participation in preapprenticeship programs, such as covering costs of child care or transportation, or facilitating interviews for apprenticeship programs.(b) The department may use up to five percent of the amount provided in (a) of this subsection for administration of these grants.(15)(a) $400,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for grants to nonprofit organizations to:(i) Expand meatcutter registered apprenticeship and preapprenticeship programs to new locations; or(ii) Develop a new fishmonger registered apprenticeship program.(b) Grants awarded under this subsection may be used for:(i) Equipment upgrades or new equipment purchases for training purposes;(ii) New training space and lab locations to support the expansion and establishment of apprenticeship and preapprenticeship training in new locations;(iii) Curriculum development, including the creation of elearning content, and instructor training for apprenticeship and preapprenticeship instructors;(iv) Tuition assistance for apprentices in registered apprenticeship programs accredited by a community or technical college;(v) Stipends for preapprentices; and(vi) Apprenticeship and preapprenticeship coordination and administration services.(c) An entity is eligible to receive a grant under this subsection if it is a nonprofit organization that administers or directly provides apprenticeship and preapprenticeship training opportunities, overseen by a committee with at least one labor union and one employer representative or with an active program with participation of both labor union and employer partners, for retail meatcutters and/or fishmongers.(d) The department may use up to five percent of the amount provided in this subsection for administration of these grants.(16) $12,000,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the department to distribute funding to multiemployer nonprofit programs providing apprenticeship education and job training for general journey level (01) electricians to increase funding for related supplemental instruction costs. Funding shall be allocated to programs by formula based on delivered related supplemental instruction hours for active apprentices under chapter 49.04 RCW and operating in compliance for administrative procedures. If a program is partnered with a Washington community or technical college to deliver the related supplemental instruction, the program may apply for up to a 25 percent increase in allocated funding based on the level of contracted support provided by the college. The department may use up to five percent of the amount provided in this subsection for administration of these grants.(17) $873,000 of the accident accountâstate appropriation and $883,000 of the medical aid accountâstate appropriation are provided solely for the creation of the center for work equity research. The center will study and systematically address employer and employment factors that place historically marginalized workers at increased risk for work-related injuries and illnesses and social and economic hardship.(18) $2,908,000 of the public works administration accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for system improvements to the prevailing wage program information technology system. This project is subject to the conditions, limitations, and review provided in section 701 of this act.(19) $205,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $205,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely to continue conducting a four-year retention study of state registered apprentices as provided in chapter 156, Laws of 2022 (apprenticeship programs). The study shall include the collection of data from all apprentices three months into their apprenticeship to understand challenges and barriers they face towards program participation. The aggregate data by trade must be displayed on a publicly available dashboard. Study data must be provided with apprenticeship coordinators to implement an early response to connect apprentices with needed supports. The department shall submit an annual report to the governor and appropriate legislative committees on June 30, 2024 and June 30, 2025.(20) $3,500,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely to administer a grant program intended to provide wraparound support services to mitigate barriers to beginning or participating in apprenticeship programs as described in chapter 156, Laws of 2022. Up to five percent of the total funding provided in this subsection may be used to cover administrative expenses.(21) $1,798,000 of the accident accountâstate appropriation and $960,000 of the medical aid accountâstate appropriation are provided solely to expand access to worker rights and safety information for workers with limited English proficiency (LEP) through outreach and translation of safety-related information, training, and other materials. $1,000,000 of the amount provided in this subsection is provided solely for grants to community-based organizations to provide workplace rights and safety outreach to underserved workers.(22) $857,000 of the accident accountâstate appropriation and $855,000 of the medical aid accountâstate appropriation are provided solely for enhancements to the workers' compensation training modules to include strategies on reducing long-term disability among claimants.(23) $6,702,000 from the electrical license accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for an additional wage increase for all positions within the electrical construction inspector, electrical construction inspector lead, electrical inspection field supervisor/technical specialist, and electrical plans examiner job class series consistent with the July 1, 2023, range differentials, subject to an agreement between the state and the exclusive collective bargaining representative of the electrical construction inspectors.(24) $165,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $165,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for a grant to an organization in Pierce county experienced in providing peer-to-peer training to continue implementation of a program aimed at reducing workplace sexual harassment in the agricultural sector. The department may use up to five percent of the amount provided in this subsection for administration of this grant. The organization receiving the grant must:(a) Continue peer-to-peer trainings for farmworkers in Yakima county and expand to provide peer-to-peer trainings for farmworkers in Grant and Benton counties;(b) Support an established network of peer trainings as farmworker leaders, whose primary purpose is to prevent workplace sexual harassment and assault through leadership, education, and other tools; and(c) Share best practices from the peer-to-peer model at a statewide conference for farmworkers, industry representatives, and advocates.(25) $250,000 of the accident accountâstate appropriation and $278,000 of the medical aid accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of House Bill No. 1197 (workers' comp. providers).(26) $1,088,000 of the public works administration accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Substitute House Bill No. 1050 (apprenticeship utilization).(27) $318,000 of the accident accountâstate appropriation and $56,000 of the medical aid accountâstate appropriation are provided solely for implementation of Substitute House Bill No. 1217 (wage complaints).(28) $105,000 of the accident accountâstate appropriation and $19,000 of the medical aid accountâstate appropriation are provided solely for implementation of Substitute House Bill No. 1323 (fire-resistant materials).(29) $239,000 of the accident accountâstate appropriation and $239,000 of the medical aid accountâstate appropriation are provided solely for implementation of Substitute House Bill No. 1521 (industrial insurance/duties).(30) $256,000 of the construction registration inspection accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute House Bill No. 1534 (construction consumers).(31) $1,311,000 of the accident accountâstate appropriation and $243,000 of the medical aid accountâstate appropriation are provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute House Bill No. 1762 (warehouse employees).(32) $431,000 of the accident accountâstate appropriation and $76,000 of the medical aid accountâstate appropriation are provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute House Bill No. 1013 (regional apprenticeship prgs).(33) $560,000 of the public works administration accountâstate appropriation is provided solely to update computer applications for implementation of Senate Bill No. 5088 (contractor registration). This project is subject to the conditions, limitations, and review provided in section 701 of this act.(34) $84,000 of the accident accountâstate appropriation and $84,000 of the medical aid accountâstate appropriation are provided solely for implementation of Senate Bill No. 5084 (self-insured pensions/fund).(35) $226,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $240,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for implementation of Senate Bill No. 5070 (nonfatal strangulation).(36) $216,000 of the accident accountâstate appropriation and $37,000 of the medical aid accountâstate appropriation are provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5156 (farm internship program).(37) $1,470,000 of the accident accountâstate appropriation and $260,000 of the medical aid accountâstate appropriation are provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5217 (musculoskeletal injuries/L&I).(38) $354,000 of the public works administration accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5268 (public works procurement).(39) $234,000 of the accident accountâstate appropriation and $41,000 of the medical aid accountâstate appropriation are provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5582 (nurse supply).(40) $230,000 of the accident accountâstate appropriation and $41,000 of the medical aid accountâstate appropriation are provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5111 (sick leave/construction).(41) $4,663,000 of the accident accountâstate appropriation and $884,000 of the medical aid accountâstate appropriation are provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5236 (hospital staffing standards).(42) $367,000 of the accident accountâstate appropriation and $369,000 of the medical aid accountâstate appropriation are provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5454 (RN PTSD/industrial insurance).(43) $1,906,000 of the electrical license accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for electrical inspector staffing to expand capacity to conduct electrical inspections, effective July 1, 2024.(44) $200,000 of the accident accountâstate appropriation and $200,000 of the medical aid accountâstate appropriation are provided solely for the department of labor and industries to contract with a third-party vendor to produce a study that assesses post-traumatic stress disorder related workers' compensation policies and claims in Washington and other states. The intent of the study is to inform the department on policy and best practices that improve worker outcomes for law enforcement officers, firefighters, and nurses. The department shall submit a report describing the outcomes, best practices, and recommendations to the governor and appropriate legislative committees by June 30, 2025.(45) $240,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for a grant to a statewide-serving nonprofit organization providing support services to apprentices and preapprentices for the provision of new work boots and other resources to state recognized apprenticeship preparation participants in correctional facilities and as they transition from incarceration to state registered apprenticeship programs. The work boots and other resources must be within allowable guidelines for incarcerated and community supervised individuals. The department may use up to five percent of the amount provided in this subsection for administration of this grant.(46) $300,000 of the surgical smoke evacuation nonappropriated accountâstate appropriation is provided solely to implement the reimbursement requirements established in chapter 129, Laws of 2022.(47) $60,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for costs for instructors for the preapprenticeship construction programs pursuant to subsection (14) of this section.(48) $175,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for the department to contract with the municipal research and services center to conduct a public works study. The study shall evaluate the application of public works requirements, including prevailing wage and apprentice utilization, on publicly funded construction, including those supported in part or in whole with state funds, the granting or loaning of public dollars, and tax deferrals or reimbursements. The department may use up to five percent of these funds for administration. A report to the relevant committees of the legislature shall be submitted by June 30, 2025.(49) $100,000 of the medical aid accountâstate appropriation and $100,000 of the accident accountâstate appropriation are provided solely for the staffing of a resolution process for complaints regarding light duty work under Title 51 RCW. The department shall submit a report to the appropriate committees of the legislature by June 30, 2025, on outcomes related to this funding and data regarding light duty resolution processes provided in this subsection.(50) $75,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for the department to survey registered apprenticeship programs and assimilate data that documents the fee structure and contractual elements of partnerships between the various registered apprenticeship programs and community and technical college system. This information will be used to inform a report and recommendations to the legislature on registered apprenticeship funding and how this funding is directed to community and technical colleges. The department shall submit a report to the legislature summarizing the survey findings by November 15, 2024.(51) (($350,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for the department of labor and industries to convene and to staff the underground economy task force created in section 906 of this act.(52))) $479,000 of the accident accountâstate appropriation and $102,000 of the medical aid accountâstate appropriation are provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5793 (paid sick leave). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2024, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.(53)))(52) $8,000 of the plumbing certificate accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Senate Bill No. 5997 (plumbing hours reporting). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2024, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.(54) $477,000))(53) $1,133,000 of the accident accountâstate appropriation and (($84,000))$200,000 of the medical accountâstate appropriation are provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 6105 (adult entertainment workers). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2024, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.(55)))(54) $44,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $139,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 6069 (retirement savings). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2024, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.(56)))(55) $79,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and (($471,000))$521,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5937 (crime victims/witnesses). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2024, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.(57)))(56) $50,000 from the electrical license accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the department to work with the association of Washington cities and associated stakeholders having an interest in the installation and maintenance of electric security alarm systems to identify appropriate pathways to streamline the permitting process and any other recommendations in order to facilitate the installation of these systems in this state. The department shall submit a report to the appropriate committees of the legislature with its findings and recommendations, in accordance with RCW 43.01.036, by December 15, 2024.(((58)))(57) $200,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for increasing access to manufacturing apprenticeships.(((59)))(58) $665,000 of the accident accountâstate appropriation and $118,000 of the medical aid accountâstate appropriation are provided solely for implementation of Substitute House Bill No. 1905 (equal pay/protected classes). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2024, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.(60)))(59) $202,000 of the accident accountâstate appropriation and $202,000 of the medical aid accountâstate appropriation are provided solely for implementation of House Bill No. 1927 (temporary total disability). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2024, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.(61) $1,933,000))(60) $1,317,000 of the accident accountâstate appropriation and (($294,000))$187,000 of the medical aid accountâstate appropriation are provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute House Bill No. 2022 (construction crane safety). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2024, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.(62) $219,000))(61) $168,000 of the accident accountâstate appropriation and (($38,000))$29,000 of the medical aid accountâstate appropriation are provided solely for implementation of Substitute House Bill No. 2061 (health employees/overtime). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2024, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.(63) $226,000))(62) $200,000 of the accident accountâstate appropriation and (($76,000))$72,000 of the medical aid accountâstate appropriation are provided solely for implementation of Substitute House Bill No. 2097 (worker wage recovery). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2024, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.(64)))(63) $226,000 of the public works administration accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Substitute House Bill No. 2136 (prevailing wage sanctions). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2024, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.))Sec. 1219. 2024 c 376 s 221 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF VETERANS AFFAIRS(1) The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(a) The department of veterans affairs shall not initiate any services that will require expenditure of state general fund moneys unless expressly authorized in this act or other law. The department may seek, receive, and spend, under RCW 43.79.260 through 43.79.282, federal moneys that are unrelated to the coronavirus response and not anticipated in this act as long as the federal funding does not require expenditure of state moneys for the program in excess of amounts anticipated in this act. If the department receives unanticipated unrestricted federal moneys that are unrelated to the coronavirus response, those moneys must be spent for services authorized in this act or in any other legislation that provides appropriation authority, and an equal amount of appropriated state moneys shall lapse. Upon the lapsing of any moneys under this subsection, the office of financial management shall notify the legislative fiscal committees. As used in this subsection, "unrestricted federal moneys" includes block grants and other funds that federal law does not require to be spent on specifically defined projects or matched on a formula basis by state funds.(b) Each year, there is fluctuation in the revenue collected to support the operation of the state veteran homes. When the department has foreknowledge that revenue will decrease, such as from a loss of census or from the elimination of a program, the legislature expects the department to make reasonable efforts to reduce expenditures in a commensurate manner and to demonstrate that it has made such efforts. In response to any request by the department for general fundâstate appropriation to backfill a loss of revenue, the legislature shall consider the department's efforts in reducing its expenditures in light of known or anticipated decreases to revenues.(2) HEADQUARTERSGeneral FundâState Appropriation (FY 2024). . . .$5,029,000General FundâState Appropriation (FY 2025). . . .(($5,324,000))Â Â Â Â Â $5,240,000Charitable, Educational, Penal, and ReformatoryInstitutions AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$10,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($10,363,000))Â Â Â Â Â $10,279,000(3) FIELD SERVICESGeneral FundâState Appropriation (FY 2024). . . .$11,113,000General FundâState Appropriation (FY 2025). . . .(($12,007,000))Â Â Â Â Â $11,146,000General FundâFederal Appropriation. . . .$10,328,000General FundâPrivate/Local Appropriation. . . .$6,542,000Veteran Estate Management AccountâPrivate/LocalAppropriation. . . .$718,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($40,708,000))Â Â Â Â Â $39,847,000The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(a) $1,200,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $1,200,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5358 (veterans' services). Of the amounts provided in this subsection:(i) $600,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $600,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for one veterans service officer each in Island county, Walla Walla county, Clallam county, and Stevens county.(b) $50,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $50,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely to contract with an organization located in Thurston county that has experience in the delivery of no-cost equine therapy for military veterans and active members of the military.(c) $138,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $135,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5268 (public works procurement).(d) $566,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute House Bill No. 2014 (definition of veteran). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2024, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.))(4) STATE VETERANS HOMES PROGRAMGeneral FundâState Appropriation (FY 2024). . . .$26,775,000General FundâState Appropriation (FY 2025). . . .(($19,507,000))Â Â Â Â Â $16,274,000General FundâFederal Appropriation. . . .(($136,196,000))Â Â Â Â Â $146,250,000General FundâPrivate/Local Appropriation. . . .(($11,982,000))Â Â Â Â Â $12,936,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($194,460,000))Â Â Â Â Â $202,235,000The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(a) $1,300,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation is provided solely for changes in federal resources as a result of potential census changes and use of these funds are contingent upon the department placing in unallotted status general fundâstate resources in an amount to be determined by the methodology utilized for census adjustments in the maintenance level budget. If the department receives additional unanticipated federal resources that are unrelated to the coronavirus response at any point during the remainder of the 2023-2025 fiscal biennium, an equal amount of general fundâstate must be placed in unallotted status so as not to exceed the total appropriation level specified in this subsection. The department may submit as part of the policy level budget submittal documentation required by RCW 43.88.030 a request to maintain the general fundâstate resources that were unallotted as required by this subsection.(b) Appropriations have been adjusted in this section to reflect anticipated changes in state, federal, and local resources as a result of census changes. The department shall incorporate these adjustments in the governor's projected maintenance level budget required in RCW 43.88.030.(5) CEMETERY SERVICESGeneral FundâState Appropriation (FY 2024). . . .$167,000General FundâState Appropriation (FY 2025). . . .$169,000General FundâFederal Appropriation. . . .$1,055,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$1,391,000Sec. 1220. 2024 c 376 s 222 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF HEALTHGeneral FundâState Appropriation (FY 2024). . . .$190,116,000General FundâState Appropriation (FY 2025). . . .(($184,729,000))Â Â Â Â Â $168,256,000General FundâFederal Appropriation. . . .(($589,612,000))Â Â Â Â Â $611,612,000General FundâPrivate/Local Appropriation. . . .(($189,255,000))Â Â Â Â Â $190,497,000Dedicated Cannabis AccountâState Appropriation(FY 2024). . . .$11,863,000Dedicated Cannabis AccountâState Appropriation(FY 2025). . . .$12,368,000Climate Commitment AccountâState Appropriation. . . .(($91,000,000))Â Â Â Â Â $89,822,000Climate Investment AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$902,000Foundational Public Health Services AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$23,066,000Hospital Data Collection AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$592,000Health Professions AccountâState Appropriation. . . .(($197,115,000))Â Â Â Â Â $197,015,000Aquatic Lands Enhancement AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$642,000Emergency Medical Services and Trauma Care SystemsTrust AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$10,175,000Medicaid Fraud Penalty AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$3,027,000Natural Climate Solutions AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$72,000Safe Drinking Water AccountâState Appropriation. . . .(($8,964,000))Â Â Â Â Â $10,801,000Drinking Water Assistance AccountâFederalAppropriation. . . .$25,901,000Waterworks Operator Certification AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$2,089,000Drinking Water Assistance Administrative AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$2,479,000Site Closure AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$197,000Biotoxin AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$1,772,000Model Toxics Control Operating AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$10,382,000Medical Test Site Licensure AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$5,238,000Secure Drug Take-Back Program AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$1,474,000Youth Tobacco and Vapor Products Prevention AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$3,272,000Public Health Supplemental AccountâPrivate/LocalAppropriation. . . .$4,117,000Accident AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$387,000Medical Aid AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$58,000Statewide 988 Behavioral Health Crisis Response LineAccountâState Appropriation. . . .(($55,066,000))Â Â Â Â Â $49,797,000Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery FundâFederalAppropriation. . . .$3,222,000Opioid Abatement Settlement AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$19,785,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($1,648,937,000))Â Â Â Â Â $1,650,996,000The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) The department of health shall not initiate any services that will require expenditure of state general fund moneys unless expressly authorized in this act or other law. The department of health and the state board of health shall not implement any new or amended rules pertaining to primary and secondary school facilities until the rules and a final cost estimate have been presented to the legislature, and the legislature has formally funded implementation of the rules through the omnibus appropriations act or by statute. The department may seek, receive, and spend, under RCW 43.79.260 through 43.79.282, federal moneys not anticipated in this act as long as the federal funding does not require expenditure of state moneys for the program in excess of amounts anticipated in this act. If the department receives unanticipated unrestricted federal moneys, those moneys shall be spent for services authorized in this act or in any other legislation that provides appropriation authority, and an equal amount of appropriated state moneys shall lapse. Upon the lapsing of any moneys under this subsection, the office of financial management shall notify the legislative fiscal committees. As used in this subsection, "unrestricted federal moneys" includes block grants and other funds that federal law does not require to be spent on specifically defined projects or matched on a formula basis by state funds.(2) During the 2023-2025 fiscal biennium, each person subject to RCW 43.70.110(3)(c) is required to pay only one surcharge of up to $25 annually for the purposes of RCW 43.70.112, regardless of how many professional licenses the person holds.(3) In accordance with RCW 43.70.110 and 71.24.037, the department is authorized to adopt license and certification fees in fiscal years 2024 and 2025 to support the costs of the regulatory program. The department's fee schedule shall have differential rates for providers with proof of accreditation from organizations that the department has determined to have substantially equivalent standards to those of the department, including but not limited to the joint commission on accreditation of health care organizations, the commission on accreditation of rehabilitation facilities, and the council on accreditation. To reflect the reduced costs associated with regulation of accredited programs, the department's fees for organizations with such proof of accreditation must reflect the lower costs of licensing for these programs than for other organizations which are not accredited.(4) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, and in accordance with RCW 70.41.100, the department shall set fees to include the full costs of the performance of inspections pursuant to RCW 70.41.080.(5) In accordance with RCW 43.70.110 and 71.24.037, the department is authorized to adopt fees for the review and approval of mental health and substance use disorder treatment programs in fiscal years 2024 and 2025 as necessary to support the costs of the regulatory program. The department's fee schedule must have differential rates for providers with proof of accreditation from organizations that the department has determined to have substantially equivalent standards to those of the department, including but not limited to the joint commission on accreditation of health care organizations, the commission on accreditation of rehabilitation facilities, and the council on accreditation. To reflect the reduced costs associated with regulation of accredited programs, the department's fees for organizations with such proof of accreditation must reflect the lower cost of licensing for these programs than for other organizations which are not accredited.(6) The health care authority, the health benefit exchange, the department of social and health services, the department of health, the department of corrections, and the department of children, youth, and families shall work together within existing resources to establish the health and human services enterprise coalition (the coalition). The coalition, led by the health care authority, must be a multi-organization collaborative that provides strategic direction and federal funding guidance for projects that have cross-organizational or enterprise impact, including information technology projects that affect organizations within the coalition. The office of the chief information officer shall maintain a statewide perspective when collaborating with the coalition to ensure that projects are planned for in a manner that ensures the efficient use of state resources, supports the adoption of a cohesive technology and data architecture, and maximizes federal financial participation. The work of the coalition and any project identified as a coalition project is subject to the conditions, limitations, and review provided in section 701 of this act.(7) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, and in accordance with RCW 43.70.110 and 71.12.470, the department shall set fees to include the full costs of the performance of inspections pursuant to RCW 71.12.485.(8) $492,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $492,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the department to coordinate with local health jurisdictions to establish and maintain comprehensive group B programs to ensure safe drinking water. These funds shall be used for implementation costs, including continued development and adoption of rules, policies, and procedures; technical assistance; and training.(9) $96,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $92,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for community outreach to prepare culturally and linguistically appropriate hepatitis B information in a digital format to be distributed to ethnic and cultural leaders and organizations to share with foreign-born and limited or non-English speaking community networks.(10) Within amounts appropriated in this section, the Washington board of nursing must hire sufficient staff to process applications for nursing licenses so that the time required for processing does not exceed seven days.(11) $725,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $1,225,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for the Washington poison center. This funding is provided in addition to funding pursuant to RCW 69.50.540.(12) $622,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024, (($622,000))$503,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $3,000,000 of the medicaid fraud penalty accountâstate appropriation are provided solely for the ongoing operations and maintenance of the prescription monitoring program maintained by the department.(13) $2,265,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $2,265,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for:(a) Staffing by the department, the department of veterans affairs, and the department of corrections to expand statewide suicide prevention efforts, which efforts include suicide prevention efforts for military service members and veterans and incarcerated persons;(b) A suicide prevention public awareness campaign to provide education regarding the signs of suicide, interventions, and resources for support;(c) Staffing for call centers to support the increased volume of calls to suicide hotlines;(d) Training for first responders to identify and respond to individuals experiencing suicidal ideation;(e) Support for tribal suicide prevention efforts;(f) Strengthening behavioral health and suicide prevention efforts in the agricultural sector;(g) Support for the three priority areas of the governor's challenge regarding identifying suicide risk among service members and their families, increasing the awareness of resources available to service members and their families, and lethal means safety planning;(h) Training for community health workers to include culturally informed training for suicide prevention;(i) Coordination with the office of the superintendent of public instruction; and(j) Support for the suicide prevention initiative housed in the University of Washington.(14) $4,500,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and (($4,600,000))$4,523,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the fruit and vegetable incentives program. Of the amounts provided in this subsection, $500,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $600,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are for the fruit and vegetable prescription program, which provides food as medicine to individuals experiencing food insecurity or are at high risk of developing a chronic health condition.(15) $627,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $627,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely to implement the recommendations from the community health workers task force to provide statewide leadership, training, and integration of community health workers with insurers, health care providers, and public health systems.(16) $3,000,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $3,000,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the Washington board of nursing to manage a grant process to incentivize nurses to supervise nursing students in health care settings. The goal of the grant program is to create more clinical placements for nursing students to complete required clinical hours to earn their nursing degree and related licensure.(17) $1,490,000 of the health professional services accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the Washington board of nursing to continue to implement virtual nursing assistant training and testing modalities, create an apprenticeship pathway into nursing for nursing assistants, implement rule changes to support a career path for nursing assistants, and collaborate with the workforce training and educational coordinating board on a pilot project to transform the culture and practice in long term care settings. The goal of these activities is to expand the nursing workforce for long term care settings.(18) $186,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and (($186,000))$100,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the department to test for lead in child care facilities to prevent child lead exposure and to research, identify, and connect facilities to financial resources available for remediation costs.(19) $814,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $814,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the department to provide grants to support school-based health centers and behavioral health services.(20) $1,300,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $1,300,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the department to coordinate and lead a multi-agency approach to youth suicide prevention and intervention.(21)(a) $486,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $85,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for maintenance of the community health worker platform and continued implementation of the community health worker trainings in the pediatric setting for children with behavioral health needs.(b) Of the amounts provided in this subsection for fiscal year 2024, $250,000 is provided solely for a grant to a pediatric organization to convene a learning collaborative to support community health workers to ensure their success while on the job with their multidisciplinary clinic teams and for the development of this new integrated health care worker field.(22) $1,390,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $1,378,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the child profile health promotion notification system.(23) (a) $10,250,000 of the opioid abatement settlement accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the department to expand the distribution of naloxone through the department's overdose education and naloxone distribution program. Funding must be prioritized to fill naloxone access gaps in community behavioral health and other community settings, including providing naloxone to first responders and agency staff in organizations such as syringe service programs, house providers, and street outreach programs.(b) Of the amounts provided in this subsection, $1,250,000 of the opioid abatement settlement accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the department to purchase a dedicated supply of naloxone for first responders across the state.(24) $2,000,000 of the opioid abatement settlement accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for prevention, treatment, and recovery support services to remediate the impacts of the opioid epidemic. This funding must be used consistent with conditions of the opioid settlement agreements that direct how funds deposited into the opioid abatement settlement account created in Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5293 must be used.(25) $400,000 of the opioid abatement settlement accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the completion of work identified in the state opioid response plan related to maternal and infant health.(26)(a) $10,000,000 of the climate commitment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely to support and administer a workplace health and safety program for workers who are affected by climate impacts, including but not limited to, extreme heat and cold, wildfire smoke, drought, and flooding. This program will focus on workplace health and safety for farmworkers, construction workers, and other workers who face the most risk from climate-related impacts. This amount shall be limited to supporting vulnerable populations in overburdened communities under the climate commitment act as defined in RCW 70A.65.010. Funding shall be provided for:(i) Pass through grants to community-based organizations, tribal governments, and tribal organizations to support workplace health and safety for workers who are burdened by the intersection of their work and climate impacts; and(ii) Procurement and distribution of equipment and resources for workers who are burdened by the intersection of their work and climate impacts directly by the department of health, or through pass-through grants to community-based organizations, tribal governments, and tribal organizations. Equipment and resources may include but are not limited to: Personal protective equipment, other protective or safety clothing for cold and heat, air purifiers for the workplace or worker housing, protection from ticks and mosquitoes, and heating and cooling devices.(b) The department of health, in consultation with the environmental justice council, community groups, and the department of labor and industries, shall evaluate mechanisms to provide workers with financial assistance to cover lost wages or other financial hardships caused by extreme weather events and climate threats.(c) No more than five percent of this funding may be used to administer this grant program.(27) $5,996,000 of the climate commitment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the department to implement the healthy environment for all act under chapter 70A.02 RCW, including additional staff and support for the environmental justice council and implementation of a community engagement plan.(28)(a) $26,355,000 of the climate commitment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the department to administer capacity grants to tribes and tribal organizations and to overburdened communities and vulnerable populations to provide guidance and input:(i) To agencies and to the environmental justice council on implementation of the healthy environment for all act; and(ii) To the department on updates to the environmental health disparities map.(b) At least 50 percent of the total amount distributed for capacity grants in this subsection must be reserved for grants to tribes and tribal organizations.(c) Funding provided in this subsection may be used for tribes and tribal organizations to hire staff or to contract with consultants to engage in updating the environmental health disparities map or on implementing the healthy environment for all act.(d) The department may use a reasonable amount of funding provided in this subsection to administer the grants.(29) $17,752,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 is provided solely to sustain information technology infrastructure, tools, and solutions developed to respond to the COVID-19 pandemic. The department shall submit a plan to the office of financial management by September 15, 2023, that identifies a new funding strategy to maintain these information technology investments within the department's existing state, local, and federal funding. Of this amount, a sufficient amount is appropriated for the department to create an implementation plan for real-time bed capacity and tracking for hospitals and skilled nursing facilities, excluding behavioral health hospitals and facilities. The department will provide the implementation plan and estimated cost for an information technology system and implementation costs to the office of financial management by September 15, 2023, for the bed capacity and tracking tool.(30) $18,700,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $1,300,000 of the coronavirus state fiscal recovery fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely to support COVID-19 public health and response activities. The department must continue to distribute COVID-19 testing supplies to agricultural workers and tribal governments. The department must submit a spending plan to the office of financial management for approval. These funds may only be allocated and expended after approval of the spending plan.(31) $7,657,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $7,853,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for programs and grants to maintain access to abortion care((. Of the amounts provided in this subsection:(a) $2,939,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $2,939,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for grants to providers of abortion care;(b) $368,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $364,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for outreach, patient navigation, staffing at the department, and training;(c) $4,100,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $4,300,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for grants to providers of abortion care who participate in the department's sexual and reproductive health program for workforce retention and recruitment initiatives to ensure continuity of services; and(d) $250,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $250,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for grants to providers of abortion care that participate in the department's sexual and reproductive health program for security investments)).(32) $285,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $295,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $214,000 of the general fundâprivate/local appropriation are provided solely for the behavioral health agency program for licensure and regulatory activities.(33) $104,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $104,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $42,000 of the health professions accountâstate appropriation are provided solely for the department to conduct credentialing and inspections under chapter 324, Laws of 2019 (behavioral health facilities).(34) $1,398,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $1,900,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the breast, cervical and colon screening program, comprehensive cancer community partnerships, and Washington state cancer registry.(35) $85,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 is provided solely for continued implementation of chapter 58, Laws of 2022 (cardiac & stroke response).(36) $671,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and (($329,000))$12,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the care-a-van mobile health program.(37) $702,000 of the climate investment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of chapter 316, Laws of 2021 (climate commitment act).(38) $200,000 of the climate investment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the environmental justice council to coordinate with the department of ecology on a process to track state agency expenditures from climate commitment act accounts, as described in section 302(13) of this act. Funding is for the following as they relate to development of the department of ecology process:(a) Public engagement with tribes and vulnerable populations within the boundaries of overburdened communities; and(b) Cost recovery or stipends for participants in the public process to reduce barriers to participation, as described in RCW 43.03.220.(39) $31,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $31,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for implementation of chapter 204, Laws of 2022 (truck drivers/restrooms).(40) $808,000 of the drinking water assistance administrative accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the water system consolidation grant program.(41) $1,044,000 of the safe drinking water accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the drinking water technical services program.(42) $288,000 of the secure drug take-back program accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of chapter 155, Laws of 2021 (drug take-back programs).(43) $7,146,000 of the drinking water assistance accountâfederal appropriation is provided solely for the office of drinking water to provide technical assistance, direct engineering support, and construction management to small water systems.(44) $381,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $607,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the early hearing detection, diagnosis, and intervention program.(45) $954,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 ((and $686,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are))is provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5263 (psilocybin).(46) $12,509,000 of the health professions accountâstate appropriation and $13,187,000 of the general fundâprivate/local appropriation are provided solely for the regulation of health professions.(47) $599,000 of the health professions accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for ongoing maintenance of the HEALWA web portal to provide access to health information for health care providers.(48) $1,359,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $680,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $680,000 of the general fundâprivate/local appropriation are provided solely for the department to perform investigations to address the backlog of hospital complaints.(49) $12,000 of the health professions accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of chapter 204, Laws of 2021 (international medical grads).(50) $634,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and (($350,000))$200,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the department to onboard systems to, and maintain, the master person index as part of the health and human services coalition master person index initiative, and funding for fiscal year 2024 is subject to the conditions, limitations, and review requirements of section 701 of this act.(51) $2,062,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and (($1,454,000))$1,127,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the department to complete upgrades to the medical cannabis authorization database to improve reporting functions and accessibility, and is subject to the conditions, limitations, and review requirements of section 701 of this act.(52) $1,865,000 of the medical test site licensure accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the medical test site regulatory program for inspections and other regulatory activities.(53) $2,276,000 of the health professions accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the Washington board of nursing for nursing licensure and other regulatory activities.(54) $813,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and (($811,000))$345,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the department to assist with access to safe drinking water for homes and businesses with individual wells or small water systems that are contaminated.(55) $146,000 of the model toxics control operating accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of chapter 264, Laws of 2022 (chemicals/consumer products).(56) $1,150,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $1,150,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the department to expand the birth equity project with the goal of reducing prenatal and perinatal health disparities.(57) $1,738,000 of the general fundâprivate/local appropriation is provided solely for implementation of chapter 115, Laws of 2020 (psychiatric patient safety).(58) $23,066,000 of the foundational public health services accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the department to maintain the RAINIER (reporting array for incident, noninfectious and infectious event response) suite, RHINO (rapid health information network) program, WAIIS (Washington immunization information system) system, and data exchange services.(59) $5,100,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024, (($7,355,000))$5,822,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $1,922,000 of the coronavirus state fiscal recovery fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely for operation of the statewide medical logistics center. Within these amounts, the department must coordinate with the department of social and health services to develop processes that will minimize the disposal and destruction of personal protective equipment and for interagency distribution of personal protective equipment.(60) $315,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $315,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the department to operate the universal development screening system.(61) $2,000,000 of the health professions accountâstate appropriation and $293,000 of the public health supplemental accountâstate appropriation are provided solely for the Washington medical commission for regulatory activities, administration, and addressing equity issues in processes and policies.(62) $250,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 is provided solely for the department, in collaboration with the Washington medical coordination center, to create an implementation plan for real-time bed capacity and tracking for hospitals. The department must provide the implementation plan and estimated costs for the bed capacity and tracing tool to the office of the governor and the office of financial management by September 1, 2024.(63) $48,000 of the model toxics control operating accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the Puget Sound clean air agency to coordinate meetings with local health jurisdictions in King, Pierce, Snohomish, and Kitsap counties to better understand air quality issues, align messaging, and facilitate delivery of ready-to-go air quality and health interventions. The amount provided in this subsection may be used for agency staff time, meetings and events, outreach materials, and tangible air quality and health interventions.(64) $150,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $150,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the midwifery licensure and regulatory program to supplement revenue from fees. The department shall charge no more than $525 annually for new or renewed licenses for the midwifery program.(65) $50,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 is provided solely for the office of radiation protection to conduct a review of the state's readiness for licensing fusion energy projects. The legislature intends for Washington to support the deployment of fusion energy projects and larger research facilities by taking a leading role in the licensing of future fusion power plants. The department, in consultation with relevant state-level regulatory agencies, must review and provide recommendations and costs estimates for the necessary staffing and technical resources to fulfill the state's registration, inspection, and licensure obligations. The department must report its findings and any recommendations to the governor and appropriate legislative committees by December 1, 2023.(66) $500,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 is provided solely for blood supply relief. The department must distribute this amount equally between the four largest nonprofit blood donation organizations operating in the state. The amounts distributed may be used only for activities to rebuild the state's blood supply, including increased staffing support for donation centers and mobile blood drives.(67) $2,500,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and (($3,000,000))$2,768,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for tobacco, vapor product, and nicotine control, cessation, treatment, and prevention, and other substance use prevention and education, with an emphasis on community-based strategies. These strategies must include programs that consider the disparate impacts of nicotine addiction on specific populations, including youth and racial or other disparities.(68) $500,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 is provided solely for an existing program that works with community members and partners to bridge health equity gaps to establish a pilot health care program in Pierce county to serve the unique needs of the African American community, including addressing diabetes, high blood pressure, low birth weight, and health care for preventable medical, dental, and behavioral health diagnoses.(69) $150,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and (($150,000))$87,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for a grant to Island county to contract for a study of cost-effective waste treatment solutions, as an alternative to septic and sewer, for unincorporated parts of Island county. The study must:(a) Identify any regulatory barriers to the use of alternative technology-based solutions;(b) Include an opportunity for review and consultation by the department; and(c) Include any recommendations from the department in the final report.(70) $2,656,000 of the general fundâprivate/local appropriation is provided solely for the department to provide cystic fibrosis DNA testing and to engage with a courier service to transport specimens to the public health laboratory.(71) $75,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $75,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely in support of the department's activities pursuant to chapter 226, Laws of 2016 (commonly known as the caregiver advise, record, enable act). This funding must be used to:(a) Create a communication campaign to notify hospitals across the state of available resources to support family caregivers;(b) Curate or create a set of online training videos on common caregiving tasks including, but not limited to, medication management, injections, nebulizers, wound care, and transfers; and(c) Provide information to patients and family caregivers upon admission.(72) $29,000 of the health professions accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Substitute House Bill No. 1275 (athletic trainers).(73) $126,000 of the health professions accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of House Bill No. 1001 (audiology & speech compact).(74) (($9,157,000))$8,557,000 of the statewide 988 behavioral health crisis response line accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 1134 (988 system).(75) $1,016,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024, (($453,000))$390,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025, $30,000 of the general fundâprivate/local appropriation, and $676,000 of the health professions accountâstate appropriation are provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute House Bill No. 1724 (behavioral health workforce).(76) $72,000 of the natural climate solutions accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 1170 (climate response strategy).(77) $418,000 of the model toxics control operating accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Substitute House Bill No. 1047 (cosmetic product chemicals).(78) $46,000 of the health professions accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Substitute House Bill No. 1466 (dental auxiliaries).(79) $12,000 of the health professions accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of House Bill No. 1287 (dental hygienists).(80) $136,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 and $193,000 of the health professions accountâstate appropriation are provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Substitute House Bill No. 1678 (dental therapists).(81) $158,000 of the health professions accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Substitute House Bill No. 1576 (dentist compact).(82) $4,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 and $700,000 of the health professions accountâstate appropriation are provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Substitute House Bill No. 1503 (health care licenses/info.).(83) $29,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $124,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for implementation of Substitute House Bill No. 1255 (health care prof. SUD prg.).(84) $48,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 1694 (home care workforce shortage).(85) $282,000 of the health professions accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute House Bill No. 1039 (intramuscular needling).(86) $1,892,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $2,895,000 of the general fundâprivate/local appropriation are provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5236 (hospital staffing standards).(87) $407,000 of the climate commitment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 1181 (climate change/planning).(88) $65,000 of the health professions accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Substitute House Bill No. 1073 (medical assistants).(89) $447,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and (($448,000))$375,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute House Bill No. 1452 (medical reserve corps).(90) (($195,000))$95,000 of the health professions accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Substitute House Bill No. 1069 (mental health counselor comp).(91) $158,000 of the health professions accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute House Bill No. 1009 (military spouse employment).(92) $165,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and (($400,000))$175,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for implementation of Substitute House Bill No. 1457 (motor carriers/restrooms).(93) $126,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024, (($202,000))$152,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $81,000 of the health professions accountâstate appropriation are provided solely for implementation of Substitute House Bill No. 1247 (music therapists).(94) $39,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and (($119,000))$69,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for implementation of Substitute House Bill No. 1271 (organ transport vehicles).(95) $627,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $761,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute House Bill No. 1470 (private detention facilities).(96) $97,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $27,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for implementation of House Bill No. 1230 (school websites/drug info.).(97) $77,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and (($76,000))$8,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute House Bill No. 1578 (wildland fire safety).(98) $2,773,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $3,273,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for grant funding and administrative costs for the school-based health center program established in chapter 68, Laws of 2021 (school-based health centers).(99) $250,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $250,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the department to contract with a community-based nonprofit organization located in the Yakima Valley to continue a Spanish-language public radio media campaign aimed at providing education on the COVID-19 pandemic through an outreach program. The goal of the radio media campaign is to reach residents considered "essential workers," including but not limited to farmworkers, and provide information on health and safety guidelines, promote vaccination events, and increase vaccine confidence. The nonprofit organization must coordinate with medical professionals and other stakeholders on the content of the radio media campaign. The department, in coordination with the nonprofit, must provide a preliminary report to the legislature no later than December 31, 2024. A final report to the legislature must be submitted no later than June 30, 2025. Both reports must include: (a) A description of the outreach program and its implementation; (b) the number of individuals reached through the outreach program; and (c) any relevant demographic data regarding those individuals.(100) $75,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $25,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the department to contract with an equity consultant to evaluate the effect of changes made by, and vulnerabilities in, Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5179 (death with dignity act). The consultant shall partner with interested parties, vulnerable populations, and communities of color to solicit feedback on barriers to accessing the provisions of the act, any unintended consequences, and any challenges and vulnerabilities in the provision of services under the act, recommendations on ways to improve data collection, and recommendations on additional measures to be reported to the department. The department must report the findings and recommendations to the legislature by June 30, 2025.(101) $350,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 is provided solely for a rural nursing workforce initiative to create a hub for students to remain in rural environments while working toward nursing credentials, including for program personnel, support, and a rural nursing needs assessment. Funding is provided to develop a program based on the rural nursing needs assessment.(102)(a) $1,393,000 of the climate commitment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for grants to King county to address the disproportionate rates of asthma among children who reside within 10 miles of the Seattle-Tacoma international airport.(b) Of the amount provided in this subsection, $971,000 is provided to increase access to community health worker asthma interventions.(c) Of the amount provided in this subsection, $412,000 is for an independent investigation of the added benefit of indoor air quality interventions, including high efficiency particulate air filters, on disparities in indoor air pollution.(d) Of the amount provided in this subsection, $10,000 is for a regional data analysis and surveillance of asthma diagnoses and hospitalizations in King county.(e) The county may contract with the University of Washington for the work described in (c) and (d) of this subsection.(103) $750,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $750,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely to continue the collaboration between the local public health jurisdiction, related accountable communities of health, and health care providers to reduce potentially preventable hospitalizations in Pierce county. This collaboration will build from the first three years of the project, planning to align care coordination efforts across health care systems and support the related accountable communities of health initiatives, including innovative, collaborative models of care. Strategies to reduce costly hospitalizations include the following: (a) Working with partners to prevent chronic disease; (b) improving heart failure rates; (c) incorporating community health workers as part of the health care team and improving care coordination; (d) supporting the COVID-19 response with improved access to immunizations; and (e) the use of community health workers to provide necessary resources to prevent hospitalization of people who are in isolation and quarantine. By December 15, 2024, the members of the collaboration shall report to the legislature regarding the effectiveness of each of the strategies identified in this subsection. In addition, the report shall describe the most significant challenges and make further recommendations for reducing costly hospitalizations.(104) $70,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $30,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the department to contract with a community-based organization to host a deliberative democratic processes workshop for the HEAL act interagency work group established under RCW 70A.02.110, then develop, in consultation with environmental justice council or its staff, best practices for how agencies can incorporate deliberative democratic processes into community engagement practices.(105) $1,305,000 of the climate commitment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the climate health adaptation initiative.(106) $65,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5179 (death with dignity act).(107) $604,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $552,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5582 (nurse supply).(108) $95,000 of the health professions accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5389 (optometry).(109) $1,205,000 of the health professions accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5499 (multistate nurse licensure).(110) $30,000 of the general fund stateâappropriation for fiscal year 2024, $25,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $52,000 of the health professions accountâstate appropriation are provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5547 (nursing pool transparency).(111) $32,000 of the general fundâprivate/local appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5569 (kidney disease centers).(112) $446,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $441,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5453 (female genital mutilation).(113) $466,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and (($487,000))$390,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5278 (home care aide certification).(114) $131,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and (($91,000))$24,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5523 (forensic pathologist).(115) $36,000 of the general fundâprivate/local appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5515 (child abuse and neglect).(116) $339,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and (($485,000))$335,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5555 (certified peer specialists).(117) $198,000 of the general fundâprivate/local appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5120 (crisis relief centers).(118) $125,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024, (($207,000))$157,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $133,000 of the health professions accountâstate appropriation are provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5189 (behavioral health support).(119) $150,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $150,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the department of health to provide grants to federally qualified health centers (FQHCs) for the purchase of long-acting reversible contraceptives (LARCs). For LARCs purchased with the funding provided in this subsection, FQHCs shall provide patients with LARCs the same day they are seeking that family planning option.(a) The department shall develop criteria for how the grant dollars will be distributed, including that FQHCs are required to participate in contraceptive training related to patient-centered care, shared decision making, and reproductive bias and coercion.(b) The department shall survey the FQHCs participating in the grant program regarding the use of LARCs by their patients, as compared to the two years prior to participation in the grant program, and report the results of the survey to the appropriate committees of the legislature by December 1, 2025.(120) $63,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 is provided solely for the department to utilize materials from the "count the kicks" program in designing, preparing, and making available online written materials to inform health care providers and staff of evidence-based research and practices that reduce the incident of stillbirth, by December 31, 2023.(121) $351,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $624,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the Snohomish county health department to convene a leadership planning group that will:(a) Conduct a landscape analysis of current sexually transmitted infection, postexposure prophylaxis, preexposure prophylaxis, and hepatitis B virus services and identify treatment improvements for HIV preexposure prophylaxis;(b) Establish sexually transmitted infection clinical services at the Snohomish county health department and identify opportunities to expand sexual health services provided outside of clinical settings;(c) Conduct research on opportunities to expand jail-based sexual health services;(d) Establish an epidemiology and technical team;(e) Expand field-based treatment for syphilis; and(f) Establish an in-house comprehensive, culturally responsive sexual health clinic at the Snohomish county health department.(122) $49,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $53,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 1216 (clean energy siting).(123) $5,496,000 of the climate commitment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the department to provide grants to school districts making updates to existing heating, venting, and air conditioning systems using small district modernization grants.(124) $38,600,000 of the climate commitment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the department to develop a grant program to fund projects that benefit overburdened communities as defined in RCW 70A.02.010(11). Of the amount provided in this subsection:(a) $6,000,000 of the climate commitment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the department and the environmental justice council created in RCW 70A.02.110 to engage in a participatory budgeting process with at least five geographically diverse overburdened communities, as identified by the department, to develop a process to select and fund projects that mitigate the disproportional impacts of climate change on overburdened communities. The process must allow for full community engagement and develop criteria for eligible entities and projects and establish priorities to achieve the greatest gain for decarbonization and resiliency. A report of the outcomes of the participatory budgeting process detailing its recommendations for funding as well as future improvements to the participatory budgeting process must be provided to the appropriate committees of the legislature by December 31, 2023.(b) $32,600,000 of the climate commitment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the department to provide grants that benefit overburdened communities. The department must submit to the governor and the legislature a ranked list of projects consistent with the recommendations developed in (a) of this subsection. The department shall not sign contracts or otherwise financially obligate funds under this section until the legislature has approved a specific list of projects.(125) $5,430,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and (($5,326,000))$5,225,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the department to maintain the current level of credentialing staff until the completion of the study on fees by Results WA.(126) $280,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $280,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the department to contract with the central nursing resource center established in RCW 18.79.202 to facilitate communication between nursing education programs and health care facilities that offer clinical placements for the purpose of increasing clinical education and practice experiences for nursing students. The department shall contract with the central nursing resource center to:(a) Gather data to assess current clinical placement practices, opportunities, and needs;(b) Identify all approved nursing education programs and health care facilities that offer clinical placement opportunities in the state;(c) Convene and facilitate quarterly stakeholder meetings between representatives from approved nursing education programs and health care facilities that offer clinical placement opportunities, and other relevant stakeholders, in order to:(i) Connect representatives by region;(ii) Facilitate discussions between representatives, by region, to determine:(A) Clinical placement barriers;(B) The number and types of clinical placement opportunities needed; and(C) The number and types of clinical placement opportunities available; and(iii) Develop strategies to resolve clinical placement barriers;(d) Provide a digital message board and communication platform representatives can use to maintain ongoing communication and clinical placement needs and opportunities;(e) Identify other policy options and recommendations to help increase the number of clinical placement opportunities, if possible; and(f) Submit a report of findings, progress, and recommendations to the governor and appropriate committees of the legislature by December 1, 2025.(127) $375,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $375,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the department of health to contract with an organization located in Thurston county that dedicates itself to the promotion of education, holistic health, and trauma healing in the African American community to provide behavioral health education, mental wellness training, evidence based health programs, events, and conferences to individuals, youth/adults, parents/parent partners, and families, that have suffered from generational and systemic racism. In conducting this work, the organization will engage diverse individuals in racial healing and reparative justice in the field of mental wellness. The organization will also prioritize mental health equity and reparative justice in their work to eradicate health disparities that African American communities have faced due to generational racism.(128) $250,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 is provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute House Bill No. 1745 (diversity in clinical trials).(129) $500,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for three full-time emergency medical technicians and other resources necessary for ((the)) Franklin county public ((health))hospital district #1 to provide health services as part of medical transport operations services, including services to the Coyote Ridge corrections center.(130) (($9,982,000))$1,338,000 of the statewide 988 behavioral health crisis response line accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the 988 technology platform implementation project as described in RCW 71.24.890(5)(a). This amount is subject to the conditions, limitations, and review requirements provided in section 701 of this act and any requirements as established in Senate Bill No. 6308 (extending timelines for implementation of the 988 system). The department must actively collaborate with consolidated technology services and the health care authority so that the statewide 988 technology solutions will be coordinated and interoperable.(131) $375,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $375,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely as pass-through funding to an organization that specializes in culturally relevant sports programs for indigenous children and adolescents, with the goal of keeping at-risk youth out of the juvenile justice system.(132)(a) $450,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for the department to contract with an independent third-party consultant to review the department's commercial shellfish regulatory program, including licensing, testing, and certification practices and requirements. The consultant must assess how the department sets commercial shellfish fees under RCW 43.70.250.(i) The consultant must seek input from the department, the commercial shellfish industry, and tribes and must consider:(A) Data sources and methods used by the department in setting or proposing increases to commercial shellfish fees;â¯(B) All costs associated with administering the department's regulatory authority over the testing of shellfish, the certification of operations and the issuance of licenses, and issuing export certificates for the commercial shellfish industry;(C) Activities conducted by the department related to regulating the shellfish industry's regulatory activities that should be exempt from inclusion in the fee; and(D) Relevant fees, methods, and considerations from other states that regulate the commercial shellfish industry under the Model Ordinance of the Interstate Shellfish Sanitation Conference for comparable services the department is providing the shellfish industry.(ii) The consultant must also evaluate the viability of the industry to support full cost recovery as required under RCW 43.70.250 and recommend strategies to address any shortfalls. The consultant shall submit a report to the governor and legislature by June 30, 2025.(b) Using the amounts provided in this subsection, the department shall also contract with a LEAN management consultant to review the shellfish licensing and certification program to identify program improvements and consider methods to offer data transparency to the industry and measures to potentially reduce program administration costs. The LEAN assessment must be completed and provided to the department by June 30, 2025.(c) The department shall not increase commercial shellfish fees under RCW 43.70.250 during fiscal year 2025.(133)(a) (($15,953,000))$10,902,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely to maintain public health information technology infrastructure in a cloud-based environment.(b) The department shall develop an initial plan to identify efficiencies in the cloud-based environment and submit it to the office of financial management and the office of the chief information officer by October 1, 2024. The plan should include, at a minimum, strategies to identify efficiencies within the cloud-based environment; new funding strategies for cloud technology for the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium budget; an update on the department's cloud road map that identifies key systems that will be modernized, consolidated, and migrated or implemented in the cloud; an overview of existing public health technology data systems in the cloud and data systems that are scheduled to transition to the cloud with an estimated implementation schedule, including a summary of data retention policies; and strategies to minimize cost increases where possible through efficient implementation strategies.(134) $1,000,000 of the model toxics control operating accountâstate appropriation is provided solely to implement actions provided in the nitrate water hazard mitigation plan to support safe drinking water in the lower Yakima valley. Implementation of this plan includes, but is not limited to, education and outreach, well testing, and provision of alternate water supplies. The department may contract with local governments, local health jurisdictions, and nonprofit organizations to administer the plan.(135) $120,000 of the climate commitment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Substitute House Bill No. 1924 (fusion technology policies). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2024, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.)) Funds provided in this subsection may not be expended or obligated prior to January 1, 2025. ((If Initiative Measure No. 2117 is approved in the general election, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse upon the effective date of the measure.))(136) $154,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 and $150,000 of the climate commitment accountâstate appropriation are provided solely to support health equity zones, as defined in RCW 43.70.595, in identification and implementation of targeted interventions to have a significant impact on health outcomes and health disparities. Use of the climate commitment accountâstate appropriation must be for permitted uses defined in RCW 70A.65.260. ((If Initiative Measure No. 2117 is approved in the 2024 general election, upon the effective date of the measure, funds from the consolidated climate account may not be used for the purposes of this subsection.))(137) (($135,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for the department to support the community hospital utilization and financial data reporting program. The department shall provide sufficient staff resources to ensure data quality, accurate reporting, timely collection of data elements, and analysis of community hospital utilization and financial data. This amount must supplement and not supplant existing funding provided for this program.(138))) $500,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for the department to conduct an analysis of the certificate of need program established under chapter 70.38 RCW and report its findings and recommendations for statutory updates to the governor and appropriate legislative committees by June 30, 2025. The department must, at a minimum, consider other state approaches to certificate of need, impacts on access to care, cost control of health services, and equity, and approaches to identifying health care service needs at the statewide and community levels.(((139)))(138) $40,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for the department to promote evidence-based breastfeeding guidelines for individuals with a substance use disorder or who receive medication-assisted treatment for a substance use disorder, and to adapt the guidelines for tribal communities.(((140)))(139) $700,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely as pass-through funding to a nonprofit organization located in the city of Seattle that specializes in resources and support for those impacted by cancer, including support groups, camps for kids impacted by cancer, and risk reduction education for teens.(((141) $196,000))(140) $117,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for community compensation stipends for low-income individuals who participate in priority engagements across the department.(((142)))(141)(a) $300,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for the department to provide grants to support community-based health assessments for overburdened or highly impacted communities, and to develop a process for a grant program for federally recognized tribes.(b) Of the amount provided in (a) of this subsection for fiscal year 2025:(i) $200,000 is provided solely for the department to leverage its existing health equity zone initiative to provide grants to overburdened or highly impacted communities to conduct community-based health assessments; and(ii) $100,000 is provided solely for the department to develop a process, in consultation with tribal governments, for a grant program for federally recognized tribes to conduct community-based health assessments.(((143)))(142) $3,172,000 of the health professions accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementing improvements to licensure processes. Improvements may include, but are not limited to, updating internal policies and procedures, creating web-based tutorials for applicants, updating existing web content for applicants, and researching the feasibility of live chat technology for applicants.(((144)))(143) $250,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for the department to pass-through to a nonprofit Washington-based organization with expertise in end-of-life care and in chapter 70.245 RCW (death with dignity act), to provide training, outreach, and education to medical professionals, hospice teams, and other Washingtonians, to support the provision of care under chapter 70.245 RCW.(((145) $168,000))(144) $116,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for the department to coordinate work related to dementia, including but not limited to:(a) Coordinating dementia-related activities with the department of social and health services, the health care authority, and other state agencies as needed;(b) Implementing recommendations from the dementia action collaborative in the updated state Alzheimer's plan within the department; and(c) Other dementia-related activities as determined by the secretary.(((146)))(145) $400,000 of the opioid abatement settlement accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the department to provide increased support for emergency medical services and fire departments in their opioid overdose prevention efforts, including naloxone leave-behind programs, overdose response communications, and staffing costs for community-based paramedics serving as navigators for education, resource, and follow-up supports.(((147)))(146) $56,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $1,107,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for additional staffing and contracted services for the health disparities council.(((148)))(147) $400,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for a grant to a community organization located in King county that specializes in building a health care workforce equipped to meet the needs of Black, people of color, indigenous, LGBTQIA+ and other marginalized communities and addressing identified gaps through recruitment and training initiatives and research. This funding will support the development and execution of recruitment strategies, human resources systems, and administrative systems that address health care workforce gaps of primary care and mental health providers.(((149)))(148) $83,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for the development of an in-home services road map to help individuals assess their in-home services needs and locate providers to serve those needs in their communities. The department must work in consultation with appropriate stakeholders, including but not limited to the department of social and health services. The department must complete the document and make hard copies available for distribution no later than June 30, 2025.(((150)))(149)(a) $300,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for the department to collaborate with the department of commerce to assess the need for and feasibility of a statewide low-income assistance program for water utility customers. The study must include, but is not limited to:(i) A summary of existing local, state, and federal low-income assistance;(ii) A review of low-income populations' water utility service cost burden; and(iii) Recommendations for the design of a statewide drinking water and wastewater utility assistance program, which must include:(A) Ongoing data collection on water-related assistance need of households;(B) Intake coordination and data sharing across statewide programs serving low-income households;(C) Program eligibility;(D) Multilingual services;(E) Outreach and community engagement;(F) Program administration;(G) Funding; and(H) Reporting.(b) Before commencing the study, the department of health and the department of commerce must convene a stakeholder group to advise the agencies throughout the study. The stakeholder group must include representatives from the governor's office, low-income advocates, wastewater system operators, drinking water system operators, and other interested parties.(c) By June 30, 2025, the department must submit the study to the appropriate committees of the legislature.(((151)))(150) $2,000,000 of the opioid abatement settlement accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the department to administer grants to local health jurisdictions for opioid and fentanyl awareness, prevention, and education campaigns.(((152)))(151)(a) $750,000 of the opioid abatement settlement accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the department to contract with the Tacoma-Pierce county health department to develop a comprehensive model toolkit that includes prevention, education, awareness, and policy strategies to address local opioid and fentanyl crisis response needs.(b) The elements of the toolkit must:(i) Be based upon evidence-based research;(ii) Include community or participatory approaches and policy, systems, and environment strategies; and(iii) Be in alignment with the state opioid response plan.(((153) $400,000))(152) $341,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for the department to support local health jurisdictions, community-based organizations, and tribes in opioid-related harm reduction, care linkage, and prevention work.(((154)))(153)(a) $745,000 of the opioid abatement settlement accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the purchase of naloxone and fentanyl test strips, for distribution to high schools and public institutions of higher education.(b) Of the amount provided in this subsection, $345,000 of the opioid abatement settlement accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the department for the purchase and distribution of naloxone administered by nasal inhalation for barrier-free and cost-free distribution to high school students. The department shall utilize and expand, as necessary, its existing bulk purchasing and distribution arrangements with educational service districts, which shall distribute further to high schools.(i) The department shall enter into agreements with educational service districts and school districts to prioritize distribution to high school juniors and seniors.(ii) The naloxone must be made available to students via health offices or vending or other machines, to promote confidence that a student may bring naloxone home, to provide anonymity for access, and to prevent any tracking of which students obtain naloxone.(iii) Information on how naloxone is administered and how to recognize an opioid overdose must be made available to all students.(iv) The department may prioritize distribution to districts and schools with a higher prevalence of opioid use and overdoses, based on data, including the healthy youth survey.(c) Of the amount provided in this subsection, $400,000 of the opioid abatement settlement accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the department for the purchase of naloxone administered by nasal inhalation and fentanyl test strips for barrier-free and cost-free distribution to students at public institutions of higher education, with the goal of distributing naloxone kits to five percent of enrolled students.(((155)))(154) $133,000 of the opioid abatement settlement accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the department to maintain a supply of naloxone in public libraries for emergency response. This funding may be used:(a) To supply naloxone directly to libraries; or(b) As pass-through grants to libraries, for:(i) The development of partnerships with local public health agencies or other governmental entities;(ii) Purchases, delivery, and replacements of naloxone supply;(iii) Training employees; or(iv) Other activities and items that would ensure the availability of naloxone in the library.(((156) $154,000))(155) $86,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for staffing to support a new office of tribal policy at the department.(((157) $4,000,000))(156) $1,105,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for the department for enhanced opioid and fentanyl data dashboards and data systems, to provide a centralized place for local data gathering efforts to be collected, analyzed, and used in larger collaborative efforts. The data dashboards and systems must support use by state, local, public, and private partners in making strategic decisions on program implementation, emergency response, and regional coordination. Examples of data that may be better collected and used include public naloxone access, naloxone use data, mapping for overdoses, and related public health trends. The data dashboards and systems may include a data collection, evaluation, and usage plan for the state opioid and overdose response plan.(((158) $1,500,000))(157) $1,450,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for the department to stabilize and expand community-based harm reduction programs that provide evidence-based interventions, care navigation, and services, such as prevention of bloodborne infections, increasing naloxone access, and connecting people to resources and services.(((159)))(158)(a) $750,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely to review and update the rules for school environmental health and safety. The state board of health and the department shall conduct the review in collaboration with a multi-disciplinary technical advisory committee. The proposed new rules shall establish the minimum statewide health and safety standards for schools. The state board of health shall consider the size of school districts, regional cost differences, the age of the schools, the feasibility of implementing the proposed rules by section or subject area, and any other variables that may affect the implementation of the rules. In developing proposed rules, the state board of health shall:(i) Convene and consult with an advisory committee consisting of, at minimum, representatives from:(A) The office of the superintendent of public instruction;(B) Small and large school districts;(C) The Washington association of school administrators;(D) The Washington state school directors' association;(E) The Washington association of maintenance and operations administrators; and(F) The Washington association of school business officials;(ii) After the development of the draft rules, the state board of health shall meet at least one time with the advisory committee and provide the opportunity for the advisory committee to comment on the draft rules;(iii) Collaborate with the office of the superintendent of public instruction and develop a fiscal analysis regarding proposed rules that considers the size of school districts, regional cost differences, the age of the schools, range of costs for implementing the proposed rules by section or subject area, and any other variables that may affect costs as identified by the advisory committee; and(iv) Assist the department in completing environmental justice assessments on any proposed rules.(b) The office of the superintendent of public instruction, the department, the state board of health, the advisory committee, and local health jurisdictions shall work collaboratively to develop and provide a report to the office of the governor and appropriate committees of the legislature by June 30, 2025, detailing prioritized sections or subject areas of the proposed rules that will provide the greatest health and safety benefits for students, the order in which they should be implemented, and any additional recommendations for implementation.(((160)))(159) $100,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for the department as pass-through funding for an organization in Pierce county with expertise in dispute resolution to convene a work group on oral health equity. The work group:(a) Must include representatives from community-based organizations, dental providers, medical providers, federally qualified health centers, tribal dental clinics, oral health foundations, and public health and water systems;(b) Shall review the findings from the department's oral health equity assessment, identify the communities in Washington experiencing the greatest oral health disparities, identify communities that should be prioritized for outreach and community water fluoridation efforts, and develop recommendations for how to partner with communities to address oral health disparities and provide education about community water fluoridation and other oral health measures;(c) May convene its meetings virtually or by telephone; and(d) Shall report its findings and recommendations to the legislature by June 30, 2025.(((161)))(160) $426,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for two new area health education centers to recruit, train, and retain health care professionals in rural and underserved areas.(((162)))(161) $428,000 of the model toxics control operating accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for continued implementation of chapter 156, Laws of 2021 (ESHB 1184) (risk-based water standards), to create standards for developers seeking to reuse wastewater in buildings.(((163)))(162) $29,000 of the health professions accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of House Bill No. 2416 (ARNP legal title). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2024, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.(164) $719,000))(163) $384,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for the department to establish a statewide registry that stores and digitally reproduces portable orders for life sustaining treatment (POLST) forms. In establishing the registry, to the extent practicable, the department shall leverage and build upon any previous work at the department to establish a similar registry.(((165) $194,000))(164) $67,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 and $94,000 of the health professions accountâstate appropriation are provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 2247 (behavioral health providers). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2024, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.(166)))(165) $49,000 of the health professions accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Senate Bill No. 5184 (anesthesiologist assistants). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2024, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.(167)))(166) $134,000 of the general fundâprivate/local appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5853 (behav crisis services/minors). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2024, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.(168)))(167) $200,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute House Bill No. 2320 (high THC cannabis products). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2024, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.(169)))(168) $161,000 of the general fundâprivate/local appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Substitute House Bill No. 2295 (hospital at-home service). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2024, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.(170)))(169) $53,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for implementation of Substitute House Bill No. 2075 (Indian health care providers). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2024, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.(171)))(170) $114,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5829 (congenital cytomegalovirus). The amount provided is for the department to develop, translate, and distribute educational materials regarding congenital cytomegalovirus. ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2024, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.(172)))(171) $95,000 of the health professions accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Substitute House Bill No. 2355 (MRI technologists). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2024, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.(173)))(172) $5,000 of the health professions accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of House Bill No. 1917 (physician assistant compact). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2024, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.(174)))(173) $68,000 of the health professions accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Substitute House Bill No. 2041 (physician assistant practice). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2024, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.(175)))(174) $22,000 of the health professions accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of House Bill No. 1972 (physician health prg. fees). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2024, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.(176)))(175) $29,000 of the general fundâprivate/local appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5920 (psychiatric/cert. of need). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2024, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.(177)))(176) $100,000 of the opioid abatement settlement accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Substitute House Bill No. 2396 (synthetic opioids). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2024, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.(178)))(177) $59,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5271 (DOH facilities/enforcement). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2024, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.(179) $2,219,000))(178) $1,145,000 of the statewide 988 behavioral health crisis response line accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 6251 (behavioral crisis coord.). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2024, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.(180)))(179) $162,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 6286 (nurse anesthetist workforce). The amount provided is for the department to provide grants to certified registered nurse anesthetists that precept nurse anesthesia residents. ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2024, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.(181)))(180) $49,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5986 (out-of-network health costs). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2024, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.(182)))(181) $175,000 of the health professions accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 6228 (substance use treatment). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2024, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.(183)))(182) $29,000 of the health professions accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5983 (syphilis treatment). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2024, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.(184)))(183) $2,623,000 of the opioid abatement settlement accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Senate Bill No. 5906 (drug overdose prevention) or Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 1956 (substance use prevention ed). The amount provided is for implementation of a drug overdose prevention campaign for youth and adults. ((If neither bill is enacted by June 30, 2024, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.(185)))(184) $384,000 of the opioid abatement settlement accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 6109 (children and families). Of the amount provided in this subsection, $359,000 of the opioid abatement settlement accountâstate appropriation is for two full-time equivalent staff to provide health education to the Latinx community. ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2024, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.(186) $972,000))(185) $111,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5937 (crime victims/witnesses). The amount provided is for creation of the statewide forensic nurse coordination program. ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2024, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.(187)))(186) $10,000 of the general fundâprivate/local appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 6127 (HIV prophylaxis). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2024, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.(188)))(187) $29,000 of the health professions accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5940 (medical assistant-EMT cert.). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2024, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.(189)))(188) $215,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for implementation of Senate Bill No. 6234 (newborn screening for BCKDK). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2024, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.))(189) $2,051,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for the healthcare enforcement and licensing management solution (HELMS) and is subject to the conditions, limitations, and review requirements of section 701 of this act.(190) $700,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for the Washington medical coordination center operating costs.(191) $268,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for the safe medication return program operating costs.Sec. 1221. 2024 c 376 s 223 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS(1)(a) The health care authority, the health benefit exchange, the department of social and health services, the department of health, the department of corrections, and the department of children, youth, and families shall work together within existing resources to establish the health and human services enterprise coalition (the coalition). The coalition, led by the health care authority, must be a multiorganization collaborative that provides strategic direction and federal funding guidance for projects that have cross-organizational or enterprise impact, including information technology projects that affect organizations within the coalition. The office of the chief information officer shall maintain a statewide perspective when collaborating with the coalition to ensure that the development of projects identified in this report are planned for in a manner that ensures the efficient use of state resources and maximizes federal financial participation. The work of the coalition and any project identified as a coalition project is subject to the conditions, limitations, and review provided in section 701 of this act.(b) The appropriations to the department of corrections in this act shall be expended for the programs and in the amounts specified in this act. However, after May 1, ((2024))2025, after approval by the director of financial management and unless specifically prohibited by this act, the department may transfer general fundâstate appropriations for fiscal year ((2024))2025 between programs. The department may not transfer funds, and the director of financial management may not approve the transfer, unless the transfer is consistent with the objective of conserving, to the maximum extent possible, the expenditure of state funds. The director of financial management shall notify the appropriate fiscal committees of the legislature in writing seven days prior to approving any deviations from appropriation levels. The written notification must include a narrative explanation and justification of the changes, along with expenditures and allotments by budget unit and appropriation, both before and after any allotment modifications or transfers.(c) Within existing resources, and based on the budget structure changes in policy transfers included in the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium omnibus operating appropriations act, chapter . . ., Laws of 2025 (Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5167), the department of corrections must:(i) Provide a narrative description of change to include how this change will affect the availability and understanding of budget and accounting information for policy makers and the public;(ii) Provide a crosswalk that displays details within the affected programs in the existing structure compared to the proposed structure;(iii) Provide a comparison of the current structure to the proposed structure that must compare the current total estimated biennial expenditures and FTEs for all programs, before and after the proposed changes; and(iv) Complete and submit a 10-year restructure of historical data.(((1)))(2) ADMINISTRATION AND SUPPORT SERVICESGeneral FundâState Appropriation (FY 2024). . . .$100,954,000General FundâState Appropriation (FY 2025). . . .(($101,900,000))Â Â Â Â Â $103,359,000General FundâFederal Appropriation. . . .(($400,000))Â Â Â Â Â $838,000General FundâPrivate/Local Appropriation. . . .$168,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($203,422,000))Â Â Â Â Â $205,319,000The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(a) $1,959,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and (($169,000))$1,001,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely to acquire and implement a sentencing calculation module for the offender management network information system and is subject to the conditions, limitations, and review requirements of section 701 of this act. This project must use one discrete organizational index across all department of corrections programs. Implementation of this sentencing calculation module must result in a reduction of tolling staff within six months of the project implementation date and the department must report this result. In addition, the report must include the budgeted and actual tolling staffing levels by fiscal month beginning with fiscal year 2023 and the count of tolling staff reduced by fiscal month from date of implementation through six months post implementation. The report must be submitted to the senate ways and means and house appropriations committees within 30 calendar days after six months post implementation.(b) $445,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and (($452,000))$292,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for restrictive housing to reduce the use of solitary confinement by increasing correctional staffing, incorporating mental health training, and implementing change to restrictive housing environments.(c) $932,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and (($434,000))$934,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the amend collaboration and training statewide program administration team.(d) $2,056,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $2,297,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for reentry investments to include reentry and discharge services and staffing to support the iCOACH supervision model. The staffing and resources must provide expanded reentry and discharge services to include, but not limited to, transition services, preemployment testing, enhanced discharge planning, housing voucher assistance, cognitive behavioral interventions, educational programming, health care discharge teams, and community partnership programs.(e) $127,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 is provided solely for chapter 160, Laws of 2022 (body scanners).(f) $127,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for the department to operate body scanner programs to conduct security screenings for employees, contractors, visitors, volunteers, incarcerated individuals, and other persons entering the secure perimeters at the Washington corrections center for women and the Washington corrections center.(g) $2,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5891 (school bus trespass). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2024, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.))(h) $3,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5917 (bias-motivated defacement). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2024, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.))(i) $15,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 6146 (tribal warrants). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2024, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.))(j) $23,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute House Bill No. 2084 (construction training/DOC) for data collection and tracking of employment outcomes. ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2024, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.))(k) $500,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for the amend (Washington way program) contract and the collaboration and training program.(l) $129,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for the staffing and operational costs to operate the sixth avenue reentry center in Tacoma as a state-run facility.(((2)))(3) CORRECTIONAL OPERATIONSGeneral FundâState Appropriation (FY 2024). . . .(($481,053,000))Â Â Â Â Â $480,993,000General FundâState Appropriation (FY 2025). . . .(($766,351,000))Â Â Â Â Â $565,101,000General FundâFederal Appropriation. . . .$4,326,000General FundâPrivate/Local Appropriation. . . .$334,000Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery FundâFederalAppropriation. . . .(($262,300,000))Â Â Â Â Â $486,137,000Opioid Abatement Settlement AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$217,000Washington Auto Theft Prevention Authority AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$4,837,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($1,519,418,000))Â Â Â Â Â $1,541,945,000The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(a) The department may contract for local jail beds statewide to the extent that it is at no net cost to the department. The department shall calculate and report the average cost per offender per day, inclusive of all services, on an annual basis for a facility that is representative of average medium or lower offender costs. The department shall not pay a rate greater than $85 per day per offender excluding the costs of department of corrections provided services, including evidence-based substance abuse programming, dedicated department of corrections classification staff on-site for individualized case management, transportation of offenders to and from department of corrections facilities, and gender responsive training for jail staff. The capacity provided at local correctional facilities must be for offenders whom the department of corrections defines as close medium or lower security offenders. Programming provided for offenders held in local jurisdictions is included in the rate, and details regarding the type and amount of programming, and any conditions regarding transferring offenders must be negotiated with the department as part of any contract. Local jurisdictions must provide health care to offenders that meets standards set by the department. The local jail must provide all medical care including unexpected emergent care. The department must utilize a screening process to ensure that offenders with existing extraordinary medical/mental health needs are not transferred to local jail facilities. If extraordinary medical conditions develop for an inmate while at a jail facility, the jail may transfer the offender back to the department, subject to terms of the negotiated agreement. Health care costs incurred prior to transfer are the responsibility of the jail.(b) $671,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 is provided solely for the department to maintain the facility, property, and assets at the institution formerly known as the maple lane school in Rochester.(c) $4,270,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and (($422,000))$1,883,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely to acquire and implement a sentencing calculation module for the offender management network information system and is subject to the conditions, limitations, and review requirements of section 701 of this act. This project must use one discrete organizational index across all department of corrections programs. Implementation of this sentencing calculation module must result in a reduction of tolling staff within six months of the project implementation date and the department must report this result. In addition, the report must include the budgeted and actual tolling staffing levels by fiscal month beginning with fiscal year 2023 and the count of tolling staff reduced by fiscal month from date of implementation through six months post implementation. The report must be submitted to the senate ways and means and house appropriations committees within 30 calendar days after six months post implementation.(d) Within the appropriated amounts in this subsection, the department of corrections must provide a minimum of one dedicated prison rape elimination act compliance specialist at each institution.(e) $300,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $320,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for continuing two contracted parent navigator positions. One parent navigator must be located at the Washington correction center for women and one parent navigator position must be located at the Airway Heights corrections center or another state correctional facility that houses incarcerated male individuals and is selected by the department of corrections as a more suitable fit for a parent navigator. The parent navigators must have lived experience in navigating the child welfare system. The parent navigators must provide guidance and support to incarcerated individuals towards family reunification including, but not limited to, how to access services, navigating the court system, assisting with guardianship arrangements, and facilitating visitation with their children. The goal of the parent navigator program is to assist incarcerated parents involved in dependency or child welfare cases to maintain connections with their children and to assist these individuals in successfully transitioning and reuniting with their families upon release from incarceration. As part of the parent navigation program, the department of corrections must also review and provide a report to the legislature on the effectiveness of the program that includes the number of incarcerated individuals that received assistance from the parent navigators and the type of assistance the incarcerated individuals received, and that tracks the outcome of the parenting navigator program. A final report must be submitted to the legislature by September 1, 2024. Of the amounts provided in this subsection, $20,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 is provided solely for the department's review and report on the effectiveness of the parent navigator program.(f) $4,504,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and (($5,417,000))$5,577,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for restrictive housing to reduce the use of solitary confinement by increasing correctional staffing, incorporating mental health training, and implementing change to restrictive housing environments.(g) $579,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $2,058,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the amend collaboration and training program.(h) $1,294,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $1,294,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for reentry investments to include reentry and discharge services and staffing to support the iCOACH supervision model. The staffing and resources must provide expanded reentry and discharge services to include, but not limited to, transition services, preemployment testing, enhanced discharge planning, housing voucher assistance, cognitive behavioral interventions, educational programming, health care discharge teams, and community partnership programs.(i) $250,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 is provided solely for implementation of Senate Bill No. 5131 (commissary funds).(j) $1,839,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $1,839,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5134 (reentry services & supports) to increase gate money from $40 to $300 at release.(k) $2,871,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 is provided solely for chapter 160, Laws of 2022 (body scanners).(l) $586,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $576,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for a planning and development manager and an executive secretary in the women's prison division.(m) $1,817,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $3,627,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the department to provide specialized gender-affirming services, including medical and mental health services, to transgender incarcerated individuals in a manner that is consistent with the October 2023 settlement agreement in Disability Rights Washington v. Washington Department of Corrections, United States district court for the western district of Washington.(n) $3,500,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $3,500,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the department of corrections to provide wages and gratuities of no less than $1.00 per hour to incarcerated persons working in class III correctional industries.(o) $2,039,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $1,423,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the department to maintain the facility, property, and assets at the Larch corrections center in Yacolt.(p) $6,050,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 is provided solely for operational costs incurred by the department in closing the Larch corrections center in Yacolt.(q) $1,684,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $5,051,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the department to reopen and operate living unit G at the Washington state penitentiary in Walla Walla.(r) $1,377,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $3,304,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the department to reopen and operate living units G and H at the Clallam Bay corrections center in Clallam Bay.(s) $1,209,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $2,074,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the department to reopen and operate living unit F at the coyote ridge corrections center in Connell.(t) $858,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and (($192,000))$142,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for a mobile dental unit vehicle and staffing that will provide dental services to each of the stand-alone minimum camps for the department.(u) $1,839,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $1,839,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided for direct variable costs for incarcerated individuals.(((w)))(v) $2,871,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for the department to operate body scanner programs to conduct security screenings for employees, contractors, visitors, volunteers, incarcerated individuals, and other persons entering the secure perimeters at the Washington corrections center for women and the Washington corrections center.(((x)))(w) $117,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 2099 (state custody/ID cards) for identification cards. ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2024, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.(y)))(x) $155,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for implementation of Substitute House Bill No. 2048 (domestic violence/sentencing). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2024, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.(3)))(4) COMMUNITY SUPERVISIONGeneral FundâState Appropriation (FY 2024). . . .$252,551,000General FundâState Appropriation (FY 2025). . . .(($259,315,000))Â Â Â Â Â $215,202,000General FundâFederal Appropriation. . . .$4,142,000General FundâPrivate/Local Appropriation. . . .$10,000Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery FundâFederalAppropriation. . . .$45,251,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($516,018,000))Â Â Â Â Â $517,156,000The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(a) The department of corrections shall contract with local and tribal governments for jail capacity to house offenders who violate the terms of their community supervision. A contract rate increase may not exceed five percent each year. The department may negotiate to include medical care of offenders in the contract rate if medical payments conform to the department's offender health plan and pharmacy formulary, and all off-site medical expenses are preapproved by department utilization management staff. If medical care of offender is included in the contract rate, the contract rate may exceed five percent to include the cost of that service. Beginning July 1, 2024, the department shall pay the bed rate for the day of release.(b) The department shall engage in ongoing mitigation strategies to reduce the costs associated with community supervision violators, including improvements in data collection and reporting and alternatives to short-term confinement for low-level violators.(c) $2,880,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and (($253,000))$1,249,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely to acquire and implement a sentencing calculation module for the offender management network information system and is subject to the conditions, limitations, and review requirements of section 701 of this act. This project must use one discrete organizational index across all department of corrections programs. Implementation of this sentencing calculation module must result in a reduction of tolling staff within six months of the project implementation date and the department must report this result. In addition, the report must include the budgeted and actual tolling staffing levels by fiscal month beginning with fiscal year 2023 and the count of tolling staff reduced by fiscal month from date of implementation through six months post implementation. The report must be submitted to the senate ways and means and house appropriations committees within 30 calendar days after six months post implementation.(d) $110,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for the amend collaboration and training program.(e) $1,409,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $1,386,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for staffing and operational costs to operate the Bellingham reentry center as a state-run facility.(f) $615,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $1,320,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for staffing and operational costs to operate the Helen B. Ratcliff reentry center as a state-run facility.(g) $18,813,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $19,027,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for reentry investments to include reentry and discharge services and staffing to support the iCOACH supervision model. The staffing and resources must provide expanded reentry and discharge services to include, but not limited to, transition services, preemployment testing, enhanced discharge planning, housing voucher assistance, cognitive behavioral interventions, educational programming, health care discharge teams, and community partnership programs.(h) $400,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $400,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for a jail medical bed rate adjustment.(i) $90,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 6146 (tribal warrants) for data tracking, documentation, and reporting on outcomes of warrants and detainers. ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2024, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.))(j) $270,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely to contract with a third-party expert to examine jail rates needed by local governments to recover the cost of housing individuals under the jurisdiction of the Washington state department of corrections who have violated the conditions of their court community supervision order. The analysis must examine the availability of specialized jail beds for medical and behavioral health care that include services such as acute mental health care, detoxification, medications for opioid use disorder, and other substance use disorder treatment. The study must also include an analysis of costs to expand access to specialized jail beds statewide while maximizing medicaid coverage under Washington's section 1115 medicaid transformation waiver. The analysis must include a recommended methodology, to include detailed fiscal backup materials in Excel, to update daily jail bed rates going forward. A report is due to the governor and appropriate policy and fiscal committees of the legislature by October 1, 2024.(k) $331,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for the staffing and operational costs to operate the sixth avenue reentry center in Tacoma as a state-run facility.(((4)))(5) CORRECTIONAL INDUSTRIESGeneral FundâState Appropriation (FY 2024). . . .$9,348,000General FundâState Appropriation (FY 2025). . . .(($9,100,000))Â Â Â Â Â $11,680,000General FundâFederal Appropriation. . . .$600,000General FundâPrivate/Local Appropriation. . . .$2,634,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($21,682,000))Â Â Â Â Â $24,262,000(((5)))(6) INTERAGENCY PAYMENTSGeneral FundâState Appropriation (FY 2024). . . .$67,877,000General FundâState Appropriation (FY 2025). . . .(($79,185,000))Â Â Â Â Â $79,199,000Opioid Abatement Settlement AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$25,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($147,087,000))Â Â Â Â Â $147,101,000The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(a) $19,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $19,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5502 (sub. use disorder treatment).(b) $36,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 is provided solely for chapter 160, Laws of 2022 (body scanners).(c) $3,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 6146 (tribal warrants). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2024, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.))(d) $36,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for the department to operate body scanner programs to conduct security screenings for employees, contractors, visitors, volunteers, incarcerated individuals, and other persons entering the secure perimeters at the Washington corrections center for women and the Washington corrections center.(e) $24,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for the staffing and operational costs to operate the sixth avenue reentry center in Tacoma as a state-run facility.(((6)))(7) OFFENDER CHANGEGeneral FundâState Appropriation (FY 2024). . . .$85,926,000General FundâState Appropriation (FY 2025). . . .(($90,206,000))Â Â Â Â Â $85,580,000General FundâFederal Appropriation. . . .$1,436,000Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery FundâFederalAppropriation. . . .$4,212,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($177,568,000))Â Â Â Â Â $177,154,000The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(a) The department of corrections shall use funds appropriated in this subsection (((6)))(7) for programming for incarcerated individuals. The department shall develop and implement a written comprehensive plan for programming for incarcerated individuals that prioritizes programs which follow the risk-needs-responsivity model, are evidence-based, and have measurable outcomes. The department is authorized to discontinue ineffective programs and to repurpose underspent funds according to the priorities in the written plan.(b) The department of corrections shall collaborate with the state health care authority to explore ways to utilize federal medicaid funds as a match to fund residential substance use disorder treatment-based alternative beds under RCW 9.94A.664 under the drug offender sentencing alternative program and residential substance use disorder treatment beds that serve individuals on community custody.(c) Within existing resources, the department of corrections may provide reentry support items such as disposable cell phones, prepaid phone cards, hygiene kits, housing vouchers, and release medications associated with individuals resentenced or ordered released from confinement as a result of policies or court decisions including, but not limited to, the State v. Blake decision.(d) $11,454,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $11,728,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for expanded reentry investments to include, but not be limited to, transition services, preemployment testing, enhanced discharge planning, housing voucher assistance, cognitive behavioral interventions, educational programming, health care discharge teams, and community partnership programs.(e) $1,177,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $1,154,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5502 (sub. use disorder treatment) for dedicated staffing for substance use disorder assessments and for coordinated treatment care in the community at release.(f) $150,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 is provided solely for a grant to a nonprofit organization to assist fathers transitioning from incarceration to community and family reunification. The grant recipient must have experience contracting with the department of corrections to support incarcerated individual betterment projects and contracting with the department of social and health services to provide access and visitation services.(g) $424,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 is provided solely for chapter 160, Laws of 2022 (body scanners).(h) $424,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for the department to operate body scanner programs to conduct security screenings for employees, contractors, visitors, volunteers, incarcerated individuals, and other persons entering the secure perimeters at the Washington corrections center for women and the Washington corrections center.(i) $122,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for work on reentry 2030, continued internal and cross agency reentry collaboration, and work on the state's medicaid 1115 transformation waiver impacts to the department. By October 1, 2024, the department must report to fiscal committees of the legislature:(i) The total spend in fiscal years 2022 and 2023 for authorized prerelease services under the medicaid 1115 transformation waiver, including but not limited to medications, laboratory services, and radiology; and(ii) How much of each qualifying service listed in (i)(i) of this subsection would be required for reinvestment and how much would be allowable to offset existing expenditures based on federal medicaid rules for state fiscal years 2022 and 2023 if the waiver had been in place during those fiscal years.(j) $350,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for the department of corrections to contract with the T.E.A.C.H. (taking education and creating history) program to provide liberatory education, foster positive self-reflection, and offer educational courses that encourage critical thinking, self-awareness, and personal growth to incarcerated individuals in correctional facilities.(k) $152,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 2099 (state custody/ID cards). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2024, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.))(l) $134,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute House Bill No. 2084 (construction training/DOC). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2024, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.(7)))(8) HEALTH CARE SERVICESGeneral FundâState Appropriation (FY 2024). . . .$251,239,000General FundâState Appropriation (FY 2025). . . .(($262,391,000))Â Â Â Â Â $205,463,000General FundâFederal Appropriation. . . .$6,720,000General FundâPrivate/Local Appropriation. . . .$2,000Opioid Abatement Settlement AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$4,458,000Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery FundâFederalAppropriation. . . .$55,700,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($524,810,000))Â Â Â Â Â $523,582,000The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(a) The state prison medical facilities may use funds appropriated in this subsection to purchase goods, supplies, and services through hospital or other group purchasing organizations when it is cost effective to do so.(b) $842,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $2,256,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for restrictive housing to reduce the use of solitary confinement by increasing correctional staffing, incorporating mental health training, and implementing change to restrictive housing environments.(c) $73,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $387,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the amend collaboration and training program.(d) $1,236,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $3,089,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for reentry investments to include reentry and discharge services and staffing to support the iCOACH supervision model. The staffing and resources must provide expanded reentry and discharge services to include, but not limited to, transition services, enhanced health care discharge planning, case management, health care discharge teams, and evaluation of physical health and behavioral health.(e) $13,605,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $13,605,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for medical staffing in prisons for patient centered care and behavioral health care. Funding must be used to increase access to care, addiction care, and expanded screening of individuals in prison facilities to include chronic illnesses, infectious disease, diabetes, heart disease, serious mental health, and behavioral health services.(f) $1,612,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 is provided solely for chapter 160, Laws of 2022 (body scanners).(g) $1,115,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $1,115,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for an electronic health records system solution and is subject to the conditions, limitations, and review requirements of section 701 of this act and must be in compliance with the statewide electronic health records plan that must be approved by the office of financial management and the technology services board.(h) $405,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $399,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for implementation of Senate Bill No. 5768 (DOC/abortion medications).(i) $627,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $1,715,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the department to provide specialized gender-affirming services, including medical and mental health services, to transgender incarcerated individuals in a manner that is consistent with the October 2023 settlement agreement in Disability Rights Washington v. Washington Department of Corrections, United States district court for the western district of Washington.(j) To promote the safety, health, and well-being of health care workers and to support patient quality of care, the department will continue to engage in reasonable efforts to reduce the use of overtime for licensed practical nurses, registered nurses, and certified nursing assistants.(k) $4,458,000 of the opioid abatement settlement accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for opioid treatment. ((Out of the amount provided in this subsection (k):(i) $2,700,000 of the opioid abatement settlement accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for approved long-term injectable medication for the treatment of opioid use disorder of incarcerated individuals; and(ii))) Funding is provided to ensure each and every single individual transferring into the department of corrections' custody on full confinement is provided medications for opioid use disorder if they were on medications for opioid use disorder in jail or out of custody prior to their transfer to the department of corrections.(l) $1,612,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for the department to operate body scanner programs to conduct security screenings for employees, contractors, visitors, volunteers, incarcerated individuals, and other persons entering the secure perimeters at the Washington corrections center for women and the Washington corrections center.(m) $118,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $354,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for medical staff for the department to reopen and operate living unit G at the Washington state penitentiary in Walla Walla.(n) $68,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $164,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for medical staff for the department to reopen and operate living units G and H at the Clallam Bay corrections center in Clallam Bay.(o) $207,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $354,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for medical staff for the department to reopen and operate living unit F at the coyote ridge corrections center in Connell.(p) (($312,000))$362,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for medical staffing of the mobile dental clinic that will provide dental services to each of the stand-alone minimum camps for the department.Sec. 1222. 2024 c 376 s 224 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SERVICES FOR THE BLINDGeneral FundâState Appropriation (FY 2024). . . .$7,065,000General FundâState Appropriation (FY 2025). . . .(($9,370,000))Â Â Â Â Â $8,581,000General FundâFederal Appropriation. . . .$32,824,000General FundâPrivate/Local Appropriation. . . .$67,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($49,326,000))Â Â Â Â Â $48,537,000The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) $201,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $201,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the continuation of statewide services for blind or low vision youth under the age of 14.(2) $184,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $367,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the independent living program.(3) $1,820,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for the renovation of the food service cafÃ© located in the natural resources building.Sec. 1223. 2024 c 376 s 225 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE EMPLOYMENT SECURITY DEPARTMENTGeneral FundâState Appropriation (FY 2024). . . .$29,354,000((General FundâState Appropriation (FY 2025). . . .$28,800,000))General FundâFederal Appropriation. . . .(($177,579,000))Â Â Â Â Â $186,961,000General FundâPrivate/Local Appropriation. . . .$38,529,000Climate Commitment AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$404,000Unemployment Compensation Administration AccountâFederal Appropriation. . . .(($309,454,000))Â Â Â Â Â $317,019,000Administrative Contingency AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .(($42,652,000))Â Â Â Â Â $69,853,000Employment Service Administrative AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .(($97,414,000))Â Â Â Â Â $104,921,000Family and Medical Leave Insurance AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .(($160,205,000))Â Â Â Â Â $157,327,000Workforce Education Investment AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .(($15,557,000))Â Â Â Â Â $7,278,000Long-Term Services and Supports Trust AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .(($45,441,000))Â Â Â Â Â $35,856,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($945,389,000))Â Â Â Â Â $947,502,000The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) The department is directed to maximize the use of federal funds. The department must update its budget annually to align expenditures with anticipated changes in projected revenues.(2) (($15,399,000))$9,002,000 of the long-term services and supports trust accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of the long-term services and support trust program information technology project and is subject to the conditions, limitations, and review provided in section 701 of this act.(3) Within existing resources, the department must reassess its ongoing staffing and funding needs for the paid family medical leave program and submit documentation of the updated need to the governor and appropriate committees of the legislature by September 1, 2023, and annually thereafter.(4) Within existing resources, the department shall coordinate outreach and education to paid family and medical leave benefit recipients with a statewide family resource, referral, and linkage system that connects families with children prenatal through age five and residing in Washington state to appropriate services and community resources. This coordination shall include but is not limited to placing information about the statewide family resource, referral, and linkage system on the paid family and medical leave program web site and in printed materials, and conducting joint events.(5) Within existing resources, the department shall report the following to the legislature and the governor by October 15, 2023, and each year thereafter:(a) An inventory of the department's programs, services, and activities, identifying federal, state, and other funding sources for each;(b) Federal grants received by the department, segregated by line of business or activity, for the most recent five fiscal years, and the applicable rules;(c) State funding available to the department, segregated by line of business or activity, for the most recent five fiscal years;(d) A history of staffing levels by line of business or activity, identifying sources of state or federal funding, for the most recent five fiscal years;(e) A projected spending plan for the employment services administrative account and the administrative contingency account. The spending plan must include forecasted revenues and estimated expenditures under various economic scenarios.(6)(a) (($15,510,000))$7,231,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation ((is))and $8,279,000 of the administrative contingency accountâstate appropriation are provided solely for career connected learning grants as provided in RCW 28C.30.050, including sector intermediary grants and administrative expenses associated with grant administration.(b) Within the amount provided in (a) of this subsection:(i) Up to $921,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation may be used for the department to contract with the student achievement council to lead the career connected learning cross-agency work group and provide staffing support as required in RCW 28C.30.040.(ii) Up to $2,192,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation may be used for technical assistance and implementation support grants associated with the career connected learning grant program as provided in RCW 28C.30.050.(7) (($2,000,000))$5,774,000 of the unemployment compensation administration accountâfederal appropriation is provided solely for the department to continue implementing the federal United States department of labor equity grant. This grant includes improving the translation of notices sent to claimants as part of their unemployment insurance claims into any of the 10 languages most frequently spoken in the state and other language, demographic, and geographic equity initiatives approved by the grantor. The department must also ensure that letters, alerts, and notices produced manually or by the department's unemployment insurance technology system are written in plainly understood language and evaluated for ease of claimant comprehension before they are approved for use.(8) $3,136,000 of the unemployment compensation administration accountâfederal appropriation is provided solely for a continuous improvement team to make customer, employer, and equity enhancements to the unemployment insurance program. If the department does not receive adequate funding from the United States department of labor to cover these costs, the department may use funding made available to the state through section 903 (d), (f), and (g) of the social security act (Reed act) in an amount not to exceed the amount provided in this subsection.(9) $404,000 of the climate commitment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for participation on the clean energy technology work force advisory committee and collaboration on the associated report established in Second Substitute House Bill No. 1176 (climate-ready communities).(10) The department must report to and coordinate with the department of ecology to track expenditures from climate commitment act accounts, as defined and described in RCW 70A.65.300 and section 302(13) of this act.(11) $18,948,000 of the employment service administrative accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the replacement of the WorkSource integrated technology platform. The replacement system must support the workforce administration statewide to ensure adoption of the United States department of labor's integrated service delivery model and program performance requirements for the state's workforce innovation and opportunity act and other federal grants. This subsection is subject to the conditions, limitations, and review provided in section 701 of this act.(12) $6,208,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $6,208,000 of the ((general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025))employment service administrative accountâstate appropriation are provided solely for the continuation of the economic security for all program. The department must collect quarterly data on the number of participants that participate in the program, the costs associated with career, training, and other support services provided by category, including but not limited to, child care, housing, transportation, and car repair, and progress made towards self-sufficiency. The department must provide a report to the governor and the legislature on December 1 and June 1 of each year that includes an analysis of the program, a detailed summary of the quarterly data collected, and associated recommendations for program delivery.(13)(a) $5,292,000 of the employment service administrative accountâstate appropriation is provided to expand the economic security for all program to residents of Washington state that are over 200 percent of the federal poverty level but who demonstrate financial need for support services or assistance with training costs to either maintain or secure employment. Unspent funds from this subsection may be used for economic security for all participants who are under 200 percent of the federal poverty level as defined in subsection (12) of this section.(b) The department must collect quarterly data on the number of participants that participate in the program, the costs associated with career, training, and other support services provided by category, including but not limited to, child care, housing, transportation, and car repair, and progress made towards self-sufficiency. The department must provide a report to the governor and the legislature on December 1 and June 1 of each year that includes an analysis of the program, a detailed summary of the quarterly data collected, and associated recommendations for program delivery.(c) Of the amounts in (a) of this subsection, the department may use $146,000 each year to cover program administrative expenses.(14) $1,655,000 of the administrative contingency accountâstate appropriation is provided to increase the department's information security team to proactively address critical security vulnerabilities, audit findings, and process gaps.(15) $300,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $300,000 of the ((general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025))administrative contingency accountâstate appropriation are provided solely for two project managers to assist with the coordination of state audits.(16) $1,448,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $1,448,000 of the ((general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025))administrative contingency accountâstate appropriation are provided solely for business navigators at the local workforce development boards to increase employer engagement in an effort to support industry recovery and growth. Of the amounts in this subsection, the department may use $148,000 per year to cover associated administrative expenses.(17) (($11,895,000))$13,537,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of the quality jobs, equity strategy, and training (QUEST) grant to enhance the workforce system's ongoing efforts to support employment equity and employment recovery from the COVID-19 pandemic. The funds are for partnership development, community outreach, business engagement, and comprehensive career and training services.(18) $3,264,000 of the employment services administration accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the continuation of the office of agricultural and seasonal workforce services.(19) $3,539,000 of the long-term services and supports trust accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the programs in the department's leave and care division to increase outreach to underserved communities, perform program evaluation and data management, perform necessary fiscal functions, and make customer experience enhancements.(20) $140,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $140,000 of the ((general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025))administrative contingency accountâstate appropriation are provided solely for one full-time employee to provide casework on behalf of constituents who contact their legislators to escalate unresolved claims.(21)(a) $250,000 of the family and medical leave insurance accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the department to contract with the University of Washington Evans school of public policy and governance to conduct a study on the impacts of the state family and medical leave program's job protection standards on equitable utilization of paid leave benefits under the program.(b) The study shall consider the following:(i) The rates at which paid leave benefits under chapter 50A.15 RCW are used by persons who qualify for job protection under RCW 50A.35.010 or the federal family and medical leave act;(ii) Worker perspectives on the effects of job protection under RCW 50A.35.010 and the federal family and medical leave act on the use of paid leave benefits under chapter 50A.15 RCW; and(iii) Employment outcomes and other impacts for persons using paid leave benefits under chapter 50A.15 RCW.(c)(i) In conducting the study, the university must collect original data directly from workers about paid leave and job protection, including demographic information such as race, gender, income, geography, primary language, and industry or job sector.(ii) In developing the study, the university must consult with the advisory committee under RCW 50A.05.030, including three briefings: An overview on the initial research design with an opportunity to provide feedback; a midpoint update; and final results. The university must consult with the committee regarding appropriate methods for collecting and assessing relevant data in order to protect the reliability of the study.(d) A preliminary report, including the initial research design and available preliminary results must be submitted by December 1, 2023, and a final report by December 1, 2024, to the governor and the appropriate policy and fiscal committees of the legislature, in accordance with RCW 43.01.036.(22) $4,433,000 of the family and medical leave insurance accountâstate appropriation and $351,000 of the unemployment compensation administration accountâfederal appropriation are provided solely for implementation of Substitute House Bill No. 1570 (TNC insurance programs).(23) $50,000 of the unemployment compensation administration accountâfederal appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Substitute House Bill No. 1458 (apprenticeship programs/UI).(24)(a) $10,000,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024, (($11,227,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025, $9,963,000))$21,190,000 of the administrative contingency accountâstate appropriation, and $4,271,000 of the employment service administrative accountâstate appropriation are provided solely to address a projected shortfall of federal revenue that supports the administration of the unemployment insurance program.(b) The department must submit an initial report no later than November 1, 2023, and a subsequent report no later than November 1, 2024, to the governor and the appropriate committees of the legislature outlining how the funding in (a) of this subsection is being utilized and recommendations for long-term solutions to address future decreases in federal funding.(25) $7,644,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $4,332,000 of the ((general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025))administrative contingency accountâstate appropriation are provided solely for the department to create a dedicated team of staff to process the unemployment insurance overpayment caseload backlog.(26) $3,389,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and (($4,540,000))$870,000 of the ((general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025))administrative contingency accountâstate appropriation are provided solely to increase the stipend for Washington service corps members to $26,758 per year and for one staff member to assist with program outreach. The stipend increase is for members that enter into a service year with income below 200 percent of the federal poverty level.(27) $794,000 of the unemployment compensation administration accountâfederal appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5176 (employee-owned coop UI).(28) $30,000 of the family and medical leave insurance accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5286 (paid leave premiums).(29) $2,896,000 of the family and medical leave insurance accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5586 (paid leave data).(30) $35,000 of the employment service administrative accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the department to provide research and consultation on the feasibility of replicating the unemployment insurance program for and expanding other social net programs to individuals regardless of their citizenship status.(31) $10,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 is provided solely for the department to design a form for employer use to voluntarily report no show, no call interview data. This data shall be used to inform potential trend analysis or policy development for job search compliance.(32) $961,000 of the unemployment compensation administration accountâfederal appropriation is provided solely for implementation of House Bill No. 1975 (unemployment overpayments). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2024, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.))(33) $5,655,000 of the family and medical leave insurance accountâstate appropriation is provided solely to increase staffing for the paid family and medical leave program to process claims and respond to customer inquiries in a timely manner.(34) (($7,305,000))$4,427,000 of the family and medical leave insurance accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for information technology staffing to complete system enhancements for any remaining statutorily required components of the paid family and medical leave program, including, but not limited to, the establishment and collection of overpayments, crossmatching eligibility with other programs, and elective coverage for tribes.(35) $483,000 of the long-term services and supports trust accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the department to process nonimmigrant work visa holder exemption requests for the long-term services and supports program.(36) $200,000 of the ((general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025))administrative contingency accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the department to provide grants to community-based organizations to become transportation network company navigators. The navigators will assist transportation network company drivers in accessing the pilot program established in chapter 451, Laws of 2023 (TNC insurance programs) by providing outreach, language assistance, cultural competency services, education, and other supports.(37) $100,000 of the unemployment compensation administration accountâfederal appropriation is provided solely for the department to develop and deploy training to assist apprentices and apprentice advocate groups in filing claims and navigating the unemployment insurance system.(38) $409,000 of the family and medical leave insurance accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Substitute House Bill No. 2102 (PFML benefits/health info.). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2024, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.))(39) $495,000 of the employment service administrative accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Substitute House Bill No. 2226 (H-2A worker program data). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2024, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.))(40) (($51,000 of the employment service administrative accountâstate appropriation is provided solely to support the underground economy task force created in section 906 of this act.(41) $3,863,000))$675,000 of the long-term services and supports trust accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Substitute House Bill No. 2467 (LTSS trust access). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2024, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.(42)))(41) $150,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $200,000 of the ((general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025))administrative contingency accountâstate appropriation are provided solely for North Central education service district 171 to expand industry and education partnerships in order to support emerging workforce needs through career awareness, exploration, and preparation activities for youth in Grant county.(((43)))(42) $100,000 of the ((general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025))administrative contingency accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the department to report how it will collect employee race and ethnicity information from employers that participate in the unemployment insurance program and employees who participate in the paid family medical leave program.(a) The department may contract to complete the report.(b) The department must submit a report to the legislature by June 30, 2025. The report must include accurate cost and time estimates needed to collect the race and ethnicity information from employers and employees. The department must consult with the office of equity to ensure that data collections is consistent with other efforts. The report must also include, but is not limited to, the following information:(i) The cost and time required for the department to revise current reporting requirements to include race and ethnicity data;(ii) The cost and time required for the department to incorporate the collection of race and ethnicity data into future reporting;(iii) The cost and time required for the department to incorporate the collection of race and ethnicity data into its existing information technology systems;(iv) Recommendations on any exclusions from the requirement to report race and ethnicity data; and(v) Any statutory changes required to collect race and ethnicity data.(((44)))(43)(a) $30,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $70,000 of the ((general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025))administrative contingency accountâstate appropriation are provided solely to convene a wage replacement program for undocumented workers work group. The work group shall convene by June 1, 2024, and must include:(i) Three members representing immigrants' interests;(ii) Two members representing workers' interests in unemployment, each of whom must be appointed from a list of names submitted by a recognized statewide organization of employees;(iii) Two members representing employers' interests in unemployment, each of whom must be appointed from a list of names submitted by a recognized statewide organization of employers;(iv) Three ex officio members, representing the state commission on African American affairs, the state commission on Hispanic affairs, and the state commission on Asian Pacific American affairs; and(v) One ex officio member, representing the department and who will serve as the chair.(b) The work group shall:(i) Identify dedicated streams of revenue within the current unemployment insurance taxation model to fully fund an equitable wage replacement program for undocumented workers;(ii) Review funding mechanisms from other states administering similar programs;(iii) Identify funding mechanisms that do not duplicate employer contributions paid into the unemployment trust fund on behalf of undocumented workers nor increase social taxes paid for employers;(iv) Explore the impact of identified funding mechanisms on solvency of the unemployment trust fund; and(v) Provide a calculation of the amount of benefits that would be annually provided to undocumented workers through this program.(c) By November 15, 2024, the department shall submit a report to the governor and related legislative committees that includes the information included in (b) of this subsection and a recommended plan of how to fully fund the program.Sec. 1224. 2024 c 376 s 226 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CHILDREN, YOUTH, AND FAMILIESâGENERAL(1)(a) The appropriations to the department of children, youth, and families in this act shall be expended for the programs and in the amounts specified in this act. Appropriations made in this act to the department of children, youth, and families shall initially be allotted as required by this act. The department shall seek approval from the office of financial management prior to transferring moneys between sections of this act except as expressly provided in this act. Subsequent allotment modifications shall not include transfers of moneys between sections of this act except as expressly provided in this act, nor shall allotment modifications permit moneys that are provided solely for a specified purpose to be used for other than that purpose. However, after May 1, ((2024))2025, unless prohibited by this act, the department may transfer general fundâstate appropriations for fiscal year ((2024))2025 among programs after approval by the director of the office of financial management. However, the department may not transfer state appropriations that are provided solely for a specified purpose except as expressly provided in (b) of this subsection.(b) To the extent that transfers under (a) of this subsection are insufficient to fund actual expenditures in excess of fiscal year ((2024))2025 caseload forecasts and utilization assumptions in the foster care, adoption support, child protective services, working connections child care, and juvenile rehabilitation programs, the department may transfer appropriations that are provided solely for a specified purpose.(2) The health care authority, the health benefit exchange, the department of social and health services, the department of health, the department of corrections, and the department of children, youth, and families shall work together within existing resources to establish the health and human services enterprise coalition (the coalition). The coalition, led by the health care authority, must be a multi-organization collaborative that provides strategic direction and federal funding guidance for projects that have cross-organizational or enterprise impact, including information technology projects that affect organizations within the coalition. The office of the chief information officer shall maintain a statewide perspective when collaborating with the coalition to ensure that projects are planned for in a manner that ensures the efficient use of state resources, supports the adoption of a cohesive technology and data architecture, and maximizes federal financial participation.(3) Information technology projects or investments and proposed projects or investments impacting time capture, payroll and payment processes and systems, eligibility, case management, and authorization systems within the department are subject to technical oversight by the office of the chief information officer.Sec. 1225. 2024 c 376 s 227 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CHILDREN, YOUTH, AND FAMILIESâCHILDREN AND FAMILIES SERVICES PROGRAMGeneral FundâState Appropriation (FY 2024). . . .$488,871,000General FundâState Appropriation (FY 2025). . . .(($527,084,000))Â Â Â Â Â $527,006,000General FundâFederal Appropriation. . . .(($518,649,000))Â Â Â Â Â $515,138,000General FundâPrivate/Local Appropriation. . . .(($2,824,000))Â Â Â Â Â $3,124,000Opioid Abatement Settlement AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$6,807,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($1,544,235,000))Â Â Â Â Â $1,540,946,000The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) $748,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $748,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely to contract for the operation of one pediatric interim care center. The center shall provide residential care for up to 13 children through two years of age. Seventy-five percent of the children served by the center must be in need of special care as a result of substance abuse by their mothers. The center shall also provide on-site training to biological, adoptive, or foster parents. The center shall provide at least three months of consultation and support to the parents accepting placement of children from the center. The center may recruit new and current foster and adoptive parents for infants served by the center. The department shall not require case management as a condition of the contract.(2) $453,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $453,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the costs of hub home foster and kinship families that provide a foster care delivery model that includes a hub home. Use of the hub home model is intended to support foster parent retention, provide support to biological families, improve child outcomes, and encourage the least restrictive community placements for children in out-of-home care.(3) $579,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $579,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $110,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely for a receiving care center east of the Cascade mountains.(4) $1,620,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $1,620,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for services provided through children's advocacy centers.(5) In fiscal year 2024 and in fiscal year 2025, the department shall provide a tracking report for social service specialists and corresponding social services support staff to the office of financial management, and the appropriate policy and fiscal committees of the legislature. The report shall detail continued implementation of the targeted 1:18 caseload ratio standard for child and family welfare services caseload-carrying staff and targeted 1:8 caseload ratio standard for child protection services caseload carrying staff. To the extent to which the information is available, the report shall include the following information identified separately for social service specialists doing case management work, supervisory work, and administrative support staff, and identified separately by job duty or program, including but not limited to intake, child protective services investigations, child protective services family assessment response, and child and family welfare services:(a) Total full-time equivalent employee authority, allotments and expenditures by region, office, classification, and band, and job duty or program;(b) Vacancy rates by region, office, and classification and band; and(c) Average length of employment with the department, and when applicable, the date of exit for staff exiting employment with the department by region, office, classification and band, and job duty or program.(6) $94,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $94,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for a contract with a child advocacy center in Spokane to provide continuum of care services for children who have experienced abuse or neglect and their families.(7)(a) $999,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $1,000,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025, $656,000 of the general fundâprivate/local appropriation, and $252,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely for a contract with an educational advocacy provider with expertise in foster care educational outreach. The amounts in this subsection are provided solely for contracted education coordinators to assist foster children in succeeding in K-12 and higher education systems and to assure a focus on education during the department's transition to performance-based contracts. Funding must be prioritized to regions with high numbers of foster care youth, regions where backlogs of youth that have formerly requested educational outreach services exist, or youth with high educational needs. The department is encouraged to use private matching funds to maintain educational advocacy services.(b) The department shall contract with the office of the superintendent of public instruction, which in turn shall contract with a nongovernmental entity or entities to provide educational advocacy services pursuant to RCW 28A.300.590.(8) For purposes of meeting the state's maintenance of effort for the state supplemental payment program, the department of children, youth, and families shall track and report to the department of social and health services the monthly state supplemental payment amounts attributable to foster care children who meet eligibility requirements specified in the state supplemental payment state plan. Such expenditures must equal at least $3,100,000 annually and may not be claimed toward any other federal maintenance of effort requirement. Annual state supplemental payment expenditure targets must continue to be established by the department of social and health services. Attributable amounts must be communicated by the department of children, youth, and families to the department of social and health services on a monthly basis.(9) $197,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $197,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the department to conduct biennial inspections and certifications of facilities, both overnight and day shelters, that serve those who are under 18 years old and are homeless.(10)(a) $6,195,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024, (($8,981,000))$6,481,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $1,188,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely for the department to operate emergent placement and enhanced emergent placement contracts.(b) The department shall not include the costs to operate emergent placement contracts in the calculations for family foster home maintenance payments and shall submit as part of the budget submittal documentation required by RCW 43.88.030 any costs associated with increases in the number of emergent placement contract beds after the effective date of this section that cannot be sustained within existing appropriations.(11) Beginning January 1, 2024, and continuing through the 2023-2025 fiscal biennium, the department must provide semiannual reports to the governor and appropriate legislative committees that includes the number of in-state behavioral rehabilitation services providers and licensed beds, the number of out-of-state behavioral rehabilitation services placements, and a comparison of these numbers to the same metrics expressed as an average over the prior six months. The report shall identify separately beds with the enhanced behavioral rehabilitation services rate. Effective January 1, 2024, and to the extent the information is available, the report shall include the same information for emergency placement services beds and enhanced emergency placement services beds.(12) $250,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $250,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for implementing the supportive visitation model that utilizes trained visit navigators to provide a structured and positive visitation experience for children and their parents.(13) $600,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $600,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for enhanced adoption placement services for legally free children in state custody, through a partnership with a national nonprofit organization with private matching funds. These funds must supplement, but not supplant, the work of the department to secure permanent adoptive homes for children with high needs.(14) The department of children, youth, and families shall make foster care maintenance payments to programs where children are placed with a parent in a residential program for substance abuse treatment. These maintenance payments are considered foster care maintenance payments for purposes of forecasting and budgeting at maintenance level as required by RCW 43.88.058.(15) $511,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $511,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $306,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely for continued implementation of chapter 210, Laws of 2021 (2SHB 1219) (youth counsel/dependency).(16) If the department receives an allocation of federal funding through an unanticipated receipt, the department shall not expend more than what was approved or for another purpose than what was approved by the governor through the unanticipated receipt process pursuant to RCW 43.79.280.(17) $2,000,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $2,000,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the department to contract with one or more nonprofit, nongovernmental organizations to purchase and deliver concrete goods to low-income families.(18) $2,400,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $2,400,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for implementation of performance-based contracts for family support and related services pursuant to RCW 74.13B.020.(19) The department will only refer child welfare cases to the department of social and health services division of child support enforcement when the court has found a child to have been abandoned by their parent or guardian as defined in RCW 13.34.030.(20) $100,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $100,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the provision of SafeCare, an evidence-based parenting program, for families in Grays Harbor county.(21) $7,685,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $11,329,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $3,326,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely for the phase-in of the settlement agreement under D.S. et al. v. Department of Children, Youth and Families et al., United States district court for the western district of Washington, cause no. 2:21-cv-00113-BJR. The department must implement the provisions of the settlement agreement pursuant to the timeline and implementation plan provided for under the settlement agreement. This includes implementing provisions related to the emerging adulthood housing program, professional therapeutic foster care, statewide hub home model, revised licensing standards, family group planning, referrals and transition, qualified residential treatment program, exceptional placement costs, and monitoring and implementation. ((To comply with the settlement agreement, funding in this subsection is provided as follows:(a) $276,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $264,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $104,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely for implementation and monitoring of the state's implementation plan, which includes receiving recurring updates, requesting data on compliance, reporting on progress, and resolving disputes that may arise.(b) $2,022,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $2,682,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $42,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely for the statewide hub home model. The department shall develop and adapt the existing hub home model to serve youth as described in the settlement agreement.(c) $452,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $864,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $334,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely for the department to establish a negotiated rule-making method to align and update foster care and group care licensing standards.(d) $2,195,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $2,110,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $238,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely for revised referral and transition procedures for youth entering foster care.(e) $1,868,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $1,852,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $1,543,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely for the department to develop and implement a professional therapeutic foster care contract and licensing category. Therapeutic foster care professionals are not required to have another source of income and must receive specialized training and support.(f) $872,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $832,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $421,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely to update assessment and placement procedures prior to placing a youth in a qualified residential treatment program, as well as updating the assessment schedule to every 90 days.(g) $2,725,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 and $644,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely for family team decision making and shared planning meetings as informed by attachment aâstakeholder facilitator and process description.(h) The department shall implement all provisions of the settlement agreement, including those described in (a) through (f) of this subsection; revisions to shared planning meeting and family team decision-making policies and practices; and any and all additional settlement agreement requirements and timelines established.))(22) $7,379,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024, (($26,325,000))$13,519,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and (($7,195,000))$5,788,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely for implementation of a seven-level foster care support system. Of the amounts provided in this subsection:(a) $5,527,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $11,054,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $5,284,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely to expand foster care maintenance payments from a four-level to a seven-level support system, beginning January 1, 2024.(b) $1,032,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024, (($14,521,000))$2,157,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and (($1,773,000))$366,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely for expanded caregiver support services. Services include, but are not limited to, placement, case aide, and after-hours support, as well as training, coaching, child care, and respite coordination.(c) $573,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and (($566,000))$124,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for project management to oversee the shift in systems and practices.(d) $247,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $184,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $138,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely for a contract with the department of social and health services research and data analysis division to track program outcomes through monitoring and analytics.(23) $732,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $732,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $362,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely to increase staff to support statewide implementation of the kinship caregiver engagement unit.(24) $2,113,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $4,119,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely to issue foster care maintenance payments for up to 90 days to those kinship caregivers who obtain an initial license.(25) $6,696,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $6,696,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $2,940,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely for contracted visitation services for children in temporary out-of-home care. Funding is provided to reimburse providers for certain uncompensated services, which may include work associated with missed or canceled visits.(26) $4,104,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and (($5,589,000))$3,939,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely to expand combined in-home services to serve more families. By December 1, 2023, and annually thereafter, the department shall provide a report to the legislature detailing combined in-home services expenditures and utilization, including the number of families served and a listing of services received by those families.(27) $892,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $892,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $796,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely for increased licensing staff. Licensing staff are increased in anticipation that more kinship placements will become licensed due to recent legislation and court decisions, including In re Dependency of K.W. and chapter 211, Laws of 2021 (E2SHB 1227) (child abuse or neglect).(28) $755,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $2,014,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5124 (nonrelative kin placement).(29) $338,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024, (($317,000))$197,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $54,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5515 (child abuse and neglect).(30) $851,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $2,412,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $108,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely for implementation of Senate Bill No. 5683 (foster care/Indian children).(31) $2,304,000 of the opioid abatement settlement accountâstate appropriation is for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5536 (controlled substances).(32) $375,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $375,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $112,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely for the department to develop, implement, and expand strategies to improve the capacity, reliability, and effectiveness of contracted visitation services for children in temporary out-of-home care and their parents and siblings. Strategies may include, but are not limited to, increasing mileage reimbursement for providers, offering transportation-only contract options, and mechanisms to reduce the level of parent-child supervision when doing so is in the best interest of the child. The department shall report to the office of financial management and the relevant fiscal and policy committees of the legislature regarding these strategies by September 1, 2023. The report shall include the number and percentage of parents requiring supervised visitation and the number and percentage of parents with unsupervised visitation, prior to reunification.(33) $499,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $499,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $310,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute House Bill No. 1204 (family connections program), which will support the family connections program in areas of the state in which the program is already established. To operate the program, the department must contract with a community-based organization that has experience working with the foster care population and administering the family connections program.(34) $2,020,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $1,894,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $1,247,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely to increase the basic foster care maintenance rate for all age groups and the supervised independent living subsidy for youth in extended foster care each by $50 per youth per month effective July 1, 2023.(35) $30,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $300,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the department to contract with a Bellevue-based nonprofit organization to support the continuation of its home visiting services for children ages three through five years old who are in the child welfare system. The nonprofit organization must provide educational and therapeutic services for children with developmental delays, disabilities, and behavioral needs.(36) $375,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $375,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for a contract with a Washington state mentoring organization to provide oversight and training for a pilot program that mentors foster youth. The goal of the program is to improve outcomes for youth in foster care by surrounding them with ongoing support from a caring adult mentor. Under the program, mentors provide a positive role model and develop a trusted relationship that helps the young person build self-confidence, explore career opportunities, access their own resourcefulness, and work to realize their fullest potential. The organization shall serve as the program administrator to provide grants to nonprofit organizations based in Washington state that meet department approved criteria specific to mentoring foster youth. Eligible grantees must have programs that currently provide mentoring services within the state and can provide mentors who provide one-to-one services to foster youth, or a maximum ratio of one mentor to three youth.(37) $1,100,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $1,400,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for a grant to a nonprofit organization in Spokane that has experience administering a family-centered drug treatment and housing program for families experiencing substance use disorder. The amount provided in this subsection is intended to support the existing program while the department works to develop a sustainable model of the program and expand to new regions of the state.(38) $150,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 is provided solely for the department to lead the development of a sustainable operating funding model for programs using the rising strong model that provides comprehensive, family-centered drug treatment and housing services to keep families together while receiving treatment and support. The department shall work in coordination with the health care authority, the department of commerce, other local agencies, and stakeholders on development of the model. The department shall submit the sustainable operating model to the appropriate committees of the legislature by July 1, 2024.(39) $107,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $102,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $50,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute House Bill No. 1580 (children in crisis).(40) $269,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $269,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely to increase the new foster home incentive payment for child-placing agencies to $1,000 for each new foster home certified for licensure, effective July 1, 2023.(41) $1,484,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely to fund a memorandum of understanding to be negotiated between the Washington federation of state employees and the department of children, youth, and families, which provides for group A assignment pay for reference 77B for SSS2s in-training on a one-time basis beginning July 1, 2024.(42)(a) $3,153,000 of the opioid abatement settlement accountâstate appropriation and $337,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 6109 (children and families). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2024, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.(b) Of the amounts provided in (a) of this subsection:(i) $1,515,000 of the opioid abatement settlement accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for a pilot program to include third-party safety plan participants and public health nurses in child protective services safety planning.(ii) $574,000 of the opioid abatement settlement accountâstate appropriation and $301,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely for at least one legal liaison position in each region to work with both the department and the office of the attorney general for the purpose of assisting with the preparation of child abuse and neglect court cases.(iii) $972,000 of the opioid abatement settlement accountâstate appropriation ((is))and $300,000 of the general fundâprivate/local appropriation are provided solely for two pilot programs to implement an evidence-based, comprehensive, intensive, in-home parenting services support model to serve children and families from birth to age 18 who are involved in the child welfare, children's mental health, or juvenile justice systems.(43) $1,350,000 of the opioid abatement settlement accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the department to establish a pilot for public health nurses, including contracts for up to eight public health nurses distributed by case count across the regions to support caseworkers in engaging and communicating with families about the risks of fentanyl and child health and safety practices.(44) The department shall collaborate with the department of social and health services to identify, place, and assist in the voluntary transition of adolescents aged 13 and older who have complex developmental, intellectual disabilities, or autism spectrum disorder, alongside potential mental health or substance use diagnoses, into a leased facility for specialized residential treatment at Lake Burien operated by the department of social and health. The partnership is dedicated to transitioning individuals to community-based settings in a seamless and voluntary manner that emphasizes care in less restrictive community-based environments.(45) $694,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for the department to contract for two receiving centers as established in RCW 7.68.380, that serve youth who are, or are at risk of being, commercially or sexually exploited. One receiving center shall be located on the west side of the state, and one receiving center shall be located on the east side of the state.(46) $100,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely to support families attending the annual caregivers conference in 2024. The conference must provide an opportunity for kinship families, foster parents, prelicensed foster parents, and adoptive families to gather for education, support, and family building experiences.(47) $18,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024((, $86,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025,)) and (($64,000))$11,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely for implementation of Substitute House Bill No. 1970 (DCYF-caregiver communication). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2024, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.(48) (($60,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 and $14,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute House Bill No. 1205 (publication of notice). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2024, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.(49))) $1,750,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely to increase the rates paid to family preservation services providers, effective July 1, 2024.(((50)))(49) $900,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 and $231,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5908 (extended foster care). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2024, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.(((51) $333,000))(50) $59,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 and (($76,000))$11,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 6006 (victims of human trafficking). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2024, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.Sec. 1226. 2024 c 376 s 228 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CHILDREN, YOUTH, AND FAMILIESâJUVENILE REHABILITATION PROGRAMGeneral FundâState Appropriation (FY 2024). . . .$152,459,000General FundâState Appropriation (FY 2025). . . .(($154,077,000))Â Â Â Â Â $170,831,000General FundâFederal Appropriation. . . .$694,000General FundâPrivate/Local Appropriation. . . .$205,000Washington Auto Theft Prevention Authority AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$196,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($307,631,000))Â Â Â Â Â $324,385,000The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) $2,841,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $2,841,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for grants to county juvenile courts for effective, community-based programs that are culturally relevant, research-informed, and focused on supporting positive youth development, not just reducing recidivism. Additional funding for this purpose is provided through an interagency agreement with the health care authority. County juvenile courts shall apply to the department of children, youth, and families for funding for program-specific participation and the department shall provide grants to the courts consistent with the per-participant treatment costs identified by the institute. The block grant oversight committee, in consultation with the Washington state institute for public policy, shall identify effective, community-based programs that are culturally relevant, research-informed, and focused on supporting positive youth development to receive funding.(2) $1,537,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $1,537,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for expansion of the juvenile justice treatments and therapies in department of children, youth, and families programs identified by the Washington state institute for public policy in its report: "Inventory of Evidence-based, Research-based, and Promising Practices for Prevention and Intervention Services for Children and Juveniles in the Child Welfare, Juvenile Justice, and Mental Health Systems." The department may concentrate delivery of these treatments and therapies at a limited number of programs to deliver the treatments in a cost-effective manner.(3)(a) $6,698,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $6,698,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely to implement evidence- and research-based programs through community juvenile accountability grants, administration of the grants, and evaluations of programs funded by the grants. In addition to funding provided in this subsection, funding to implement alcohol and substance abuse treatment programs for locally committed offenders is provided through an interagency agreement with the health care authority.(b) The department of children, youth, and families shall administer a block grant to county juvenile courts for the purpose of serving youth as defined in RCW 13.40.510(4)(a) in the county juvenile justice system. Funds dedicated to the block grant include: Consolidated juvenile service funds, community juvenile accountability act grants, chemical dependency/mental health disposition alternative, and suspended disposition alternative. The department of children, youth, and families shall follow the following formula and must prioritize evidence-based programs and disposition alternatives and take into account juvenile courts program-eligible youth in conjunction with the number of youth served in each approved evidence-based program or disposition alternative: (i) Thirty-seven and one-half percent for the at-risk population of youth ten to seventeen years old; (ii) fifteen percent for the assessment of low, moderate, and high-risk youth; (iii) twenty-five percent for evidence-based program participation; (iv) seventeen and one-half percent for minority populations; (v) three percent for the chemical dependency and mental health disposition alternative; and (vi) two percent for the suspended dispositional alternatives. Funding for the special sex offender disposition alternative shall not be included in the block grant, but allocated on the average daily population in juvenile courts. Funding for the evidence-based expansion grants shall be excluded from the block grant formula. Funds may be used for promising practices when approved by the department of children, youth, and families and juvenile courts, through the community juvenile accountability act committee, based on the criteria established in consultation with Washington state institute for public policy and the juvenile courts.(c) The department of children, youth, and families and the juvenile courts shall establish a block grant funding formula oversight committee with equal representation from the department of children, youth, and families and the juvenile courts. The purpose of this committee is to assess the ongoing implementation of the block grant funding formula, utilizing data-driven decision making and the most current available information. The committee will be co-chaired by the department of children, youth, and families and the juvenile courts, who will also have the ability to change members of the committee as needed to achieve its purpose. The committee may make changes to the formula categories in (b) of this subsection if it determines the changes will increase statewide service delivery or effectiveness of evidence-based program or disposition alternative resulting in increased cost/benefit savings to the state, including long-term cost/benefit savings. The committee must also consider these outcomes in determining when evidence-based expansion or special sex offender disposition alternative funds should be included in the block grant or left separate.(d) The juvenile courts and administrative office of the courts must collect and distribute information and provide access to the data systems to the department of children, youth, and families and the Washington state institute for public policy related to program and outcome data. The department of children, youth, and families and the juvenile courts must work collaboratively to develop program outcomes that reinforce the greatest cost/benefit to the state in the implementation of evidence-based practices and disposition alternatives.(4) $645,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and (($645,000))$808,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for funding of the teamchild project.(5) $500,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $500,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for a grant program focused on criminal street gang prevention and intervention. The department of children, youth, and families may award grants under this subsection. The department of children, youth, and families shall give priority to applicants who have demonstrated the greatest problems with criminal street gangs. Applicants composed of, at a minimum, one or more local governmental entities and one or more nonprofit, nongovernmental organizations that have a documented history of creating and administering effective criminal street gang prevention and intervention programs may apply for funding under this subsection. Each entity receiving funds must report to the department of children, youth, and families on the number and types of youth served, the services provided, and the impact of those services on the youth and the community.(6) The juvenile rehabilitation institutions may use funding appropriated in this subsection to purchase goods, supplies, and services through hospital group purchasing organizations when it is cost-effective to do so.(7) $50,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $50,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for grants to county juvenile courts to establish alternative detention facilities similar to the proctor house model in Jefferson county, Washington, that will provide less restrictive confinement alternatives to youth in their local communities. County juvenile courts shall apply to the department of children, youth, and families for funding and each entity receiving funds must report to the department on the number and types of youth serviced, the services provided, and the impact of those services on the youth and the community.(8) $432,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $432,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the department to provide housing services to clients releasing from incarceration into the community.(9)(a) $878,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $879,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for implementation of chapter 206, Laws of 2021 (concerning juvenile rehabilitation community transition services).(b) Of the amounts provided in (a) of this subsection, $105,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $105,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for housing vouchers.(10) $123,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $123,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for implementation of chapter 265, Laws of 2021 (supporting successful reentry).(11) $250,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $250,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for a credible messenger mentorship organization located in Kitsap county to provide peer counseling, peer support services, and mentorship for at-risk youth and families.(12) $1,791,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $1,754,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for maintenance of the facility, property, and assets at the facility formerly known as the Naselle youth camp in Naselle. ((The department of children, youth, and families must enter into an interagency agreement with the department of social and health services for the management and warm closure maintenance of the Naselle youth camp facility and grounds during the 2023-2025 fiscal biennium.))(13)(a) $140,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $140,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Substitute House Bill No. 1394 (sexual offenses by youth).(b) The department of children, youth, and familiesâjuvenile rehabilitation shall develop and implement a grant program that allows defense attorneys and counties to apply for funding for sex offender evaluation and treatment programs. The department shall provide funding to counties for: (a) Process mapping, site assessment, and training for additional sex offender treatment modalities such as multisystemic therapy-problem sexual behavior or problematic sexual behavior-cognitive behavioral therapy; and (b) for any evaluation and preadjudication treatment costs which are not covered by the court.(14) $2,436,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $2,206,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for a dedicated institutional educational oversight and accountability team and 12 staff to provide a transition team at both green hill and echo glen that will serve as an education engagement team at the facility and will also coordinate and engage with community enrichment programs and community organizations to afford more successful transitions.(15) $505,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $505,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for contracted services for housing for youth exiting juvenile rehabilitation facilities.(16) $2,958,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $11,436,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for caseload costs and staffing. Of the amount provided in this subsection: $690,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $2,055,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for staffing necessary to operate the baker cottage north living unit at green hill school that is anticipated to be operational by May 1, 2024.(17) $967,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 is provided solely for the department to purchase body scanners, one for Echo Glen children's center, and two for Green Hill school, to comply with chapter 246-230 WAC (security screening systems).(18) $7,774,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $10,160,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for enhanced security services at the Echo Glen children's center.(19) $68,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 6006 (victims of human trafficking). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2024, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.))(20) $200,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for the department to contract with a nonprofit entity doing statewide gender-responsive, race equity training and girls' advocacy programming in the juvenile rehabilitation system. The entity must provide:(a) Girl-centered, antibias training for adults working with girls;(b) Youth stipends for girls involved in advocacy programming; and(c) Program facilitation for girls in the continuum of the juvenile rehabilitation system.(21) $1,701,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for the department to open and operate a 48-bed living unit, a modular building, and recreation area at the Stafford Creek corrections center in Aberdeen.(22) $2,600,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for enhanced security services at the Green Hill school, to include canine services.Sec. 1227. 2024 c 376 s 229 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CHILDREN, YOUTH, AND FAMILIESâEARLY LEARNING PROGRAMGeneral FundâState Appropriation (FY 2024). . . .$586,784,000General FundâState Appropriation (FY 2025). . . .(($756,322,000))Â Â Â Â Â $823,004,000General FundâFederal Appropriation. . . .(($660,817,000))Â Â Â Â Â $661,798,000General FundâPrivate/Local Appropriation. . . .(($104,000))Â Â Â Â Â $579,000Education Legacy Trust AccountâState Appropriation. . . .(($385,401,000))Â Â Â Â Â $380,321,000Home Visiting Services AccountâState Appropriation. . . .(($35,794,000))Â Â Â Â Â $34,544,000Home Visiting Services AccountâFederal Appropriation. . . .$37,256,000((Opioid Abatement Settlement AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$3,179,000))Washington Opportunity Pathways AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$80,000,000Workforce Education Investment AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .(($22,764,000))Â Â Â Â Â $15,623,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($2,568,421,000))Â Â Â Â Â $2,619,909,000The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1)(a) $132,698,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024, (($156,585,000))$147,546,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025, $91,810,000 of the education legacy trust accountâstate appropriation, and $80,000,000 of the opportunity pathways accountâstate appropriation are provided solely for the early childhood education and assistance program. These amounts shall support at least 16,778 slots in fiscal year 2024 and ((17,278))16,433 slots in fiscal year 2025. Of the total slots in each fiscal year, 100 slots must be reserved for foster children to receive school-year-round enrollment.(b) Of the amounts provided in (a) of this subsection:(i) $23,647,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $26,412,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for a slot rate increase of 18 percent for full day slots, a 9 percent increase for extended day slots, and a 7 percent increase for part day slots, beginning July 1, 2023.(ii) $8,271,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for a rate increase of 5 percent for full day slots and 9 percent for extended day slots, beginning July 1, 2024.(iii) $9,862,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $9,862,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely to convert 1,000 part day slots to full day slots, and to increase full day slots by 500, beginning in fiscal year 2024.(iv) $9,862,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely to convert 1,000 part day slots to full day slotsand to increase full day slots by 500, beginning in fiscal year 2025.(c) Of the amounts provided in (a) of this subsection, $2,509,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $3,278,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely to increase complex needs grant funds for the early childhood education and assistance program.(d) The department of children, youth, and families must develop a methodology to identify, at the school district level, the geographic locations of where early childhood education and assistance program slots are needed to meet the entitlement specified in RCW 43.216.556. This methodology must be linked to the caseload forecast produced by the caseload forecast council and must include estimates of the number of slots needed at each school district and the corresponding facility needs required to meet the entitlement in accordance with RCW 43.216.556. This methodology must be included as part of the budget submittal documentation required by RCW 43.88.030.(2) The department is the lead agency for and recipient of the federal child care and development fund grant. Amounts within this grant shall be used to fund child care licensing, quality initiatives, agency administration, and other costs associated with child care subsidies.(3) The department of children, youth, and families shall work in collaboration with the department of social and health services to determine the appropriate amount of state expenditures for the working connections child care program to claim towards the state's maintenance of effort for the temporary assistance for needy families program. The departments will also collaborate to track the average monthly child care subsidy caseload and expenditures by fund type, including child care development fund, general fundâstate appropriation, and temporary assistance for needy families for the purpose of estimating the annual temporary assistance for needy families reimbursement from the department of social and health services to the department of children, youth, and families. Effective December 1, 2023, and annually thereafter, the department of children, youth, and families must report to the governor and the appropriate fiscal and policy committees of the legislature the total state contribution for the working connections child care program claimed the previous fiscal year towards the state's maintenance of effort for the temporary assistance for needy families program and the total temporary assistance for needy families reimbursement from the department of social and health services for the previous fiscal year.(4)(a) $145,852,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024, (($208,181,000))$218,527,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025, $56,400,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation, and $99,100,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation (ARPA) are provided solely for enhancements to the working connections child care program.(b) Of the amounts provided in (a) of this subsection:(i) $47,637,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $87,556,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025, $36,249,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation, and $33,085,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation (ARPA) are provided solely to increase subsidy base rates to the 85th percentile of market based on the 2021 market rate survey for child care centers.(ii) $98,215,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024, (($120,625,000))$130,971,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025, $20,151,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation, and $18,415,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation (ARPA) are provided solely to implement the 2023-2025 collective bargaining agreement covering family child care providers as provided in section 907 of this act. Of the amounts provided in this subsection:(A) $8,263,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $9,793,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are for an 85 cent per hour per child rate increase for family, friends, and neighbor providers (FFNs) beginning July 1, 2023, and a 15 cent per hour per child rate increase beginning July 1, 2024.(B) $26,515,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $48,615,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025, $20,151,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation, and $18,415,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation (ARPA) are provided to increase subsidy base rates to the 85th percentile of market based on the 2021 market rate survey.(C) $370,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $370,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the department to pay the background check application and fingerprint processing fees.(D) $63,067,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and (($61,847,000))$72,193,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are for a cost of care rate enhancement.(c) Funding in this subsection must be expended with internal controls that provide child-level detail for all transactions, beginning July 1, 2024.(d) On July 1, 2023, and July 1, 2024, the department, in collaboration with the department of social and health services, must report to the governor and the appropriate fiscal and policy committees of the legislature on the status of overpayments in the working connections child care program. The report must include the following information for the previous fiscal year:(i) A summary of the number of overpayments that occurred;(ii) The reason for each overpayment;(iii) The total cost of overpayments;(iv) A comparison to overpayments that occurred in the past two preceding fiscal years; and(v) Any planned modifications to internal processes that will take place in the coming fiscal year to further reduce the occurrence of overpayments.(e) Within available amounts, the department in consultation with the office of financial management shall report enrollments and active caseload for the working connections child care program to the governor and the legislative fiscal committees and the legislative-executive WorkFirst poverty reduction oversight task force on an agreed upon schedule. The report shall also identify the number of cases participating in both temporary assistance for needy families and working connections child care. The department must also report on the number of children served through contracted slots.(5) $2,362,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $2,362,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $772,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely to increase the nonstandard hours bonus to:(a) $135 per child per month, beginning July 1, 2023; and(b) $150 per child per month, beginning July 1, 2024.(6) (($22,764,000))$15,623,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the working connections child care program under RCW 43.216.135.(7) $353,402,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation is reimbursed by the department of social and health services to the department of children, youth, and families for qualifying expenditures of the working connections child care program under RCW 43.216.135.(8) $1,560,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024((, $1,560,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025,)) and $6,701,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely for the seasonal child care program.(9) $871,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $871,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the department of children, youth, and families to contract with a countywide nonprofit organization with early childhood expertise in Pierce county for a project to prevent child abuse and neglect using nationally recognized models.(a) The nonprofit organization must continue to implement a countywide resource and referral linkage system for families of children who are prenatal through age five.(b) The nonprofit organization must offer a voluntary brief newborn home visiting program. The program must meet the diverse needs of Pierce county residents and, therefore, it must be flexible, culturally appropriate, and culturally responsive. The department, in collaboration with the nonprofit organization, must examine the feasibility of leveraging federal and other fund sources, including federal Title IV-E and medicaid funds, for home visiting provided through the pilot. The department must report its findings to the governor and appropriate legislative committees by September 1, 2023.(10) $3,577,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024, (($3,587,000))$3,444,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and (($9,588,000))$9,303,000 of the education legacy trust accountâstate appropriation are provided solely for the early childhood intervention prevention services (ECLIPSE) program. The department shall contract for ECLIPSE services to provide therapeutic child care and other specialized treatment services to abused, neglected, at-risk, and/or drug-affected children. The department shall pursue opportunities to leverage other funding to continue and expand ECLIPSE services. Priority for services shall be given to children referred from the department.(11) The department shall place a ten percent administrative overhead cap on any contract entered into with the University of Washington. In a bi-annual report to the governor and the legislature, the department shall report the total amount of funds spent on the quality rating and improvements system and the total amount of funds spent on degree incentives, scholarships, and tuition reimbursements.(12) $1,728,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $1,728,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for reducing barriers for low-income providers to participate in the early achievers program.(13) $300,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $300,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for a contract with a nonprofit entity experienced in the provision of promoting early literacy for children through pediatric office visits.(14) $4,000,000 of the education legacy trust accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for early intervention assessment and services.(15) The department shall work with state and local law enforcement, federally recognized tribal governments, and tribal law enforcement to develop a process for expediting fingerprinting and data collection necessary to conduct background checks for tribal early learning and child care providers.(16) $100,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $100,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for continued implementation of chapter 202, Laws of 2017 (children's mental health).(17) Within existing resources, the department shall continue implementation of chapter 409, Laws of 2019 (early learning access).(18) $515,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $515,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for a statewide family resource and referral linkage system, with coordinated access point of resource navigators who will connect families with children prenatal through age five with services, programs, and community resources through a facilitated referral and linkage process.(19)(a) $114,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024, (($173,000))$86,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025, $6,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation, and $31,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation (ARPA) are provided solely for the department to complete its pilot project to determine the feasibility of a child care license category for multi-site programs operating under one owner or one entity and to complete one year of transition activities. The department shall adopt rules to implement the pilot project and may waive or adapt licensing requirements when necessary to allow for the operation of a new license category. Pilot participants must include, at least:(i) One governmental agency;(ii) One nonprofit organization; and(iii) One for-profit private business.(b) New or existing license child care providers may participate in the pilot. When selecting and approving pilot project locations, the department shall aim to select a mix of rural, urban, and suburban locations. By July 1, 2024, the department shall submit to the governor and relevant committees of the legislature a plan for permanent implementation of this license category, including any necessary changes to law.(20) (($3,020,000 of the home visiting accountâstate appropriation and $6,540,000 of the home visiting accountâfederal appropriation are provided solely for the home visiting program. Of the amounts in this subsection:(a) $2,020,000))$1,770,000 of the home visiting accountâstate appropriation and $6,540,000 of the home visiting accountâfederal appropriation are provided solely for a funding increase, including to increase funding for contracts to support wage and cost increases and create more equity in contracting among the home visiting workforce.(((b) $1,000,000 of the home visiting accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the expansion of visiting services.))(21) Within the amounts provided in this section, funding is provided for the department to make permanent the two language access coordinators with specialties in Spanish and Somali as funded in chapter 334, Laws of 2021.(22)(a) The department must provide to the education research and data center, housed at the office of financial management, data on all state-funded early childhood programs. These programs include the early support for infants and toddlers, early childhood education and assistance program (ECEAP), and the working connections and seasonal subsidized childcare programs including license-exempt facilities or family, friend, and neighbor care. The data provided by the department to the education research data center must include information on children who participate in these programs, including their name and date of birth, and dates the child received services at a particular facility.(b) ECEAP early learning professionals must enter any new qualifications into the department's professional development registry starting in the 2015-16 school year, and every school year thereafter. By October 2017, and every October thereafter, the department must provide updated ECEAP early learning professional data to the education research data center.(c) The department must request federally funded head start programs to voluntarily provide data to the department and the education research data center that is equivalent to what is being provided for state-funded programs.(d) The education research and data center must provide an updated report on early childhood program participation and K-12 outcomes to the house of representatives appropriations committee and the senate ways and means committee using available data every March for the previous school year.(e) The department, in consultation with the department of social and health services, must withhold payment for services to early childhood programs that do not report on the name, date of birth, and the dates a child received services at a particular facility.(23) $260,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $260,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the department to continue implementation of an infant and early childhood mental health consultation initiative to support tribal child care and early learning programs. Funding may be used to provide culturally congruent infant and early childhood mental health supports for tribal child care, the tribal early childhood education and assistance program, and tribal head start providers. The department must consult with federally recognized tribes which may include round tables through the Indian policy early learning committee.(24) $860,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $860,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for continued expansion and support of family, friend, or neighbor caregivers with a focus on the provision of play and learn groups. The amounts provided in this subsection may be used for the department to:(a) Fund consistent staffing across the state's six geographic regions to support the needs of family, friend, or neighbor caregivers;(b) Contract with a statewide child care resource and referral program to sustain and expand the number of facilitated play groups to meet the needs of communities statewide;(c) Support existing infrastructure for organizations that have developed the three existing play and learn program models so they have capacity to provide training, technical assistance, evaluation, data collection, and other support needed for implementation; and(d) Provide direct implementation support to community-based organizations that offer play and learn groups.(25) $2,750,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $4,750,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for tribal early learning grants to be distributed to providers with tribal children enrolled in early childhood education and assistance program, early ECEAP, childcare, head start, early head start and home visiting programs. Grants will be administered by the department of children, youth and families office of tribal relations and may be awarded for purposes including but not limited to culturally appropriate mental health supports for addressing historical trauma, incorporating indigenous foods, culturally-responsive books and materials, staff professional development, curriculum adaptations and supplements, tribal language education, elders and storytelling in classrooms, traditional music and arts instruction, and transportation to facilitate tribal child participation in early childhood education. Of the amounts in this subsection, the department may use $143,000 in fiscal year 2024 and up to $136,000 in fiscal year 2025 to cover associated administrative expenses.(26) $7,698,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $7,698,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely to increase complex needs grant funds for child care providers.(27) $2,624,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $2,624,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for equity grants established under chapter 199, Laws of 2021 (E2SSB 5237).(28) $2,354,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and (($2,431,000))$2,082,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the department to continue the birth-to-three early childhood education and assistance program. Funding is sufficient for a 20 percent rate increase beginning July 1, 2023, and a 1.8 percent rate increase beginning July 1, 2024.(29) $3,352,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $9,916,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely to implement Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5225 (working conn. child care).(30) $200,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $200,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely to help close the gap in childcare access in the King county region by providing pandemic recovery support funding to the Launch learning organization.(31) $169,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $364,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the department to submit an implementation plan to expand access to Washington's mixed delivery child care system. The plan must assume that any financial contribution by families is capped at no more than seven percent of household income and that the child care workforce are provided living wages and benefits. The plan must be submitted to the appropriate committees of the legislature by June 30, 2025, and should:(a) Follow the intent of chapter 199, Laws of 2021;(b) Be aligned with the cost of quality care rate model;(c) Include timelines, costs, and statutory changes necessary for timely and effective implementation; and(d) Be developed through partnership with the statewide child care resource and referral organization and the largest union representing child care providers, with consultation from families.(32) $250,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $250,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $1,750,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely for infant and early childhood mental health consultation. Of the amounts provided in this subsection, $150,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation is for infant and early childhood mental health consultation services to support rural schools and child care programs in rural communities.(33) $1,000,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $1,000,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the department to contract with Washington communities for children to maintain a community-based early childhood network.(34) $200,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $200,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the department to contract with a Washington state based nonprofit digital child care marketing and matching service to deliver child care marketing and matching services in order to increase the number of licensed providers offering nonstandard hours care and to provide effective outreach to workforces in order to help them find and match with available nonstandard hours care providers.(35) $250,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $250,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $2,500,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely for the department to contract with an organization that provides relationship-based professional development support to family, friend, and neighbor, child care center, and licensed family care providers to work with child care workers to establish and support new affordable, high quality child care and early learning programs. To be eligible to receive funding, the organization must:(a) Provide professional development services for child care providers and early childhood educators, including training and mentorship programs;(b) Provide mentorship and other services to assist with child care provider and facility licensing;(c) Administer or host a system of shared services and consulting related to operating a child care business; and(d) Administer a state sponsored substitute pool child care provider program.(36) $830,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute House Bill No. 1447 (assistance programs).(37) $972,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $1,728,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute House Bill No. 1525 (apprenticeships/child care).(38) $2,438,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 is provided solely for the department to provide a one-time rate enhancement in fiscal year 2024 for early support for infants and toddlers program providers.(39) $4,291,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for implementation of Substitute House Bill No. 1916 (infants and toddlers program). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2024, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.(40) $1,000,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $1,500,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the imagination library.(41) $5,561,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation is provided solely for the department to increase the infant rate enhancement to $300 per month, beginning July 1, 2024.(42) (($1,313,000))$1,077,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for implementation of chapter 420, Laws of 2023 (transition to kindergarten program).(43) $650,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation is provided solely for the department to contract with a nonprofit organization that implements an inclusion mentorship program for child care and early learning providers. The mentorship program shall provide early learning providers with the necessary skills and knowledge to effectively care for and educate children with disabilities, developmental delays, or challenging behaviors.(44)(a) $30,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and (($170,000))$200,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the department to contract with the Snohomish county early learning coalition to develop a leadership team to identify and report on ways to strengthen the early learning community in Snohomish county. The leadership team may include, but is not limited to, members from the following groups:(i) Business communities and industry representatives;(ii) Child care directors and owners;(iii) School district superintendents;(iv) The children's commission;(v) Early learning nonprofit executive directors;(vi) Tribes located in Snohomish county;(vii) Councilmembers from cities located in Snohomish county;(viii) Law enforcement;(ix) The communities of color coalition; and(x) Immigrant communities.(b) The early learning coalition must submit an initial report to the governor and the appropriate committees of the legislature by June 30, 2025. The report must identify the following information:(i) Highest priority early learning needs and common challenges in the Snohomish county early learning sector;(ii) Best strategies to address the identified challenges;(iii) A list of potential partners to help implement the strategies identified in the report;(iv) A funding plan to implement the strategies; and(v) The goal of any strategies implemented.(45)(((a) $3,179,000 of the opioid abatement settlement accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 6109 (children and families). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2024, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.(b) Of the amounts provided in (a) of this subsection:(i) $1,600,000 of the opioid abatement settlement accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of section 202 of Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 6109 (children and families) for the department to enter into targeted contracts with existing home visiting programs established by RCW 43.216.130 in locales with the historically highest rates of child welfare screened-in intake to serve families.(ii) $1,579,000 of the opioid abatement settlement accountâstate appropriation is provided solely to establish a pilot program for contracted child care slots for infants in child protective services, which may be used as part of a safety plan.(46)))(a) $250,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for the department to contract with a nonprofit organization located in Spokane for a pilot program to increase the child care workforce and child care capacity in the greater Spokane area. At a minimum, the pilot program must create a cohort of at least 10 child care facilities that will engage in culture index and blueprint assessments in order to increase the child care workforce.(b) In administering the pilot program, the nonprofit organization must:(i) Conduct coordinated outreach efforts to establish capacity and utilization benchmarks for current licensed day care facilities;(ii) Create a recruitment and branding strategy to increase the child care workforce; and(iii) Establish data points for training, recruiting, and retaining child care employees.(c) The organization must submit a report on the results of the pilot program, including any outcomes affecting the child care workforce and capacity, to the governor and the appropriate committees of the legislature by June 30, 2025.(((47)))(46) $1,246,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute House Bill No. 2124 (child care prog. eligibility). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2024, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.Sec. 1228. 2024 c 376 s 230 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CHILDREN, YOUTH, AND FAMILIESâPROGRAM SUPPORTGeneral FundâState Appropriation (FY 2024). . . .$371,994,000General FundâState Appropriation (FY 2025). . . .(($293,151,000))Â Â Â Â Â $323,118,000General FundâFederal Appropriation. . . .(($171,942,000))Â Â Â Â Â $190,241,000General FundâPrivate/Local Appropriation. . . .$2,131,000Education Legacy Trust AccountâState Appropriation. . . .(($744,000))Â Â Â Â Â $1,047,000Home Visiting Services AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$482,000Home Visiting Services AccountâFederal Appropriation. . . .$380,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($840,824,000))Â Â Â Â Â $889,393,000The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) $400,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $400,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for a Washington state mentoring organization to continue its public-private partnerships providing technical assistance and training to mentoring programs that serve at-risk youth.(2) $2,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $6,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $2,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely for the implementation of an agreement reached between the governor and the Washington federation of state employees for the language access providers under the provisions of chapter 41.56 RCW for the 2023-2025 fiscal biennium, as provided in section 907 of this act.(3) $100,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $100,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for a full-time employee to coordinate policies and programs to support pregnant and parenting individuals receiving chemical dependency or substance use disorder treatment.(4) $3,525,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024, (($3,597,000))$3,025,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $181,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely for the phase-in of the settlement agreement under D.S. et al. v. Department of Children, Youth and Families et al., United States district court for the western district of Washington, cause no. 2:21-cv-00113-BJR. The department must implement the provisions of the settlement agreement pursuant to the timeline and implementation plan provided for under the settlement agreement. This includes implementing provisions related to the emerging adulthood housing program, professional therapeutic foster care, statewide hub home model, revised licensing standards, family group planning, referrals and transition, qualified residential treatment program, and monitoring and implementation. To comply with the settlement agreement, funding in this subsection is provided as follows:(a) $2,406,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $2,382,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $174,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely for supported housing programs for hard-to-place foster youth age 16 and above. The department shall provide housing and case management supports that ensure youth placement stability, promote mental health and well-being, and prepare youth for independent living.(b) $313,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and (($250,000))$143,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for implementation and monitoring of the state's implementation plan, which includes receiving recurring updates, requesting data on compliance, reporting on progress, and resolving disputes that may arise.(c) $806,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024, (($965,000))$500,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $7,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely for plaintiff legal fees and fiduciary support to support rate modeling and payments for the emerging adult housing program, professional therapeutic foster parents, referrals and transitions, and hub homes.(5) $704,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $1,022,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $222,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely for the department to implement a language access plan, which will include but is not limited to:(a) Translation of department materials;(b) Hiring staff to form a centralized language access team to provide language access supports and coordination across all department divisions;(c) Outreach to community organizations serving multilingual children and families regarding department programs;(d) Webinars and other technical assistance provided in multiple languages for department programs;(e) Training for department staff on language access resources; and(f) Other means of increasing language access and equity for providers and caregivers in health and safety, licensing and regulations, and public funding opportunities for programs offered by the department.(6) $1,885,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $1,885,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely for a feasibility study to develop an implementation plan and determine costs for a new child welfare information system.(7) $2,149,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024, (($7,851,000))$7,046,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $10,000,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely for a comprehensive child welfare information system. The funding in this section is sufficient to complete procurement and the initial stages of implementation and is subject to the conditions, limitations, and review requirements of section 701 of this act.(8) $1,187,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $1,187,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for housing support services for youth exiting foster care and juvenile rehabilitation.(9) $19,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $19,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $6,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely for indirect costs associated with the implementation of a seven-level foster care support system.(10) $1,494,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation is provided solely for continued implementation of the family first prevention services act requirements, including technology enhancements to support the automated assessments, data quality, and reporting requirements. Funding provided in this subsection is subject to the conditions, limitations, and review provided in section 701 of this act.(11) $717,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024((, $717,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025,)) and $324,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely for continued implementation of chapter 210, Laws of 2021 (2SHB 1219).(12) $1,248,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $1,248,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the continuation of the emergency adolescent housing pilot program. The housing pilot will serve hard-to-place foster youth who are at least 16 years old with housing and intensive case management.(13) $319,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024, (($319,000))$155,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $170,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely to continue implementation of chapter 137, Laws of 2022 (2SHB 1905).(14) $26,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $26,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely to continue implementation of chapter 39, Laws of 2022 (SHB 2068).(15) $23,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $31,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $7,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely to implement Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5225 (working conn. child care).(16) $1,571,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and (($1,571,000))$1,105,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely to implement Senate Bill No. 5316 (DCYF background check fees).(17) $53,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $53,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $16,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely to implement Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5515 (child abuse and neglect).(18) $43,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $78,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $18,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely to implement Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5124 (nonrelative kin placement).(19) $2,627,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and (($2,628,000))$2,161,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5256 (child welfare housing).(20) $33,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $58,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $14,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely for implementation of Senate Bill No. 5683 (foster care/Indian children).(21) $300,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $300,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the partnership council for juvenile justice to consider and provide recommendations regarding juvenile justice policy projects and for one additional staff for ongoing policy and program analysis. The partnership council is authorized to consult with experts to study and gather research on best practices regarding juvenile justice, and to consult with relevant stakeholders regarding its potential recommendations. Relevant stakeholders may include but are not limited to the superior court judges association; Washington association of juvenile court administrators; Washington association of county clerks; the association of Washington counties; community-based organizations with expertise in legal financial obligation reform, community compensation funds, supporting victims and survivors of crime, or supporting youth who have been convicted or adjudicated of criminal offenses; law enforcement, prosecutors; public defenders; incarcerated and formerly incarcerated youth and young adults; the administrative office of the courts; the crime victims compensation program; and the office of crime victims advocacy.(a) The council shall:(i) By October 31, 2024, report to the governor and appropriate committees of the legislature recommendations for establishing a state-funded community compensation program to address out of pocket expenses for those who have been harmed by juvenile criminal offenses. Recommendations shall consider restorative principles and best practices and shall be developed in consultation with those who have been adjudicated and charged restitution and those who have been owed restitution. The council shall provide recommendations for program implementation including, but not limited to, structure and placement within state government; scope and scale of funding including eligibility criteria; retroactivity; documentation requirements; and coordination with the existing crime victims compensation fund. The council shall provide estimates of startup costs and ongoing operational costs, including administration and direct compensation to victims.(ii) By October 31, 2024, report to the governor and appropriate committees of the legislature recommendations regarding retention, dissemination, confidentiality, sealing, consequences, and general treatment of juvenile court records. In making recommendations, the council shall take into consideration developments in brain science regarding decision-making amongst youth; the impact the juvenile court records can have on future individual well-being; principles of racial equity; and impacts that the recommendations could have on recidivism.(iii) By June 30, 2025, report to the governor and appropriate committees of the legislature recommendations regarding implementation of juvenile court jurisdiction expansion to encompass persons 18, 19, and 20 years old. Recommendations shall include an implementation plan for the expansion, including necessary funding, essential personnel and programmatic resources, measures necessary to avoid a negative impact on the state's child protection response, and specific milestones related to operations and policy. The implementation plan shall also include a timeline for structural and systemic changes within the juvenile justice system for the juvenile rehabilitation division; the department of children, youth, and families; the department of corrections; and the juvenile court pursuant to chapter 13.04 RCW. The implementation plan shall also include an operations and business plan that defines benchmarks including possible changes to resource allocations; a review of the estimated costs avoided by local and state governments with the reduction of recidivism and an analysis of cost savings reinvestment options; and estimated new costs incurred to provide juvenile justice services to persons 18, 19, and 20 years old.(22) $150,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $150,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the department to contract with a statewide nonprofit with demonstrated capability of partnering with agencies and community organizations to develop public-facing regionalized data dashboards and reports to measure change in equitable early learning access as a result of programs and grants administered by the department. The nonprofit must provide the data in a consumer-friendly format and include updates on program supply and demand for subsidized child care and preschool programs. The data must be disaggregated by program and facility type, geography, family demographics, copayments, and outcomes of grants and rate enhancements disaggregated by staff role, program and facility type, and geography.(23) $1,206,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $1,554,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $1,416,000 of the general fundâprivate/local appropriation are provided solely for the department to contract with one or more community organizations with expertise in the LifeSet case management model to serve youth and adults currently being served in or exiting the foster care, juvenile justice, and mental health systems to successfully transition to adulthood.(24) $750,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $750,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the department to increase rates for independent living service providers.(25) $700,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $700,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for funding of the teamchild project.(26) $150,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $150,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the department to contract with an entity for three separate studies. The department must submit the studies to the governor and the legislature by June 30, 2025. The studies must analyze:(a) The feasibility of implementing a universal child allowance, universal child care, and universal baby boxes;(b) The feasibility of a social wealth fund for Washington state; and(c) The current cash and cash-equivalent benefits currently available for Washington state residents who are nonworkers.(27) $125,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $125,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the department to contract with an all-male, African American organization to mentor youth ages 12 through 19 in south King county.(28) $37,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $37,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $74,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 1188 (child welfare services/DD).(29) $18,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $18,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $8,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute House Bill No. 1580 (children in crisis).(30)(a) $118,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $41,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the department to report on a plan to discontinue the practice of using any benefits, payments, funds, or accrual paid to or on behalf of a child or youth to reimburse itself for cost of care by the earliest date feasible. The report must include an implementation plan to conserve funds for the future needs of the child in a manner in which the funds will not count against eligibility for federal or state means tested programs. The report must include a strategy for developing the financial literacy and capability of youth and young adults exiting foster care and juvenile rehabilitation. The department will develop the report in consultation with stakeholders, including but not limited to:(i) Individuals with disabilities and organizations representing the interests of or serving individuals with disabilities;(ii) Youth in foster care and juvenile rehabilitation and their parents;(iii) The social security administration; and(iv) Other relevant state agencies.(b) The department must provide periodic status updates and must submit the final report no later than October 1, 2024. The department must convene the first meeting of the work group no later than September 1, 2023.(31) $938,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $961,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $172,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely for:(a) Compliance with the settlement agreement reached in Ta'afulisia et al. v. Washington State Department of Children, Youth, and Families, et al., Thurston county superior court, cause no. 22-2-02974-34. The department must implement the provisions of the settlement agreement, which includes providing hearings to incarcerated youth under age 25 serving their sentence at a department of children, youth, and families facility prior to transfer to an adult corrections facility operated by the department of corrections; and(b) Providing hearings for youth under age 25 transferred from a department of children, youth, and families community partial confinement facility to a department of children, youth, and families total confinement facility.(32) $94,615,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 is provided solely for legal costs that exceed the amount covered by the self-insurance liability account as follows:(a) $91,250,000 for the costs associated with a jury verdict resulting from Cox et al. v. State of Washington et al., Pierce county superior court, cause no. 12-2-11389-6; and(b) $3,365,000 for the costs associated with a settlement agreement reached in Aroni et al., v. State of Washington, King county superior court, cause no. 21-2-16587-3.(33) $11,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $651,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $662,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely for a feasibility study for the social service payment system replacement project.(34) $946,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 and $154,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute House Bill No. 1205 (service by pub./dependency). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2024, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.(35) $3,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $22,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $4,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely for implementation of Substitute House Bill No. 1970 (DCYF-caregiver communication). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2024, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.(36) (($954,000))$359,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely to transact with the necessary level of detail regarding working connections child care program payments to address the repeated findings made by the state auditor's office related to the child care and development fund and temporary assistance for needy families federal grants.(37) $254,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5774 (fingerprint backgr. checks). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2024, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.(38) $31,000,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for legal costs that exceed the amount covered by the self-insurance liability account as follows:(a) $7,000,000 for the costs associated with a settlement agreement reached in the Estate of Jose Fernandez-Armas, King County Superior Court, case no. 23-2-04113-5KNT.(b) $9,500,000 for the costs associated with a settlement agreement reached in Denny, et al. v. State of Washington, King County Superior Court, case no. 22-2-20293-9SEA.(c) $8,000,000 for the costs associated with a settlement agreement reached in Glover, et al. v. State of Washington, King County Superior Court, case no. 23-2-02517-2SEA.(d) $6,500,000 for the costs associated with a settlement agreement reached in Estate of Hazel Homan, Thurston County Superior Court, case no. 20-2-01513-34.(End of part)PART XIIINATURAL RESOURCESSec. 1301. 2024 c 376 s 302 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGYGeneral FundâState Appropriation (FY 2024). . . .$39,429,000General FundâState Appropriation (FY 2025). . . .(($39,352,000))Â Â Â Â Â $38,382,000General FundâFederal Appropriation. . . .(($145,441,000))Â Â Â Â Â $145,028,000General FundâPrivate/Local Appropriation. . . .$29,544,000Climate Commitment AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$25,152,000Emergency Drought Response AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$6,000,000Natural Climate Solutions AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$16,408,000Reclamation AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$4,785,000Flood Control Assistance AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$5,252,000Aquatic Lands Enhancement AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$150,000Refrigerant Emission Management AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$3,121,000State Emergency Water Projects Revolving AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$40,000Waste Reduction, Recycling, and Litter ControlAccountâState Appropriation. . . .$33,999,000State Drought Preparedness AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$2,219,000State and Local Improvements Revolving AccountâWaterSupply FacilitiesâState Appropriation. . . .$186,000Water Rights Tracking System AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$48,000Site Closure AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$582,000Wood Stove Education and Enforcement AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$605,000Worker and Community Right to Know FundâStateAppropriation. . . .$2,222,000Water Rights Processing AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$39,000Water Quality Permit AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$67,216,000Underground Storage Tank AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$5,032,000Biosolids Permit AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$3,068,000Hazardous Waste Assistance AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$9,476,000Radioactive Mixed Waste AccountâState Appropriation. . . .(($24,455,000))Â Â Â Â Â $24,868,000Air Pollution Control AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$4,926,000Oil Spill Prevention AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$9,132,000Air Operating Permit AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$5,593,000Wastewater Treatment Plant Operator CertificationAccountâState Appropriation. . . .$804,000Oil Spill Response AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$7,076,000Model Toxics Control Operating AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .(($350,774,000))Â Â Â Â Â $350,730,000Model Toxics Control Operating AccountâLocalAppropriation. . . .$1,000,000Model Toxics Control Stormwater AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$16,992,000Voluntary Cleanup AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$344,000Paint Product Stewardship AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$151,000Water Pollution Control Revolving AdministrationAccountâState Appropriation. . . .$8,641,000Clean Fuels Program AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$5,003,000Climate Investment AccountâState Appropriation. . . .(($60,877,000))Â Â Â Â Â $57,877,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($935,134,000))Â Â Â Â Â $931,120,000The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) $455,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $455,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the department to grant to the northwest straits commission to provide funding, technical assistance, and/or coordination support equally to the seven Puget Sound marine resources committees.(2) $170,000 of the oil spill prevention accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for a contract with the University of Washington's sea grant program to continue an educational program targeted to small spills from commercial fishing vessels, ferries, cruise ships, ports, and marinas.(3) $102,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $102,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for implementation of Executive Order No. 12-07, Washington's response to ocean acidification.(4) $24,000,000 of the model toxics control operating accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the department to provide grants to local governments for the purpose of supporting local solid waste and financial assistance programs.(5) $150,000 of the aquatic lands enhancement accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of the state marine management plan and ongoing costs of the Washington coastal marine advisory council to serve as a forum and provide recommendations on coastal management issues.(6) $2,000,000 of the model toxics control operating accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the department to convene a stakeholder group, including representatives from overburdened communities, to assist with developing a water quality implementation plan for polychlorinated biphenyls and to address other emerging contaminants in the Spokane river. The department must also consult with the Spokane tribe of Indians and other interested tribes when developing and implementing actions to address water quality in the Spokane river.(7) $4,002,000 of the natural climate solutions accountâstate appropriation is provided solely to address flood prevention in the Nooksack basin and Sumas prairie. Of this amount:(a) $2,000,000 is provided solely to expand and sustain Whatcom county's floodplain integrated planning (FLIP) team planning process, including supporting communication, community participation, coordination, technical studies and analysis, and development of local solutions.(b) $900,000 is provided solely for the department to support transboundary coordination, including facilitation and technical support to develop and evaluate alternatives for managing transboundary flooding in Whatcom county and British Columbia.(c) $1,102,000 is provided solely to support dedicated local and department capacity for floodplain planning and technical support. Of the amount in this subsection (c), $738,000 is solely for a grant to Whatcom county. The remaining amount is for the department to provide ongoing staff technical assistance and support to flood prevention efforts in this area.(8) (($21,504,000))$18,504,000 of the climate investment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for capacity grants to federally recognized tribes for: (a) Consultation on spending decisions on grants in accordance with RCW 70A.65.305; (b) consultation on clean energy siting projects; (c) activities supporting climate resilience and adaptation; (d) developing tribal clean energy projects; (e) applying for state or federal grant funding; and (f) other related work. In order to meet the requirements of RCW 70A.65.230(1)(b), tribal applicants are encouraged to include a tribal resolution supporting their request with their grant application. If Initiative Measure No. 2117 is approved in the 2024 general election, upon the effective date of the measure, $5,032,000 of the funds from this subsection shall lapse.(9) $1,363,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $1,375,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for preparation and filing of adjudications of state water rights in water resource inventory area 1 (Nooksack).(10) $573,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and (($963,000))$343,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for preparation and filing of adjudications of state water rights in lake Roosevelt and its immediate tributaries.(11) $2,479,000 of the climate investment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for addressing air quality in overburdened communities highly impacted by air pollution under RCW 70A.65.020.(12) $177,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $177,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely to validate a proposed standardized channel migration zone mapping methodology, develop a statewide channel migration zone mapping implementation plan, and provide technical assistance to local and tribal governments looking to use the new standard.(13)(a) $640,000 of the climate investment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the department, in consultation with the office of financial management and the environmental justice council, to develop and implement a process to track, summarize, and report on state agency expenditures from climate commitment act accounts that provide direct and meaningful benefits to vulnerable populations within the boundaries of overburdened communities as described in RCW 70A.65.030 and 70A.65.230, and expenditures that are formally supported by a resolution of an Indian tribe as described in RCW 70A.65.230. The department must incorporate the process under this subsection into existing efforts to track climate commitment act expenditures under RCW 70A.65.300. The department must incorporate the Washington state proequity antiracism (PEAR) plan and playbook and executive order 22-04 into the work of this subsection as appropriate.(b) The information that agencies provide to the department, and that the department tracks and reports on under this subsection, must include, at a minimum:(i) The amount of each expenditure that provides direct and meaningful benefits to vulnerable populations within the boundaries of overburdened communities;(ii) An explanation of how the expenditure provides such benefits;(iii) The methods by which overburdened communities and vulnerable populations were identified by the agency and an explanation of the outcomes of those identification processes, including the geographic location impacted by the expenditure where relevant, and the geographic boundaries of overburdened communities identified by the agency;(iv) The amount of each expenditure used for programs, activities, or projects formally supported by a resolution of an Indian tribe; and(v) For expenditures that do not meet, or it is unclear whether they meet, (b)(i) or (iv) of this subsection, an explanation of why.(c) The department, in consultation with the environmental justice council and the office of financial management, and in coordination with reporting under RCW 70A.65.300, must report to the appropriate committees of the legislature by September 30, 2024, on the following:(i) A summary of the information provided by agencies through the process in this subsection; and(ii) Any recommendations for improvements to the process under this subsection or potential amendments to RCW 70A.65.030, 70A.65.230, or 70A.02.080, or other statutes relevant to this subsection. In making recommendations, the department must consider any statutory changes necessary to ensure consistent tracking of the uses of climate commitment account funds, including standardization or coordination of the process for identifying the overburdened communities used for purposes of tracking expenditures and the methods for determining whether an expenditure contributes a direct and meaningful benefit to a vulnerable population or overburdened community.(d) "Climate commitment act accounts" means the carbon emissions reduction account created in RCW 70A.65.240, the climate commitment account created in RCW 70A.65.260, the natural climate solutions account created in RCW 70A.65.270, the climate investment account created in RCW 70A.65.250, the air quality and health disparities improvement account created in RCW 70A.65.280, the climate transit programs account created in RCW 46.68.500, and the climate active transportation account created in RCW 46.68.490.(14) $238,000 of the model toxics control operating accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for technical assistance and compliance assurance associated with the ban of certain hydrofluorocarbon-related products.(15) $2,500,000 of the model toxics control operating accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the department to conduct a statewide compost emissions study, which will provide essential data needed to improve the quality of air permitting decisions, improve compost facility operations, and support state goals to reduce organic waste in landfills reducing climate change impacts.(16) $2,256,000 of the model toxics control operating accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the department to provide technical assistance to landowners and local governments to promote voluntary compliance, implement best management practices, and support implementation of water quality clean-up plans in shellfish growing areas, agricultural areas, forestlands, and other types of land uses, including technical assistance focused on protection and restoration of critical riparian management areas important for salmon recovery.(17) $2,702,000 of the model toxics control operating accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the department to develop a 6PPD action plan and complete a safer alternatives assessment of the 6PPD compound used in tires, including obtaining any data necessary to complete the alternatives assessment. The action plan should identify, characterize, and evaluate uses and releases of 6PPD and related chemicals, and recommend actions to protect human health and the environment. The department shall provide a progress report on the action plan and alternatives assessment to the governor's office, the office of financial management, and the appropriate committees of the legislature by December 31, 2024. The department may provide funding from this subsection to the University of Washington and Washington State University for the purposes of this subsection.(18) $5,195,000 of the model toxics control operating accountâstate appropriation is provided solely to establish a program to monitor 6PPD compounds in water and sediment, identify effective best management practices to treat 6PPD in stormwater runoff, produce guidance on how and when to use best management practices for toxicity reduction to protect salmon and other aquatic life, and incorporate the guidance into stormwater management manuals. The department may provide funding from this subsection to the University of Washington and Washington State University for the purposes of this subsection.(19) $2,296,000 of the natural climate solutions accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Senate Bill No. 5104 (marine shoreline habitat).(20)(a) $500,000 of the model toxics control operating accountâ state appropriation is provided solely for the department to carry out the following activities to inform the development of legislative proposals to increase recycling, reuse, and source reduction rates, which must include consideration of how to design and implement a producer responsibility model for consumer packaging, including paper, plastic, metal, and glass, and paper products:(i) Conduct a recycling, reuse, and source reduction targets study; and(ii) Carry out a community input process on the state's recycling system.(b) The department must contract with an impartial third-party consultant with relevant technical expertise and capabilities in facilitation and gathering public input, including from overburdened communities, to carry out the activities specified in (a) of this subsection. In order to ensure that the state is receiving a variety of expert perspectives on the topic of packaging management, the contractor should include in their team individuals and/or subcontractors with a wide range of expertise and experience. The third party consultant must submit a report to the appropriate committees of the house of representatives and the senate by December 1, 2023.(c) The recycling, reuse, and source reduction targets study must:(i) Document recycling rates, reuse rates, and the reduction of single-use plastics for consumer packaging and paper products that have been adopted in other jurisdictions, measure methods used, and the basis or justification for recommended target rates selected;(ii) Recommend highest achievable performance rates, including an overall recycling rate, a separate specific minimum reuse rate, a recycling rate for each material category, and a source reduction rate to be achieved solely by eliminating plastic components, that could be achieved under up to four different scenarios, including a producer responsibility program and other policies; and(iii) Make recommendations that consider the commercial viability and technological feasibility of achieving rates based on current rates achieved in the state, rates achieved based on real world performance data, and other data, with performance rates designed to be achieved statewide by 2032.(d) For purposes of this subsection, "eliminate" or "elimination," with respect to source reduction, means the removal of a plastic component from a covered material without replacing that component with a nonplastic component.(e) The community input process on the state's recycling system must include:(i) In-person and virtual workshops and community meetings held at locations in urban and rural areas and in ways that are accessible to stakeholders across the state, including overburdened communities;(ii) Public opinion surveys that are representative of Washington residents across the state, including overburdened communities and urban and rural areas; and(iii) A focus on eliciting an improved understanding of public values and opinions related to the state's recycling system, the current public experience with respect to the state's recycling systems, and ways the public believes that their recycling experience and system outcomes could be improved.(21)(a) $250,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 ((and $250,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are))is provided solely for the department, in consultation with other agencies as necessary, to conduct an analysis of water use for irrigation under the potential scenario of lower Snake river dam removal. Analysis must include continued water use during drawdown and thereafter from the river postremoval. The analysis must include the following:(i) A plan identifying potential mitigation needs and interim approaches for delivery of water for irrigation pursuant to existing water rights for those using pumps, wells, or both, from Ice Harbor reservoir during a possible transition from the current reservoir-based irrigation to irrigation from the river;(ii) Identification of cost-effective options for continued irrigation at current amounts and with existing water rights from the lower Snake river at the area of the current Ice Harbor pool; and(iii) Cost estimates for any necessary irrigation system upgrades required to continue irrigation from the lower Snake river.(b) The department may, as necessary and appropriate, consult for this analysis with irrigators and tribal governments.(c) The department shall provide a status update to the environment and energy committees of the legislature and the office of the governor by December 31, 2024.(22) $3,914,000 of the natural climate solutions accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for activities related to coastal hazards, including expanding the coastal monitoring and analysis program, establishing a coastal hazard organizational resilience team, and establishing a coastal hazards grant program to help local communities design projects and apply for funding opportunities. At least 25 percent of the funding in this subsection must be used for the benefit of tribes.(23) $340,000 of the model toxics control operating accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Substitute House Bill No. 1033 (compostable product usage).(24) $1,124,000 of the model toxics control operating accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Substitute House Bill No. 1047 (cosmetic product chemicals).(25) $139,000 of the model toxics control operating accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Substitute House Bill No. 1085 (plastic pollution).(26) $6,000,000 of the emergency drought response accountâstate appropriation and $2,000,000 of the state drought preparedness accountâstate appropriation are provided solely for implementation of Substitute House Bill No. 1138 (drought preparedness).(27) $1,123,000 of the natural climate solutions accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 1170 (climate response strategy).(28) $43,000 of the underground storage tank accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Substitute House Bill No. 1175 (petroleum storage tanks).(29) $1,174,000 of the climate commitment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 1181 (climate change/planning).(30) $13,248,000 of the climate commitment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 1216 (clean energy siting).(31) $140,000 of the model toxics control operating accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute House Bill No. 1578 (wildland fire safety).(32) Expenditures on upgrading or developing the turboplan system, Washington fuel reporting system, and EAGL system are subject to the conditions, limitations, and review requirements of section 701 of this act.(33) $1,263,000 of the clean fuels program accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5447 (alternative jet fuel).(34) $370,000 of the climate commitment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely as a grant to the Puget Sound clean air agency to identify emission reduction projects and to help community-based organizations, local governments, and ports in overburdened communities author grant applications and provide support for grant reporting for entities that receive grants. The department must prioritize projects located in overburdened communities so that those communities can reap the public health benefits from the climate commitment act, inflation reduction act, and other new funding opportunities.(35) $1,220,000 of the model toxics control operating accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5144 (batteries/environment).(36) $77,000 of the model toxics control operating accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Senate Bill No. 5369 (polychlorinated biphenyls).(37) $330,000 of the model toxics control operating accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the department to provide a grant to Clark county for the purpose of developing and implementing a lake management plan to restore and maintain the health of Vancouver lake, a category 5 303(d) status impaired body of water. The department must work with the county to include involvement by property owners around the lake and within the watersheds that drain to the lake, the department of natural resources, other state agencies and local governments with proprietary or regulatory jurisdiction, tribes, and nonprofit organizations advocating for the health of the lake. The plan should incorporate work already completed by the county and other entities involved in development of the lake management strategy.(38) $276,000 of the model toxics control operating accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for a grant to San Juan county for the enhancement of ongoing oil spill response preparedness staff hiring, spill response equipment acquisition, and spill response training and operational expenses.(39) $1,460,000 of the natural climate solutions accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the department to provide grants to the following organizations in the amounts specified for the purpose of coordinating, monitoring, restoring, and conducting research for Puget Sound kelp conservation and recovery:(a) $300,000 to the Squaxin Island Tribe;(b) $200,000 to the Samish Indian Nation;(c) $144,000 to the Lower Elwha Klallam Tribe;(d) $200,000 to the Northwest straits commission;(e) $366,000 to the Puget Sound restoration fund to subcontract with sound data systems and Vashon nature center; and(f) $250,000 to the reef check foundation.(40) $150,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $150,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the department's engagement with the federal government, Indian tribes, water users, and local governments on a process that could result in a federal Indian water rights settlement through the Nooksack adjudication. The department shall produce a monthly report during the claims filing period to monitor the progress of claims filed by water users. The department shall provide a report to the appropriate standing committees of the legislature regarding the status of the adjudication and any potential settlement structure by June 30, 2024, and by June 30, 2025.(41) $150,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $150,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for a grant to Whatcom county to provide technical assistance that must be made available to all water users in WRIA 1 in filing adjudication claims under RCW 90.03.140. This assistance must be administered by Whatcom county and no portion of this funding may be used to contest the claims of any other claimant in the adjudication.(42) $330,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $370,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for a grant to Whatcom county acting as fiscal agent for the WRIA 1 watershed management board, in support of collaborative water supply planning in WRIA 1. Funding may be used to collect or analyze technical information, to develop and assess the feasibility of water supply solutions in WRIA 1, and for facilitation and mediation among parties including, but not limited to, the department, Whatcom county, the public utility district, the city of Bellingham, Lummi Nation, and the Nooksack Tribe. Specific funding allocations, including purpose and amount, will be determined by the WRIA 1 watershed management board. Funding under this subsection will be available only after the filing of the Nooksack adjudication, and no funding provided for the Nooksack adjudication will be used to support the activities funded by this subsection. It is anticipated that these activities will run in parallel with the Nooksack adjudication.(43) $200,000 of the model toxics control operating accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the department to contract with a consultant to develop a report that conducts a full emissions life cycle assessment for solid waste processed at the Spokane Waste to Energy Facility (WTEF) compared to solid waste processed at three other landfills within the region that waste may be sent to if the WTEF were to cease operations. The report must be submitted to the appropriate committees of the legislature by December 31, 2023.(44) $1,416,000 of the climate investment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for additional staff and resources to implement the climate commitment act. If Initiative Measure No. 2117 is approved in the 2024 general election, upon the effective date of the measure, funds from the consolidated climate account may not be used for the purposes in this subsection.(45) $896,000 of the model toxics control operating accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for Washington conservation corps (WCC) cost-share requirements for qualifying organizations, as identified through a competitive application process that prioritizes communities that have not previously received WCC support, are in areas with a high cumulative impact on the department of health's environmental health disparities map, are identified by the office of financial management as distressed, and/or have a high percentile of people of color or low-income.(46) $3,307,000 of the natural climate solutions accountâstate appropriation is provided solely to update surface water maps across the state, develop geospatial integration tools, and support the use, accuracy, and adoption of the state's hydrography dataset. If Initiative Measure No. 2117 is approved in the 2024 general election, upon the effective date of the measure, funds from the consolidated climate account may not be used for the purposes in this subsection.(47) $410,000 of the model toxics control operating accountâstate appropriation is provided solely to implement the recommendations from the agency's June 2023 report on Puget Sound nutrient credit trading, including conducting a market feasibility analysis and developing a stakeholder outreach plan, a tribal engagement plan, and trading resource materials.(48) $338,000 of the climate commitment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the department to increase planning, engagement, and evaluation tools for effective ocean management and offshore wind energy development. The department must engage with tribes in carrying out this subsection. If Initiative Measure No. 2117 is approved in the 2024 general election, upon the effective date of the measure, funds from the consolidated climate account may not be used for the purposes in this subsection.(49) $2,000,000 of the model toxics control operating accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the department to meet the increased demand for administrative orders authorized under chapter 90.48 RCW (the water pollution control act) for projects impacting state waters.(50) Upon request, the department must provide technical assistance to representatives of emissions-intensive trade-exposed industries, as defined in RCW 70A.65.110, on the replacement of existing industrial facilities with facilities under the same North American industry classification system code with lower greenhouse gas emissions. The department must provide such assistance until November 1, 2024.(51)(a) $300,000 of the climate commitment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the department, in consultation with the department of commerce, to contract with a third-party entity to conduct a study of the extent to which carbon dioxide removal is needed to meet Washington's emissions reduction targets defined in RCW 70A.45.020. The study must include recommendations on policies to grow Washington's carbon dioxide removal capacity, including compliance market development and government procurement policies. The department must provide an interim progress report to the appropriate committees of the legislature by November 30, 2024. The department must provide a final report by June 30, 2025, that includes:(i) A summary of feedback from relevant stakeholders;(ii) An analysis of economic and climate opportunities for Washington;(iii) Ways in which carbon dioxide removal might integrate with existing compliance programs;(iv) Strategies to support industry sectors in integrating carbon dioxide removal and maximizing federal funding;(v) Recommendations for monitoring, reporting, and verification standards to ensure carbon dioxide removal technologies may be compared; and(vi) Consideration of carbon dioxide removal accounting mechanisms that account for varying durability of different approaches.(b) If Initiative Measure No. 2117 is approved in the 2024 general election, upon the effective date of the measure, funds from the consolidated climate account may not be used for the purposes in this subsection.(52) $375,000 of the model toxics control operating accountâstate appropriation is provided solely to:(a) Identify additional priority consumer products containing PFAS for potential regulatory action; and(b) Issue orders to manufacturers under RCW 70A.350.040 and 70A.350.030 to obtain ingredient information, including for chemical ingredients used to replace priority chemicals.(53) $200,000 of the flood control assistance accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for a grant to the Spirit Lake-Toutle/Cowlitz river collaborative for flood risk reduction, ecosystem recovery, scientific research, and other activities related to sediment management and flooding in the Spirit Lake-Toutle/Cowlitz river system.(54) $501,000 of the model toxics control operating accountâprivate/local appropriation is provided solely for cleanup costs at the Stillwater holdings Chevron site in Walla Walla.(55) $300,000 of the model toxics control operating accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for an analysis of the contribution of waste tires, as defined in RCW 70A.205.440, to 6PPD-q pollution. The department may contract with a third party for the study. A final study report is due to the appropriate committees of the legislature by June 30, 2025, in accordance with RCW 43.01.036. The study must include:(a) A review of the disposal, repurposing, reuse, recycling, handling, and management of waste tires in the state;(b) A review of the markets for waste tires, including state policies and programs that impact these markets;(c) A description of the sectoral and geographic origins and destinations of waste tires; and(d) Alternatives to using tire derived rubber in waste tire markets.(56)(a) $250,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for the department to contract with a statewide association of local public health officials to conduct an analysis of:(i) Current wastewater treatment capacity to treat and dispose of septage in Washington; and(ii) Future wastewater treatment infrastructure needs to accommodate development growth using on-site septage systems.(b) The department must report to the appropriate committees of the legislature by June 30, 2025, with the results of the analysis.(57)(a) $206,000 of the natural climate solutions accountâstate appropriation is provided solely to initiate the development of a statewide web map tool to integrate the department's water resources management databases. Data elements to integrate include water rights records and geospatial information, mitigation and water banks, and metering data. The web map must provide the public with an interactive online mapping system focused on water resource data that enables users to access, visualize, and use improved water data.(b) The department must consult with local and tribal governments to identify the most useful data elements and analytics to incorporate into an enhanced water resource management tool and must use this information to prioritize future tool enhancements.(c) The department must provide a status update on the data integration project to the appropriate committees of the legislature and to the office of financial management by June 30, 2025, including work completed to date, recommendations for priority tool enhancements to support decision-making, planned work for fiscal year 2026, and future budget needs required to complete the development of an enhanced water resource management tool and maintain it on an ongoing basis.(d) Funds provided in this subsection may not be expended or obligated prior to January 1, 2025. If Initiative Measure No. 2117 is approved in the general election, this subsection is null and void upon the effective date of the measure.(58) $145,000 of the air pollution control accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 6121 (ag. and forestry biomass). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2024, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.(59) $1,787,000 of the climate investment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 6058 (carbon market linkage). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2024, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse. Funds provided in this subsection may not be expended or obligated prior to January 1, 2025. If Initiative Measure No. 2117 is approved in the general election, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse upon the effective date of the measure.(60) $1,645,000 of the climate commitment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of food waste management grant programs as provided in Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 2301 (waste material management). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2024, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse. Funds provided in this subsection may not be expended or obligated prior to January 1, 2025. If Initiative Measure No. 2117 is approved in the general election, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse upon the effective date of the measure.(61) $1,335,000 of the model toxics control operating accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 2301 (waste material management). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2024, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.(62) $44,000 of the climate commitment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Substitute House Bill No. 1924 (fusion technology policies). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2024, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse. Funds provided in this subsection may not be expended or obligated prior to January 1, 2025. If Initiative Measure No. 2117 is approved in the general election, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse upon the effective date of the measure.(63) $2,000,000 of the climate investment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely to communicate with the public in multiple languages on the use and benefits of climate commitment act funding, as well as the ways in which communities can access climate commitment act grant funding. Funds provided in this subsection may not be expended or obligated prior to January 1, 2025. If Initiative Measure No. 2117 is approved in the general election, this subsection is null and void upon the effective date of the measure.(64) (($400,000))$300,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for the department to develop a groundwater modeling guidance publication.(a) The publication must provide consistency in the department's evaluation of groundwater models submitted for water right permitting actions and ensure continued transparency to water right applicants in the department's permitting processes. The core purpose of the publication is to establish best practices for groundwater modeling. The publication will:(i) Define criteria for evaluating model suitability for proposed projects;(ii) Identify the department's approach to evaluating model error and uncertainty;(iii) Identify circumstances where model outputs are insufficient for permit decision making; and(iv) Address the appropriateness of refining a regional groundwater model in water right permitting decisions.(b) The department must convene a technical advisory committee of licensed hydrogeologists, including hydrogeologists employed or designated by tribes, or professional engineers with experience in groundwater modeling to review the workplan and provide comments on the guidance. The publication must be peer reviewed by the United States geological survey or other state or national hydrogeologic professional organization.(c) The department must invite any federally recognized Indian tribes that may be potentially affected by the publication to participate in the technical advisory committee and engage in consultation with any federally recognized Indian tribe as requested.(d) The department must provide an update to the appropriate committees of the legislature and to the office of financial management by June 30, 2025. The department must indicate the estimated time to complete the publication, including draft guidance, recommended further research, and key implementation steps in the update.(65) $650,000 of the climate commitment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for a feasibility and engineering study for the city of Spokane's waste to energy plant carbon emissions reductions project. Funds provided in this subsection may not be expended or obligated prior to January 1, 2025. If Initiative Measure No. 2117 is approved in the general election, this subsection is null and void upon the effective date of the measure.(66) $200,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for the implementation of the Spanaway lake cyanobacteria plan and the aquatic plant management plan, including testing, sample collection, and monitoring for tracking water quality and determining treatment options.(67) $6,000,000 of the climate commitment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the department, in collaboration with the University of Washington department of environmental and occupational health sciences, to provide air quality mitigation equipment to residential, recreational, or educational facilities in south King county that will measurably improve air quality including, but not limited to, the provision of high particulate air purifiers designed to mitigate or eliminate ultrafine particles or other aviation-related air pollution. Funds provided in this subsection may not be expended or obligated prior to January 1, 2025. If Initiative Measure No. 2117 is approved in the general election, this subsection is null and void upon the effective date of the measure.(68) $37,000 of the model toxics control operating accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5649 (floodproofing improvements). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2024, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.(69) $76,000 of the model toxics control operating accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5812 (electric vehicle fires). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2024, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.(((71)))(70) $1,070,000 of the climate commitment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 6039 (geothermal energy resources). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2024, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse. Funds provided in this subsection may not be expended or obligated prior to January 1, 2025. If Initiative Measure No. 2117 is approved in the general election, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse upon the effective date of the measure.Sec. 1302. 2024 c 376 s 303 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE WASHINGTON POLLUTION LIABILITY INSURANCE PROGRAMGeneral FundâFederal Appropriation. . . .$1,237,000Pollution Liability Insurance Agency UndergroundStorage Tank Revolving AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .(($957,000))Â Â Â Â Â $1,063,000Pollution Liability Insurance Program Trust AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$10,235,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($12,429,000))Â Â Â Â Â $12,535,000The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: $8,340,000 of the pollution liability insurance program trust accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Substitute House Bill No. 1175 (petroleum storage tanks).Sec. 1303. 2024 c 376 s 304 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSIONGeneral FundâState Appropriation (FY 2024). . . .$41,197,000General FundâState Appropriation (FY 2025). . . .(($45,091,000))Â Â Â Â Â $45,876,000General FundâFederal Appropriation. . . .$7,231,000Climate Commitment AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$2,883,000Natural Climate Solutions AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$650,000Winter Recreation Program AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$4,928,000ORV and Nonhighway Vehicle AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$396,000Snowmobile AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$5,715,000Aquatic Lands Enhancement AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$367,000Parks Renewal and Stewardship AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .(($153,073,000))Â Â Â Â Â $153,158,000Parks Renewal and Stewardship AccountâPrivate/LocalAppropriation. . . .$720,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($262,251,000))Â Â Â Â Â $263,121,000The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) $5,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $5,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $142,000 of the parks renewal and stewardship accountâstate appropriation are provided solely for operating budget impacts from capital budget projects completed in the 2021-2023 fiscal biennium.(2) $127,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $128,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $750,000 of the parks renewal and stewardship accountâstate appropriation are provided solely to monitor known cultural resource sites, perform needed evaluations for historic properties, manage historic preservation capital projects, and support native American grave protection and repatriation act compliance.(3) $299,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $299,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $1,797,000 of the parks renewal and stewardship accountâstate appropriation are provided solely for additional staff and technical support for scoping and scheduling to proactively address tribal and community concerns and increase the quality of capital project requests.(4) $200,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $400,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely to complete a park master plan and an environmental impact statement for Miller peninsula park.(5) $3,750,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $3,750,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the maintenance of state parks, including maintaining grounds and facilities, trails, restrooms, water access areas, and similar activities.(6) $1,083,000 of the climate commitment accountâstate appropriation and $350,000 of the natural climate solutions accountâstate appropriation are provided solely to identify and reduce the state park system's carbon emissions and assess areas of vulnerability for climate change.(7) $336,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $336,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely to create a statewide data management system with the department of natural resources and the department of fish and wildlife to make informed management decisions that meet conservation goals for public lands. The agencies will also collaborate with tribal governments to ensure cultural resources and cultural practices are considered and incorporated into management plans.(8) $129,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $129,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for a grant for the operation of the Northwest weather and avalanche center.(9) The commission must report to and coordinate with the department of ecology to track expenditures from climate commitment act accounts, as defined and described in RCW 70A.65.300 and section 302(13) of this act.(10)(a) $170,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $170,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for a contract with a statewide trail maintenance and hiking nonprofit organization to provide the emerging leaders program: expanding equity in the outdoors. The goal of the program is expanding both the number and diversity of trained, qualified individuals available for employment in the outdoor recreation and natural resource management sectors.(b) The program must demonstrate a commitment to diversity, equity, and inclusion by providing a safe and supportive environment for individuals of diverse backgrounds, including those who have been historically underrepresented in the outdoor recreation and natural resource sectors, such as indigenous people and people of color.(c) The program must provide both technical outdoor skills training and professional development opportunities that include, but are not limited to, outdoor leadership, representation in the outdoors, and team building.(11) $21,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5371 (orca vessel protection).(12) (($450,000))$950,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for grounds and facilities maintenance costs at the Fort Worden state park campus. The state parks and recreation commission shall work with the Fort Worden lifelong learning center public development authority to develop a report that reviews the historic public development authority financial records, identifies a cost-recovery model to pay for campus maintenance, and proposes any changes to the current lease structure necessary to maintain the public development authority. The commission must submit the report to the office of financial management and the fiscal committees of the legislature no later than June 1, 2024.(13) $50,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for a grant to a park and recreation district in Blaine to provide youth day camp mental health counselor services.(14) $1,800,000 of the climate commitment accountâstate appropriation and $300,000 of the natural climate solutions accountâstate appropriation are provided solely to purchase electric lawn mowers, conduct energy use metering and audits in historic buildings, and analyze coastal erosion and flooding risks. If Initiative Measure No. 2117 is approved in the 2024 general election, upon the effective date of the measure, funds from the consolidated climate account may not be used for the purposes in this subsection.Sec. 1304. 2024 c 376 s 305 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION OFFICEGeneral FundâState Appropriation (FY 2024). . . .$10,572,000General FundâState Appropriation (FY 2025). . . .(($7,370,000))Â Â Â Â Â $7,443,000General FundâFederal Appropriation. . . .$6,197,000General FundâPrivate/Local Appropriation. . . .$24,000Aquatic Lands Enhancement AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$463,000Climate Investment AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$200,000Firearms Range AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$37,000Natural Climate Solutions AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$398,000Recreation Resources AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$5,124,000NOVA Program AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$1,564,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($31,949,000))Â Â Â Â Â $32,022,000The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) $37,000 of the firearms range accountâstate appropriation is provided solely to the recreation and conservation funding board for administration of the firearms range grant program as described in RCW 79A.25.210.(2) $5,124,000 of the recreation resources accountâstate appropriation is provided solely to the recreation and conservation funding board for administrative and coordinating costs of the recreation and conservation office and the board as described in RCW 79A.25.080(1).(3) $1,564,000 of the NOVA program accountâstate appropriation is provided solely to the recreation and conservation funding board for administration of the nonhighway and off-road vehicle activities program as described in chapter 46.09 RCW.(4) $135,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $135,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the governor's salmon recovery office to implement the governor's salmon recovery strategy update by convening the natural resources subcabinet on a regular basis and developing biennial statewide work priorities with a recommended budget for salmon recovery pursuant to RCW 77.85.030(4)(e) that align with tribal priorities and regional salmon recovery plans. The office shall submit the biennial implementation plan to the governor's office and the office of financial management no later than October 31, 2024.(5) $1,714,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and (($1,714,000))$1,557,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for operational and administrative support of lead entities and salmon recovery regions.(6) $200,000 of the climate investment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the agency to complete the required community engagement plan as outlined in RCW 70A.65.030, the climate commitment act.(7) $1,464,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation and $50,000 of the aquatic lands enhancement accountâstate appropriation are provided solely to support removal efforts for flowering rush in the Columbia river basin and Whatcom county.(8) $398,000 of the natural climate solutions accountâstate appropriation is provided solely to establish a riparian coordinator position within the governor's salmon recovery office to work with state agencies to improve project coordination, develop common metrics across programs, and consolidate data platforms.(9) $3,500,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $298,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for a grant to a nonprofit organization with a mission for salmon and steelhead restoration to install near-term solutions to prevent steelhead mortality at the Hood canal bridge.(10) The office must report to and coordinate with the department of ecology to track expenditures from climate commitment act accounts, as defined and described in RCW 70A.65.300 and section 302(13) of this act.(11) $250,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $250,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the connections and snow to sea programs, which provide youth outdoor learning experiences in the Blaine, Mount Baker, and Nooksack Valley school districts.(12) $2,500,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $2,500,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for grants to local parks to address any maintenance backlog of existing facilities, trails, and capital improvements. The funds should be dispersed on a needs-based set of criteria and on a one-time basis. Grants are limited to $100,000 per organization. Allowable uses of grant funding include, but are not limited to, maintenance, repair, or replacement of trails, restroom facilities, picnic sites, playgrounds, signage, and kiosks, as well as necessary Americans with disabilities act upgrades delayed due to the pandemic. Local parks agencies may partner with nonprofit organizations in deploying this maintenance and Americans with disabilities act funding.(13) $150,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for updating the economic analysis of outdoor recreation in Washington state and adding an analysis of the impacts of the outdoor recreation economy in underserved communities.(14) $250,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and (($350,000))$580,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely to match federal funds to identify the offsets to the loss of recreation opportunities associated with the potential draw down of reservoirs on the lower Snake river.(15) $125,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $125,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for motorized and nonmotorized boater education and outreach on Lake Union, with a specific goal of preventing boat and airplane conflicts on the lake during peak recreation season, given the provisions of the United States coast guard navigation rules that seaplanes must in general keep well clear of other vessels. The office may grant funding to local or federal government agencies or nonprofit organizations. The office must publish a publicly available summary report by June 30, 2025, on funding recipients, uses of the funding, and the successes and failures of programs funded. Funding provided in this subsection may not be used to preclude or restrict public use of Lake Union, including recreational, commercial, or tribal use of waters of the state.Sec. 1305. 2024 c 376 s 306 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE ENVIRONMENTAL AND LAND USE HEARINGS OFFICEGeneral FundâState Appropriation (FY 2024). . . .$3,483,000General FundâState Appropriation (FY 2025). . . .(($4,308,000))Â Â Â Â Â $4,108,000Climate Investment AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$898,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($8,689,000))Â Â Â Â Â $8,489,000The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) $164,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $379,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $898,000 of the climate investment accountâstate appropriation are provided solely for the agency to hire staff to respond to increased caseloads, including appeals as a result of the climate commitment act, chapter 316, Laws of 2021.(2) $52,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for implementation of Substitute House Bill No. 1047 (cosmetic product chemicals).(3) $20,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $20,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 1110 (middle housing).(4) The office must report to and coordinate with the department of ecology to track expenditures from climate commitment act accounts, as defined and described in RCW 70A.65.300 and section 302(13) of this act.Sec. 1306. 2024 c 376 s 307 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE CONSERVATION COMMISSIONGeneral FundâState Appropriation (FY 2024). . . .$16,459,000General FundâState Appropriation (FY 2025). . . .$20,692,000General FundâFederal Appropriation. . . .$2,482,000Climate Commitment AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$5,300,000Climate Investment AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$250,000Natural Climate Solutions AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$20,023,000Public Works Assistance AccountâState Appropriation. . . .(($10,332,000))Â Â Â Â Â $9,960,000Model Toxics Control Operating AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$1,110,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($76,648,000))Â Â Â Â Â $76,276,000The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) $250,000 of the climate investment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the agency to complete the required community engagement plan as outlined in RCW 70A.65.030, the climate commitment act.(2) $500,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $4,000,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely to increase technical assistance and operational capacity of conservation districts.(3) $3,000,000 of the natural climate solutions accountâstate appropriation is provided solely to support the outreach, identification, and implementation of salmon riparian habitat restoration projects.(4) $5,000,000 of the natural climate solutions accountâstate appropriation is provided solely to the commission to work with conservation districts to address unhealthy forests and build greater community resiliency to wildfire.(5) $500,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $500,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely to connect scientists, practitioners, and researchers and coordinate efforts to monitor and quantify benefits of best management practices on agricultural lands, and better understand values and motivations of landowners to implement voluntary incentive programs.(6) $300,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $300,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely to support the continued development of the disaster assistance program established in RCW 89.08.645, to provide short-term financial support for farmers and ranchers during disasters. Funding must be prioritized for farmers and ranchers who are the most economically vulnerable.(7) $1,420,000 of the public works assistance accountâstate appropriation is provided solely to support monitoring and reporting efforts necessary to evaluate the implementation and effectiveness of voluntary stewardship program work plans.(8) $8,533,000 of the public works assistance accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of the voluntary stewardship program. This amount may not be used to fund agency indirect and administrative expenses.(9) $5,100,000 of the climate commitment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for grants through the sustainable farms and fields program for organic agricultural waste and greenhouse gas emissions reduction through climate-smart livestock management. Of the amounts provided in this subsection:(a) The commission may grant up to $3,000,000 for technical and financial assistance to increase implementation of climate-smart livestock management, alternative manure management, and other best management practices to reduce greenhouse gas emissions and increase carbon sequestration.(b) The commission may grant up to $2,000,000 for research on, or demonstration of, projects with greenhouse gas reduction benefits.(c) When funding for specific technologies, including anaerobic digesters, the commission must enter into appropriate agreements to support the state's interest in advancing innovation solution to decarbonize while ensuring compliance with Article VIII, section 5 and Article XII, section 9 of the state Constitution.(d) The commission must submit a report summarizing the grants awarded and the likely annual greenhouse gas emission reductions achieved as a result to the appropriate committees of the legislature by December 1, 2024.(10) $23,000 of the natural climate solutions accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 1170 (climate response strategy).(11) (($379,000))$7,000 of the public works assistance accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5353 (voluntary stewardship program).(12) The commission must report to and coordinate with the department of ecology to track expenditures from climate commitment act accounts, as defined and described in RCW 70A.65.300 and section 302(13) of this act.(13) $150,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $150,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for a grant to the King county conservation district to reduce the impacts of artificial lighting on or near the water on the behavior of salmon and other aquatic life in Lake Sammamish and Lake Washington. The grant funding may be used for:(a) Research, including quantifying light intensities and conducting field studies of fish behavior;(b) Community education, engagement, and technical assistance; and(c) Development of model lighting ordinances.(14) $2,000,000 of the natural climate solutions accountâstate appropriation is provided solely to develop and implement an educational communication plan to the general public and landowners in urban, suburban, rural, agricultural, and forested areas regarding the importance of riparian buffers and the actions they can take to protect and enhance these critical areas.(15) $200,000 of the climate commitment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the commission to conduct an evaluation of the current contribution that organic and climate smart agriculture makes toward Washington's climate response goals, what potential there is for increasing this contribution, and how additional investments will help realize this potential, while supporting resiliency. The commission must include the departments of agriculture and ecology and other relevant state agencies, Washington state university, conservation districts, tribal governments, nongovernmental organizations, and other relevant stakeholders who will participate in the evaluation. The commission must submit a report of its findings and recommendation to the appropriate committees of the legislature by May 1, 2025.(16) $10,000,000 of the natural climate solutions accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the commission to provide grants to local government and private landowners for fire wise projects to reduce forest fuel loading in areas deemed a high hazard for potential wildfire.(17) $200,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for staffing to support administrative operations of the commission. The commission will adopt an administrative rate policy for funding indirect support costs for future programmatic operating budget requests.(18) $500,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for post wildfire recovery actions in central Klickitat conservation district and eastern Klickitat conservation district to provide technical assistance and conduct fire recovery activities such as seeding, weed control, dozer line repair, forest health, and shrub steppe restoration, on areas that are necessary for public resource protection.Sec. 1307. 2024 c 376 s 308 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFEGeneral FundâState Appropriation (FY 2024). . . .$162,299,000General FundâState Appropriation (FY 2025). . . .(($183,753,000))Â Â Â Â Â $186,352,000General FundâFederal Appropriation. . . .(($160,011,000))Â Â Â Â Â $158,290,000General FundâPrivate/Local Appropriation. . . .(($70,020,000))Â Â Â Â Â $71,842,000Climate Commitment AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$3,398,000Natural Climate Solutions AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$5,748,000ORV and Nonhighway Vehicle AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$696,000Aquatic Lands Enhancement AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .(($14,124,000))Â Â Â Â Â $14,150,000Recreational Fisheries Enhancement AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .(($3,756,000))Â Â Â Â Â $3,820,000Salmon Recovery AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$3,000,000Warm Water Game Fish AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$3,088,000Eastern Washington Pheasant Enhancement AccountâState Appropriation. . . .(($675,000))Â Â Â Â Â $391,000Limited Fish and Wildlife AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .(($36,947,000))Â Â Â Â Â $39,451,000Special Wildlife AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$2,925,000Special Wildlife AccountâFederal Appropriation. . . .$531,000Special Wildlife AccountâPrivate/Local Appropriation. . . .(($3,842,000))Â Â Â Â Â $3,852,000Wildlife Rehabilitation AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$661,000Ballast Water and Biofouling Management AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$10,000Regional Fisheries Enhancement Salmonid RecoveryAccountâFederal Appropriation. . . .$5,001,000Oil Spill Prevention AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$1,284,000Aquatic Invasive Species Management AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$1,157,000Model Toxics Control Operating AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$7,724,000Fish, Wildlife, and Conservation AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .(($83,975,000))Â Â Â Â Â $83,516,000Forest Resiliency AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$4,000,000Oyster Reserve Land AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$524,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($759,149,000))Â Â Â Â Â $763,710,000The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) $1,777,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $1,777,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely to grant to the northwest Indian fisheries commission for hatchery operations that are prioritized to increase prey abundance for southern resident orcas, including $200,000 per fiscal year for tagging and marking costs, and the remainder to grant to tribes in the following amounts per fiscal year: $150,000 for the Quinault Indian Nation, $199,000 for the Tulalip Tribes, $268,000 for the Quileute Tribe, $186,000 for the Puyallup Tribe, $122,000 for the Port Gamble S'Klallam Tribe, $25,000 for the Muckleshoot Indian Tribe, $207,000 for the Squaxin Island Tribe, $142,000 for the Skokomish Indian Tribe, and $278,000 for the Lummi Nation.(2) $330,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $330,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the department to provide to the Yakama Nation for hatchery operations that are prioritized to increase prey abundance for southern resident orcas.(3) $175,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $175,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely to grant to public utility districts for additional hatchery production that is prioritized to increase prey abundance for southern resident orcas.(4) $217,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $467,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely to pay for emergency fire suppression costs. These amounts may not be used to fund agency indirect and administrative expenses.(5) $400,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $400,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for a state match to support the Puget Sound nearshore partnership between the department and the United States army corps of engineers.(6)(a) $6,082,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $6,082,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the department to implement eradication and control measures on European green crabs through coordination and grants with partner organizations. The department must provide quarterly progress reports on the success and challenges of the measures to the appropriate committees of the legislature.(b) The department must develop a comprehensive long-term plan for Washington's response to European green crab. The plan must identify where permanent trapping efforts should occur, where efficiencies over current operations may be achieved, which agencies, tribes, or organizations require ongoing funding to support the state's eradication and control measures, and the potential for federal funding for control efforts, and include a recommended funding level to implement the plan in the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium. The plan shall be submitted to the governor and legislature by October 1, 2024.(7) $403,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $377,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely to develop conflict mitigation strategies for wolf recovery and staff resources in northeast Washington for response to wolf-livestock conflicts. The department shall not hire contract range riders in northeast Washington unless there is a gap in coverage from entities funded through the northeast Washington wolf-livestock management grant program as provided in RCW 16.76.020. No contract riders shall be deployed in areas already sufficiently covered by other riders. The department must focus on facilitating coordination with other entities providing conflict deterrence, including range riding, and technical assistance to livestock producers in order to minimize wolf-livestock issues in the Kettle Range and other areas of northeast Washington with existing or emerging chronic conflict. The department is discouraged from the use of firearms from helicopters for removing wolves.(8) $852,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and (($852,000))$639,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the department to provide additional capacity to the attorney general's office to prosecute environmental crimes. The department must provide an annual report by December 1st of each year, to the appropriate committees of the legislature, on the progress made in prosecuting environmental crimes.(9) $753,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $753,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for expanded management of pinniped populations on the lower Columbia river and its tributaries with the goal of increasing chinook salmon abundance and prey availability for southern resident orcas.(10) $470,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $470,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the department to expand efforts to survey the diets of seals and sea lions in the Salish sea and identify nonlethal management actions to deter them from preying on salmon and steelhead.(11) $518,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $519,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the department to continue to provide policy and scientific support to the department of ecology regarding surface and groundwater management issues as part of implementing chapter 90.94 RCW streamflow restoration.(12) $4,096,000 of the model toxics control operating accountâstate appropriation is provided solely to analyze salmon contaminants of emerging concern (CEC), including substances such as 6PPD-quinone and polychlorinated biphenyls (PCB) in already collected tissue samples. This research will accelerate recovery and protection by identifying the location and sources of CEC exposure.(13) $130,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $130,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for an external facilitator to seek solutions through a collaborative process using the department's wolf advisory group.(14) $194,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $194,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the department to update and maintain rule making related to chapter 77.57 RCW, fishways, flow, and screening.(15) $822,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $822,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely to monitor recreational steelhead spawning and harvest in freshwater streams and rivers in Puget Sound.(16) $2,714,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for additional law enforcement officers for marine and freshwater fisheries compliance and a patrol vessel dedicated to coastal operations.(17) $509,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $305,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely to monitor recreational shellfish harvests, monitor intertidal and crustacean fisheries, address emerging environmental issues, maintain a new data management infrastructure, and develop a disease and pest management program to protect shellfish fisheries in the Puget Sound.(18) $360,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $224,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the department to complete and maintain a statewide prioritization of fish passage barriers in collaboration with regional salmon recovery organizations.(19) $997,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $997,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely to continue the assessment of riparian ecosystems. The assessment must include identifying common statewide definitions of terms for riparian usage, recommendations to improve data sharing, and identifying any gaps in vegetated cover relative to a science-based standard for a fully functioning riparian ecosystem and comparing the status and gaps to water temperature impairments, known fish passage barriers, and status of salmonid stocks.(20) $419,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 is provided solely for the Lummi Nation to make infrastructure updates at the Skookum hatchery.(21) $285,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $285,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely to manage electronic tracked crab fishery gear to avoid whale entanglements during their migration as the agency develops a conservation plan to submit for an endangered species act incidental take permit.(22) $480,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $435,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely to equip officers with body worn cameras to advance public safety.(23) $158,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $163,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5371 (orca vessel protection).(24) $3,000,000 of the salmon recovery accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for pass-through to tribes of the upper Columbia river to support reintroduction of Chinook salmon above Grand Coulee and Chief Joseph dams.(25) $741,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $741,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for operation and maintenance capacity and technical assistance for state fish passage facilities.(26) $948,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $948,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely to continue operations of the Toutle and Skamania hatcheries.(27) $283,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $283,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely to create a statewide data management system with the department of natural resources and the state parks and recreation commission to make informed management decisions that meet conservation goals for public lands. The agencies will also collaborate with tribal governments to ensure cultural resources and cultural practices are considered and incorporated into management plans.(28) $385,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $385,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely to increase wildlife conflict specialists to address crop damage, dangerous wildlife interactions, and conflict preventative education and outreach.(29) $430,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $430,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $3,564,000 of the natural climate solutions accountâstate appropriation are provided solely to increase capacity in three aspects of the department's mission most vulnerable to climate change including species recovery planning, providing technical assistance, permitting, and planning support, and managing agency lands and infrastructure.(30) $1,752,000 of the climate commitment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the first phase of the department's sustainability plan, including advancing energy efficiency and renewable energy projects, creating a commute trip reduction program, and supporting foundational research and capacity-building.(31) $4,000,000 of the forest resiliency accountâstate appropriation and $2,000,000 of the natural climate solutions accountâstate appropriation are provided solely to reduce severe wildfire risk and increase forest resiliency through fuels reduction, thinning, fuel break creation, and prescribed burning on agency lands. The amounts provided in this subsection may not be used to fund agency indirect and administrative expenses. If Initiative Measure No. 2117 is approved in the 2024 general election, upon the effective date of the measure, funds from the consolidated climate account may not be used for the purposes in this subsection.(32)(a) $7,905,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $15,095,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the protection, recovery, and restoration of biodiversity, the recovery of threatened and endangered species, and a review of the department of fish and wildlife. Examples include habitat protection and restoration, technical assistance for growth management act planning, fish passage improvements, conservation education, scientific research for species and ecosystem protection, and similar activities. Funding in this subsection may include pass-throughs to public, nonprofit, academic, or tribal entities for the purposes of this subsection.(b) Of the amounts provided in this subsection, $205,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $95,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for a grant to the Ruckelshaus center for a review of the department of fish and wildlife, as referenced in (a) of this subsection. The review must focus on the department's efforts to fulfill its obligations as the trustee of state fish and wildlife on behalf of all current and future Washingtonians, to meet the mixed goals of the mandate set forth in RCW 77.04.012, and to respond to the equity principles articulated in RCW 43.06D.020. The review must explore the following areas and recommend changes as appropriate:(i) The department's ability to meet threats created by climate change and biodiversity loss;(ii) An alignment of mandate with the department's responsibility as a public trustee;(iii) The department's governance structure;(iv) The department's funding model; and(v) Accountability and transparency in department decision making at both the commission and management levels.(c) Within this scope, the Ruckelshaus center must also examine the following areas and provide recommendations as appropriate:(i) Fish and wildlife commission structure, composition, duties, and compensation;(ii) Influence on the department by special interest groups;(iii) The process by which the department uses science and social values in its decision making;(iv) Outreach and involvement of Washington citizens who have historically been excluded from fish and wildlife decisions, including nonconsumptive users and marginalized communities;(v) The department's adherence to state laws, including the state environmental policy act and the public records act; and(vi) Any other related issues that arise during the review.(d) Based on the results of the review, the Ruckelshaus center must provide options for making changes to the department's mandate and governance structure as deemed necessary to improve the department's ability to function as a trustee for state fish and wildlife.(e) The Ruckelshaus center must submit a report to the appropriate committees of the legislature by December 1, 2024.(33) $101,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $24,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for a contract with a nonprofit organization that operates a zoological garden in King county and that has developed an educators' toolkit for nature play programming for youth in communities historically excluded from nature experiences to provide inclusive nature-based programming statewide to children from racially, ethnically, and culturally diverse backgrounds.(34) $310,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $160,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the department to perform the following tasks related to net ecological gain:(a) Of the amount provided in this subsection, $160,000 in fiscal year 2024 and $160,000 in fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the department to facilitate a work group focused on developing a net ecological gain implementation framework.(i) Participation in the work group is as follows:(A) The work group must include representatives from the department, the department of commerce, the department of ecology, and the department of transportation; and(B) The work group may include representatives from, and consultation with, as appropriate, other state agencies, federally recognized Indian tribes, local governments, and other relevant stakeholders.(ii) The work group is responsible for accomplishing the following tasks:(A) Define net ecological gain criteria;(B) Create monitoring and assessment criteria related to net ecological gain;(C) Develop an assessment model to evaluate and quantify contributions to overall net ecological gain;(D) Consider the geographic scale at which net ecological gain criteria may be effectively applied;(E) Provide budget and policy recommendations for net ecological gain to the legislature and to the office of financial management;(F) Identify existing state-administered or state-funded programs and projects that:(I) Already contribute to net ecological gain;(II) Can or should give funding priority to funding applicants that commit to incorporating net ecological gain principles; and(III) Programs and projects that can or should have a net ecological gain requirement in the future; and(G) Generate interim recommendations for a project to serve as a net ecological gain proof of concept within a county that chooses to adopt a net ecological gain standard.(iii) The department may contract with an independent entity to facilitate the work group, including the tasks identified in (b) of this subsection.(iv) The work group must submit an interim and final report of its work, including any budget and policy recommendations, to the office of financial management and the appropriate committees of the legislature no later than June 30, 2024, and June 30, 2025.(b) Of the amount provided in this subsection, $150,000 in fiscal year 2024 is provided solely for the department to contract with an independent entity to perform the following tasks:(i) Review existing grant programs; and(ii) Make recommendations on the potential addition of net ecological gain into grant prioritization criteria.(35)(a) $700,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $700,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely to initiate a demonstration project to contribute to rebuilding of salmon runs in the Lake Washington basin through suppression of predatory fish species. The project shall include:(i) Removal of nonnative species and northern pike minnow using trap, nets, or other means;(ii) Assessment of the benefits of reduced predator abundance on juvenile salmon survival; and(iii) Assessment of the recreational fishing rules that were implemented in 2020 in the Lake Washington basin.(b) An interim report on the demonstration project must be provided to the appropriate committees of the legislature by December 1, 2024.(36) $270,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and (($57,000))$177,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for implementation of Substitute House Bill No. 1085 (plastic pollution).(37) $184,000 of the natural climate solutions accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 1170 (climate response strategy).(38) $1,026,000 of the climate commitment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 1181 (climate change/planning).(39) $620,000 of the climate commitment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 1216 (clean energy siting).(40) The department must report to and coordinate with the department of ecology to track expenditures from climate commitment act accounts, as defined and described in RCW 70A.65.300 and section 302(13) of this act.(41) $100,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 is provided solely for the department to enter into individual damage prevention contract agreements for the use of hiring range riders for proactive wolf-livestock conflict deterrence outside of the service area of the northeast Washington wolf-livestock management grant program as provided in RCW 16.76.020.(42) $175,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and (($175,000))$198,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for a conflict resolution process mediated by the federal mediation and conciliation service. This funding must be used by the department to facilitate meetings between Skagit tribes, drainage and irrigation districts, and state and federal resource agencies and support the technical work necessary to resolve conflict. Invited parties must include the national marine fisheries service, Washington state department of agriculture, Washington state department of fish and wildlife, Swinomish Indian tribal community, Upper Skagit Indian Tribe, Sauk-Suiattle Indian Tribe, and Skagit drainage and irrigation districts consortium LLC. A report documenting meeting notes, points of resolution, and recommendations must be provided to the legislature no later than June 30, 2025.(43) $500,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $500,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely to evaluate the abundance and distribution of white and green sturgeon on the Washington coast and Puget Sound tributaries and to evaluate genetic relatedness with Columbia and Fraser river sturgeon populations. The funding is also provided to increase monitoring of the abundance and distribution of eulachon to use the information as a baseline for sturgeon and eulachon management plans.(44) $235,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $409,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely to the department of fish and wildlife to proactively survey for wildlife disease risks and provide action plans and management for healthy wildlife in Washington.(45) $325,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 is provided solely for a contract with a nonprofit organization that operates a zoological garden in King county for the purpose of an outreach campaign on pollinator health issues. The pollinator outreach campaign is intended to further the mission of the department's pollinator conservation efforts and the department of agriculture's pollinator health task force goals.(46) Within amounts provided in this section, but not to exceed $20,000, the department must prioritize derelict and abandoned crab pot removal in north Hood Canal.(47) $1,175,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $1,175,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the department to continue to restore shrubsteppe habitat and associated wildlife on public lands as well as private lands by landowners who are willing to participate. The restoration effort must be coordinated with other natural resource agencies and interested stakeholders.(48) $5,000,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $5,000,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely to continue to address the maintenance backlog associated with providing recreation on lands managed by the department. Allowable uses include, but are not limited to, maintenance, repair, or replacement of trails, toilet facilities, roads, parking lots, campgrounds, picnic sites, water access areas, signs, kiosks, and gates. The department is encouraged to partner with nonprofit organizations in the maintenance of public lands.(49) $250,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $250,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the department to increase the work of regional fisheries enhancement groups.(50) $250,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $250,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for grants to commercial fishers to modify fishing gear in order to facilitate participation in the emerging commercial fishery in the lower Columbia river, and to fund staffing and supplies needed to monitor the emerging commercial fishery on the lower Columbia river. The purpose of the grants to modify fishing gear is to support the state's efforts to develop fishing tools that allow for increased harvest of hatchery fish while minimizing impacts to salmonid species listed as threatened or endangered under the federal endangered species act. The department must provide a report of goods and services purchased with grant funds to the appropriate committees of the legislature by June 30, 2025.(51) $1,657,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 ((is))and $1,440,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for habitat recovery and restoration work on agency owned and managed lands damaged from wildfires.(52) $443,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $6,313,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025, $86,000 of the limited fish and wildlife accountâstate appropriation, and $196,000 of the fish, wildlife, and conservation accountâstate appropriation are provided solely for additional safety capacity in each region, development of a technology solution for training requirements, increased support to remote employees, and a third-party review of the agency safety program.(53) $403,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 and $42,000 of the general fundâprivate/local appropriation are provided solely for two new positions to support statewide fish health through veterinary services and maintenance support for the fish marking trailer fleet.(54) $224,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely to conduct up to four community bear hazard assessments in communities with historical high levels of human-bear conflict. The department must submit a report to the appropriate committees of the legislature with initial funding recommendations to prioritize and implement the bear hazard assessments by December 31, 2024.(55) $1,810,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 and $1,810,000 of the general fundâ((federal))private/local appropriation are provided solely for monitoring and response efforts for invasive quagga mussels, which were discovered on the Snake river in Idaho in July 2023. Possible activities include coordination with tribal, federal, regional, state, and local entities, watercraft inspections and decontamination, equipment and training, monitoring of potential residential and commercial pathways, and public outreach. Matching federal funds are anticipated from a United States army corps of engineers invasive mussel cost-share program.(56) $100,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for a grant to an organization based in Friday harbor that is focused on orcas and proposes to fill knowledge gaps through conservation research, arm policymakers with the latest available science, and engage the public with accessible information to:(a) Use scent detection dogs to noninvasively collect fecal material to monitor and track the health of southern resident killer whales, including reproductive health, nutrition, and impacts from pollutants; and(b) Coordinate with the department on relevant research, as appropriate.(57) $100,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for elk management in the Skagit valley in cooperation with affected tribes and landowners. Authorized expenditures include, but are not limited to, mitigation of the impacts of elk on agricultural crop production through elk fencing and related equipment, replacement seed and fertilizer to offset losses caused by elk, and elk deterrent equipment.(58) $222,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for implementation of Substitute House Bill No. 2293 (avian predation/salmon). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2024, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.(59) $801,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for the department to rebuild an Autofish marking system.(60) $184,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $650,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5784 (deer & elk crop damage). Of the amounts provided in this subsection, $50,000 in fiscal year 2025 is provided for a grant to the Yakama nation for participation in an elk collaring pilot project. If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2024, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.(61) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, the department shall identify opportunities and spend available fund balance in the limited fish and wildlife accountâstate appropriation that do not diminish the department's ability to meet statutorily required obligations for the ensuing fiscal biennia.Sec. 1308. 2024 c 376 s 309 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE PUGET SOUND PARTNERSHIPGeneral FundâState Appropriation (FY 2024). . . .$9,217,000General FundâState Appropriation (FY 2025). . . .(($9,288,000))Â Â Â Â Â $8,858,000General FundâFederal Appropriation. . . .$32,043,000Aquatic Lands Enhancement AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$1,504,000Model Toxics Control Operating AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$1,351,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($53,403,000))Â Â Â Â Â $52,973,000The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) By October 15, 2024, the Puget Sound partnership shall provide the governor and appropriate legislative fiscal committees a single, prioritized list of state agency 2025-2027 capital and operating budget requests related to Puget Sound recovery and restoration.(2) $14,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 1170 (climate response strategy).(3) $350,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $350,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the partnership to implement shipping noise reduction initiatives and monitoring programs in the Puget Sound, in coordination with Canadian and United States authorities. The partnership must contract with Washington maritime blue in order to establish and administer the quiet sound program to better understand and reduce the cumulative effects of acoustic and physical disturbance from large commercial vessels on southern resident orcas throughout their range in Washington state. Washington maritime blue will support a quiet sound leadership committee and work groups that include relevant federal and state agencies, ports, industry, research institutions, and nongovernmental organizations and consult early and often with relevant federally recognized tribes.Sec. 1309. 2024 c 376 s 310 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCESGeneral FundâState Appropriation (FY 2024). . . .$180,560,000General FundâState Appropriation (FY 2025). . . .(($159,163,000))Â Â Â Â Â $202,934,000General FundâFederal Appropriation. . . .(($98,151,000))Â Â Â Â Â $117,327,000General FundâPrivate/Local Appropriation. . . .(($6,054,000))Â Â Â Â Â $7,009,000Access Road Revolving Nonappropriated AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$108,000Climate Commitment AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$12,682,000Derelict Structure Removal AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$325,000Forest Development AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$58,600,000Forest Fire Protection Assessment NonappropriatedAccountâState Appropriation. . . .$88,000Forest Health Revolving Nonappropriated AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$106,000Natural Climate Solutions AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$40,164,000Natural Resources Federal Lands RevolvingNonappropriated AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$6,000ORV and Nonhighway Vehicle AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$7,995,000State Forest Nursery Revolving NonappropriatedAccountâState Appropriation. . . .$34,000Surveys and Maps AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$2,381,000Aquatic Lands Enhancement AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$21,933,000Resource Management Cost AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$123,297,000Surface Mining Reclamation AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$4,717,000Disaster Response AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$23,642,000Forest and Fish Support AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$12,687,000Aquatic Land Dredged Material Disposal Site AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$405,000Natural Resources Conservation Areas StewardshipAccountâState Appropriation. . . .$212,000Forest Practices Application AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$2,189,000Air Pollution Control AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$922,000Model Toxics Control Operating AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$2,774,000Wildfire Response, Forest Restoration, and CommunityResilience AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$120,277,000Derelict Vessel Removal AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$10,649,000Community Forest Trust AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$52,000Agricultural College Trust Management AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$4,432,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($894,605,000))Â Â Â Â Â $958,507,000The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) $1,857,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $1,857,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the department to carry out the forest practices adaptive management program pursuant to RCW 76.09.370 and the May 24, 2012, settlement agreement entered into by the department and the department of ecology. Scientific research must be carried out according to the master project schedule and work plan of cooperative monitoring, evaluation, and research priorities adopted by the forest practices board.(2) $1,000,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $1,000,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the small forest landowner office, in order to restore staffing capacity reduced during the great recession and to support small forest landowners, including assistance related to forest and fish act regulations.(3) $1,583,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $1,515,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for deposit into the agricultural college trust management account and are provided solely to manage approximately 70,700 acres of Washington State University's agricultural college trust lands.(4) $88,617,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024, (($60,883,000))$104,982,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $16,050,000 of the disaster response accountâstate appropriation are provided solely for emergency response, including fire suppression. The department shall provide a monthly report to the office of financial management and the appropriate fiscal and policy committees of the legislature with an update of fire suppression costs incurred and the number and type of wildfires suppressed.(5) $5,647,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $8,470,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $330,000 of the disaster response accountâstate appropriation are provided solely for indirect and administrative expenses related to fire suppression.(6) $5,500,000 of the forest and fish support accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for outcome-based performance contracts with tribes to participate in the implementation of the forest practices program. Contracts awarded may only contain indirect costs set at or below the rate in the contracting tribe's indirect cost agreement with the federal government. Of the amount provided in this subsection, $500,000 is contingent upon receipts under RCW 82.04.261 exceeding $8,000,000 per biennium. If receipts under RCW 82.04.261 are more than $8,000,000 but less than $8,500,000 for the biennium, an amount equivalent to the difference between actual receipts and $8,500,000 shall lapse.(7) Consistent with the recommendations of the Wildfire Suppression Funding and Costs (18-02) report of the joint legislative audit and review committee, the department shall submit a report to the governor and legislature by December 1, 2023, and December 1, 2024, describing the previous fire season. At a minimum, the report shall provide information for each wildfire in the state, including its location, impact by type of land ownership, the extent it involved timber or range lands, cause, size, costs, and cost-share with federal agencies and nonstate partners. The report must also be posted on the agency's website.(8) $4,206,000 of the aquatic land enhancement accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the removal of creosote pilings and debris from the marine environment and to continue monitoring zooplankton and eelgrass beds on state-owned aquatic lands managed by the department. Actions will address recommendations to recover the southern resident orca population and to monitor ocean acidification as well as help implement the Puget Sound action agenda.(9) $279,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $286,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for compensation to the trust beneficiaries and department for lost revenue from leases to amateur radio operators who use space on the department managed radio towers for their equipment. The department is authorized to lease sites at the rate of up to $100 per year, per site, per lessee. The legislature makes this appropriation to fulfill the remaining costs of the leases at market rate per RCW 79.13.510.(10) $2,500,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $3,280,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the department to collect and refresh statewide lidar data.(11) $1,200,000 of the resource management cost accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the agency to pursue opportunities to provide workforce housing on state trust lands.(12)(a) $1,500,000 of the natural climate solutions accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the department, in close collaboration with the department of ecology, to convene a group composed of a balanced representation of experts and stakeholders to conduct a state ecosystem services inventory and develop a state lands ecosystem services asset plan. The plan must outline how state lands under the department's jurisdiction can be monetized, including ecosystem services credits, and utilized to reduce the overall greenhouse emissions, or increase greenhouse gas sequestration and storage, in the state, including both public and private emissions.(b) In developing the plan, the department must:(i) Conduct a resource and asset inventory to identify all state-owned or controlled lands under its jurisdiction that could be eligible or utilized in ecosystem services credits, including carbon offset markets;(ii) Explore opportunities for the department to utilize its inventoried proprietary assets in offering ecosystem services credits, including carbon offset credits, both under the regulatory offset programs, such as the one established under RCW 70A.65.170, and existing or future voluntary, private ecosystem service markets, including carbon offset programs;(iii) Develop a marginal cost abatement model to inform highest and best use of state assets in ecosystem services markets, including carbon markets;(iv) Conduct a needs assessment in relation to marketing state-owned carbon assets on state lands under the department's jurisdiction to third party developers, including a proposed implementation plan and recommendations for plan execution;(v) Identify any known or suspected policy or regulatory limitations to the formation and full execution of the ecosystem services inventory and asset plan identified above;(vi) Create an implementation plan for a virtual dashboard where public and private sector participants in regulatory or voluntary carbon markets can locate the inventory created under this subsection, understand the marginal cost abatement model, and locate any requests for proposals from state asset-involved carbon projects on lands under the department's jurisdiction; and(vii) Make recommendations for the creation of an ecosystems services equity and innovation account that includes:(A) New modes of ecosystem services; and(B) Identification of new or different beneficiaries of carbon investments that increase the participation of historically marginalized groups in ecosystem service opportunities.(c) The department must report its progress and findings under this subsection to the legislature no later than December 31, 2024.(13) $3,166,000 of the natural climate solutions accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for silvicultural treatments on forested trust lands in western Washington to support maintenance of healthy, resilient forests as a critical component of climate adaptation and mitigation efforts.(14) $2,185,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $1,705,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for increased law enforcement capacity on agency managed lands, to develop a statewide recreation plan, and to jointly create a statewide data management system with the Washington department of fish and wildlife and the state parks and recreation commission to make informed management decisions that meet conservation goals for public lands. The agencies will also collaborate with tribal governments to ensure cultural resources and cultural practices are considered and incorporated into management plans.(15) $2,066,000 of the natural climate solutions accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the agency to develop a comprehensive strategy to tackle barriers to reforestation, including through expanding seed collection, increasing the capacity of the state's public nursery, and addressing workforce needs.(16) $2,864,000 of the natural climate solutions accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the agency to implement aspects of their watershed resilience action plan for the Snohomish watershed, including activities to support kelp and eelgrass stewardship, a large woody debris program, aquatic restoration grants, and culvert removal.(17) $5,991,000 of the natural climate solutions accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for investment in urban forestry to support reduction of negative environmental conditions such as heat, flooding, and pollution and helping communities become greener, cleaner, healthier, and more resilient.(18) $7,791,000 of the climate commitment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the agency to analyze current infrastructure and build a plan for the department to achieve its greenhouse gas emission reduction targets.(19) $2,365,000 of the climate commitment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the department to make investments in education and training to bolster a statewide natural resources workforce to support the health and resilience of Washington's forests. Of this amount, $800,000 is provided solely to provide wildland fire management training to tribal communities and members.(20) $3,356,000 of the natural climate solutions accountâstate appropriation is provided solely to increase the agency's capacity to provide active management of department of natural resources natural areas.(21) $1,500,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $1,500,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $1,817,000 of the aquatic lands enhancement accountâstate appropriation are provided solely for full-time and seasonal crews from the Washington conservation corps and other corps programs to conduct work benefiting the management of state managed lands, including aquatic reserves management, natural areas restoration and conservation, trail work, and forest resiliency activities as well as other recreation and habitat projects with agency partners.(22)(a) $475,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $253,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $62,000 of the model toxics control operating accountâstate appropriation are provided solely for a geoduck task force. Of the amounts provided in this subsection, $411,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $208,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are for the department's costs for the task force, and the remaining amounts are for the department to provide to the department of ecology, the department of fish and wildlife, and the Puget Sound partnership for their projected costs for the task force.(b) The task force must investigate opportunities to reduce negative impacts to tribal treaty and state geoduck harvest and promote long-term opportunities to expand or sustain geoduck harvest. The task force must provide a report to the commissioner of public lands and the legislature, in compliance with RCW 43.01.036, by December 1, 2024, that includes analysis and recommendations related to the following elements:(i) The feasibility of intervention to enhance the wildstock of geoduck, including reseeding projects;(ii) Factors that are preventing areas from being classified for commercial harvest of wildstock geoduck or factors that are leading to existing wildstock geoduck commercial tract classification downgrade, and recommendations to sustainably and cost-effectively increase the number and area of harvestable tracts, including:(A) Consideration of opportunities and recommendations presented in previous studies and reports;(B) An inventory of wastewater treatment plant and surface water runoff point sources impacting state and tribal geoduck harvesting opportunities within the classified commercial shellfish growing areas in Puget Sound;(C) A ranking of outfalls and point sources identified in (b)(ii)(B) of this subsection prioritized for future correction to mitigate downgraded classification of areas with commercial geoduck harvest opportunity;(D) An inventory of wildstock geoduck tracts that are most impacted by poor water quality or other factors impacting classification;(E) Consideration of the role of sediment load and urban runoff, and pathways to mitigate these impacts; and(F) Recommendations for future actions to improve the harvest quantity of wildstock geoduck and to prioritize areas that can attain improved classification most readily, while considering the influence of outfalls ranked pursuant to (b)(ii)(C) of this subsection.(c) The commissioner of public lands must invite the following representatives to participate in the task force:(i) A representative of the department of natural resources, who shall serve as the chair of the task force;(ii) Representatives of tribes with treaty or reserved rights to geoduck harvest in Washington state;(iii) A representative of the department of ecology;(iv) A representative of the department of health;(v) A representative of the department of fish and wildlife;(vi) A representative of the Puget Sound partnership; and(vii) A representative of the academic community.(d) The commissioner of public lands must appoint each representative. The commissioner may invite and appoint other individuals to the task force, not to exceed the number of seats of tribal entities.(e) Members of the task force may be reimbursed for travel expenses as authorized in RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.(23) $636,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $353,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute House Bill No. 1032 (wildfires/electric utilities).(24) $65,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $55,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for implementation of Substitute House Bill No. 1085 (plastic pollution).(25) $350,000 of the natural climate solutions accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 1170 (climate response strategy).(26) $250,000 of the climate commitment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 1181 (climate change/planning).(27) $164,000 of the climate commitment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 1216 (clean energy siting).(28) $591,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $552,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5433 (derelict aquatic structures).(29) $431,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $331,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Substitute House Bill No. 1498 (aviation assurance funding).(30) $2,500,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $2,822,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute House Bill No. 1578 (wildland fire safety). Of the amounts provided in this subsection, $322,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for the agency to operate the post-fire debris flow program.(31) The department must report to and coordinate with the department of ecology to track expenditures from climate commitment act accounts, as defined and described in RCW 70A.65.300 and section 302(13) of this act.(32) $1,000,000 of the model toxics control operating accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for tire removal projects in Puget Sound, with specific priority to remove tire reefs.(33) $321,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $427,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for implementation of Senate Bill No. 5390 (forestlands/safeharbor).(34) $70,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $30,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the department to advance research and cooperation with governmental agencies of Finland and Finnish organizations to implement sustainable forestry practices. The department must report to the appropriate committees of the legislature by June 30, 2024, on the use of the funds and the research conducted and cooperation accomplished, and make recommendations for further opportunities for collaboration.(35) $278,000 of the natural climate solutions accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the department to perform coordination and monitoring related to Puget Sound kelp conservation and recovery.(36) $312,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $313,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the department to coordinate with the Olympic natural resources center to study emerging ecosystem threats such as Swiss needlecast disease, fully implement the T3 watershed experiments on state trust lands, continue field trials for long-term ecosystem productivity, and engage stakeholders through learning-based collaboration. The department may expend up to $30,000 in one fiscal year to conduct Swiss needlecast surveys.(37) $300,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $300,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the department to continue the work specified in section 3291, chapter 413, Laws of 2019 to assess public school seismic safety for school buildings not yet assessed, focused on highest risk areas of the state as a priority.(38) $10,000,000 of the natural climate solutions accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the department to prepare commercial thinning timber sales for the purposes of restoring spotted owl and riparian habitat as specified in the 1997 state lands habitat conservation plan, facilitating access to more timber volume than is possible under normal operating funding and increasing carbon sequestration. Thinning operations in designated spotted owl management areas must be conducted in stands that do not yet meet spotted owl habitat conditions. Thinning in riparian areas must comply with department procedures for restoring riparian habitat under the 1997 state lands habitat conservation plan.(39) $5,000,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $5,000,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely to continue to address the maintenance backlog associated with providing recreation on lands managed by the department. Allowable uses include, but are not limited to, maintenance, repair, or replacement of trails, toilet facilities, roads, parking lots, campgrounds, picnic sites, water access areas, signs, kiosks, and gates. The department is encouraged to partner with nonprofit organizations in the maintenance of public lands.(40) $175,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $175,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the department to implement a pilot project to evaluate the costs and benefits of marketing and selling specialty forest products including cedar salvage, alder, and other hardwood products. The pilot project must include: Identifying suitable areas for hardwood or cedar sales within the administrative areas of the Olympic and Pacific Cascade regions, preparing and conducting sales, and evaluating the costs and benefits from conducting the sales.(a) The pilot project must include an evaluation that:(i) Determines if revenues from the sales are sufficient to cover the costs of preparing and conducting the sales;(ii) Identifies and evaluates factors impacting the sales, including regulatory constraints, staffing levels, or other limitations;(iii) Compares the specialty sales to other timber sales that combine the sale of cedar and hardwoods with other species;(iv) Evaluates the bidder pool for the pilot sales and other factors that impact the costs and revenues received from the sales; and(v) Evaluates the current and future prices and market trends for cedar salvage and hardwood species.(b) The department must work with affected stakeholders and report to the appropriate committees of the legislature with the results of the pilot project and make recommendations for any changes to statute by June 30, 2025.(41) $857,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for the department to implement eradication and control measures on European green crabs on state-owned aquatic lands and adjacent lands as appropriate. The department must report to and coordinate with the department of fish and wildlife to support the department of fish and wildlife's quarterly progress reports to the legislature.(42) (($847,000))$719,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 and $473,000 of the model toxics control operating accountâstate appropriation are provided solely for the department to develop an authorized target shooting range as an alternative to dispersed shooting, lead a stakeholder-driven process to identify potential additional locations for target shooting ranges, and address lead pollution in known dispersed shooting sites.(43) $524,000 of the resource management cost accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the agency to supplement the cost of the contract with the department of fish and wildlife for biological geoduck survey work. Within existing appropriations, the department must develop a proposal with the department of fish and wildlife for the equitable and sustainable ongoing funding of this work.(44) $593,000 of the natural climate solutions accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the department to conduct remote sensing, stressor studies, and imagery and survey work of kelp forests and eelgrass meadows pursuant to RCW 79.135.440 and manage the native kelp forest and eelgrass meadow health and conservation plan. If Initiative Measure No. 2117 is approved in the 2024 general election, upon the effective date of the measure, funds from the consolidated climate account may not be used for the purposes in this subsection.(45) $10,000,000 of the natural climate solutions accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for forest treatments in areas where they have the greatest potential to prevent wildfires and protect air quality. If Initiative Measure No. 2117 is approved in the 2024 general election, upon the effective date of the measure, funds from the consolidated climate account may not be used for the purposes in this subsection.(46) $83,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5667 (forestry riparian easements). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2024, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.(47) $862,000 of the climate commitment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 6039 (geothermal energy resources). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2024, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse. Funds provided in this subsection may not be expended or obligated prior to January 1, 2025. If Initiative Measure No. 2117 is approved in the general election, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse upon the effective date of the measure.(48) $307,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Senate Bill No. 6120 (wildland urban interface). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2024, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.(49) $300,000 of the model toxics control operating accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for a grant for the removal of tires containing 6PPD from docks serving floatplanes in salmon-bearing waterways. Funds may be used to reduce the cost of conversion to alternative products that are free of 6PPD.Sec. 1310. 2024 c 376 s 311 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF AGRICULTUREGeneral FundâState Appropriation (FY 2024). . . .$60,747,000General FundâState Appropriation (FY 2025). . . .(($79,848,000))Â Â Â Â Â $79,528,000General FundâFederal Appropriation. . . .(($48,282,000))Â Â Â Â Â $60,513,000General FundâPrivate/Local Appropriation. . . .$193,000Agricultural Pest and Disease Response AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$1,000,000Aquatic Lands Enhancement AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$2,863,000Climate Commitment AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$7,376,000Natural Climate Solutions AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$261,000Water Quality Permit AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$73,000Model Toxics Control Operating AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .(($13,822,000))Â Â Â Â Â $14,229,000Northeast Washington Wolf-Livestock ManagementNonappropriated AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$1,600,000Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery FundâFederalAppropriation. . . .$36,875,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($252,940,000))Â Â Â Â Â $265,258,000The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) $18,000,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $17,000,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely to continue the we feed Washington program, a state alternative to the United States department of agriculture farmers to families food box program, and provide resources for hunger relief organizations.(2) $4,000,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and (($4,000,000))$3,658,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for local food system infrastructure and market access grants.(3) $4,992,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and (($3,655,000))$4,105,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for implementing a Popillia japonica monitoring and eradication program in central Washington.(4) $5,000,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $20,000,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $15,000,000 of the coronavirus state fiscal recovery fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely for implementing the emergency food assistance program as defined in RCW 43.23.290.(5) $246,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024, (($246,000))$401,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and (($1,550,000))$1,889,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely for implementing a Vespa mandarinia eradication program.(6) $1,600,000 of the northeast Washington wolf-livestock management nonappropriated accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the department to conduct the following:(a) Offer grants for the northeast Washington wolf-livestock management program as provided in RCW 16.76.020, in the amount of $1,400,000 for the biennium.(i) Funds from the grant program must be used only for the deployment of nonlethal deterrence, specifically with the goal to reduce the likelihood of cattle being injured or killed by wolves by deploying proactive, preventative methods that have a high probability of producing effective results. Grant proposals will be assessed partially on this intent. Grantees who use funds for range riders or herd monitoring must deploy this tool in a manner so that targeted areas with cattle are visited daily or near daily. Grantees must collaborate with other grantees of the program and other entities providing prevention efforts resulting in coordinated wolf-livestock conflict deterrence efforts, both temporally and spatially, therefore providing well timed and placed preventative coverage on the landscape. Additionally, range riders must document their activities with GPS track logs and provide written description of their efforts to the department of fish and wildlife on a monthly basis. The department shall incorporate the requirements of this subsection into contract language with the grantees.(ii) In order to provide continuity of services to meet the long-term intent of the program, no less than $1,100,000 of the funding allocated in this subsection (a) shall be awarded to entities who have proven ability to meet program intent as described in (a)(i) of this subsection and who have been awarded funds through this grant program or pass-through funds from the northeast Washington wolf-livestock management nonappropriated account in the past. The remaining $300,000 may be awarded to new applicants whose applications meet program intent and all of other requirements of the program. If no applications from new entities are deemed qualified, the unused funds shall be awarded in equal amounts to successful grantees. The department retains the final decision making authority over disbursement of funds. Annual reports from grantees will be assessed for how well grant objectives were met and used to decide whether future grant funds will be awarded to past grantees.(b) Within the amounts provided in this subsection, the department must provide $100,000 each fiscal year to the sheriffs offices of Ferry and Stevens counties for providing a local wildlife specialist to aid the department of fish and wildlife in the management of wolves in northeast Washington.(7) $1,000,000 of the coronavirus state fiscal recovery fundâfederal appropriation is provided solely for grants and technical assistance to producers and processors for meat and poultry processing.(8) $842,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $822,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for implementation of chapter 135, Laws of 2022, which requires the department to establish cannabis testing lab quality standards by rule.(9) $3,038,000 of the climate commitment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely to implement organic materials legislation passed in the 2022 legislative session.(10) $200,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $200,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely to contract with Washington State University's IMPACT Center to conduct an analysis of the threats, barriers, and challenges facing the state's agricultural producers.(11) $581,000 of the climate commitment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely to implement a science-based, voluntary software program called saving tomorrow's agricultural resources (STAR) which provide producers tools to track soil health improvements and the ability to generate market-based incentives.(12) (($1,492,000))$1,392,000 of the model toxics control operating accountâstate appropriation is provided solely to increase capacity and support work to reduce nitrate pollution in groundwater from irrigated agriculture in the lower Yakima valley.(13) $502,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024, (($88,000))$514,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and (($1,053,000))$1,434,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely to match federal funding for eradication treatments and follow-up monitoring of invasive moths.(14) $120,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $120,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely to continue the early detection program for the spotted lanternfly and the associated invasive Ailanthus altissima, known colloquially as tree-of-heaven, survey and control programs.(15) $90,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $90,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the department to implement changes that advance equity for underrepresented farmers and ranchers in the department's programs and services. In carrying out this duty, the department may focus on implementation of:(a) Proequity and inclusion strategies within the activities and services of the regional markets program;(b) Recommendations from the department's 2022 report to the legislature on equity for underrepresented farmers and ranchers; and(c) Community-generated suggestions resulting from stakeholder engagement activities. In carrying out this duty, the department may engage with underrepresented farmers and ranchers to advise and provide guidance as the department works to implement changes to improve equity and inclusion in the department's services and programs, and where possible in the agricultural industry more broadly.(16) $261,000 of the natural climate solutions accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 1170 (climate response strategy).(17) $200,000 of the climate commitment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 1216 (clean energy siting).(18) $116,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $110,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for implementation of Substitute House Bill No. 1500 (cottage food sales cap).(19) The department must report to and coordinate with the department of ecology to track expenditures from climate commitment act accounts, as defined and described in RCW 70A.65.300 and section 302(13) of this act.(20) $100,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $100,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for a grant to a community-based organization in Whatcom county for the food and farm finder program, which connects local food producers with retail and wholesale consumers throughout the state.(21) $10,600,000 of the coronavirus state fiscal recovery fundâfederal appropriation is provided solely for local food system infrastructure and market access grants, the emergency food assistance program, and a state farmers to families food box program. The total expenditures from the coronavirus state fiscal recovery fundâfederal for these purposes in fiscal year 2023 and fiscal year 2024 may not exceed the total amounts provided in section 311(1), (3), and (7), chapter 334, Laws of 2021, from the coronavirus state fiscal recovery fundâfederal for these purposes.(22) $47,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $47,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5263 (psilocybin).(23) $200,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $200,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the department to provide a grant to a food bank in Pierce county for the continued provision of food bank services to low-income individuals, including costs related to the potential relocation of the food bank.(24) $128,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $127,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for a grant to the Tri-Cities food bank for operations including food storage.(25) $170,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $170,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely to continue a shellfish coordinator position.(26) $635,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $635,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for compliance-based laboratory analysis of pesticides in cannabis.(27) $220,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for the agency to partner with the department of commerce to conduct a study to better understand the opportunities and challenges of using hemp as a building material.(28) $112,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $683,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the agency to partner with organizations to promote diversity and develop agricultural leadership and educational opportunities.(29) $250,000 of the climate commitment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the department to facilitate a work group and prepare a comprehensive report with recommendations regarding the establishment of a grant program to support farmers in the purchase of green fertilizer produced within the state of Washington.(a) The work group convened by the department shall include representatives from the department of ecology, the department of commerce, Washington state agricultural organizations, manufacturers of green fertilizer products, and other relevant stakeholders as determined by the department.(b) The work group shall review, analyze, and propose the structure of a grant program designed to encourage farmers to purchase green fertilizer produced within the state of Washington. The review shall include considerations of:(i) The environmental benefits of green fertilizer;(ii) Economic impacts on farmers;(iii) The development and capacity of local green fertilizer manufacturers; and(iv) Ensuring equitable access to the grant program among different agricultural sectors.(c) The department shall submit a comprehensive report of its findings and recommendations to the governor and appropriate committees of the legislature no later than November 1, 2024, including a detailed plan for the administration of the proposed grant program and a recommended funding level. The report shall include legislative and regulatory changes, if necessary, to establish and manage the program effectively.(d) If Initiative Measure No. 2117 is approved in the 2024 general election, upon the effective date of the measure, funds from the consolidated climate account may not be used for the purposes in this subsection.(30) $131,000 of the climate commitment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for a climate lead position. Funds provided in this subsection may not be expended or obligated prior to January 1, 2025. If Initiative Measure No. 2117 is approved in the general election, this subsection is null and void upon the effective date of the measure.(31) $250,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided to the department to complete an assessment of current animal welfare issues, such as animal abandonment, rescue organization operations, and veterinary services shortages and costs. The assessment may include an estimated fiscal investment and recommendations needed to improve the animal health and welfare system in Washington. The department must report on the assessment to the appropriate committees of the legislature by June 30, 2025.(((33)))(32) $3,176,000 of the climate commitment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 2301 (waste material management). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2024, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse. Funds provided in this subsection may not be expended or obligated prior to January 1, 2025. If Initiative Measure No. 2117 is approved in the general election, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse upon the effective date of the measure.(((34)))(33) $1,000,000 of the agricultural pest and disease response accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Substitute House Bill No. 2147 (agriculture pests & diseases). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2024, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.(((35)))(34) $250,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely to convene and staff a work group to provide recommendations on mental health and suicide prevention for agricultural producers, farm workers, and their families, including whether an agricultural mental health hotline should be established. The work group must be cochaired by one member from the department and one other member selected from the work group. The department must provide a draft report to the appropriate committees of the legislature summarizing the work group's recommendations by December 31, 2024, and a final report by June 30, 2025. The work group must include:(a) One member from each of the two largest caucuses of the senate, appointed by the president of the senate;(b) One member from each of the two largest caucuses of the house of representatives, appointed by the speaker of the house of representatives;(c) One mental health care provider from an agricultural area in western Washington, appointed by the department;(d) One mental health care provider from a rural area in eastern Washington, appointed by the department;(e) Two members from an agricultural organization, appointed by the department; and(f) Two members from the department, appointed by the department.(((36)))(35) $250,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $250,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for a grant to a Washington based nonprofit organization that supports farmworkers to help develop and share farmworker ideas to improve production in ways that are meaningful to both workers and growers. These funds must be used to conduct outreach to farmworkers, provide support, and facilitate access to educational materials, tools, and technology to further the engagement and collaboration of both farmworkers and their employers.(((37)))(36) $315,000 of the model toxics control operating accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5972 (neonicotinoid pesticides). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2024, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.(((38)))(37) $400,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for grants to farmers to help offset the costs of gaining organic certification and the associated inspection fees.(((39)))(38)(a) $250,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for the department to administer a grant program to farmers to promote hiring local workers, providing locally grown food, reducing transportation pollution, and strengthening food sovereignty and climate and disaster resiliency.(b) To qualify for the grant program, the farm must grow handpicked specialty crop vegetables that are provided to local markets or schools, hire only domestic agricultural workers, and be owned and operated by a state resident.(c) Under the grant program, each farm submitting proof of eligibility for the grant program to the department may be offered grant funding in an amount up to the equivalent of four weeks of their paid overtime hours during peak harvest for their specialty crop vegetable, up to $20,000.(((40) $2,000,000))(39) $1,750,000 of the model toxics control operating accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for research, including, but not limited to, ongoing research and trial research; larger scale treatment trials; and permit development, including required monitoring and review, to assist with development of an integrated pest management plan to find a suitable replacement for imidacloprid to address burrowing shrimp in Willapa bay and Grays Harbor and facilitate continued shellfish cultivation on tidelands. In selecting research recipients for this purpose, the department must incorporate the advice of the Willapa-Grays Harbor working group formed on October 15, 2019. Up to eight percent of the amount provided in this subsection may be used by the department to reimburse any participating group or individual for their expenses associated with meeting participation, preparation, or travel, in accordance with chapter 43.03 RCW.(End of part)PART XIVTRANSPORTATIONSec. 1401. 2024 c 376 s 401 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF LICENSINGGeneral FundâState Appropriation (FY 2024). . . .$4,042,000General FundâState Appropriation (FY 2025). . . .(($3,670,000))Â Â Â Â Â $3,161,000Architects' License AccountâState Appropriation. . . .(($1,825,000))Â Â Â Â Â $1,522,000Climate Investment AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$30,000,000Real Estate Commission AccountâState Appropriation. . . .(($15,771,000))Â Â Â Â Â $16,961,000Uniform Commercial Code AccountâState Appropriation. . . .(($3,534,000))Â Â Â Â Â $3,908,000Real Estate Education Program AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$308,000Real Estate Appraiser Commission AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .(($2,398,000))Â Â Â Â Â $2,640,000Business and Professions AccountâState Appropriation. . . .(($31,377,000))Â Â Â Â Â $29,696,000Real Estate Research AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$461,000Firearms Range AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$74,000Funeral and Cemetery AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$125,000Landscape Architects' License AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$95,000Appraisal Management Company AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$258,000Concealed Pistol License Renewal NotificationAccountâState Appropriation. . . .(($142,000))Â Â Â Â Â $146,000Geologists' AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$55,000Derelict Vessel Removal AccountâState Appropriation. . . .(($37,000))Â Â Â Â Â $41,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($94,172,000))Â Â Â Â Â $93,493,000The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) (($142,000))$146,000 of the concealed pistol license renewal notification accountâstate appropriation and $74,000 of the firearms range accountâstate appropriation are provided solely to implement chapter 74, Laws of 2017 (concealed pistol license).(2) $6,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $9,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025, $8,000 of the architects' license accountâstate appropriation, $74,000 of the real estate commission accountâstate appropriation, $14,000 of the uniform commercial code accountâstate appropriation, $10,000 of the real estate appraiser commission accountâstate appropriation, and $139,000 of the business and professions accountâstate appropriation are provided solely for the department to redesign and improve its online services and website, and are subject to the conditions, limitations, and review requirements of section 701 of this act.(3) $7,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $9,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025, $5,000 of the architects' license accountâstate appropriation, $43,000 of the real estate commission accountâstate appropriation, $8,000 of the uniform commercial code accountâstate appropriation, $8,000 of the real estate appraiser commission accountâstate appropriation, $166,000 of the business and professions accountâstate appropriation, $9,000 of the funeral and cemetery accountâstate appropriation, $3,000 of the landscape architects' license accountâstate appropriation, $2,000 of the appraisal management company accountâstate appropriation, and $5,000 of the geologists' accountâstate appropriation are provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute House Bill No. 1009 (military spouse employment).(4) $20,000 of the business and professions accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of House Bill No. 1017 (cosmetologists, licenses, etc.).(5) $320,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 1143 (firearms purchase and transfer).(6) $5,000 of the architects' license accountâstate appropriation, $31,000 of the real estate commission accountâstate appropriation, $5,000 of the real estate appraiser commission accountâstate appropriation, $64,000 of the business and professions accountâstate appropriation, $5,000 of the funeral and cemetery accountâstate appropriation, $5,000 of the landscape architects' license accountâstate appropriation, $5,000 of the appraisal management company accountâstate appropriation, and $5,000 of the geologists' accountâstate appropriation are provided solely for implementation of House Bill No. 1301 (license review and requirements).(7) $25,000 of the real estate commission accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5191 (real estate agency).(8) $19,000 of the funeral and cemetery accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5261 (cemetery authority deadlines).(9) $308,000 of the real estate appraiser commission accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed House Bill No. 1797 (real estate appraisers).(10)(a) $30,000,000 of the climate investment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for payments to support farm fuel users and transporters who have purchased fuel for agricultural purposes that is exempt from the requirements of the climate commitment act, as described in RCW 70A.65.080(7)(e). The payment structure outlined in (b) of this subsection is intended to:(i) Benefit farming and transportation operations, prioritizing noncorporate farms;(ii) Enable ease of use and accessibility for recipients; and(iii) Promote speed and efficiency in administering the payments.(b) The department must use a tiered system of payments based on the annual number of gallons of agricultural fuel consumed, as determined by the farm fuel user or transporter in a signed attestation. The department shall use the following payment tiers:(i) $600 to recipients with annual agricultural fuel use of less than 1,000 gallons;(ii) $2,300 to recipients with annual agricultural fuel use greater than or equal to 1,000 gallons and less than 4,000 gallons; and(iii) $3,400 to recipients with annual agricultural fuel use greater than or equal to 4,000 gallons and less than 10,000 gallons; and(iv) $4,500 to recipients with annual agricultural fuel use greater than or equal to 10,000 gallons.(c) Recipients of payments under this subsection may submit receipts and other documentation as part of their attestation showing that they were overcharged for fuel costs due to the impact of chapter 70A.65 RCW.(d) The department may use no more than five percent of the amounts appropriated for this specific purpose on administration. The department must begin providing payments by September 1, 2024. If Initiative Measure No. 2117 is approved in the 2024 general election, upon the effective date of the measure, funds from the consolidated climate account may not be used for the purposes in this subsection.(11) $55,000 of the business and professions accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Substitute House Bill No. 1889 (professionals/immigration). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2024, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.))(12) $45,000 of the architects' license accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Substitute House Bill No. 1880 (architecture licensing exams). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2024, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.))Sec. 1402. 2024 c 376 s 402 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE PATROLGeneral FundâState Appropriation (FY 2024). . . .$77,176,000General FundâState Appropriation (FY 2025). . . .(($85,297,000))Â Â Â Â Â $84,321,000General FundâFederal Appropriation. . . .$16,972,000General FundâPrivate/Local Appropriation. . . .$3,091,000Death Investigations AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$9,593,000County Criminal Justice Assistance AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$4,893,000Municipal Criminal Justice Assistance AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$1,800,000Fire Service Trust AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$131,000Vehicle License Fraud AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$119,000Disaster Response AccountâState Appropriation. . . .(($23,500,000))Â Â Â Â Â $47,060,000Fire Service Training AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$13,457,000Model Toxics Control Operating AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$596,000Fingerprint Identification AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$15,200,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($251,825,000))Â Â Â Â Â $274,409,000The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) (($23,500,000))$47,060,000 of the disaster response accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for Washington state fire service resource mobilization costs incurred in response to an emergency or disaster authorized under RCW 43.43.960 through 43.43.964. The state patrol shall submit a report quarterly to the office of financial management and the legislative fiscal committees detailing information on current and planned expenditures from this account. This work shall be done in coordination with the military department.(2) $79,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $146,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for compensation adjustments for commissioned staff as provided for in the omnibus transportation appropriations act.(3) $20,000 of the fingerprint identification accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute House Bill No. 1452 (medical reserve corps).(4) $16,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $15,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for implementation of House Bill No. 1179 (nonconviction data/auditor).(5) $26,000 of the fingerprint identification accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Substitute House Bill No. 1069 (mental health counselor compensation).(6) $500,000 of the disaster response accountâstate appropriation, is provided solely to continue a pilot project for the early deployment or prepositioning of Washington state fire service resources in advance of an expected mobilization event. Any authorization for the deployment of resources under this section must be authorized in accordance with section 6 of the Washington state fire services resource mobilization plan.(7) $320,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $68,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5367 (products containing THC).(8) $1,133,000 of the fingerprint identification accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5499 (multistate nurse licensure).(9) $1,000,000 of the fire service training accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the firefighter apprenticeship training program.(10) $12,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $12,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely to support the Washington state missing and murdered indigenous women and people task force in section 912 of this act.(11) In fiscal year 2025, the Washington state patrol may initiate procurement of a Pilatus PC-12 aircraft and a forward-looking infrared camera. ((It is the intent of the legislature to provide an appropriation for the purchase of the aircraft in future fiscal biennia.))(12) $18,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for implementation of Substitute House Bill No. 2357 (state patrol longevity bonus). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2024, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.))(13)(a) $500,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for financial assistance to local jurisdictions to conduct DNA testing for unidentified remains, and for those remains that failed to yield a CODIS match, for forensic genetic genealogy DNA testing to be conducted. Local jurisdictions may contract for these services. The purpose of this funding is to provide sufficient funding to eliminate the backlog of unidentified remains awaiting testing. This funding is intended to supplement DNA testing and investigative genealogy available through the national missing and unidentified persons system or the Washington state patrol crime lab to provide timely identification of remains and entry into CODIS, and should be prioritized for cases not meeting eligibility requirements for the national missing and unidentified persons system or cases already tested for DNA analysis that failed to yield a CODIS match.(b) For purposes of this subsection, "forensic genetic genealogy DNA testing" means any technology performed in a forensic laboratory capable of producing a forensic genealogy profile with a minimum of 100,000 genetic markers and compatible with multiple genealogical databases consented for law enforcement use and includes associated genealogical research.(c) Records from the DNA testing or forensic genetic genealogy DNA testing, including DNA profiles and markers, of unidentified remains funded under this subsection are sensitive and shall be treated as confidential to the fullest extent allowed under the law.(14) Any funds provided to the missing and exploited children task force shall ensure operations are adherent to federally established internet crimes against children standards.(15) Within existing resources, the Washington state patrol may provide security and protection to the secretary of state and to his or her family during a presidential election campaign and through two weeks following inauguration.(16) $2,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5299 (law enf. officer protection). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2024, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.))(17) $89,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5812 (electric vehicle fires). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2024, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.))(End of part)PART XVEDUCATIONSec. 1501. 2024 c 376 s 501 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTIONGeneral FundâState Appropriation (FY 2024). . . .$46,161,000General FundâState Appropriation (FY 2025). . . .(($61,189,000))Â Â Â Â Â $113,399,000General FundâFederal Appropriation. . . .(($148,570,000))Â Â Â Â Â $150,169,000General FundâPrivate/Local Appropriation. . . .$8,079,000Dedicated Cannabis AccountâState Appropriation(FY 2024). . . .$593,000Dedicated Cannabis AccountâState Appropriation(FY 2025). . . .$618,000Washington Opportunity Pathways AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .(($8,639,000))Â Â Â Â Â $8,889,000Performance Audits of Government AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$213,000Workforce Education Investment AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$12,979,000Elementary and Secondary School Emergency Relief IIIAccountâFederal Appropriation. . . .$3,524,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($290,565,000))Â Â Â Â Â $344,624,000The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) BASE OPERATIONS AND EXPENSES OF THE OFFICE(a) $22,323,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and (($22,814,000))$23,274,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the operation and expenses of the office of the superintendent of public instruction.(i) The superintendent shall recognize the extraordinary accomplishments of four students who have demonstrated a strong understanding of the civics essential learning requirements to receive the Daniel J. Evans civic education award.(ii) By October 31st of each year, the office of the superintendent of public instruction shall produce an annual status report on implementation of the budget provisos in section 501, chapter 415, Laws of 2019 and sections 515 and 522, chapter 334, Laws of 2021. The status report of each proviso shall include, but not be limited to, the following information: Purpose and objective, number of state staff funded by the proviso, number of contractors, status of proviso implementation, number of beneficiaries by year, list of beneficiaries, a comparison of budgeted funding and actual expenditures, other sources and amounts of funding, and proviso outcomes and achievements.(iii) Districts shall annually report to the office of the superintendent of public instruction on: (A) The annual number of graduating high school seniors within the district earning the Washington state seal of biliteracy provided in RCW 28A.300.575; and (B) the number of high school students earning competency-based high school credits for world languages by demonstrating proficiency in a language other than English. The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall provide a summary report to the office of the governor and the appropriate committees of the legislature by December 1st of each year.(iv) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall perform ongoing program reviews of alternative learning experience programs, dropout reengagement programs, and other high risk programs. Findings from the program reviews will be used to support and prioritize the office of the superintendent of public instruction outreach and education efforts that assist school districts in implementing the programs in accordance with statute and legislative intent, as well as to support financial and performance audit work conducted by the office of the state auditor.(v) The superintendent of public instruction shall integrate climate change content into the Washington state learning standards across subject areas and grade levels. The office shall develop materials and resources that accompany the updated learning standards that encourage school districts to develop interdisciplinary units focused on climate change that include authentic learning experiences, that integrate a range of perspectives, and that are action oriented.(vi) Funding provided in this subsection (1)(a) is sufficient for maintenance of the apportionment system, including technical staff and the data governance working group.(vii) Of the amounts provided in this subsection (1)(a), $465,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 is provided solely for office of the attorney general legal services related to special education related litigation.(b) $494,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $494,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the implementation of chapter 240, Laws of 2010, including staffing the office of equity and civil rights.(c) $61,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $61,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the ongoing work of the education opportunity gap oversight and accountability committee.(d) $96,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $96,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the implementation of chapter 380, Laws of 2009 (enacting the interstate compact on educational opportunity for military children).(e) $285,000 of the Washington opportunity pathways accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for activities related to public schools other than common schools authorized under chapter 28A.710 RCW.(f) $123,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $123,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for implementation of chapter 163, Laws of 2012 (foster care outcomes). The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall annually report each December on the implementation of the state's plan of cross-system collaboration to promote educational stability and improve education outcomes of foster youth.(g) $880,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $1,240,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the office of native education to increase services to tribes, including but not limited to, providing assistance to tribes and school districts to implement Since Time Immemorial, applying to become tribal compact schools, convening the Washington state native American education advisory committee, and extending professional learning opportunities to provide instruction in tribal history, culture, and government. The professional development must be done in collaboration with school district administrators and school directors. Funding in this subsection is sufficient for the office, the Washington state school directors' association government-to-government task force, and the association of educational service districts to collaborate with the tribal leaders congress on education to develop a tribal consultation training and schedule. Of the amounts provided in this subsection: $345,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $705,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the office of native education to convene a work group to develop the supports necessary to serve American Indian and Alaska Native students identified as needing additional literacy supports. The work group must include representation from Washington's federally recognized tribes and federally recognized tribes with reserved treaty rights in Washington. The work group must conduct tribal consultations, develop best practices, engage in professional learning, and develop curricula and resources that may be provided to school districts and state-tribal education compact schools to serve American Indian and Alaska Native students with appropriate, culturally affirming literacy supports.(h) $481,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $481,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for additional full-time equivalent staff to support the work of the safety net committee and to provide training and support to districts applying for safety net awards.(i) Districts shall report to the office the results of each collective bargaining agreement for certificated staff within their district using a uniform template as required by the superintendent, within thirty days of finalizing contracts. The data must include but is not limited to: Minimum and maximum base salaries, supplemental salary information, and average percent increase for all certificated instructional staff. Within existing resources by December 1st of each year, the office shall produce a report for the legislative evaluation and accountability program committee summarizing the district level collective bargaining agreement data.(j) $3,524,000 of the elementary and secondary school emergency relief III accountâfederal appropriation from funds attributable to subsection 2001(f)(4), the American rescue plan act of 2021, P.L. 117-2 is provided solely for administrative costs related to the management of federal funds provided for COVID-19 response and other emergency needs.(k) $150,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 is provided solely for the office of the superintendent of public instruction to plan for the development and implementation of a common substitute teacher application platform.(l) $150,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for the office of the superintendent of public instruction to hire a mental health instruction implementation coordinator to facilitate the addition of mental health education curriculum in schools, including but not limited to the following activities:(i) Working with the educational service districts to build awareness of learning benefits and resource availability;(ii) Providing training and support to school staff in the implementation of mental health education and integration into existing health curriculum;(iii) Facilitating office website updates to reflect available mental health instruction resources and supporting data; and(iv) Facilitating the addition of mental health literacy components to state learning standards and updating social emotional learning standards to reflect differentiation between the two programs and the grade-appropriate nature of each program.(m) $150,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for the office to hire staff to support school districts applying for grants funded by the state of Washington and grants from other public or private sources for which the school district may be eligible. The office must prioritize supporting school districts with smaller student enrollments, tax bases, and operating budgets, and other factors that may preclude or otherwise limit the ability of a school district to apply for grants for which it may be eligible.(2) DATA SYSTEMS(a) $1,802,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $1,802,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for implementing a comprehensive data system to include financial, student, and educator data, including development and maintenance of the comprehensive education data and research system (CEDARS).(b) $281,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $281,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for K-20 telecommunications network technical support in the K-12 sector to prevent system failures and avoid interruptions in school utilization of the data processing and video-conferencing capabilities of the network. These funds may be used to purchase engineering and advanced technical support for the network.(c) $450,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $450,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the superintendent of public instruction to develop and implement a statewide accountability system to address absenteeism and to improve student graduation rates. The system must use data to engage schools and districts in identifying successful strategies and systems that are based on federal and state accountability measures. Funding may also support the effort to provide assistance about successful strategies and systems to districts and schools that are underperforming in the targeted student subgroups.(d) $500,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for the office of the superintendent of public instruction to conduct a feasibility study for an online, statewide individualized education program system. A contract with a third party may be used to conduct all or any portion of the study. The results of the feasibility study must be reported to the appropriate fiscal and education committees of the legislature by June 30, 2025.(3) WORK GROUPS(a) $68,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $68,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute House Bill No. 1013 (regional apprenticeship prgs).(b) $200,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $200,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the office of the superintendent of public instruction to meet statutory obligations related to the provision of medically and scientifically accurate, age-appropriate, and inclusive sexual health education as authorized by chapter 206, Laws of 1988 (AIDS omnibus act) and chapter 265, Laws of 2007 (healthy youth act).(c) $118,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $118,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for implementation of chapter 75, Laws of 2018 (dyslexia).(d) $200,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $200,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for implementation of chapter 386, Laws of 2019 (social emotional learning).(e) $107,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $107,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the office to support the children and youth behavioral health work group created in chapter 130, Laws of 2020 (child. mental health wk. grp).(4) STATEWIDE PROGRAMS(a) $2,590,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $2,590,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the Washington kindergarten inventory of developing skills. State funding shall support statewide administration and district implementation of the inventory under RCW 28A.655.080.(b) $703,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $703,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for implementation of chapter 72, Laws of 2016 (educational opportunity gap).(c) $950,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $950,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the Washington reading corps. The superintendent shall allocate reading corps members to schools identified for comprehensive or targeted support and school districts that are implementing comprehensive, proven, research-based reading programs. Two or more schools may combine their Washington reading corps programs.(d) $457,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $260,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for chapter 102, Laws of 2014 (biliteracy seal). Of the amounts provided in this subsection:(i) $197,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 is provided solely for the office to develop and establish criteria for school districts to award the seal of biliteracy to graduating high school students.(ii) $250,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $250,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the office to provide students with access to methods for students to demonstrate proficiency in less commonly taught or assessed languages.(e)(i) $50,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $50,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for school bullying and harassment prevention activities.(ii) $15,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $15,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for implementation of chapter 240, Laws of 2016 (school safety).(iii) $570,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $570,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the office of the superintendent of public instruction to provide statewide support and coordination for the regional network of behavioral health, school safety, and threat assessment established in chapter 333, Laws of 2019 (school safety and well-being).(iv) $196,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $196,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the school safety center within the office of the superintendent of public instruction.(A) Within the amounts provided in this subsection (4)(e)(iv), $100,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $100,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for a school safety program to provide school safety training for all school administrators and school safety personnel. The school safety center advisory committee shall develop and revise the training program, using the best practices in school safety.(B) Within the amounts provided in this subsection (4)(e)(iv), $96,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $96,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for administration of the school safety center. The safety center shall act as an information dissemination and resource center when an incident occurs in a school district in Washington or in another state, coordinate activities relating to school safety, review and approve manuals and curricula used for school safety models and training, and maintain a school safety information web site.(f)(i) $162,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $162,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for youth suicide prevention activities.(ii) $76,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $76,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for implementation of chapter 64, Laws of 2018 (sexual abuse of students).(g)(i) $280,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $530,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025, $593,000 of the dedicated cannabis accountâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024, and $618,000 of the dedicated cannabis accountâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for dropout prevention, intervention, and reengagement programs, dropout prevention programs that provide student mentoring, and the building bridges statewide program. The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall convene staff representatives from high schools to meet and share best practices for dropout prevention. Of these amounts, the entire dedicated cannabis accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the building bridges statewide program and for grants to districts for life skills training for children and youth in K-12.(ii) $293,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $293,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the office of the superintendent of public instruction to support district implementation of comprehensive guidance and planning programs in support of high-quality high school and beyond plans consistent with RCW 28A.230.090.(iii) $178,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $178,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for implementation of chapter 291, Laws of 2017 (truancy reduction efforts).(h) Sufficient amounts are appropriated in this section for the office of the superintendent of public instruction to create a process and provide assistance to school districts in planning for future implementation of the summer knowledge improvement program grants.(i) $358,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $358,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the implementation of chapter 221, Laws of 2019 (CTE course equivalencies).(j) $196,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $196,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the implementation of chapter 252, Laws of 2019 (high school graduation reqs.).(k) $60,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $60,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $680,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely for the implementation of chapter 295, Laws of 2019 (educator workforce supply). Of the amounts provided in this subsection, $680,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation is provided solely for title II SEA state-level activities to implement section 103, chapter 295, Laws of 2019 relating to the regional recruiters program.(l) $150,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $150,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for a tribal liaison at the office of the superintendent of public instruction to facilitate access to and support enrollment in career connected learning opportunities for tribal students, including career awareness and exploration, career preparation, and career launch programs, as defined in RCW 28C.30.020, so that tribal students may receive high school or college credit to the maximum extent possible.(m) $57,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $57,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for implementation of chapter 288, Laws of 2020 (school meals at no cost).(n) $269,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $142,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for implementation of chapter 353, Laws of 2020 (innovative learning pilot).(o) $200,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $200,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the office of the superintendent of public instruction to provide statewide coordination towards multicultural, culturally responsive, and anti-racist education to support academically, socially, and culturally literate learners. The office must engage community members and key interested parties to:(i) Develop a clear definition and framework for African American studies to guide instruction in grades seven through twelve;(ii) Develop a plan for aligning African American studies across all content areas; and(iii) Identify professional development opportunities for educators and administrators to build capacity in creating high-quality learning environments centered in belonging and racial equity, anti-racist approaches, and asset-based methodologies that pull from all students' cultural funds of knowledge.(p) $49,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $49,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for implementation of chapter 38, Laws of 2021 (K-12 safety & security serv.).(q) $135,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $135,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for implementation of chapter 111, Laws of 2021 (learning assistance program).(r) $1,152,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $1,157,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for implementation of chapter 164, Laws of 2021 (institutional ed./release).(s) $553,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $553,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the office of the superintendent of public instruction to develop and implement a mathematics pathways pilot to modernize algebra II. The office should use research and engage stakeholders to develop a revised and expanded course.(t) $3,348,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $3,348,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for implementation of chapter 107, Laws of 2022 (language access in schools).(u) $300,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $300,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the superintendent to establish a media literacy and digital citizenship ambassador program to promote the integration of media literacy and digital citizenship instruction.(v) $294,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $294,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 provided solely for implementation of chapter 9, Laws of 2022 (school consultation/tribes).(w)(i) $8,144,000 of the Washington state opportunity pathways accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for support to small school districts and public schools receiving allocations under chapters 28A.710 and 28A.715 RCW in the 2022-23 school year that have less than 800 enrolled students, are located in urban or suburban areas, and budgeted for less than $20,000 per pupil in general fund expenditures in the 2022-23 school year. For eligible school districts and schools, the superintendent of public instruction must allocate an amount equal to the lesser of amount 1 or amount 2, as provided in (w)(i) (A) and (B) of this subsection, multiplied by the school district or school's budgeted enrollment in the 2022-23 school year.(A) Amount 1 is $1,550.(B) Amount 2 is $20,000 minus the school district or school's budgeted general fund expenditures per pupil in the 2022-23 school year.(ii) $210,000 of the Washington state opportunity pathways accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for support to public schools receiving allocations under chapter 28A.715 RCW in the 2023-24 school year that have less than 800 enrolled students, are located in urban or suburban areas, and expended less than $20,000 per pupil in general fund expenditures in the 2022-23 school year. For eligible schools, the superintendent of public instruction must allocate an amount equal to the lesser of amount 1 or amount 2, as provided in (w)(ii)(A) and (B) of this subsection, multiplied by the school's actual enrollment in the 2022-23 school year.(A) Amount 1 is $1,550.(B) Amount 2 is $20,000 minus the school's general fund expenditures per pupil in the 2022-23 school year.(x) $76,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $15,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5072 (highly capable students).(y) $72,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $4,663,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5243 (high school and beyond plan).(z) $17,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5257 (elementary school recess).(aa) $169,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $487,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5315 (special education/nonpublic).(bb) $39,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 is provided solely for implementation of Senate Bill No. 5403 (school depreciation subfunds).(cc) $532,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $436,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5593 (student data transfer).(dd) $51,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $36,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5617 (career and technical education courses).(ee) $1,000,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $1,000,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the office of the superintendent of public instruction to contract with a community-based youth development nonprofit organization for a pilot program to provide behavioral health support for youth and trauma-informed, culturally responsive staff training.(ff) $50,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 is provided solely for the office to consult with one or two public high schools that offer established courses in the early childhood development and services career pathway and develop model materials that may be employed by other school districts with an interest in establishing or expanding similar instructional offerings to students. The model materials must be developed by January 1, 2024.(gg) $62,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $62,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the creation of a deliberative democratic climate change education program in public high schools based on the Washington student climate assembly pilot program. The office must use the funding to develop and promote a full curriculum for student climate assemblies that can be replicated in public high schools across the state and to fund a part-time statewide coordinator position to oversee program outreach and implementation. By January 1, 2025, the office must collect and evaluate feedback from teachers, students, local government employees, and elected officials participating in the pilot program and report to the legislature on options to improve, expand, and extend the program.(hh) $75,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $75,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the office to contract with a nongovernmental agency to coordinate and serve as a fiscal agent and to cover direct costs of the project education impact workgroup to achieve educational parity for students experiencing foster care and/or homelessness, consistent with chapter 233, Laws of 2020. The office must contract with a nongovernmental agency with experience coordinating administrative and fiscal support for project education impact.(ii) $150,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 is provided solely for the office to contract for a feasibility study for the creation of a maritime academy on the Olympic peninsula. The study must include the scope, location, design, and budget for the construction of the maritime academy. The study must include plans to address systems, policies, and practices that address disparities of historically marginalized communities in the maritime industry. A preliminary report is due to the legislature by December 1, 2023, with the final feasibility study due to the legislature by June 3, 2024. Funding provided in this subsection may be matched by a nonprofit organization that provides high school students with accredited career and technical postsecondary education for maritime vessel operations and maritime curriculum to high schools in Jefferson, Clallam, Kitsap, King, Mason, Pierce, Island, and Snohomish counties.(jj) $74,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $69,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for implementation of Substitute House Bill No. 1701 (institutional ed. programs).(kk) $141,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $130,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for implementation of House Bill No. 1308 (graduation pathway options).(ll) $73,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $72,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for implementation of Substitute House Bill No. 1346 (purple star award).(mm)(i) $1,900,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $8,100,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the office to provide statewide professional development and technical assistance to school districts and to provide a limited number of grants for demonstration projects. The demonstration projects must build school-level and district-level systems that eliminate student isolation, track and reduce restraint use, and build schoolwide systems to support students in distress and prevent crisis escalation cycles that may result in restraint or isolation. The schoolwide systems must include trauma-informed positive behavior and intervention supports, de-escalation, and problem-solving skills. Of the amounts provided in this subsection:(A) $400,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $1,600,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are for grants for district demonstration sites;(B) $1,334,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $6,334,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are for professional development and training, including professional development in inclusionary practices for classroom teachers. Funding must be prioritized to public schools with the highest percentage of students with individualized education programs aged three through 21 who spend the least amount of time in general education classrooms; and(C) $166,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $166,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are for staff and administration support for the demonstration sites and the professional development and training.(ii) The office must create a technical assistance manual to support the elimination of isolation and reduction of restraint and room clears based on the results of the demonstration projects, and must provide an initial report to the educational opportunity gap oversight and accountability committee and the education committees of the legislature by September 30, 2024, and a final report by June 30, 2025. The reports must include:(A) A status update on demonstration projects that occurred during the 2023-24 school year, the technical assistance manual, and professional development offered statewide;(B) Key implementation challenges and findings; and(C) Recommendations for statewide policy changes or funding, including information on the amount of professional development needed across the state.(iii) In developing the manual, the office must consult with, at minimum:(A) Representatives from state associations representing both certificated and classified staff;(B) An association representing principals;(C) An association representing school administrators;(D) The Washington state school directors' association;(E) An association representing parents;(F) An individual with lived experience of restraint and isolation; and(G) A representative of the protection and advocacy agency of Washington.(iv) The office must prioritize the provision of professional development and selection of the demonstration sites to local education agencies, educational programs, and staff who provide educational services to students in prekindergarten through grade five and who have high incidents of isolation, restraint, or injury related to use of restraint or isolation. Grant recipients must commit to isolation phaseout and must report on restraint reduction and progress to the office by June 30, 2025.(nn) $430,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Senate Bill No. 5462 (inclusive learning standards). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2024, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.))(oo) $28,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for implementation of Senate Bill No. 5647 (school safety/temp employees). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2024, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.))(pp) $5,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $8,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for implementation of Second Engrossed Substitute House Bill No. 1377 (continuing education/K-12). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2024, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.))(qq) $3,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 6053 (education data sharing). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2024, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.))(rr) $30,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for the office to create and distribute age appropriate promotional and educational materials to school districts for Americans of Chinese descent history month.(ss) $150,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for the office of the superintendent of public instruction to examine how free and reduced-price school meal data is used as a funding driver for programs such as the learning assistance program and provide recommendations for an alternative metric or metrics to the legislature by January 1, 2025. The office may collaborate with other state agencies that maintain income and poverty data to develop alternative metrics, including but not limited to the department of social and health services, the student achievement council, and the health care authority. In creating recommendations, the office shall work with educational stakeholders including organizations representing of principals, school board directors, certificated teachers, and classified staff. The office may contract with a third party to conduct all or any portion of the work.(tt) $183,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for the office of the superintendent of public instruction to collaborate with the department of agriculture and the department of labor and industries on a study that, at a minimum, examines factors that impact children of seasonal farmworkers in comparison to migrant students in the following areas: School and program access, school readiness, attendance, grade promotion and retention, performance on state assessments, academic growth, graduation rates, discipline rates, and teacher qualifications and years of experience. The study must also investigate student access to postsecondary education and career opportunities in formerly rural or agricultural communities.(uu) $200,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $300,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the office of the superintendent of public instruction to develop guidance and provide technical assistance to school districts on the implementation of Initiative Measure No. 2081. To ensure that public schools and school districts are in compliance with state and federal laws related to student privacy, antidiscrimination, and harassment, intimidation and bullying, the office shall provide technical assistance and monitor local school district implementation, as needed. By July 1, 2024, the office shall develop a tool and identify a process for community members to send and for the office to receive and track questions and concerns related to implementation. The process must be publicly available on the agency website. The office shall submit monthly reports to the legislature which include a status update on implementation including challenges, frequently asked questions, and a summary of technical assistance.(vv) $1,500,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for the office of the superintendent of public instruction to conduct a one-time compliance review of every school district in Washington state between July 2024 and July 2025 related to compliance with state nondiscrimination laws, chapters 28A.640 and 28A.642 RCW, and federal nondiscrimination laws. The office shall utilize the compliance monitoring process that has been established in chapter 392-190 WAC and may utilize the regional educational service districts to assist in the reviews as appropriate under RCW 28A.310.010(2). Reviews may be conducted as desk reviews with selected on-site reviews where the office deems additional follow-up may be necessary to the desk review. The office shall provide a report to the legislature by December 1, 2025, summarizing the results of these compliance reviews and shall include a summary of types of noncompliance found, any corrective actions taken by the office or the school district, and school district responses to issues of noncompliance that were found during the compliance review process.(ww) $150,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for implementation of Third Substitute House Bill No. 1228 (dual & tribal language edu.). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2024, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.))(xx) $21,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Fourth Substitute House Bill No. 1239 (educator ethics & complaints). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2024, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.))(yy) $334,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 1956 (substance use prevention ed.). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2024, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.))(zz) $51,750,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 and $250,000 of the Washington opportunity pathways accountâstate appropriation are provided solely for one-time funding equal to $50 per pupil to all school districts during the 2024-25 school year. Funding provided under this subsection is not part of the state's statutory program of basic education.(5) CAREER CONNECTED LEARNING(a) $919,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for expanding career connected learning as provided in RCW 28C.30.020.(b) $960,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for increasing the funding per full-time equivalent for career launch programs as described in RCW 28A.700.130. In the 2023-2025 fiscal biennium, for career launch enrollment exceeding the funding provided in this subsection, funding is provided in section 504 of this act.(c) $3,600,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the office of the superintendent of public instruction to administer grants to skill centers for nursing programs to purchase or upgrade simulation laboratory equipment.(d) $4,000,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute House Bill No. 1013 (regional apprenticeship prgs.). Of the amount provided in this subsection, $2,000,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the Marysville school district to collaborate with Arlington school district, Everett Community College, other local school districts, local labor unions, local Washington state apprenticeship and training council registered apprenticeship programs, and local industry groups to continue the regional apprenticeship pathways program.(e) $3,000,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the office to contract with a community-based organization to prepare students to enroll in and enter college through one-on-one advising, workshops and help sessions, guest speakers and panel presentations, community building activities, campus visits, workplace field trips, and college/career resources and to fund the oversight of the grantee or grantees.(f) $500,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Substitute House Bill No. 2236 (tech. ed. core plus programs). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2024, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.))Sec. 1502. 2024 c 376 s 503 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE PROFESSIONAL EDUCATOR STANDARDS BOARDGeneral FundâState Appropriation (FY 2024). . . .$17,246,000General FundâState Appropriation (FY 2025). . . .(($22,279,000))Â Â Â Â Â $17,406,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($39,525,000))Â Â Â Â Â $34,652,000The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) $1,930,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $2,036,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are for the operation and expenses of the Washington professional educator standards board including implementation of chapter 172, Laws of 2017 (educator prep. data/PESB).(2)(a) $600,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $600,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for grants to improve preservice teacher training and funding of alternate routes to certification programs administered by the professional educator standards board.(b) Within the amounts provided in this subsection (2), up to $500,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and up to $500,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for grants to public or private colleges of education in Washington state to develop models and share best practices for increasing the classroom teaching experience of preservice training programs.(3) $1,005,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $1,001,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the recruiting Washington teachers program with priority given to programs that support bilingual teachers, teachers from populations that are underrepresented, and English language learners. Of the amounts provided in this subsection (3), $500,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $500,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for implementation and expansion of the bilingual educator initiative pilot project established under RCW 28A.180.120.(4) $150,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $150,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the implementation of chapter 295, Laws of 2019 (educator workforce supply).(5) $12,335,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and (($17,535,000))$12,662,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for implementation of chapter 237, Laws of 2017 (paraeducators). Of the amounts provided in this subsection: $11,550,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and (($16,873,000))$12,000,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for grants to districts to provide two days of training per school year in the paraeducator certificate program to all paraeducators. Funds in this subsection are provided solely for reimbursement to school districts that provide paraeducators with two days of training in the paraeducator certificate program in each of the 2022-23 and 2023-24 school years. Funding provided in this subsection is sufficient for new paraeducators to receive four days of training in the paraeducator certificate program during their first year. School districts receiving grants under this subsection must prioritize funding toward compensation for paraeducators who complete the required hours of instruction per school year.(6) $85,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $28,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the board to review national certification opportunities for educational staff associates through the relevant national associations for their profession and through the national board for professional teaching standards. The board must compare the standards and processes for achieving these certifications, including an analysis of how educational staff associate positions' national certification aligns with school roles and the professional expertise of school-based education staff associates. The board must submit the comparison report to the education committees of the legislature by October 1, 2024.(7) $147,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $158,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute House Bill No. 1009 (military spouse employment).(8) $35,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $71,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the professional educator standards board and the paraeducator board to collaborate with the office of the superintendent of public instruction to align bilingual education and English language learner endorsement standards and to determine language assessment requirements for multilingual teachers and paraeducators as required in Third Substitute House Bill No. 1228 (dual & tribal language edu.). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2024, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.(9) $877,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $135,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the professional educator standards board, in coordination with the office of the superintendent of public instruction, to develop a teacher residency program through Western Washington University focused on special education instruction beginning in the 2024-25 school year.(10) $33,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $155,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the professional educator standards board to convene two separate groups to review implementation of new and existing standards in teacher preparation programs and to perform preparation program gap analyses.(a) By October 1, 2024, the board shall convene a group of educators, including principals and teachers, to identify what preparation programs must be providing candidates to prepare them for the modern classroom.(i) Prior to the convening of the group, the board, in collaboration with the office of the superintendent of public instruction and the state board of education, shall develop a list of major changes to the educational system in statute and rule during the last 10 years that might require pedagogical changes in preparation programs. The group of educators shall review the list in order to identify what programs must be providing candidates.(ii) The group of educators must include a wide variety of representatives from different subject matter areas including, but not limited to, any shortage areas, different grade levels, rural and urban school districts, large and small school districts, schools participating in the mastery-based learning collaborative, schools implementing inclusionary practices to support students with disabilities, and educators of color.(iii) By June 1, 2025, the board shall compile a summary of the findings from the group of educators. Members of the legislature may review this summary upon request.(b) By December 1, 2024, the board shall develop a process to facilitate an ongoing and collaborative process to help educator preparation programs in Washington state respond to the continuously changing needs of the modern classroom; provide a feedback loop between school staff and programs; and promote continuity, consistency, and coherence across the educator preparation system regarding implementing new and existing standards. This process must at a minimum meet the following requirements:(i) Convening of a group representing the educator preparation programs to review the list developed in (a)(i) of this subsection and, when completed, the summary compiled under (a)(iii) of this subsection;(ii) Requiring each preparation program to perform a gap analysis of their programs. The board shall determine the components of this gap analysis;(iii) Submission of a plan of improvement and action plan, as needed, to address the areas identified in the gap analysis;(iv) A plan for compliance monitoring including recommendations related to potential consequences for programs not making sufficient progress; and(v) A timeline that requires educator preparation programs to complete the process at least once every three years and aligns the process with other review processes.(c) In creating the process, the board shall begin with a process for teacher preparation programs offered at institutions of higher education and develop a phase-in plan for how to eventually include alternative route teacher certification programs and principal preparation programs.(11) $26,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $387,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for implementation of Second Engrossed Substitute House Bill No. 1377 (continuing education/K-12).(12) $23,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $23,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Fourth Substitute House Bill No. 1239 (educator ethics & complaints). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2024, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.Sec. 1503. 2024 c 376 s 504 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTIONâFOR GENERAL APPORTIONMENTGeneral FundâState Appropriation (FY 2024). . . .$9,784,078,000General FundâState Appropriation (FY 2025). . . .(($9,813,885,000))Â Â Â Â Â $9,812,324,000Education Legacy Trust AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$1,773,730,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($21,371,693,000))Â Â Â Â Â $21,370,132,000The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1)(a) Each general fund fiscal year appropriation includes such funds as are necessary to complete the school year ending in the fiscal year and for prior fiscal year adjustments.(b) For the 2023-24 and 2024-25 school years, the superintendent shall allocate general apportionment funding to school districts as provided in the funding formulas and salary allocations in sections 504 and 505 of this act, excluding (c) of this subsection.(c) From July 1, 2023, to August 31, 2023, the superintendent shall allocate general apportionment funding to school districts programs as provided in sections 504 and 505, chapter 297, Laws of 2022, as amended.(d) The enrollment of any district shall be the annual average number of full-time equivalent students and part-time students as provided in RCW 28A.150.350, enrolled on the fourth day of school in September and on the first school day of each month October through June, including students who are in attendance pursuant to RCW 28A.335.160 and 28A.225.250 who do not reside within the servicing school district. Any school district concluding its basic education program in May must report the enrollment of the last school day held in May in lieu of a June enrollment.(e)(i) Funding provided in part V of this act is sufficient to provide each full-time equivalent student with the minimum hours of instruction required under RCW 28A.150.220.(ii) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall align the agency rules defining a full-time equivalent student with the increase in the minimum instructional hours under RCW 28A.150.220, as amended by the legislature in 2014.(f) The superintendent shall adopt rules requiring school districts to report full-time equivalent student enrollment as provided in RCW 28A.655.210.(g) For the 2023-24 and 2024-25 school years, school districts must report to the office of the superintendent of public instruction the monthly actual average district-wide class size across each grade level of kindergarten, first grade, second grade, and third grade classes. The superintendent of public instruction shall report this information to the education and fiscal committees of the house of representatives and the senate by September 30th of each year.(2) CERTIFICATED INSTRUCTIONAL STAFF ALLOCATIONSAllocations for certificated instructional staff salaries for the 2023-24 and 2024-25 school years are determined using formula-generated staff units calculated pursuant to this subsection.(a) Certificated instructional staff units, as defined in RCW 28A.150.410, shall be allocated to reflect the minimum class size allocations, requirements, and school prototypes assumptions as provided in RCW 28A.150.260. The superintendent shall make allocations to school districts based on the district's annual average full-time equivalent student enrollment in each grade.(b) Additional certificated instructional staff units provided in this subsection (2) that exceed the minimum requirements in RCW 28A.150.260 are enhancements outside the program of basic education, except as otherwise provided in this section.(c)(i) The superintendent shall base allocations for each level of prototypical school, including those at which more than fifty percent of the students were eligible for free and reduced-price meals in the prior school year, on the following regular education average class size of full-time equivalent students per teacher, except as provided in (c)(ii) of this subsection:General education class size:Â Â Â GradeRCW 28A.150.2602023-24School Year2024-25School YearGrade KÂ 17.0017.00Grade 1Â 17.0017.00Grade 2Â 17.0017.00Grade 3Â 17.0017.00Grade 4Â 27.0027.00Grades 5-6Â 27.0027.00Grades 7-8Â 28.5328.53Grades 9-12Â 28.7428.74The superintendent shall base allocations for: Laboratory science average class size as provided in RCW 28A.150.260; career and technical education (CTE) class size of 23.0; and skill center program class size of 19. Certificated instructional staff units provided for skills centers that exceed the minimum requirements of RCW 28A.150.260 achieve class size reductions under RCW 28A.400.007 and are part of the state's program of basic education.(ii) Pursuant to RCW 28A.150.260(4)(a), the assumed teacher planning period, expressed as a percentage of a teacher work day, is 13.42 percent in grades K-6, and 16.67 percent in grades 7-12; and(iii) Advanced placement and international baccalaureate courses are funded at the same class size assumptions as general education schools in the same grade; and(d)(i) Funding for teacher librarians, school nurses, social workers, school psychologists, and guidance counselors is allocated based on the school prototypes as provided in RCW 28A.150.260, as amended by chapter 109, Laws of 2022, and is considered certificated instructional staff.(ii) For qualifying high-poverty schools in the 2023-24 school year, at which more than 50 percent of the students were eligible for free and reduced-price meals in the prior school year, in addition to the allocation under (d)(i) of this subsection, the superintendent shall allocate additional funding for guidance counselors for each level of prototypical school as follows:Â ElementaryMiddleHighGuidance counselors0.1660.1660.157(iii) Students in approved career and technical education and skill center programs generate certificated instructional staff units to provide for the services of teacher librarians, school nurses, social workers, school psychologists, and guidance counselors at the following combined rate per 1000 student full-time equivalent enrollment:Â 2023-24School Year2024-25School YearCareer and Technical Education3.653.91Skill Center3.984.25(3) ADMINISTRATIVE STAFF ALLOCATIONS(a) Allocations for school building-level certificated administrative staff salaries for the 2023-24 and 2024-25 school years for general education students are determined using the formula generated staff units calculated pursuant to this subsection. The superintendent shall make allocations to school districts based on the district's annual average full-time equivalent enrollment in each grade. The following prototypical school values shall determine the allocation for principals, assistant principals, and other certificated building level administrators:Prototypical School Building:Â Â Elementary SchoolÂ 1.253Middle SchoolÂ 1.353High SchoolÂ 1.880(b) Students in approved career and technical education and skill center programs generate certificated school building-level administrator staff units at per student rates that are a multiple of the general education rate in (a) of this subsection by the following factors:Career and Technical Education students. . . .1.025Skill Center students. . . .1.198(4) CLASSIFIED STAFF ALLOCATIONSAllocations for classified staff units providing school building-level and district-wide support services for the 2023-24 and 2024-25 school years are determined using the formula-generated staff units provided in RCW 28A.150.260 and pursuant to this subsection, and adjusted based on each district's annual average full-time equivalent student enrollment in each grade.(5) CENTRAL OFFICE ALLOCATIONSIn addition to classified and administrative staff units allocated in subsections (3) and (4) of this section, classified and administrative staff units are provided for the 2023-24 and 2024-25 school years for the central office administrative costs of operating a school district, at the following rates:(a) The total central office staff units provided in this subsection (5) are calculated by first multiplying the total number of eligible certificated instructional, certificated administrative, and classified staff units providing school-based or district-wide support services, as identified in RCW 28A.150.260(6)(b) and the increased allocations provided pursuant to subsections (2) and (4) of this section, by 5.3 percent.(b) Of the central office staff units calculated in (a) of this subsection, 74.53 percent are allocated as classified staff units, as generated in subsection (4) of this section, and 25.48 percent shall be allocated as administrative staff units, as generated in subsection (3) of this section.(c) Staff units generated as enhancements outside the program of basic education to the minimum requirements of RCW 28A.150.260, and staff units generated by skill center and career-technical students, are excluded from the total central office staff units calculation in (a) of this subsection.(d) For students in approved career-technical and skill center programs, central office classified units are allocated at the same staff unit per student rate as those generated for general education students of the same grade in this subsection (5), and central office administrative staff units are allocated at staff unit per student rates that exceed the general education rate established for students in the same grade in this subsection (5) by 12.25 percent in the 2023-24 school year and ((12.42))12.44 percent in the 2024-25 school year for career and technical education students, and 17.58 percent in the 2023-24 school year and ((17.75))17.77 percent in the 2024-25 school year for skill center students.(6) FRINGE BENEFIT ALLOCATIONSFringe benefit allocations shall be calculated at a rate of 17.97 percent in the 2023-24 school year and 18.15 percent in the 2024-25 school year for certificated salary allocations provided under subsections (2), (3), and (5) of this section, and a rate of 22.06 percent in the 2023-24 school year and 21.66 percent in the 2024-25 school year for classified salary allocations provided under subsections (4) and (5) of this section.(7) INSURANCE BENEFIT ALLOCATIONSInsurance benefit allocations shall be calculated at the rates specified in section 506 of this act, based on the number of benefit units determined as follows: Except for nonrepresented employees of educational service districts, the number of calculated benefit units determined below. Calculated benefit units are staff units multiplied by the benefit allocation factors established in the collective bargaining agreement referenced in section 909 of this act. These factors are intended to adjust allocations so that, for the purpose of distributing insurance benefits, full-time equivalent employees may be calculated on the basis of 630 hours of work per year, with no individual employee counted as more than one full-time equivalent. The number of benefit units is determined as follows:(a) The number of certificated staff units determined in subsections (2), (3), and (5) of this section multiplied by 1.02; and(b) The number of classified staff units determined in subsections (4) and (5) of this section multiplied by 1.43.(8) MATERIALS, SUPPLIES, AND OPERATING COSTS (MSOC) ALLOCATIONSFunding is allocated per annual average full-time equivalent student for the materials, supplies, and operating costs (MSOC) incurred by school districts, consistent with the requirements of RCW 28A.150.260.(a)(i) MSOC funding for general education students are allocated at the following per student rates:MSOC RATES/STUDENT FTEÂ MSOC Component2023-24School Year2024-25School YearÂ Â Â Technology$178.98$182.37Utilities and Insurance$430.26$438.43Curriculum and Textbooks$164.48$167.61Other Supplies$326.54$332.74Library Materials$22.65$23.09Instructional Professional Development for Certificatedand Classified Staff$28.94$29.50Facilities Maintenance$206.22$210.13Security and Central Office$146.37$149.15TOTAL MSOC/STUDENT FTE$1,504.44$1,533.02(ii) For the 2023-24 school year and 2024-25 school year, as part of the budget development, hearing, and review process required by chapter 28A.505 RCW, each school district must disclose: (A) The amount of state funding to be received by the district under (a) and (d) of this subsection (8); (B) the amount the district proposes to spend for materials, supplies, and operating costs; (C) the difference between these two amounts; and (D) if (a)(ii)(A) of this subsection (8) exceeds (a)(ii)(B) of this subsection (8), any proposed use of this difference and how this use will improve student achievement.(b) Students in approved skill center programs generate per student FTE MSOC allocations of $1,724.62 for the 2023-24 school year and $1,757.39 for the 2024-25 school year.(c) Students in approved exploratory and preparatory career and technical education programs generate per student FTE MSOC allocations of $1,724.62 for the 2023-24 school year and $1,757.39 for the 2024-25 school year.(d) Students in grades 9-12 generate per student FTE MSOC allocations in addition to the allocations provided in (a) through (c) of this subsection at the following rate:MSOC Component2023-24School Year2024-25School YearTechnology$44.04$44.88Curriculum and Textbooks$48.06$48.97Other Supplies$94.07$95.86Library Materials$6.05$6.16Instructional Professional Development for Certifiedand Classified Staff$8.01$8.16TOTAL GRADE 9-12 BASIC EDUCATION MSOC/STUDENT FTE$200.23$204.03(9) SUBSTITUTE TEACHER ALLOCATIONSFor the 2023-24 and 2024-25 school years, funding for substitute costs for classroom teachers is based on four (4) funded substitute days per classroom teacher unit generated under subsection (2) of this section, at a daily substitute rate of $151.86.(10) ALTERNATIVE LEARNING EXPERIENCE PROGRAM FUNDING(a) Amounts provided in this section from July 1, 2023, to August 31, 2023, are adjusted to reflect provisions of chapter 297, Laws of 2022, as amended (allocation of funding for students enrolled in alternative learning experiences).(b) The superintendent of public instruction shall require all districts receiving general apportionment funding for alternative learning experience (ALE) programs as defined in WAC 392-121-182 to provide separate financial accounting of expenditures for the ALE programs offered in district or with a provider, including but not limited to private companies and multidistrict cooperatives, as well as accurate, monthly headcount and FTE enrollment claimed for basic education, including separate counts of resident and nonresident students.(11) DROPOUT REENGAGEMENT PROGRAMThe superintendent shall adopt rules to require students claimed for general apportionment funding based on enrollment in dropout reengagement programs authorized under RCW 28A.175.100 through 28A.175.115 to meet requirements for at least weekly minimum instructional contact, academic counseling, career counseling, or case management contact. Districts must also provide separate financial accounting of expenditures for the programs offered by the district or under contract with a provider, as well as accurate monthly headcount and full-time equivalent enrollment claimed for basic education, including separate enrollment counts of resident and nonresident students.(12) ALL DAY KINDERGARTEN PROGRAMS$670,803,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $869,125,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely to fund all day kindergarten programs in all schools in the 2023-24 school year and 2024-25 school year, pursuant to RCW 28A.150.220 and 28A.150.315. Beginning in the 2023-24 school year, funding for students admitted early to kindergarten under exceptions to the uniform entry qualifications under RCW 28A.225.160 must be limited to children deemed to be likely to be "successful in kindergarten."(13) ADDITIONAL FUNDING FOR SMALL SCHOOL DISTRICTS AND REMOTE AND NECESSARY PLANTSFor small school districts and remote and necessary school plants within any district which have been judged to be remote and necessary by the superintendent of public instruction, additional staff units are provided to ensure a minimum level of staffing support. Additional administrative and certificated instructional staff units provided to districts in this subsection shall be reduced by the general education staff units, excluding career and technical education and skills center enhancement units, otherwise provided in subsections (2) through (5) of this section on a per district basis.(a) For districts enrolling not more than twenty-five average annual full-time equivalent students in grades K-8, and for small school plants within any school district which have been judged to be remote and necessary by the superintendent of public instruction and enroll not more than twenty-five average annual full-time equivalent students in grades K-8:(i) For those enrolling no students in grades 7 and 8, 1.76 certificated instructional staff units and 0.24 certificated administrative staff units for enrollment of not more than five students, plus one-twentieth of a certificated instructional staff unit for each additional student enrolled; and(ii) For those enrolling students in grades 7 or 8, 1.68 certificated instructional staff units and 0.32 certificated administrative staff units for enrollment of not more than five students, plus one-tenth of a certificated instructional staff unit for each additional student enrolled;(b) For specified enrollments in districts enrolling more than twenty-five but not more than one hundred average annual full-time equivalent students in grades K-8, and for small school plants within any school district which enroll more than twenty-five average annual full-time equivalent students in grades K-8 and have been judged to be remote and necessary by the superintendent of public instruction:(i) For enrollment of up to sixty annual average full-time equivalent students in grades K-6, 2.76 certificated instructional staff units and 0.24 certificated administrative staff units; and(ii) For enrollment of up to twenty annual average full-time equivalent students in grades 7 and 8, 0.92 certificated instructional staff units and 0.08 certificated administrative staff units;(c) For districts operating no more than two high schools with enrollments of less than three hundred average annual full-time equivalent students, for enrollment in grades 9-12 in each such school, other than alternative schools, except as noted in this subsection:(i) For remote and necessary schools enrolling students in any grades 9-12 but no more than twenty-five average annual full-time equivalent students in grades K-12, four and one-half certificated instructional staff units and one-quarter of a certificated administrative staff unit;(ii) For all other small high schools under this subsection, nine certificated instructional staff units and one-half of a certificated administrative staff unit for the first sixty average annual full-time equivalent students, and additional staff units based on a ratio of 0.8732 certificated instructional staff units and 0.1268 certificated administrative staff units per each additional forty-three and one-half average annual full-time equivalent students;(iii) Districts receiving staff units under this subsection shall add students enrolled in a district alternative high school and any grades nine through twelve alternative learning experience programs with the small high school enrollment for calculations under this subsection;(d) For each nonhigh school district having an enrollment of more than seventy annual average full-time equivalent students and less than one hundred eighty students, operating a grades K-8 program or a grades 1-8 program, an additional one-half of a certificated instructional staff unit;(e) For each nonhigh school district having an enrollment of more than fifty annual average full-time equivalent students and less than one hundred eighty students, operating a grades K-6 program or a grades 1-6 program, an additional one-half of a certificated instructional staff unit;(f)(i) For enrollments generating certificated staff unit allocations under (a) through (e) of this subsection, one classified staff unit for each 2.94 certificated staff units allocated under such subsections;(ii) For each nonhigh school district with an enrollment of more than fifty annual average full-time equivalent students and less than one hundred eighty students, an additional one-half of a classified staff unit; and(g) School districts receiving additional staff units to support small student enrollments and remote and necessary plants under this subsection (13) shall generate additional MSOC allocations consistent with the nonemployee related costs (NERC) allocation formula in place for the 2010-11 school year as provided section 502, chapter 37, Laws of 2010 1st sp. sess. (2010 supplemental budget), adjusted annually for inflation.(14) Any school district board of directors may petition the superintendent of public instruction by submission of a resolution adopted in a public meeting to reduce or delay any portion of its basic education allocation for any school year. The superintendent of public instruction shall approve such reduction or delay if it does not impair the district's financial condition. Any delay shall not be for more than two school years. Any reduction or delay shall have no impact on levy authority pursuant to RCW 84.52.0531 and local effort assistance pursuant to chapter 28A.500 RCW.(15) The superintendent may distribute funding for the following programs outside the basic education formula during fiscal years 2024 and 2025 as follows:(a) $650,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $650,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for fire protection for school districts located in a fire protection district as now or hereafter established pursuant to chapter 52.04 RCW.(b) $436,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $436,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for programs providing skills training for secondary students who are enrolled in extended day school-to-work programs, as approved by the superintendent of public instruction. The funds shall be allocated at a rate not to exceed $500 per full-time equivalent student enrolled in those programs.(c) $375,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for the office of the superintendent of public instruction to subsidize the cost of health care-based industry recognized credentials required for employment for students enrolled in health care courses in skill centers and comprehensive high school programs.(16) Funding in this section is sufficient to fund a maximum of 1.6 FTE enrollment for skills center students pursuant to chapter 463, Laws of 2007.(17) Funding in this section is sufficient to fund a maximum of 1.2 FTE enrollment for career launch students pursuant to RCW 28A.700.130. Expenditures for this purpose must come first from the appropriations provided in section 501(5) of this act; funding for career launch enrollment exceeding those appropriations is provided in this section. The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall provide a summary report to the office of the governor and the appropriate committees of the legislature by January 1, 2024. The report must include the total FTE enrollment for career launch students, the FTE enrollment for career launch students that exceeded the appropriations provided in section 501(5) of this act, and the amount expended from this section for those students.(18)(a) Students participating in running start programs may be funded up to a combined maximum enrollment of 1.4 FTE including school district and institution of higher education enrollment consistent with the running start course requirements provided in chapter 202, Laws of 2015 (dual credit education opportunities). In calculating the combined 1.4 FTE, the office of the superintendent of public instruction:(i) Must adopt rules to fund the participating student's enrollment in running start courses provided by the institution of higher education during the summer academic term; and(ii) May average the participating student's September through June enrollment to account for differences in the start and end dates for courses provided by the high school and the institution of higher education.(iii) In consultation with the state board for community and technical colleges, the participating institutions of higher education, the student achievement council, and the education data center, must annually track and report to the fiscal committees of the legislature on the combined FTE experience of students participating in the running start program, including course load analyses at both the high school and community and technical college system.(b) $1,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 is provided for implementation of Second Substitute House Bill No. 1316 (dual credit program access).(19) If two or more school districts consolidate and each district was receiving additional basic education formula staff units pursuant to subsection (13) of this section, the following apply:(a) For three school years following consolidation, the number of basic education formula staff units shall not be less than the number of basic education formula staff units received by the districts in the school year prior to the consolidation; and(b) For the fourth through eighth school years following consolidation, the difference between the basic education formula staff units received by the districts for the school year prior to consolidation and the basic education formula staff units after consolidation pursuant to subsection (13) of this section shall be reduced in increments of twenty percent per year.(20)(a) Indirect cost charges by a school district to approved career and technical education middle and secondary programs shall not exceed the lesser of five percent or the cap established in federal law of the combined basic education and career and technical education program enhancement allocations of state funds. Middle and secondary career and technical education programs are considered separate programs for funding and financial reporting purposes under this section.(b) Career and technical education program full-time equivalent enrollment shall be reported on the same monthly basis as the enrollment for students eligible for basic support, and payments shall be adjusted for reported career and technical education program enrollments on the same monthly basis as those adjustments for enrollment for students eligible for basic support.(21) Funding in this section is sufficient to provide full general apportionment payments to school districts eligible for federal forest revenues as provided in RCW 28A.520.020. For the 2023-2025 biennium, general apportionment payments are not reduced for school districts receiving federal forest revenues.(22) $15,898,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $20,781,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Substitute House Bill No. 2494 (school operating costs). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2024, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.(23) $25,165,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $32,355,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely to implement Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5882 (prototypical school staffing). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2024, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.Sec. 1504. 2024 c 376 s 506 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTIONâFOR SCHOOL EMPLOYEE COMPENSATION ADJUSTMENTSGeneral FundâState Appropriation (FY 2024). . . .$391,520,000General FundâState Appropriation (FY 2025). . . .(($888,496,000))Â Â Â Â Â $893,654,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($1,280,016,000))Â Â Â Â Â $1,285,174,000The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) The salary increases provided in this section are 3.7 percent for the 2023-24 school year, and 3.7 percent for the 2024-25 school year, the annual inflationary adjustments pursuant to RCW 28A.400.205.(2)(a) In addition to salary allocations, the appropriations in this section include funding for professional learning as defined in RCW 28A.415.430, 28A.415.432, and 28A.415.434. Funding for this purpose is calculated as the equivalent of three days of salary and benefits for each of the funded full-time equivalent certificated instructional staff units. Nothing in this section entitles an individual certificated instructional staff to any particular number of professional learning days.(b) Of the funding provided for professional learning in this section, the equivalent of one day of salary and benefits for each of the funded full-time equivalent certificated instructional staff units in the 2023-24 school year must be used to train school district staff on cultural competency, diversity, equity, or inclusion, as required in chapter 197, Laws of 2021.(3)(a) The appropriations in this section include associated incremental fringe benefit allocations at 17.33 percent for the 2023-24 school year and 17.51 percent for the 2024-25 school year for certificated instructional and certificated administrative staff and 18.56 percent for the 2023-24 school year and 18.16 percent for the 2024-25 school year for classified staff.(b) The appropriations in this section include the increased or decreased portion of salaries and incremental fringe benefits for all relevant state-funded school programs in part V of this act. Changes for general apportionment (basic education) are based on the salary allocations and methodology in sections 504 and 505 of this act. Changes for special education result from changes in each district's basic education allocation per student. Changes for educational service districts and institutional education programs are determined by the superintendent of public instruction using the methodology for general apportionment salaries and benefits in sections 504 and 505 of this act. Changes for pupil transportation are determined by the superintendent of public instruction pursuant to RCW 28A.160.192, and impact compensation factors in sections 504, 505, and 506 of this act.(c) The appropriations in this section include no salary adjustments for substitute teachers.(4) The appropriations in this section are sufficient to fund the collective bargaining agreement referenced in part 9 of this act and reflect the incremental change in cost of allocating rates as follows: For the 2023-24 school year, $1,100 per month and for the 2024-25 school year, $1,178 per month.(5) The rates specified in this section are subject to revision each year by the legislature.(6) $46,426,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 ((and $211,538,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are))is provided solely for implementation of chapter 50, Laws of 2023.(7) $5,155,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 ((and $12,076,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are))is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Substitute House Bill No. 1436 (special education funding).(8) (($1,286,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for implementation of Substitute House Bill No. 2180 (special education cap). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2024, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.(9))) $1,264,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 ((and $2,949,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are))is provided solely to implement Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5882 (prototypical school staffing). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2024, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.(((10)))(9) $670,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 ((and $1,556,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are))is provided solely to account for the office of the superintendent of public instruction allocation of transportation funding to school districts.Sec. 1505. 2024 c 376 s 507 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTIONâFOR PUPIL TRANSPORTATIONGeneral FundâState Appropriation (FY 2024). . . .$803,792,000General FundâState Appropriation (FY 2025). . . .(($810,077,000))Â Â Â Â Â $829,270,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($1,613,869,000))Â Â Â Â Â $1,633,062,000The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) Each general fund fiscal year appropriation includes such funds as are necessary to complete the school year ending in the fiscal year and for prior fiscal year adjustments.(2)(a) For the 2023-24 and 2024-25 school years, the superintendent shall allocate funding to school district programs for the transportation of eligible students as provided in RCW 28A.160.192. Funding in this section constitutes full implementation of RCW 28A.160.192, which enhancement is within the program of basic education. Students are considered eligible only if meeting the definitions provided in RCW 28A.160.160.(b) From July 1, 2023, to August 31, 2023, the superintendent shall allocate funding to school districts programs for the transportation of students as provided in section 507, chapter 297, Laws of 2022, as amended.(3) Within amounts appropriated in this section, up to $10,000,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and up to $10,000,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are for a transportation alternate funding grant program based on the alternate funding process established in RCW 28A.160.191. The superintendent of public instruction must include a review of school district efficiency rating, key performance indicators and local school district characteristics such as unique geographic constraints in the grant award process.(4) A maximum of $939,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and a maximum of $939,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 may be expended for regional transportation coordinators and related activities. The transportation coordinators shall ensure that data submitted by school districts for state transportation funding shall, to the greatest extent practical, reflect the actual transportation activity of each district.(5) Subject to available funds under this section, school districts may provide student transportation for summer skills center programs.(6) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall provide reimbursement funding to a school district for school bus purchases only after the superintendent of public instruction determines that the school bus was purchased from the list established pursuant to RCW 28A.160.195(2) or a comparable competitive bid process based on the lowest price quote based on similar bus categories to those used to establish the list pursuant to RCW 28A.160.195.(7) The superintendent of public instruction shall base depreciation payments for school district buses on the presales tax five-year average of lowest bids in the appropriate category of bus. In the final year on the depreciation schedule, the depreciation payment shall be based on the lowest bid in the appropriate bus category for that school year.(8) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall annually disburse payments for bus depreciation in August.(9)(a) $13,000,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $13,000,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the superintendent to provide transportation safety net funding to school districts with a convincingly demonstrated need for additional transportation funding for special passengers. Transportation safety net awards shall only be provided when a school district's allowable transportation expenditures attributable to serving special passengers exceeds the amount allocated under subsection (2)(a) of this section and any excess transportation costs reimbursed by federal, state, tribal, or local child welfare agencies. A transportation safety net award may not exceed a school district's excess expenditures directly attributable to serving special passengers in the pupil transportation program.(b) To be eligible for additional transportation safety net award funding, the school district must report, in accordance with statewide accounting guidance, the amount of the excess costs and the specific activities or services provided to special passengers that created the excess costs. The office of the superintendent of public instruction must request from school districts an application for transportation safety net funding. The office must submit to the office of financial management, and to the education and fiscal committees of the legislature, the total demonstrated need and awards by school district.(c) Transportation safety net awards allocated under this subsection are not part of the state's program of basic education.(10) $425,000 of the of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for supplemental transportation allocations for pupil transportation services contractor benefits as described in Engrossed Substitute House Bill No. 1248 (pupil transportation). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2024, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.(((12)))(11) $32,177,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $41,519,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely to account for the office of the superintendent of public instruction allocation of transportation funding to school districts.Sec. 1506. 2024 c 376 s 508 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTIONâSCHOOL FOOD SERVICESGeneral FundâState Appropriation (FY 2024). . . .$55,834,000General FundâState Appropriation (FY 2025). . . .(($102,357,000))Â Â Â Â Â $119,918,000General FundâFederal Appropriation. . . .(($925,799,000))Â Â Â Â Â $1,016,190,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($1,083,990,000))Â Â Â Â Â $1,191,942,000The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) $11,548,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $11,548,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for state matching money for federal child nutrition programs, and may support the meals for kids program through the following allowable uses:(a) Elimination of breakfast copays for eligible public school students and lunch copays for eligible public school students in grades pre-kindergarten through twelfth grades who are eligible for reduced-price lunch as required in chapter 74, Laws of 2021 (reduced-price lunch copays);(b) Assistance to school districts and authorized public and private nonprofit organizations for supporting summer food service programs, and initiating new summer food service programs in low-income areas;(c) Reimbursements to school districts for school breakfasts served to students eligible for free and reduced-price lunch, pursuant to chapter 287, Laws of 2005; and(d) Assistance to school districts in initiating and expanding school breakfast programs.(2) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall report annually to the fiscal committees of the legislature on annual expenditures in subsection (1)(a) through (c) of this section.(3) The superintendent of public instruction shall provide the department of health with the following data, where available, for all nutrition assistance programs that are funded by the United States department of agriculture and administered by the office of the superintendent of public instruction. The superintendent must provide the report for the preceding federal fiscal year by February 1, 2024, and February 1, 2025. The report must provide:(a) The number of people in Washington who are eligible for the program;(b) The number of people in Washington who participated in the program;(c) The average annual participation rate in the program;(d) Participation rates by geographic distribution; and(e) The annual federal funding of the program in Washington.(4)(a) $44,167,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024, (($74,667,000))$83,617,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $28,500,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation (CRRSA) are provided solely for reimbursements to school districts for schools and groups of schools required to participate in the federal community eligibility program under section 1, chapter 7, Laws of 2022 (schools/comm. eligibility) for meals not reimbursed at the federal free meal rate.(b) $119,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $119,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for implementation of chapter 271, Laws of 2018 (school meal payment) to increase the number of schools participating in the federal community eligibility program and to support breakfast after the bell programs authorized by the legislature that have adopted the community eligibility provision, and for staff at the office of the superintendent of public instruction to implement section 1, chapter 7, Laws of 2022 (schools/comm. eligibility).(5) $6,000,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation (CRRSA/GEER) and (($16,023,000))$24,634,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 1238 (free school meals).Sec. 1507. 2024 c 376 s 509 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTIONâFOR SPECIAL EDUCATION PROGRAMSGeneral FundâState Appropriation (FY 2024). . . .$1,811,444,000General FundâState Appropriation (FY 2025). . . .(($1,925,849,000))Â Â Â Â Â $1,992,731,000General FundâFederal Appropriation. . . .(($664,372,000))Â Â Â Â Â $692,218,000Education Legacy Trust AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$54,694,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($4,456,359,000))Â Â Â Â Â $4,551,087,000The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1)(a) Funding for special education programs is provided on an excess cost basis, pursuant to RCW 28A.150.390. School districts shall ensure that special education students as a class receive their full share of the general apportionment allocation accruing through sections 504 and 506 of this act. To the extent a school district cannot provide an appropriate education for special education students under chapter 28A.155 RCW through the general apportionment allocation, it shall provide services through the special education excess cost allocation funded in this section.(b) Funding provided within this section is sufficient for districts to provide school principals and lead special education teachers annual professional development on the best-practices for special education instruction and strategies for implementation. Districts shall annually provide a summary of professional development activities to the office of the superintendent of public instruction.(2)(a) The superintendent of public instruction shall ensure that:(i) Special education students are basic education students first;(ii) As a class, special education students are entitled to the full basic education allocation; and(iii) Special education students are basic education students for the entire school day.(b)(i) The superintendent of public instruction shall continue to implement the full cost method of excess cost accounting, as designed by the committee and recommended by the superintendent, pursuant to section 501(1)(k), chapter 372, Laws of 2006, except as provided in (b)(ii) of this subsection.(ii) The superintendent of public instruction shall implement any changes to excess cost accounting methods required under Engrossed Substitute House Bill No. 1436 (special education funding).(3) Each fiscal year appropriation includes such funds as are necessary to complete the school year ending in the fiscal year and for prior fiscal year adjustments.(4)(a) For the 2023-24 and 2024-25 school years, the superintendent shall allocate funding to school district programs for special education students as provided in RCW 28A.150.390, except that the calculation of the base allocation also includes allocations provided under section 504 (2) and (4) of this act and RCW 28A.150.415, which enhancement is within the program of basic education.(b) From July 1, 2023, to August 31, 2023, the superintendent shall allocate funding to school district programs for special education students as provided in section 509, chapter 297, Laws of 2022, as amended.(5) The following applies throughout this section: The definitions for enrollment and enrollment percent are as specified in RCW 28A.150.390(3). Each district's general fundâstate funded special education enrollment shall be the lesser of the district's actual enrollment percent or 15 percent in the 2023-24 school year, and the lesser of the district's actual enrollment percent or 16 percent in the 2024-25 school year.(6) At the request of any interdistrict cooperative of at least 15 districts in which all excess cost services for special education students of the districts are provided by the cooperative, the maximum enrollment percent shall be calculated in accordance with RCW 28A.150.390(3) (c) and (d), and shall be calculated in the aggregate rather than individual district units. For purposes of this subsection, the average basic education allocation per full-time equivalent student shall be calculated in the aggregate rather than individual district units.(7) $151,047,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024, (($151,047,000))$205,498,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $29,574,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely for safety net awards for districts with demonstrated needs for special education funding beyond the amounts provided in subsection (4) of this section. If the federal safety net awards based on the federal eligibility threshold exceed the federal appropriation in this subsection (7) in any fiscal year, the superintendent shall expend all available federal discretionary funds necessary to meet this need. At the conclusion of each school year, the superintendent shall recover safety net funds that were distributed prospectively but for which districts were not subsequently eligible.(a) For the 2023-24 and 2024-25 school years, safety net funds shall be awarded by the state safety net oversight committee as provided in section 109(1) chapter 548, Laws of 2009 (education).(b) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall make award determinations for state safety net funding in August of each school year, except that the superintendent of public instruction shall make award determinations for state safety net funding in July of each school year for the Washington state school for the blind and for the center for childhood deafness and hearing loss. Determinations on school district eligibility for state safety net awards shall be based on analysis of actual expenditure data from the current school year.(8) A maximum of $1,250,000 may be expended from the general fundâstate appropriations to fund teachers and aides at Seattle children's hospital. This amount is in lieu of money provided through the home and hospital allocation and the special education program.(9) The superintendent shall maintain the percentage of federal flow-through to school districts at 85 percent. In addition to other purposes, school districts may use increased federal funds for high-cost students, for purchasing regional special education services from educational service districts, and for staff development activities particularly relating to inclusion issues.(10) A school district may carry over from one year to the next year up to 10 percent of the general fundâstate funds allocated under this program; however, carryover funds shall be expended in the special education program.(11) $87,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $87,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $214,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely for a special education family liaison position within the office of the superintendent of public instruction.(12)(a) $13,538,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation (ARPA) is provided solely for allocations from federal funding as authorized in section 2014, the American rescue plan act of 2021, P.L. 117-2.(b) $1,777,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation (ARPA) is provided solely for providing preschool services to qualifying special education students under section 619 of the federal individuals with disabilities education act, pursuant to section 2002, the American rescue plan act of 2021, P.L. 117-2.(13) $153,091,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $199,246,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Substitute House Bill No. 1436 (special education funding).(14) $18,235,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely to increase the special education enrollment funding cap as required in Substitute House Bill No. 2180 (special education cap). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2024, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.(15) $2,877,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $3,818,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Substitute House Bill No. 2494 (School operating costs). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2024, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.(16)(a) $25,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for compilation of reporting as required under this subsection. By November 1, 2024, each district shall report to the superintendent on the district's utilization of funds provided by the legislature under chapter 475, Laws of 2023 and this act, including under subsections (13) and (14) of this section. The report shall include the following:(i) To what extent the district has increased special services, programs, and supports to students with disabilities for the 2023-24 and 2024-25 school years;(ii) How the district has modified staffing ratios during the 2023-24 and 2024-25 school years in special programs to provide more intensive staff support to students enrolled in special education programs;(iii) How the district has used the resources provided under chapter 475, Laws of 2023 and this act to increase employee compensation for both certificated and classified staff during the 2023-24 and 2024-25 school years to improve staff retention and recruitment of new staff;(iv) To what extent the district has increased staff development programs and curriculum that is both timely and relevant to the needs of students with disabilities during the 2023-24 and 2024-25 school years; and(v) To what extent the district has used the resources provided under chapter 475, Laws of 2023 and this act to purchase staff safety equipment during the 2023-24 and 2024-25 school years in order to reduce work-related injuries.(b) The office shall compile the reports provided under (a) of this subsection and provide a report to the relevant committees of the legislature by December 1, 2024, summarizing statewide trends and providing each district's individual responses.(17) $4,199,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $5,479,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely to implement Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5882 (prototypical school staffing). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2024, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.(18) $581,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for implementation of Senate Bill No. 5852 (special education safety net). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2024, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.Sec. 1508. 2024 c 376 s 510 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTIONâFOR EDUCATIONAL SERVICE DISTRICTSGeneral FundâState Appropriation (FY 2024). . . .$41,625,000General FundâState Appropriation (FY 2025). . . .$39,138,000Workforce Education Investment AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$2,700,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$83,463,000The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) The educational service districts shall continue to furnish financial services required by the superintendent of public instruction and RCW 28A.310.190 (3) and (4).(2) Funding within this section is provided for regional professional development related to mathematics and science curriculum and instructional strategies aligned with common core state standards and next generation science standards. Funding shall be distributed among the educational service districts in the same proportion as distributions in the 2007-2009 biennium. Each educational service district shall use this funding solely for salary and benefits for a certificated instructional staff with expertise in the appropriate subject matter and in professional development delivery, and for travel, materials, and other expenditures related to providing regional professional development support.(3) Funding in this section is provided for regional professional development related to English language arts curriculum and instructional strategies aligned with common core state standards. Each educational service district shall use this funding solely for salary and benefits for certificated instructional staff with expertise in the appropriate subject matter and in professional development delivery, and for travel, materials, and other expenditures related to providing regional professional development support.(4) Funding in this section is provided for regional technical support for the K-20 telecommunications network to prevent system failures and avoid interruptions in school utilization of the data processing and video-conferencing capabilities of the network. These funds may be used to purchase engineering and advanced technical support for the network.(5) Funding in this section is provided for a corps of nurses located at the educational service districts, to be dispatched in coordination with the office of the superintendent of public instruction, to provide direct care to students, health education, and training for school staff. In fiscal years 2024 and 2025, allocations for the corps of nurses is sufficient to provide one day per week of nursing services for all second-class school districts.(6) Funding in this section is provided for staff and support at the nine educational service districts to provide a network of support for school districts to develop and implement comprehensive suicide prevention and behavioral health supports for students.(7) Funding in this section is provided for staff and support at the nine educational service districts to provide assistance to school districts with comprehensive safe schools planning, conducting needs assessments, school safety and security trainings, coordinating appropriate crisis and emergency response and recovery, and developing threat assessment and crisis intervention teams. In fiscal years 2024 and 2025, allocations for staff and support for regional safety centers are increased to 3 full-time equivalent certificated instructional staff for each regional safety center.(8) Funding in this section is provided for regional English language arts coordinators to provide professional development of teachers and principals around the new early screening for dyslexia requirements.(9) The educational service districts, at the request of the state board of education pursuant to RCW 28A.310.010 and 28A.305.130, may receive and screen applications for school accreditation, conduct school accreditation site visits pursuant to state board of education rules, and submit to the state board of education post-site visit recommendations for school accreditation. The educational service districts may assess a cooperative service fee to recover actual plus reasonable indirect costs for the purposes of this subsection.(10) $2,169,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $2,169,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for each educational service district to provide technology consultation, procurement, and training required under chapter 301, Laws of 2021 (schools/computers & devices).(11) $1,834,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $1,930,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for implementation of chapter 87, Laws of 2022 (ed. service district funding).(12) $2,700,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the cost of employing one full-time equivalent employee at each of the nine education service districts to support the expansion of career connected learning.(13) $500,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $500,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for educational service districts to provide students attending school in rural areas with access to a mental health professional using telemedicine. Funding must be prioritized to districts where mental health services are inadequate or nonexistent due to geographic constraints. Funding may be used for schools or school districts for technology upgrades to provide secure access for students, for contracted services, or to pay applicable copays or fees for telemedicine visits if not covered by a student's public or private insurance.(14) $325,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $325,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the Puget Sound educational service district 121 to administer a Washington state capitol civic engagement grant program for the Auburn, Federal Way, Highline, Kent, Renton, and Tukwila public school districts. Grant recipients must use the grant awards to transport one grade of either fourth or fifth grade students to the Washington state capitol campus for a day of civic engagement, which may include a capitol tour, mock legislative committee hearings, presentations on the legislative process, meet and greets with legislative members, and other related activities. If funding remains after all eligible school districts have received grant awards, the remaining funding may be used to support the program for high school students within the eligible school districts. Of the amounts provided in this subsection, $5,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $5,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided for the Puget Sound educational service district to administer the grant program.(15) $5,000,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $1,200,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely to continue behavioral health regional services grants to support school districts with the least access to behavioral health services. The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall conduct an evaluation of the investments in behavioral health supports and by December 31, 2024, report to the office of financial management and the fiscal committees of the legislature, the number of students served by specific behavioral health supports, how the students were selected for specific behavioral health supports, and how the students may have received behavioral health supports, and make recommendations for improving behavioral health supports for students.(16) $2,800,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $2,800,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the educational service districts to expand and maintain student behavioral health and mental health services.(17) $643,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $643,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for educational service districts 121 and 101 to coordinate with local mental health agencies and local school districts to arrange for in-school placements of social worker associates licensed under RCW 18.225.145 and masters in social work candidates enrolled in an accredited university program who commit to working as school social workers, and to coordinate clinical supervision for approved supervisors that meet the requirements as defined in rule by the department of health to provide the necessary supervision to the social worker associates and masters in social work candidates.(18) $125,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for the office of the superintendent of public instruction to work with educational service districts, the health care authority, and the department of health to review and update materials for information sessions provided to students designed to prevent the use of opioids, including fentanyl, specifically outlining the risks of death related to uneven dosages and pills that look like prescription drugs. If Second Substitute House Bill No. 1956 (relating to fentanyl and other substance use prevention education) is not enacted by June 30, 2024, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.(19) $400,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for educational service district 112 to offer a teacher residency program during the 2024-25 school year.(20) $500,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for educational service district 112 to support a therapeutic educational program for students in Clark, Cowlitz, and Skamania counties.(21) $180,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for the Puget Sound educational service district 121 to contract with a Washington-based Muslim ((and Arab community organization serving communities throughout the state, with experience in building educational campaigns and supporting Muslim and Arab students in our state and that has been incorporated in Washington for over 10 years, in partnership with an expert curriculum and professional development nonprofit organization with at least 10 years of experience, to support Washington teachers in implementing and incorporating lessons on Islamophobia in accordance with RCW 28A.150.210. If a Washington-based organization cannot be found, the office may seek proposals from organizations incorporated outside of Washington. Of the amounts provided in this subsection, $5,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided for the Puget Sound educational service district to administer the contract))educational organization, with expertise in curriculum about Muslim and Arab history, to develop curriculum that supports Washington teachers in implementing and incorporating lessons on Islamophobia.Sec. 1509. 2024 c 376 s 511 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTIONâFOR LOCAL EFFORT ASSISTANCEGeneral FundâState Appropriation (FY 2024). . . .$213,689,000General FundâState Appropriation (FY 2025). . . .(($211,467,000))Â Â Â Â Â $193,579,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($425,156,000))Â Â Â Â Â $407,268,000Sec. 1510. 2024 c 376 s 512 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTIONâFOR INSTITUTIONAL EDUCATION PROGRAMSGeneral FundâState Appropriation (FY 2024). . . .$16,148,000General FundâState Appropriation (FY 2025). . . .(($16,754,000))Â Â Â Â Â $18,228,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($32,902,000))Â Â Â Â Â $34,376,000The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) Each general fundâstate fiscal year appropriation includes such funds as are necessary to complete the school year ending in the fiscal year and for prior fiscal year adjustments.(2) State funding provided under this section is based on salaries and other expenditures for a 220-day school year. The superintendent of public instruction shall monitor school district expenditure plans for institutional education programs to ensure that districts plan for a full-time summer program.(3) State funding for each institutional education program shall be based on the institution's annual average full-time equivalent student enrollment. Staffing ratios for each category of institution shall remain the same as those funded in the 1995-97 biennium.(4) The funded staffing ratios for education programs for juveniles age 18 or less in department of corrections facilities shall be the same as those provided in the 1997-99 biennium.(5) $701,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $701,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely to maintain at least one certificated instructional staff and related support services at an institution whenever the K-12 enrollment is not sufficient to support one full-time equivalent certificated instructional staff to furnish the educational program. The following types of institutions are included: Residential programs under the department of social and health services for developmentally disabled juveniles, programs for juveniles under the department of corrections, programs for juveniles under the juvenile rehabilitation administration, and programs for juveniles operated by city and county jails.(6) Within the amounts provided in this section, funding is provided to increase the capacity of institutional education programs to differentiate instruction to meet students' unique educational needs, including students with individualized educational plans. Those needs may include but are not limited to one-on-one instruction, enhanced access to counseling for social emotional needs of the student, and services to identify the proper level of instruction at the time of student entry into the facility. Allocations of amounts for this purpose in a school year must be based on 45 percent of full-time enrollment in institutional education receiving a differentiated instruction amount per pupil equal to the total statewide allocation generated by the distribution formula under RCW 28A.150.260 (4)(a), (5), (6), and (8) and the allocation under RCW 28A.150.415, per the statewide full-time equivalent enrollment in common schools.(7) $200,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation in fiscal year 2024 and $200,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation in fiscal year 2025 are provided solely to support two student records coordinators to manage the transmission of academic records for each of the long-term juvenile institutions. One coordinator is provided for each of the following: The Issaquah school district for the Echo Glen children's center and for the Chehalis school district for Green Hill academic school.(8) Ten percent of the funds allocated for the institution may be carried over from one year to the next.(9) $588,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $897,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for one educational advocate to each institution with enrollments above 40 full-time equivalent students in addition to any educational advocates supported by federal funding. Educational advocates will provide the following supports to students enrolled in or just released from institutional education programs:(a) Advocacy for institutional education students to eliminate barriers to educational access and success;(b) Consultation with juvenile rehabilitation staff to develop educational plans for and with participating youth;(c) Monitoring educational progress of participating students;(d) Providing participating students with school and local resources that may assist in educational access and success upon release from institutional education facilities; and(e) Coaching students and caregivers to advocate for educational needs to be addressed at the school district upon return to the community.(10) Within the amounts provided in this section, funding is provided to increase materials, supplies, and operating costs by $85 per pupil for technology supports for institutional education programs. This funding is in addition to general education materials, supplies, and operating costs provided to institutional education programs, which exclude formula costs supported by the institutional facilities.(11) $400,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $400,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely to support instruction in cohorts of students grouped by similar age and academic levels.(12) $5,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $8,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Substitute House Bill No. 2494 (school operating costs). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2024, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.(13) $5,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $9,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely to implement Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5882 (prototypical school staffing). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2024, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.Sec. 1511. 2024 c 376 s 513 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTIONâFOR PROGRAMS FOR HIGHLY CAPABLE STUDENTSGeneral FundâState Appropriation (FY 2024). . . .$33,171,000General FundâState Appropriation (FY 2025). . . .(($32,995,000))Â Â Â Â Â $33,139,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($66,166,000))Â Â Â Â Â $66,310,000The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) Each general fund fiscal year appropriation includes such funds as are necessary to complete the school year ending in the fiscal year and for prior fiscal year adjustments.(2)(a) For the 2023-24 and 2024-25 school years, the superintendent shall allocate funding to school district programs for highly capable students as provided in RCW 28A.150.260(10)(c) except that allocations must be based on 5.0 percent of each school district's full-time equivalent enrollment. In calculating the allocations, the superintendent shall assume the following: (i) Additional instruction of 2.1590 hours per week per funded highly capable program student; (ii) fifteen highly capable program students per teacher; (iii) 36 instructional weeks per year; (iv) 900 instructional hours per teacher; and (v) the compensation rates as provided in sections 505 and 506 of this act.(b) From July 1, 2023, to August 31, 2023, the superintendent shall allocate funding to school districts programs for highly capable students as provided in section 513, chapter 297, Laws of 2022, as amended.Sec. 1512. 2024 c 376 s 515 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTIONâEDUCATION REFORM PROGRAMSGeneral FundâState Appropriation (FY 2024). . . .$132,050,000General FundâState Appropriation (FY 2025). . . .(($146,775,000))Â Â Â Â Â $138,771,000General FundâFederal Appropriation. . . .(($97,174,000))Â Â Â Â Â $97,531,000General FundâPrivate/Local Appropriation. . . .$1,450,000Education Legacy Trust AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$1,664,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($379,113,000))Â Â Â Â Â $371,466,000The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) ACCOUNTABILITY(a) $26,975,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $26,975,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025, $1,350,000 of the education legacy trust accountâstate appropriation, and $15,868,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely for development and implementation of the Washington state assessment system.(b) $14,352,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $14,352,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for implementation of chapter 159, Laws of 2013 (K-12 education - failing schools).(2) EDUCATOR CONTINUUM(a) $68,070,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and (($77,623,000))$69,619,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the following bonuses for teachers who hold valid, unexpired certification from the national board for professional teaching standards and who are teaching in a Washington public school, subject to the following conditions and limitations:(i) For national board certified teachers, a bonus of $6,206 per teacher in the 2023-24 school year and a bonus of $6,324 per teacher in the 2024-25 school year;(ii) An additional $5,000 annual bonus shall be paid to national board certified teachers who teach in either: (A) High schools where at least 50 percent of student headcount enrollment is eligible for federal free or reduced-price lunch, (B) middle schools where at least 60 percent of student headcount enrollment is eligible for federal free or reduced-price lunch, or (C) elementary schools where at least 70 percent of student headcount enrollment is eligible for federal free or reduced-price lunch;(iii) The superintendent of public instruction shall adopt rules to ensure that national board certified teachers meet the qualifications for bonuses under (b) of this subsection for less than one full school year receive bonuses in a prorated manner. All bonuses in this subsection will be paid in July of each school year. Bonuses in this subsection shall be reduced by a factor of 40 percent for first year NBPTS certified teachers, to reflect the portion of the instructional school year they are certified; and(iv) During the 2023-24 and 2024-25 school years, and within available funds, certificated instructional staff who have met the eligibility requirements and have applied for certification from the national board for professional teaching standards may receive a conditional loan of two thousand dollars or the amount set by the office of the superintendent of public instruction to contribute toward the current assessment fee, not including the initial up-front candidacy payment. The fee shall be an advance on the first annual bonus under RCW 28A.405.415. The conditional loan is provided in addition to compensation received under a district's salary allocation and shall not be included in calculations of a district's average salary and associated salary limitation under RCW 28A.400.200. Recipients who fail to receive certification after fully exhausting all years of candidacy as set by the national board for professional teaching standards are required to repay the conditional loan. The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall adopt rules to define the terms for initial grant of the assessment fee and repayment, including applicable fees. To the extent necessary, the superintendent may use revenues from the repayment of conditional loan scholarships to ensure payment of all national board bonus payments required by this section in each school year.(b) $3,418,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $3,418,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for implementation of a new performance-based evaluation for certificated educators and other activities as provided in chapter 235, Laws of 2010 (education reform) and chapter 35, Laws of 2012 (certificated employee evaluations).(c) $477,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $700,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the leadership internship program for superintendents, principals, and program administrators.(d) $810,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $810,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the development of a leadership academy for school principals and administrators. The superintendent of public instruction shall contract with an independent organization to operate a state-of-the-art education leadership academy that will be accessible throughout the state. Semiannually the independent organization shall report on amounts committed by foundations and others to support the development and implementation of this program. Leadership academy partners shall include the state level organizations for school administrators and principals, the superintendent of public instruction, the professional educator standards board, and others as the independent organization shall identify.(e) $11,500,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $11,500,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for a beginning educator support program (BEST). The program shall prioritize first year educators in the mentoring program. School districts and/or regional consortia may apply for grant funding. The program provided by a district and/or regional consortia shall include: A paid orientation; assignment of a qualified mentor; development of a professional growth plan for each beginning educator aligned with professional certification; release time for mentors and new educators to work together; and educator observation time with accomplished peers. Funding may be used to provide statewide professional development opportunities for mentors and beginning educators. Of the amounts provided in this subsection, $1,000,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $1,000,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely to support first year educators in the mentoring program.(f) $4,000,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $4,000,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the provision of training for teachers, principals, and principal evaluators in the performance-based teacher principal evaluation program.(g) $3,500,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for the office of the superintendent of public instruction to contract with an approved educator preparation program run by a statewide labor organization representing educators to fund cohorts of teacher residents. This program shall choose its candidates from among the paraeducators working in those districts. Through completing this program, participants shall attain a teaching certification with an endorsement in special education.(h) $621,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for the office of the superintendent of public instruction to contract with a statewide labor association that represents educators to provide a suite of supports and professional development opportunities for 15,000 emergency substitute teachers.(i) $720,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for the office of the superintendent of public instruction to conduct a feasibility study on the costs and timeline for developing a database and tool to identify real-time and future educator workforce shortages.Sec. 1513. 2024 c 376 s 516 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTIONâFOR TRANSITIONAL BILINGUAL PROGRAMSGeneral FundâState Appropriation (FY 2024). . . .$249,957,000General FundâState Appropriation (FY 2025). . . .(($260,599,000))Â Â Â Â Â $269,058,000General FundâFederal Appropriation. . . .(($137,117,000))Â Â Â Â Â $152,111,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($647,673,000))Â Â Â Â Â $671,126,000The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) Each general fund fiscal year appropriation includes such funds as are necessary to complete the school year ending in the fiscal year and for prior fiscal year adjustments.(2)(a) For the 2023-24 and 2024-25 school years, the superintendent shall allocate funding to school districts for transitional bilingual programs under RCW 28A.180.010 through 28A.180.080, including programs for exited students, as provided in RCW 28A.150.260(10)(b) and the provisions of this section. In calculating the allocations, the superintendent shall assume the following averages: (i) Additional instruction of 4.7780 hours per week per transitional bilingual program student in grades kindergarten through six and 6.7780 hours per week per transitional bilingual program student in grades seven through twelve in school years 2023-24 and 2024-25; (ii) additional instruction of 3.0000 hours per week in school years 2023-24 and 2024-25 for the head count number of students who have exited the transitional bilingual instruction program within the previous two years based on their performance on the English proficiency assessment; (iii) fifteen transitional bilingual program students per teacher; (iv) 36 instructional weeks per year; (v) 900 instructional hours per teacher; and (vi) the compensation rates as provided in sections 505 and 506 of this act. Pursuant to RCW 28A.180.040(1)(g), the instructional hours specified in (a)(ii) of this subsection (2) are within the program of basic education.(b) From July 1, 2023, to August 31, 2023, the superintendent shall allocate funding to school districts for transitional bilingual instruction programs as provided in section 516, chapter 297, Laws of 2022, as amended.(3) The superintendent may withhold allocations to school districts in subsection (2) of this section solely for the central provision of assessments as provided in RCW 28A.180.090 (1) and (2) up to the following amounts: 1.64 percent for school year 2023-24 and ((1.57))1.50 percent for school year 2024-25.(4) The general fundâfederal appropriation in this section is for migrant education under Title I Part C and English language acquisition, and language enhancement grants under Title III of the elementary and secondary education act.(5) $35,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $35,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely to track current and former transitional bilingual program students.(6) $1,461,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation in fiscal year 2024 and $1,916,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation in fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the central provision of assessments as provided in RCW 28A.180.090, and is in addition to the withholding amounts specified in subsection (3) of this section.Sec. 1514. 2024 c 376 s 517 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTIONâFOR THE LEARNING ASSISTANCE PROGRAMGeneral FundâState Appropriation (FY 2024). . . .$484,953,000General FundâState Appropriation (FY 2025). . . .(($491,565,000))Â Â Â Â Â $492,853,000General FundâFederal Appropriation. . . .(($636,543,000))Â Â Â Â Â $647,670,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($1,613,061,000))Â Â Â Â Â $1,625,476,000The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) The general fundâstate appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(a) The appropriations include such funds as are necessary to complete the school year ending in the fiscal year and for prior fiscal year adjustments.(b)(i) For the 2023-24 and 2024-25 school years, the superintendent shall allocate funding to school districts for learning assistance programs as provided in RCW 28A.150.260(10)(a). In calculating the allocations, the superintendent shall assume the following averages: (A) Additional instruction of 2.3975 hours per week per funded learning assistance program student for the 2023-24 and 2024-25 school years; (B) additional instruction of 1.1 hours per week per funded learning assistance program student for the 2023-24 and 2024-25 school years in qualifying high-poverty school building; (C) fifteen learning assistance program students per teacher; (D) 36 instructional weeks per year; (E) 900 instructional hours per teacher; and (F) the compensation rates as provided in sections 505 and 506 of this act.(ii) From July 1, 2023, to August 31, 2023, the superintendent shall allocate funding to school districts for learning assistance programs as provided in section 517, chapter 297, Laws of 2022, as amended.(c) A school district's funded students for the learning assistance program shall be the sum of the district's full-time equivalent enrollment in grades K-12 multiplied by the district's percentage of October headcount enrollment in grades K-12 eligible for free or reduced-price lunch in the school year period defined under RCW 28A.150.260(10)(a). A school year's October headcount enrollment for free and reduced-price lunch shall be as reported in the comprehensive education data and research system.(2) Allocations made pursuant to subsection (1) of this section shall be adjusted to reflect ineligible applications identified through the annual income verification process required by the national school lunch program, as recommended in the report of the state auditor on the learning assistance program dated February, 2010.(3) The general fundâfederal appropriation in this section is provided for Title I Part A allocations of the every student succeeds act of 2016.(4) A school district may carry over from one year to the next up to 10 percent of the general fundâstate funds allocated under this program; however, carryover funds shall be expended for the learning assistance program.(5) Within existing resources, during the 2023-24 and 2024-25 school years, school districts are authorized to use funds allocated for the learning assistance program to also provide assistance to high school students who have not passed the state assessment in science.Sec. 1515. 2024 c 376 s 518 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTIONâPER PUPIL ALLOCATIONSStatewide Average AllocationsPer Annual Average Full-Time Equivalent StudentBasic Education Program2023-24School Year2024-25School YearGeneral Apportionment$10,354(($10,859))$10,861Pupil Transportation$783(($803))$822Special Education Programs$12,272(($12,762))$13,061Institutional Education Programs$25,795(($27,327))$28,378Programs for Highly Capable Students$647$675Transitional Bilingual Programs$1,571(($1,622))$1,649Learning Assistance Program$1,009(($1,052))$1,054Sec. 1516. 2024 c 376 s 519 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION(1) Amounts distributed to districts by the superintendent through part V of this act are for allocation purposes only, unless specified by part V of this act, and do not entitle a particular district, district employee, or student to a specific service, beyond what has been expressly provided in statute. Part V of this act restates the requirements of various sections of Title 28A RCW. If any conflict exists, the provisions of Title 28A RCW control unless this act explicitly states that it is providing an enhancement. Any amounts provided in part V of this act in excess of the amounts required by Title 28A RCW provided in statute, are not within the program of basic education unless clearly stated by this act.(2) When adopting new or revised rules or policies relating to the administration of allocations in part V of this act that result in fiscal impact, the office of the superintendent of public instruction shall seek legislative approval through the budget request process.(3) Appropriations made in this act to the office of the superintendent of public instruction shall initially be allotted as required by this act. Subsequent allotment modifications shall not include transfers of moneys between sections of this act, except as provided in subsections (6) and (7) of this section.(4) Appropriations in sections 504 and 506 of this act for insurance benefits under chapter 41.05 RCW are provided solely for the superintendent to allocate to districts for employee health benefits as provided in section 909 of this act. The superintendent may not allocate, and districts may not expend, these amounts for any other purpose beyond those authorized in section 909 of this act.(5) As required by RCW 28A.710.110, the office of the superintendent of public instruction shall transmit the charter school authorizer oversight fee for the charter school commission to the charter school oversight account.(6) By January 15, 2024, the office of the superintendent of public instruction must identify funding in this Part V from the elementary and secondary school emergency relief III accountâfederal appropriation from funds attributable to subsection 2001(f), the American rescue plan act of 2021, P.L. 11 117-2 and general fundâfederal appropriation (CRRSA/GEER) that are provided solely for the purposes defined in sections 507, 522, and 523 of this act and are at risk of being unobligated or unspent by federal deadlines, as of January 15, 2024. Funding identified at risk under this subsection must be reported to the fiscal committees of the legislature and expended as allocations to school districts in the same proportion as received under part A of title I of the elementary and secondary education act of 1965 in the most recent fiscal year.(7) The appropriations to the office of the superintendent of public instruction in this act shall be expended for the programs and amounts specified in this act. However, after May 1, 2024, unless specifically prohibited by this act and after approval by the director of financial management, the superintendent of public instruction may transfer state general fund appropriations for fiscal year 2024 among the following programs to meet the apportionment schedule for a specified formula in another of these programs: General apportionment; employee compensation adjustments; pupil transportation; special education programs; institutional education programs; transitional bilingual programs; highly capable programs; and learning assistance programs.(8) The appropriations to the office of the superintendent of public instruction in this act shall be expended for the programs and amounts specified in this act. However, after May 1, 2025, unless specifically prohibited by this act and after approval by the director of financial management, the superintendent of public instruction may transfer state general fund appropriations for fiscal year 2025 among the following programs to meet the apportionment schedule for a specified formula in another of these programs: General apportionment; employee compensation adjustments; pupil transportation; special education programs; institutional education programs; transitional bilingual programs; highly capable programs; and learning assistance programs.(9) The director of financial management shall notify the appropriate legislative fiscal committees in writing prior to approving any allotment modifications or transfers under this section.Sec. 1517. 2024 c 376 s 520 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE OFFICE OF THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTIONâFOR CHARTER SCHOOLSWashington Opportunity Pathways AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .(($178,654,000))Â Â Â Â Â $173,162,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($178,654,000))Â Â Â Â Â $173,162,000The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) The superintendent shall distribute funding appropriated in this section to charter schools under chapter 28A.710 RCW. Within amounts provided in this section the superintendent may distribute funding for safety net awards for charter schools with demonstrated needs for special education funding beyond the amounts provided under chapter 28A.710 RCW.(2) $3,293,000 of the opportunity pathways accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of chapter 50, Laws of 2023 (K-12 inflationary increases).(3) $1,421,000 of the opportunity pathways accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Substitute House Bill No. 1436 (special education funding).(4) $224,000 of the opportunity pathways accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Substitute House Bill No. 2494 (school operating costs). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2024, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.(5) $111,000 of the opportunity pathways accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Substitute House Bill No. 2180 (special education cap). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2024, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.(6) $7,815,000 of the opportunity pathways accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for payment for enrichment to charter schools.(7) $355,000 of the opportunity pathways accountâstate appropriation is provided solely to implement Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5882 (prototypical school staffing). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2024, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.Sec. 1518. 2024 c 376 s 523 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTIONâFOR TRANSITION TO KINDERGARTEN PROGRAMSGeneral FundâState Appropriation (FY 2024). . . .$6,870,000General FundâState Appropriation (FY 2025). . . .(($69,959,000))Â Â Â Â Â $85,733,000General FundâFederal Appropriation. . . .$41,848,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($118,677,000))Â Â Â Â Â $134,451,000The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) $6,870,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024, (($69,959,000))$85,733,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $41,848,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation (CRRSA/GEER) are for implementation of Second Substitute House Bill No. 1550 (transition to kindergarten). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2023, the office of the superintendent of public instruction must distribute the amounts appropriated in this section for enrollment funding for transitional kindergarten programs to participating school districts, charter schools authorized pursuant to RCW 28A.710.080(2), and state-tribal education compact schools during the 2023-24 and 2024-25 school years. Enrollment funding for transitional kindergarten is not part of the state's statutory program of basic education.(2) $150,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 ((and $150,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are))is provided solely for staff and administrative costs necessary to provide interdepartmental coordination and engagement with stakeholders with respect to the program authorized in chapter 420, Laws of 2023 (transition to kindergarten).(End of part)PART XVIHIGHER EDUCATIONSec. 1601. 2024 c 376 s 601 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE STATE BOARD FOR COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGESGeneral FundâState Appropriation (FY 2024). . . .$920,130,000General FundâState Appropriation (FY 2025). . . .(($988,064,000))Â Â Â Â Â $960,324,000Climate Commitment AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$475,000Community/Technical College Capital ProjectsAccountâState Appropriation. . . .$21,368,000Education Legacy Trust AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$164,063,000Invest in Washington AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$92,000Workforce Education Investment AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .(($304,251,000))Â Â Â Â Â $333,027,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($2,398,443,000))Â Â Â Â Â $2,399,479,000The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) $33,261,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $33,261,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely as special funds for training and related support services, including financial aid, as specified in RCW 28C.04.390. Funding is provided to support at least 7,170 full-time equivalent students in fiscal year 2024 and at least 7,170 full-time equivalent students in fiscal year 2025.(2) $5,000,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $5,000,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $5,450,000 of the education legacy trust accountâstate appropriation are provided solely for administration and customized training contracts through the job skills program. The state board shall make an annual report by January 1st of each year to the governor and to the appropriate policy and fiscal committees of the legislature under RCW 43.01.036 regarding implementation of this section, listing the scope of grant awards, the distribution of funds by educational sector and region of the state, and the results of the partnerships supported by these funds.(3) $425,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $425,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for Seattle Central College's expansion of allied health programs.(4) $5,250,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $5,250,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the student achievement initiative.(5) $1,610,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $1,610,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $904,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation are provided solely for the mathematics, engineering, and science achievement program.(6) $1,500,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $1,500,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for operating a fabrication composite wing incumbent worker training program to be housed at the Washington aerospace training and research center.(7) $100,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $100,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the aerospace center of excellence currently hosted by Everett community college to:(a) Increase statewide communications and outreach between industry sectors, industry organizations, businesses, K-12 schools, colleges, and universities;(b) Enhance information technology to increase business and student accessibility and use of the center's web site; and(c) Act as the information entry point for prospective students and job seekers regarding education, training, and employment in the industry.(8) $24,001,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and (($24,601,000))$24,745,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the implementation of the college affordability program as set forth in RCW 28B.15.066.(9) Community and technical colleges are not required to send mass mailings of course catalogs to residents of their districts. Community and technical colleges shall consider lower cost alternatives, such as mailing postcards or brochures that direct individuals to online information and other ways of acquiring print catalogs.(10) The state board for community and technical colleges shall not use funds appropriated in this section to support intercollegiate athletics programs.(11) $157,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $157,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the Wenatchee Valley college wildfire prevention program.(12) $150,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $150,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the Puget Sound welcome back center at Highline College to create a grant program for internationally trained individuals seeking employment in the behavioral health field in Washington state.(13) $750,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $750,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for increased enrollments in the integrated basic education and skills training program. Funding will support approximately 120 additional full-time equivalent enrollments annually.(14) $216,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $216,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the opportunity center for employment and education at North Seattle College.(15) $500,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $500,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for Highline College to implement the Federal Way higher education initiative in partnership with the city of Federal Way and the University of Washington Tacoma campus.(16) $350,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $350,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for Peninsula College to maintain the annual cohorts of the specified programs as follows:(a) Medical assisting, 40 students;(b) Nursing assistant, 60 students; and(c) Registered nursing, 32 students.(17) $338,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $338,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the Washington state labor education and research center at South Seattle College.(18) $150,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $150,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the aerospace and advanced manufacturing center of excellence hosted by Everett Community College to develop a semiconductor and electronics manufacturing branch in Vancouver.(19)(a) $80,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 is provided solely for a pilot program to help students, including those enrolled in state registered apprenticeship programs, connect with health care coverage. The state board for community and technical colleges must provide resources for up to two community or technical colleges, one on the east side and one on the west side of the Cascade mountains, to hire or train an employee to:(i) Provide information to students and college staff about available health insurance options;(ii) Develop culturally relevant materials and conduct outreach for historically marginalized and underserved student populations to assist these populations in their knowledge of access to low cost or free health insurance plans;(iii) Provide ongoing technical assistance to students about health insurance options or the health insurance application process; and(iv) Provide technical assistance to students as a health benefit exchange certified assister, to help students understand, shop, apply, and enroll in health insurance through Washington health planfinder.(b) Participation in the exchange assister program is contingent on fulfilling applicable contracting, security, and other program requirements.(c) The state board, in collaboration with the student achievement council and the health benefit exchange, must submit a report by June 30, 2024, to the appropriate committees of the legislature, pursuant to RCW 43.01.036, on information about barriers students, including those enrolled in state registered apprenticeship programs, encountered accessing health insurance coverage; and to provide recommendations on how to improve student access to health coverage based on data gathered from the pilot program.(20) $1,500,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $1,500,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $75,847,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation are provided solely for statewide implementation of guided pathways at each of the state's community and technical colleges or similar programs designed to improve student success, including, but not limited to, academic program redesign, student advising, and other student supports.(21) $15,220,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for college operating costs, including compensation and central services, in recognition that these costs exceed estimated increases in undergraduate operating fee revenue as a result of RCW 28B.15.067.(22) $15,220,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for employee compensation, academic program enhancements, student support services, and other institutional priorities that maintain a quality academic experience for Washington students.(23) $40,800,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely to continue to fund nurse educator salaries.(24) $40,000,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation is provided to continue to fund high-demand program faculty salaries, including but not limited to nurse educators, other health-related professions, information technology, computer science, and trades.(25) $8,000,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the state board for community and technical colleges to maintain high-demand and career launch enrollments, as provided under RCW 28C.30.020. Within the amounts provided in this subsection (25):(a) $6,000,000 of the amounts in this subsection (25) are provided to maintain and grow career launch enrollments, as provided under RCW 28C.30.020. Up to three percent of this amount may be used for administration, technical assistance, and support for career launch programs within the community and technical colleges.(b) $2,000,000 of the amounts in this subsection (25) are provided to maintain enrollments in high demand programs. These programs include, but are not limited to, allied health, computer and information science, manufacturing, and other fields identified by the state board for community and technical colleges.(c) The state board for community and technical colleges may transfer amounts between (a) and (b) of this subsection if either program does not have sufficient demand to spend the allocated funding. Any transfer must be approved by the state board for community and technical colleges and the office of financial management.(26) $8,000,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the emergency assistance grant program in RCW 28B.50.295.(27) $1,119,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $1,119,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $4,221,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation are provided solely for implementation of diversity, equity, inclusion, and antiracism provisions in chapter 28B.10 RCW.(28) $20,473,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of equity and access provisions in chapter 28B.50 RCW.(29)(a) $3,000,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $3,000,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for grants to promote workforce development in trucking and trucking-related supply chain industries and the school bus driving industry by expanding the number of registered apprenticeships, preapprenticeships, and trucking related training programs; and providing support for registered apprenticeships or programs in trucking and trucking-related supply chain industries and the school bus driving industry.(b) Grants awarded under this subsection may be used for:(i) Equipment upgrades or new equipment purchases for training purposes;(ii) New training spaces and locations to support capacity needs and expansion of training to veterans and veteran spouses, and underserved populations to include foster care and homeless transition populations and previously incarcerated persons;(iii) Faculty curriculum development and instructor training for driving, repair, and service of technological advancements facing the industries;(iv) Tuition assistance for commercial vehicle driver and related supply chain industry training, fees associated with driver testing, and other reasonable and necessary student support services, including child care costs; and(v) Fees and other reasonable costs associated with commercial truck driving examiner training and certification.(c) An entity is eligible to receive a grant if it is a nonprofit, nongovernmental, or institution of primary or higher education that provides training opportunities, including apprenticeships, preapprenticeships, preemployment training, commercial vehicle driver training and testing, or vocational training related to mechanical and support functions that support the trucking industry or the school bus driving industry; or incumbent worker training to prepare workers for the trucking and trucking-related supply chain industries or the school bus driving industry. Preference will be given to entities in compliance with government approved or accredited programs. Reporting requirements, as determined by the board, shall be required.(d) The board may use up to five percent of funds for administration of grants.(30) $3,200,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for costs associated with grants awarded in fiscal year 2023 for nursing programs to purchase or upgrade simulation laboratory equipment.(31)(a) $9,336,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely to expand cybersecurity academic enrollments by 500 FTE students.(b) The state board for community and technical colleges must coordinate with the student achievement council as provided in section 608(10) of this act to submit a progress report on the new or expanded cybersecurity academic programs, including the number of students enrolled.(32) $410,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely to establish a center for excellence in cybersecurity.(33) $2,068,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $2,068,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for legal services related to litigation by employees within the community and technical college system challenging the denial of retirement and sick leave benefits. The cases include Wolf v. State and SBCTC, Rush v. State and SBCTC (retirement), and Rush v. State and SBCTC (sick leave).(34) $4,000,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $4,000,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the opportunity grant program to provide health care workforce grants for students.(35) $2,720,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $2,720,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for each community and technical college to contract with a community-based organization to assist with financial aid access and support in communities.(36) $7,456,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the expansion of existing programming to accommodate refugees and immigrants who have arrived in Washington state on or after July 1, 2021, including those from Afghanistan and Ukraine.(37)(a) $2,160,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $2,160,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $3,600,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation are provided solely for nursing education, to increase the number of nursing slots by at least 400 new slots in the 2023-2025 fiscal biennium.(b) The state board for community and technical colleges must coordinate with the student achievement council as provided in section 608(10) of this act to submit a progress report on the new or expanded nursing academic programs, including the number of students enrolled per program.(38) $200,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the Bellingham Technical College maritime apprenticeship program.(39) $2,100,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the Skagit Valley College dental therapy education program.(40)(a) $855,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the Seattle Central College for partnership with the Seattle maritime academy. Seattle Central College must enter into a memorandum of agreement with Washington state ferries. Funding may not be expended until Seattle Central College certifies to the office of financial management that a memorandum of agreement with Washington state ferries has been executed. The memorandum of agreement must address:(((A)))(i) The shared use of training and other facilities and implementation of joint training opportunities where practicable;(((B)))(ii) Development of a joint recruitment plan aimed at increasing enrollment of women and people of color, with specific strategies to recruit existing community and technical college students, maritime skills center students, high school students from maritime programs, foster care graduates, and former juvenile rehabilitation and adult incarcerated individuals; and(((C)))(iii) Development of a training program and recruitment plan and a five-year operational plan.(((ii)))(b) The joint training program and recruitment plan and the five-year operational plan must be submitted to the appropriate policy and fiscal committees of the legislature by December 1, 2023.(41) $200,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the state board for community and technical colleges to work with interested parties, such as local law enforcement agencies, the department of corrections, representatives of county or city jail facilities, the Washington state patrol, Washington community and technical colleges, and other organizations and entities as appropriate to assess the recruitment and retention challenges for their agencies and develop recommendations to meet the workforce needs. These recommendations should focus on education and training programs that meet the needs of law enforcement and corrections agencies and must include an outreach strategy designed to inform and attract students in non-traditional program pathways. The assessment and recommendations shall be provided in a report to the governor and the appropriate committees of the legislature, pursuant to RCW 43.01.036, by October 1, 2024.(42) $12,000,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely to support the continued diversity, equity, and inclusion efforts of institutions.(43) $331,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $331,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $1,360,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation are provided solely for implementation of state registered apprenticeship provisions in chapter 28B.124 RCW.(44) $200,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the Everett Community College parent leadership training institute to recruit and train new course instructors to build additional capacity.(45) $19,850,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $35,024,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for compensation support.(46) $243,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $180,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $500,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation are provided solely for Renton Technical College. Of the amounts provided in this subsection:(a) $500,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation is for the college to award full tuition and fees to students who attend the college and graduated high school in the school district where the main campus is located. Eligible students must complete a free application for federal student aid or the Washington application for state financial aid. A report on the number of students utilizing the funding must be submitted to the appropriate committees of the legislature, pursuant to RCW 43.01.036, by January 15, 2024.(b) $243,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $180,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are for continuing outreach and participation in running start and adult education programs, including the program described in (a) of this subsection.(47)(a) $700,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the state board to administer a pilot program to increase career and technical education dual credit participation and credential attainment in professional technical programs. The state board, in collaboration with the office of the superintendent of public instruction, must select up to three community and technical colleges to participate in the pilot program during the 2023-24 and 2024-25 academic years. The three colleges must be located within the same educational service district and one must be located in a county with a population between 115,000 and 150,000. Colleges and school districts participating in the career and technical education dual credit grant program may utilize funding to cover the following expenses:(i) Subsidized out-of-pocket costs to students and families for supplies, textbooks, materials, and credit transcription fees;(ii) Outreach to prospective students and students who have completed career and technical education dual credit courses and are eligible to receive postsecondary credit to encourage participation and credit transcription;(iii) Costs associated with staff or teacher time dedicated to curriculum alignment or the development of articulation agreements; and(iv) Equipment and supplies for career and technical education dual credit courses required to meet postsecondary learning objectives.(b) By December 10, 2024, the state board, in collaboration with the office of the superintendent of public instruction, must issue a preliminary report to the appropriate committees of the legislature, pursuant to RCW 43.01.036, with findings and recommendations regarding the pilot program that may be scaled statewide. The final report is due by December 10, 2025. The state board must establish a stakeholder committee that is representative of students, faculty, staff, and agency representatives to inform this work. The report must include recommendations on the following topics:(i) Course articulation and development of model articulation agreements;(ii) Data collection and reporting;(iii) Credit transcription and transfer;(iv) Student advising and career guidance supports;(v) Alignment of career and technical education dual credit programs with credential pathways and in-demand career fields;(vi) Funding for industry-recognized credentials;(vii) Identification of priority courses and programs; and(viii) Evaluation of the statewide enrollment and data system, and recommendations for improvements to or replacement of the system to reflect articulation agreement data, student data, and transcription information to support data validity, credit portability, and program improvement.(48) $500,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for Olympic College to partner with regional high schools for college at the high school courses on-site at one or more regional high schools.(49) $1,262,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the centers of excellence.(50) $5,789,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute House Bill No. 1559 (postsecondary student needs).(51) $3,718,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5702 (student homelessness pilot).(52) (($5,429,000))$6,321,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5048 (college in high school fees).(53) $882,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5582 (nurse supply).(54) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, the state board for community and technical colleges shall develop a plan that includes the cost to provide compensation to part-time and adjunct faculty that equals or exceeds 85 percent of the compensation provided to comparably qualified full-time and tenured faculty by the 2026-27 academic year. The plan must be submitted to the governor and the higher education committees of the legislature, in accordance with RCW 43.01.036, by July 1, 2024.(55) $598,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 is provided solely for moving costs.(56) $475,000 of the climate commitment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the continuation of curriculum development and program redesign to integrate climate justice and solutions-focused assignments and professional technical green workforce modules into community college curriculum across the state. Funds provided in this subsection may not be expended or obligated prior to January 1, 2025. If Initiative Measure No. 2117 is approved in the general election, this subsection is null and void upon the effective date of the measure.(57) $801,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for community college staff to recruit, advise, and support early achievers scholars completing their early childhood qualifications. The state board shall prioritize colleges with longer wait lists for early achievers scholars. The state board for community and technical colleges shall collaborate with the department of children, youth, and families to submit a report, pursuant to RCW 43.01.036, by September 30, 2024, to the governor and appropriate committees of the legislature on early achievers grant participation data, including data on enrollment and waitlists for the grant program.(58) $85,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for Edmonds College to provide support to students who are military veterans, focusing on counseling services, financial assistance and reentry services.(59) $204,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for Olympic College to hire program directors for new health care pathways.(60) $275,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for a study of low-income student housing opportunities on community and technical college campuses to help address the housing shortage. The study shall include an analysis of the rental housing market serving each college campus; each college's need for low-income student housing; the estimated capital and ongoing costs to operate and maintain low-income student housing; and the impact on the local market rental housing supply should new low-income housing be constructed on a community or technical college campus for students. The study shall be submitted to the appropriate committees of the legislature, pursuant to RCW 43.01.036, by June 30, 2025.(61) $200,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for increasing access and capacity to manufacturing apprenticeship related supplemental instruction.(62) $150,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for expansion of the imaging science program at Tacoma Community College.(63) $1,140,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the increase in bachelor of science computer science programs.(64) $257,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for the creation of a hospitality center of excellence hosted at Columbia basin college.(65) $25,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely to the state board for community and technical colleges to collaborate with a nonprofit, professional association of state, county, city, and town officials engaged in development, enforcement, and administration of building construction codes and ordinances to design and implement training programs to accelerate the hiring of city and county permit technicians.(66) $425,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely to expand the student aid outreach and completion initiative pilot program in RCW 28B.50.940 to participating community and technical colleges located within capital region educational service district 113.(67) $1,053,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely to support college in the high school program expansion resulting from passage of chapter 314, Laws of 2023 (2SSB 5048).(68) $12,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Senate Bill No. 6296 (retail industry work group). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2024, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.(69) $412,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for the implementation of Second Substitute House Bill No. 2112 (higher ed. opioid prevention). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2024, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.(70) $11,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for Second Substitute House Bill No. 2084 (construction training/DOC). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2024, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.(71) $819,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5953 (incarcerated student grants). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2024, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.Sec. 1602. 2024 c 376 s 602 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTONGeneral FundâState Appropriation (FY 2024). . . .(($523,357,000))Â Â Â Â Â $523,332,000General FundâState Appropriation (FY 2025). . . .(($541,066,000))Â Â Â Â Â $541,265,000Aquatic Lands Enhancement AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$1,646,000Climate Commitment AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$3,413,000Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery FundâFederalAppropriation. . . .$20,000,000Model Toxics Control Operating AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$500,000Natural Climate Solutions AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$836,000Opioid Abatement Settlement AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$250,000Statewide 988 Behavioral Health Crisis Response LineAccountâState Appropriation. . . .$280,000University of Washington Building AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$1,546,000Education Legacy Trust AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$39,643,000Economic Development Strategic Reserve AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$3,127,000Biotoxin AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$632,000Dedicated Cannabis AccountâState Appropriation(FY 2024). . . .$351,000Dedicated Cannabis AccountâState Appropriation(FY 2025). . . .$366,000Accident AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$8,585,000Medical Aid AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$8,024,000Workforce Education Investment AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .(($91,196,000))Â Â Â Â Â $91,588,000Geoduck Aquaculture Research AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .(($414,000))Â Â Â Â Â $207,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($1,245,232,000))Â Â Â Â Â $1,245,591,000The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) $49,816,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and (($51,061,000))$51,360,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the implementation of the college affordability program as set forth in RCW 28B.15.066.(2) $200,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $200,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $100,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation are provided solely for one head archivist for the labor archives of Washington and reserved solely for labor archives activities, staffing, supplies, and equipment. The head will determine budget priorities and oversee expenditures on the budget. Budget funds will be reserved solely for the labor archives and shall not be used to supplant or supplement other activities of the University of Washington libraries unrelated to the collections and activities of the labor archives. The university and the head shall work in collaboration with the friends of the labor archives community advisory board.(3) $10,000,000 of the education legacy trust accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the family medicine residency network at the university to maintain and expand the number of residency slots available in Washington.(4) The university must continue work with the education research and data center to demonstrate progress in computer science and engineering enrollments. By September 1st of each year, the university shall provide a report including but not limited to the cost per student, student completion rates, and the number of low-income students enrolled in each program, any process changes or best-practices implemented by the university, and how many students are enrolled in computer science and engineering programs above the prior academic year.(5) $14,000,000 of the education legacy trust accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the expansion of degrees in the department of computer science and engineering at the Seattle campus.(6) $3,062,000 of the economic development strategic reserve accountâstate appropriation is provided solely to support the joint center for aerospace innovation technology.(7) The University of Washington shall not use funds appropriated in this section to support intercollegiate athletics programs.(8) $7,345,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $7,345,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the continued operations and expansion of the Washington, Wyoming, Alaska, Montana, Idaho medical school program.(9) $2,625,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $2,625,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the institute for stem cell and regenerative medicine. Funds appropriated in this subsection must be dedicated to research utilizing pluripotent stem cells and related research methods.(10) $500,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $500,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided to the University of Washington to support youth and young adults experiencing homelessness in the university district of Seattle. Funding is provided for the university to work with community service providers and university colleges and departments to plan for and implement a comprehensive one-stop center with navigation services for homeless youth; the university may contract with the department of commerce to expand services that serve homeless youth in the university district.(11) $1,200,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $1,200,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $1,200,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation are provided solely for the adult psychiatry residency program at the University of Washington to offer additional residency positions that are approved by the accreditation council for graduate medical education.(12) $1,000,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $1,000,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the University of Washington's psychiatry integrated care training program.(13) $427,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $427,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $426,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation are provided solely for child and adolescent psychiatry residency positions that are approved by the accreditation council for graduate medical education, as provided in RCW 28B.20.445.(14) $1,000,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $1,000,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the University of Washington School of Dentistry to support its role as a major oral health provider to individuals covered by medicaid and the uninsured.(15) $200,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $200,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the pre-law pipeline and social justice program at the University of Washington-Tacoma.(16) $226,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $226,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the university's neurology department to create a telemedicine program to disseminate dementia care best practices to primary care practitioners using the project ECHO model. The program shall provide a virtual connection for providers and content experts and include didactics, case conferences, and an emphasis on practice transformation and systems-level issues that affect care delivery. The initial users of this program shall include referral sources in health care systems and clinics, such as the university's neighborhood clinics and Virginia Mason Memorial in Yakima with a goal of adding 15 to 20 providers from smaller clinics and practices per year.(17) $102,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $102,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $350,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation are provided solely for the university's center for international trade in forest products.(18) $500,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $500,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $500,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation are provided solely for the Latino center for health.(19) $500,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $500,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for a firearm policy research program. The program will:(a) Support investigations of firearm death and injury risk factors;(b) Evaluate the effectiveness of state firearm laws and policies;(c) Assess the consequences of firearm violence; and(d) Develop strategies to reduce the toll of firearm violence to citizens of the state.(20) $400,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $400,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the climate impacts group in the college of the environment.(21) $300,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $300,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the college of education to collaborate with teacher preparation programs and the office of the superintendent of public instruction to develop open access climate science educational curriculum for use in teacher preparation programs.(22) $300,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $300,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $300,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation are provided solely for the Harry Bridges center for labor studies. The center shall work in collaboration with the state board for community and technical colleges.(23) $8,000,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for employee compensation, academic program enhancements, student support services, and other institutional priorities that maintain a quality academic experience for Washington students.(24) $8,000,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely to maintain degree production in the college of engineering at the Seattle campus.(25)(a) $2,724,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely to maintain the Washington state academic redshirt program on the Seattle campus and establish a program on the Bothell campus.(b) The university must provide a report on the redshirt program at the Seattle and Bothell campuses, including, but not limited to, the following:(i) The number of students who have enrolled in the program and the number of students by cohort;(ii) The number of students who have completed the program and the number of students by cohort;(iii) The placements of students by academic major;(iv) The number of students placed in first-choice majors;(v) The number of underrepresented minority students in the program;(vi) The number of first-generation college students in the program;(vii) The number of Washington college grant eligible or Pell grant eligible students in the program;(viii) The number of Washington state opportunity scholarship recipients in the program;(ix) The number of students who completed the program and graduated with a science, technology, engineering, or math related degree and the number of graduates by cohort; and(x) Other program outcomes.(c) A preliminary report is due to the appropriate committees of the legislature, pursuant to RCW 43.01.036, by December 1, 2023, and a final report is due December 1, 2024.(26) $2,700,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely to maintain degree capacity and undergraduate enrollments in engineering, mathematics, and science programs to support the biomedical innovation partnership zone at the Bothell campus.(27) $3,268,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely to maintain bachelor of science programs in mechanical and civil engineering to support increased student and local employer demand for graduates in these fields at the Tacoma campus.(28) $150,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $150,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $700,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation are provided solely for Washington mathematics, engineering, science achievement programs to provide enrichment opportunities in mathematics, engineering, science, and technology to students who are traditionally underrepresented in these programs. Of the amounts provided in this subsection, $500,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation is for Washington State University to plan and implement expansion of MESA activities at the Everett campus to facilitate increased attendance and degree completion by students who are underrepresented in science, technology, engineering, and mathematics degrees.(29) $75,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $75,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for a community care coordinator for transitional-age youth for the doorway project in partnership with the Seattle campus.(30) $14,000,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the expansion of the Paul G. Allen school of computer science and engineering in order to award an additional 200 degrees per year focusing on traditionally underrepresented students. A report on the program graduation rates, waitlist for entry into the program, time to degree completion, and degrees awarded must be submitted to the appropriate committees of the legislature, pursuant to RCW 43.01.036, by June 30, 2024, and June 30, 2025.(31) $200,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $200,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely to expand a series of online courses related to behavioral health and student well-being that are currently offered at the Bothell campus for school district staff. The standards for the courses must be consistent with knowledge, skill, and performance standards related to mental health and well-being of public school students. The online courses must provide:(a) Foundational knowledge in behavioral health, mental health, and mental illness;(b) Information on how to assess, intervene upon, and refer behavioral health and intersection of behavioral health and substance use issues; and(c) Approaches to promote health and positively influence student health behaviors.(32) To ensure transparency and accountability, in the 2023-2025 fiscal biennium the University of Washington shall comply with any and all financial and accountability audits by the Washington state auditor including any and all audits of university services offered to the general public, including those offered through any public-private partnership, business venture, affiliation, or joint venture with a public or private entity, except the government of the United States. The university shall comply with all state auditor requests for the university's financial and business information including the university's governance and financial participation in these public-private partnerships, business ventures, affiliations, or joint ventures with a public or private entity. In any instance in which the university declines to produce the information to the state auditor, the university will provide the state auditor a brief summary of the documents withheld and a citation of the legal or contractual provision that prevents disclosure. The summaries must be compiled into a report by the state auditor and provided on a quarterly basis to the legislature.(33) $600,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $600,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the Burke museum of natural history and culture to make education programs offered by the museum accessible to more students across Washington, especially students in underserved schools and locations. The funding shall be used for:(a) Increasing the number of students who participate in Burke education programs at reduced or no cost, including virtual programs;(b) Providing bus reimbursement for students visiting the museum on field trips and to support travel to bring museum programs across the state;(c) Staff who will form partnerships with school districts to serve statewide communities more efficiently and equitably, including through the Burkemobile program; and(d) Support of tribal consultation work, including expanding Native programming, and digitization of Native collections.(34) $410,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $410,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the university's center for human rights. The appropriation must be used to supplement, not supplant, other funding sources for the center for human rights.(35) $143,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $143,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely to the University of Washington for the establishment and operation of the state forensic anthropologist. The university shall work in conjunction with and provide the full funding directly to the King county medical examiner's office to support the statewide work of the state forensic anthropologist.(36) $64,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $64,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for one full-time mental health counselor licensed under chapter 18.225 RCW who has experience and training specifically related to working with active members of the military or military veterans.(37) $443,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $750,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the operation of the center for environmental forensic science.(38) $1,250,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $1,250,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the community-engagement test to facilitate clean energy transitions by partnering with communities, utilities, and project developers.(39) $2,000,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $2,000,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for staffing and operational expenditures related to the battery fabrication testbed.(40) $505,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $505,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for pharmacy behavioral health. The University of Washington school of pharmacy/medicine pharmacy services will hire two residency training positions and one behavioral health faculty to create a residency program focused on behavioral health.(41) $1,242,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $1,242,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $742,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation are provided solely for an increase in the number of nursing slots and graduates in the already established accelerated bachelor of science in nursing program. Of the amounts provided in this subsection, $273,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $273,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the Tacoma school of nursing and healthcare leadership.(42) $100,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $150,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the memory and brain wellness center to support the statewide expansion of the dementia friends program.(43) $77,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $250,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely to maintain a data repository to assist the state and all political subdivisions with evaluating whether and to what extent existing laws and practices with respect to voting and elections are consistent with public policy, implementing best practices in voting and elections, and to investigate potential infringements upon the right to vote.(a) The operation of the database shall be the responsibility of the director of the database, who shall be employed by the University of Washington with training and experience in demography, statistical analysis, and electoral systems. The director shall appoint necessary staff to implement and maintain the database.(b) The database shall maintain in electronic format at least the following data and records, where available, for at least the previous 12-year period:(i) Estimates of the total population, voting age population, and citizen voting age population by race, ethnicity, and language-minority groups, broken down to the election district and precinct level on a year-by-year basis for every political subdivision in the state, based on data from the United States census bureau, American community survey, or data of comparable quality collected by a public office;(ii) Election results at the precinct level for every statewide election and every election in every political subdivision;(iii) Regularly updated voter registration lists, voter history files, voting center locations, ballot drop box locations, and student engagement hub locations for every election in every political subdivision;(iv) Contemporaneous maps, descriptions of boundaries, and shapefiles for election districts and precincts;(v) The following records for every election in every political subdivision:(A) Records of all voters issued a ballot and all voters who returned a ballot; and(B) Records of all ballots with missing and mismatched signatures, including the date on which the voter was contacted or the notice was mailed, as well as the date on which the voter submitted updated information;(vi) Apportionment plans for every election in every political subdivision; and(vii) Any other data that the director deems advisable.(c) Upon the certification of election results and the completion of the voter history file after each general election, the secretary of state shall transmit copies of the following to the director of the database:(i) Election results at the precinct level, including information about rejected and cured ballots;(ii) Voter history files;(iii) Shapefiles for election districts; and(iv) Lists of voting centers, ballot drop boxes, and student engagement hubs.(d) The director and staff shall update election data in the database as soon as it is available from the office of the secretary of state, following certification of each election as required by RCW 29A.60.190 or 29A.60.250.(e) Except for any data, information, or estimates that identify individual voters, the data, information, and estimates maintained by the database shall be posted online and made available to the public at no cost.(f) The database shall prepare any estimates made pursuant to this section by applying scientifically rigorous and validated methodologies.(g) On or before January 1, 2025, the database shall publish on its website and transmit to the state for dissemination to county auditors and the secretary of state a list of political subdivisions required, pursuant to section 203 of the federal voting rights act, 52 U.S.C. Sec. 10503, to provide assistance to members of language-minority groups and each language in which those political subdivisions are required to provide assistance. Each county auditor shall transmit the list described in this subsection to all political subdivisions within their jurisdiction.(h) The database will complete regular analysis of ballot rejections and cures, identifying population subgroups with higher than average ballot rejection rates. An annual report of ballot rejections will be posted online and made available to the public at no cost. Database staff may work with the secretary of state and county auditors to examine new practices and solutions for reducing ballot rejections and increasing ballot cure rates.(i) Staff at the database may provide nonpartisan technical assistance to political subdivisions, scholars, and the general public seeking to use the resources of the database.(44) $122,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $122,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for sexual assault nurse examiner training.(45) $2,505,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the expansion of the University of Washington school of dentistry regional initiatives in dental education (RIDE) program.(46) Within existing resources, the institution must resume a mentoring, organization, and social support for autism inclusion on campus program. The program must focus on academic coaching, peer-mentoring, support for social interactions, and career preparation.(47) $6,532,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $11,108,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for compensation support.(48) $712,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $4,183,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the behavioral health teaching faculty physician and facility support.(49) $1,869,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $3,738,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for operations and maintenance support of the behavioral health teaching faculty.(50) $1,000,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the center for indigenous health to increase the number of American Indian and Alaska Native physicians practicing in the state of Washington.(51) $484,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely to the university for Friday harbor labs in the amount of $125,000 each fiscal year and the school of aquatic and fishery sciences in the amount of $117,000 each fiscal year to perform coordinating, monitoring, and research related to Puget Sound kelp conservation and recovery.(52) $200,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely to develop a framework for research to help determine inequities in poverty, access to service, language, barriers, and access to justice for individuals of Middle Eastern descent.(53) $3,000,000 of the climate commitment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the development of an energy transformation strategy to modernize the energy infrastructure and better align the institution's sustainability values at the Seattle campus.(54) $2,854,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for increasing enrollments in computing and engineering programs at the Tacoma campus.(55)(a) $800,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the colab for community and behavioral health policy to collaborate with allies in healthier systems for health and abundance in youth to pilot test a culturally responsive training curricula for an expanded children's mental health workforce in community behavioral health sites. Community and lived experience stakeholders, representing communities of color, must make up over half of the project team. The pilot implementation shall include expansion of:(i) The clinical training of both a lived experience workforce and licensed workforce to provide culturally responsive and evidence-informed mental health services focused on families, children, and youth;(ii) An implementation plan that allows for local flexibility and local community input; and(iii) An evaluation plan that will yield information about the potential success in implementation statewide and the improved experiences of those seeking mental health services.(b) The project team must report its findings and recommendations to the appropriate committees of the legislature in compliance with RCW 43.01.036 by June 30, 2025.(56) $520,000 of the natural climate solutions accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the biological response to ocean acidification to advance high-priority biological experiments to better understand the relationship between marine organisms and ocean acidification.(57) $300,000 of the natural climate solutions accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for monitoring assistance at the Washington ocean acidification center.(58) $104,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $104,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the continued implementation of chapter 191, Laws of 2022 (veterans & military suicide).(59) $426,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the continued implementation of RCW 49.60.525 (racial restrictions/review).(60) $205,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 is provided solely to organize and facilitate the difficult to discharge task force described in section 133(11) of this act and its operations, including any associated ad hoc subgroups through October 31, 2023.(61) $500,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the addictions, drug and alcohol institute to continue cannabis and public health impact research. Funding may be used to develop resources regarding the connection between first episode psychosis and cannabis use.(62) $2,224,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for program support and student scholarships for the expansion of the master of arts in applied child and adolescent psychology program. Of the amounts provided in this subsection:(a) $1,116,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for program support at the Seattle site.(b) $1,108,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for student scholarships at the Seattle site.(63) $800,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the development and implementation of a program to support pathways from prison to the university's Tacoma campus. The university shall collaborate with formerly incarcerated women, Tacoma Community College, the freedom education project Puget Sound, the women's village, the state board for community and technical colleges, and the department of corrections, in development and implementation of the pathways program.(64) $580,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the Allen school scholars program.(65) $1,397,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for increased student support services at the Tacoma campus.(66) $158,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $158,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $798,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation are provided solely for continued implementation of diversity, equity, inclusion, and antiracism professional development for faculty and staff, student training, and campus climate assessments in chapter 28B.10 RCW.(67) $50,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $50,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the college of education to partner with the Chehalis and Spokane school districts to continue the math improvement pilot program.(68) $300,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for support and promotion of a long-term care nursing residency program and externship.(69) $400,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for nanocellulose based research to produce a replacement for cellophane and clear plastic products with one made with plant materials that is biodegradable.(70) $150,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $450,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely to the University of Washington for the operation of a pilot plant to produce nanocellulose based materials for evaluation by potential users, such as packaging manufacturers and companies that produce polylactic acid composites.(71) $1,238,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely to establish washpop, a statewide integrated data repository for population and policy research on topics, including criminal justice and safety, economic prosperity and equity, and health and social well-being.(72) $50,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $50,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for continuation of the collaborative for the advancement of telemedicine, hosted by the institution's telehealth services.(73) $100,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 is provided solely for the center for health workforce studies to continue a program to track dental workforce trends, needs, and enhancements to better serve the increasing population and demand for access to adequate oral health care. The center shall continue the program in consultation with dental stakeholders including, but not limited to, provider associations and oral health philanthropic leaders. The workforce reporting program is to be considered a public-private partnership. The institutions may accept matching funds from interested stakeholders to help facilitate and administer the workforce reporting program. Information generated by the dental workforce reporting program shall be made available on the center's website in a deidentified, aggregate format.(74) $200,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for planning student studios to assist cities and counties with planning projects. Assistance shall focus on students and supporting faculty to facilitate on-site learning with cities and counties.(75) The institution must report to and coordinate with the department of ecology to track expenditures from climate commitment act accounts, as defined and described in RCW 70A.65.300 and section 302(13) of this act.(76) $513,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute House Bill No. 1559 (postsecondary student needs).(77) $686,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $669,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute House Bill No. 1745 (diversity clinical trials).(78) $150,000 of the climate commitment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 1181 (climate change/planning).(79) $208,000 of the statewide 988 behavioral health crisis response accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 1134 (988 system).(80) (($2,053,000))$2,445,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5048 (college in high school fees).(81) $157,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5189 (behavioral health support).(82) $7,500,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 is provided solely for support of staff, training, and other costs necessary to facilitate the opening of the behavioral health teaching facility.(83) $450,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely to continue financial student assistance in public service oriented graduate and professional degree programs, referred to as "fee-based" programs, whose tuition for public service degrees is over $18,000 per year. Programs shall create mechanisms to prioritize assistance to traditionally underrepresented students, specifically those who have expressed a commitment to service in the physician assistant, community oriented public health, or social work programs. The institution may offer financial assistance for students that volunteer or work with public health agencies, including as contact tracers.(84) $1,100,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $1,100,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for a pilot program for short-term stabilization and transition support for individuals incompetent to stand trial due to intellectual or developmental disability as provided in Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5440 (competency evaluations).(85) $1,464,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5263 (psilocybin).(86) $400,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 and $500,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation are provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 1715 (domestic violence).(87) $80,000,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $60,000,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $20,000,000 of the coronavirus state fiscal recovery fundâfederal appropriation are provided solely to support the operations and teaching mission of the University of Washington medical center and harborview medical center.(88) $239,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of chapter 232, Laws of 2023 (Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5447) (alternative jet fuel).(89) $263,000 of the climate commitment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for two grant writers to support the ongoing need for tribal and overburdened communities to access state and federal funding opportunities that advance environmental justice through the thriving communities technical assistance program. If Initiative Measure No. 2117 is approved in the 2024 general election, upon the effective date of the measure, funds from the consolidated climate account may not be used for the purposes in this subsection.(90) $20,000,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely to support behavioral health care and training at the University of Washington medical center. A report detailing how these funds and any federal funds are expended for the medical center shall be submitted to the governor and the appropriate committees of the legislature, pursuant to RCW 43.01.036, by June 30, 2025.(91) $300,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for an entrepreneur in residence pilot program for graduate and postgraduate international students.(92) $180,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for soccer field renovation and associated lighting upgrades at the institution.(93) $250,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the Barnard center for infant and early childhood mental health, within the University of Washington, to identify existing infant and early childhood mental health workforce initiatives and activities. In consultation with the health care authority, the center must identify and provide stakeholder connections, including tribes, to assist with workforce strategic planning. A report of findings and recommendations for expansion, diversification, training, and retention within the infant early childhood mental health workforce must be submitted to the appropriate committees of the legislature and to the children and youth behavioral health work group as established in RCW 74.09.4951, pursuant to RCW 43.01.036 by June 30, 2025.(94) $500,000 of the model toxics control operating accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the school of public health to study and develop mobile screening methods to screen consumer products for fluorine, an indicator of per- and polyfluoralkyl chemicals. The developed method shall be compared to established approaches to measure fluorine and per- and polyfluoralkyl chemicals. A report on development of a functional screening method and recommendations to limit harmful exposures must be submitted to the appropriate committees of the legislature, pursuant to RCW 43.01.036, by June 30, 2025.(95) $250,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the center for social sector analytics and technology to provide a report on conditional scholarships for students who commit to working in the public behavioral health system. The institution must submit a preliminary report to the appropriate committees of the legislature, pursuant to RCW 43.01.036, by June 30, 2025. The preliminary report must include overall effectiveness of the conditional grant programs, how to improve clinical training, how to support underserved communities, and the progress in diversifying the public behavioral workforce.(96)(a) $120,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $250,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the school mental health assessment research and training (SMART) center to research and report on collection and use of data, including universal screening and other social-emotional, behavioral, and mental health (SEBMH) data, in public schools within the multitiered system of supports and integrated student supports frameworks.(b) The SMART center must submit a preliminary report to the appropriate committees of the legislature, pursuant to RCW 43.01.036, by December 1, 2024. At a minimum, the preliminary report must:(i) Analyze alignment of current Washington statute and guidance with national best practices on universal SEBMH screening;(ii) Identify facilitators and barriers to selection and effective use of research-based, culturally relevant universal SEBMH screening tools in Washington schools;(iii) Analyze schools' current application of existing Washington statute relevant to SEBMH screening requirements;(iv) Recommend statutory changes to increase systematic SEBMH screening of students in schools; and(v) Include an implementation plan for demonstration sites to determine the feasibility, acceptability, and effectiveness of a best practices guide or resource on universal student SEBMH screening.(c) The SMART center must submit a final report to the relevant policy and fiscal committees of the legislature, pursuant to RCW 43.01.036, by June 30, 2025. In addition to information from the preliminary report, the final report must include a guide or other resource for implementing best practices for screening of student SEBMH in schools, including the following best practices:(i) Training and professional development;(ii) Engaging with families, students, and other partners;(iii) Informing tier 1 universal strategies and practices;(iv) Assuring adequate availability of services;(v) Complying with privacy and confidentiality laws;(vi) Assuring cultural responsiveness in SEBMH screening practices; and(vii) Partnering with community-based organizations.(97) $140,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the junior summer institute program to pilot a regional focused expansion that provides a pathway for historically underrepresented students into public policy and public service.(98) $174,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for genome sequencing and other research to improve control and eradication of the European green crab.(99) $615,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for legal services related to the behavioral health teaching facility.(100) $412,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely to develop and implement the Washington reproductive access alliance. The alliance shall provide a service coordination website and phone line, administrative support and coordination of the alliance, patient care coordination, and social support for patient travel.(101) $350,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for the University of Washington to establish a pilot program to support activities related to cooperation with academic institutions and governmental and public agencies of the Republic of Finland, the Kingdom of Sweden, and the Kingdom of Norway. Eligible activities include, but are not limited to, cooperation in clean energy, clean technology, clean transportation, telecommunications, agriculture and wood science technology, general economic development, and other areas of mutual interest with Nordic nations and institutions.(102) $630,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely to support college in the high school program expansion resulting from passage of chapter 314, Laws of 2023 (2SSB 5048).(103) $250,000 of the opioid abatement settlement accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the University of Washington center for novel therapeutics in addiction psychiatry for an initial study of ibogaine assisted therapy.(104) $535,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for coresponse curriculum development and certification and credential opportunities.(((106)))(105) $232,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for the implementation of Second Substitute House Bill No. 2112 (higher ed. opioid prevention). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2024, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.(((107)))(106) $214,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for the implementation of Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 6228 (substance use treatment). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2024, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.(((108)))(107) $10,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5890 (ballot rejection). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2024, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.(((109)))(108) $267,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 6125 (Lakeland village records). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2024, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.(((110)))(109) $250,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 6286 (nurse anesthetist workforce). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2024, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.Sec. 1603. 2024 c 376 s 603 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITYGeneral FundâState Appropriation (FY 2024). . . .$282,829,000General FundâState Appropriation (FY 2025). . . .(($293,782,000))Â Â Â Â Â $293,994,000Climate Commitment AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$8,321,000Washington State University Building AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$792,000Education Legacy Trust AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$33,995,000Model Toxics Control Operating AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$2,771,000Dedicated Cannabis AccountâState Appropriation(FY 2024). . . .$189,000Dedicated Cannabis AccountâState Appropriation(FY 2025). . . .$197,000Workforce Education Investment AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$49,032,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($671,908,000))Â Â Â Â Â $672,120,000The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) $90,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $90,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for a rural economic development and outreach coordinator.(2) The university must continue work with the education research and data center to demonstrate progress in computer science and engineering enrollments. By September 1st of each year, the university shall provide a report including but not limited to the cost per student, student completion rates, and the number of low-income students enrolled in each program, any process changes or best-practices implemented by the university, and how many students are enrolled in computer science and engineering programs above the prior academic year.(3) $500,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $500,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for state match requirements related to the federal aviation administration grant.(4) Washington State University shall not use funds appropriated in this section to support intercollegiate athletic programs.(5) $7,000,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $7,000,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $22,800,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation are provided solely for the continued development and operations of a medical school program in Spokane.(6) $135,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $135,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for a honey bee biology research position.(7) $35,411,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and (($36,296,000))$36,508,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the implementation of the college affordability program as set forth in RCW 28B.15.066.(8) $580,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $580,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the development of an organic agriculture systems degree program located at the university center in Everett.(9) $630,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $630,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the creation of an electrical engineering program located in Bremerton. At full implementation, the university is expected to increase degree production by 25 new bachelor's degrees per year. The university must identify these students separately when providing data to the education research data center as required in subsection (2) of this section.(10) $1,370,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $1,370,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the creation of software engineering and data analytic programs at the university center in Everett. At full implementation, the university is expected to enroll 50 students per academic year. The university must identify these students separately when providing data to the education research data center as required in subsection (2) of this section.(11) General fundâstate appropriations in this section are reduced to reflect a reduction in state-supported tuition waivers for graduate students. When reducing tuition waivers, the university will not change its practices and procedures for providing eligible veterans with tuition waivers.(12) $1,154,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $1,154,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for RCW 82.16.120 and 82.16.165 (renewable energy, tax incentives).(13) $376,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $376,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for RCW 28B.30.357 (children's mental health).(14) $585,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $585,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for RCW 77.12.272 (elk hoof disease).(15) $2,076,000 of the model toxics control operating accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the university's soil health initiative and its network of long-term agroecological research and extension (LTARE) sites. The network must include a Mount Vernon REC site.(16) $42,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $42,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for one full-time mental health counselor licensed under chapter 18.225 RCW who has experience and training specifically related to working with active members of the military or military veterans.(17) $33,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $33,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for compensation funding for Western Washington University employees that work on the Washington State University Everett campus.(18) $327,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $327,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for pharmacy behavioral health. Washington State University college of pharmacy and pharmaceutical sciences will hire two residency training positions and one behavioral health faculty to create a residency program focused on behavioral health.(19) $1,921,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $3,526,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for compensation support.(20) $608,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $608,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for the Washington state academy of sciences to provide support for core operations and to accomplish its mission of providing science in the service of Washington, pursuant to its memorandum of understanding with the university.(21) $188,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $188,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for stormwater research to study the long-term efficacy of green stormwater infrastructure that incorporates compost to remove pollutants.(22) $500,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $500,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the joint center for deployment and research in earth abundant materials.(23) $4,112,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely to establish a bachelor's degree in cybersecurity operations.(24) $568,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $568,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for implementation of chapter 212, Laws of 2022 (community solar projects).(25) $7,721,000 of the climate commitment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the creation of the institute for northwest energy futures.(26) $3,910,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for increasing nursing salaries at the institution.(27) $476,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for nursing program equipment.(28) $2,521,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the establishment of a bachelor of science in public health degree at the Pullman, Spokane, and Vancouver campuses.(29) $600,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $600,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for increasing the base funding for the William D. Ruckleshaus Center.(30) $50,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $150,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for Washington State University extension service to hire a qualified contractor to assess program performance of the northeast Washington wolf-livestock management grant program as provided in RCW 16.76.020 and recipients of pass-through grants from the northeast Washington wolf-livestock management nonappropriated account. The program must be assessed for the period of 2021-2023 as to whether grant recipients met the intent of the appropriation.(a) For recipients of grant funds from the program authorized in RCW 16.76.020, performance must be evaluated on the deployment of nonlethal deterrence, specifically with the goal to reduce the likelihood of cattle being injured or killed by wolves by deploying proactive, preventative methods that have a good probability of producing effective results. Grantees who use funds for range riders or herd monitoring must deploy this tool in a manner so that targeted areas with cattle are visited daily or near daily. Grantees must collaborate with other entities providing prevention efforts resulting in coordinated wolf-livestock conflict deterrence efforts, both temporally and spatially, therefore providing well timed and placed preventative coverage on the landscape.(b) For recipient of the pass-through funds from the northeast Washington wolf-livestock management nonappropriated account, performance must be based on the intent of conducting proactive deterrence activities with the goal to reduce the likelihood of cattle being injured or killed by wolves.(c) The contractor must have at least five years of experience in the combination of field work as a range rider and running range riding programs in areas with wolf-livestock conflict in the western United States. In conducting the assessment, the contractor may access written range rider logs and georeferenced data produced by the grant recipients, in addition to reading annual reports of the recipients and interviewing relevant participants. The contractor may also provide general recommendations for improvement of programs intended to provide effective wolf-livestock deterrence, taking into account the terrain and other challenges faced in northeast Washington. The contractor must complete their assessment for Washington State University extension service to be delivered to the legislature, pursuant to RCW 43.01.036, by December 1, 2024.(31) $500,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the energy program for residential energy code education and support, including training, hotline support to the building industry, and information material and web resources.(32) $695,000 of the model toxics control operating accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for turf grass resilience research in high traffic areas.(33)$95,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $215,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the William D. Ruckelshaus center to support the jail modernization task force created in section 915, chapter 475, Laws of 2023.(a) Of the amounts provided in this subsection, $95,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 is provided solely for the center to conduct a jail modernization task force convening assessment and design a facilitated collaborative process and work plan for the jail modernization task force created in section 915, chapter 475, Laws of 2023.(b) Of the amounts provided in this subsection, $215,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for the center to provide staff support, facilitation, and development of the task force's initial report of findings and recommendations described in section 915, chapter 475, Laws of 2023.(c) The convening assessment shall include, but not be limited to:(i) Gathering and reviewing additional background information relevant to the project;(ii) Meeting and consulting with the Washington state association of counties to gather background on issues, confirm the list of members to interview, and provide updates throughout the duration of the work; and meeting and consulting with the Washington state institute for public policy to coordinate, inform, and share information and findings gathered; and(iii) Setting up individual conversations with task force members, and others as needed, to assess their goals, expectations, interests, and desired outcomes for the task force. The purpose of these conversations will also be to gather insights and perspectives from members about, but not limited to, the following:(A) What key components and issues should be included in a statewide jail modernization plan, what existing facilities are in need of upgrades or remodel, and any need for building new facilities;(B) Identifying any additional key stakeholders;(C) Employee retention issues and potential solutions;(D) The impact of overtime, jail atmosphere, emergency response time, inexperienced corrections officers, and how to overcome these challenges;(E) The type of and design of facilities needed to house those with behavioral health needs and associated costs of these facilities;(F) Available diversion programs and their costs;(G) Types of existing behavioral health facilities for those involved in the criminal justice system, the costs of building and running these facilities, how these facilities vary by location, the viability of offering facilities in every county, and potential system improvements to the types of services and supports offered and delivered to those with behavioral health needs;(H) The types of services and supports provided to those exiting the jail system; and(I) Reforms necessary to create and enhance a seamless transition back to the community following jail confinement.(d) Center staff will provide a convening assessment report that will include the overall process design and work plan for the task force by June 30, 2024.(34) $1,596,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the creation of a bachelor's and master's degree in social work at the Tri-Cities campus.(35) The institution must report to and coordinate with the department of ecology to track expenditures from climate commitment act accounts, as defined and described in RCW 70A.65.300 and section 302(13) of this act.(36) $434,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute House Bill No. 1559 (postsecondary student needs).(37) $77,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 is provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute House Bill No. 1390 (district energy systems).(38) $600,000 of the climate commitment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 1216 (clean energy siting), for a least-conflict pumped storage siting project.(39) $125,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Senate Bill No. 5287 (wind turbine blades).(40)(a) $1,700,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the development and implementation of a Native American scholarship program during the 2023-2025 biennium. Of the amounts in this subsection, no more than $100,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $100,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 may be spent on administration; development of the program; support services for students; outreach regarding the program; and technical support for application.(b) "Eligible student" means a member of a federally recognized Indian tribe located within Washington who files a free application for federal student aid (FAFSA) and enrolls in an undergraduate degree program. Eligible students need to maintain satisfactory academic progress during the 2023-2025 biennium to remain eligible for the scholarship. The institution shall determine award priorities based on tribal consultation. Awards must be distributed to students no later than May of each fiscal year.(c) The institution must submit a report to the appropriate committees of the legislature, pursuant to RCW 43.01.036, by June 30, 2025. The report must include: The number of eligible students; the number of students who receive a scholarship; how recipients were determined; and how many members of federally recognized Indian tribes in Washington received scholarships versus members of federally recognized Indian tribes from other states.(41) $44,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $49,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute House Bill No. 1745 (diversity in clinical trials).(42) $2,425,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the development and operations of a journalism fellowship program focused on civic affairs.(43) $70,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $70,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5447 (alternative jet fuel).(44) $4,271,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $2,573,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the institution to purchase the obligated amount of carbon allowances.(45) $190,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for continued funding of the statewide broadband coordinator within the Washington State University extension program. This funding will support the salary and benefits of this position.(46) $353,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the complex social interactions lab.(47) $298,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for the William D. Ruckelshaus center, working in collaboration with the departments of health and ecology, to evaluate and recommend actions to increase the effectiveness of the state's municipal water conservation statute at RCW 70A.125.170 and regulation at chapter 246-290 WAC. The center may contract with consultants or organizations with expertise on municipal water conservation programs. Recommendations may be informed by best practices in other states and include: Statutory or regulatory changes to increase program effectiveness, modifying regulatory oversight including whether the responsibility for parts or all of the program should be moved from the department of health to the department of ecology, improving coordination between the departments, identifying sufficient funding to effectively implement the program, including creation of a grant or loan program to assist municipal water systems in program implementation, or other ideas on municipal water use conservation and efficiency strategies.(a) The center shall invite participation from federally recognized Indian tribes, municipal water systems and organizations, and relevant stakeholders in this evaluation.(b) The center shall submit a report to the governor and the appropriate committees of the legislature, pursuant to RCW 43.01.036, by June 30, 2025, on work conducted within this subsection and must include:(i) Recommendation for a long-term strategy for program implementation; and(ii) Estimated costs of ongoing expenses for program implementation, including any costs associated with changes in regulatory oversight of program elements or implementation.(48)(a) $135,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for a study to investigate housing market conditions in tourism-dependent municipalities. The study must:(i) Examine state and local government policies nationwide that address and support affordable and workforce housing projects and programs in tourism-dependent communities;(ii) Examine how the increase in area median incomes correlates with the rise in housing costs statewide and whether the allocation of state housing program funds has been equitable and proportional throughout all regions in the state, placing specific emphasis on understanding the disparity between urban and rural counties;(iii) Examine state policies and regulations that have influenced the cost of housing with a specific emphasis on rural counties;(iv) Identify various strategies deployed to enhance the flexibility of local government revenue; and(v) Identify outcomes of strategies deployed to enhance revenue streams to support workforce housing initiatives.(b) The study must be submitted to the appropriate committees of the legislature, pursuant to RCW 43.01.036, by December 31, 2024.(49) $500,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $2,000,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for one-time compensation support.(50) $232,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute House Bill No. 2112 (higher ed. opioid prevention). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2024, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.Sec. 1604. 2024 c 376 s 604 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR EASTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITYGeneral FundâState Appropriation (FY 2024). . . .$65,664,000General FundâState Appropriation (FY 2025). . . .(($68,260,000))Â Â Â Â Â $68,336,000Education Legacy Trust AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$16,838,000Workforce Education Investment AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .(($24,909,000))Â Â Â Â Â $25,468,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($175,671,000))Â Â Â Â Â $176,306,000The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) At least $350,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and at least $350,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 must be expended on the Northwest autism center.(2) The university must continue work with the education research and data center to demonstrate progress in computer science and engineering enrollments. By September 1st of each year, the university shall provide a report including but not limited to the cost per student, student completion rates, and the number of low-income students enrolled in each program, any process changes or best-practices implemented by the university, and how many students are enrolled in computer science and engineering programs above the prior academic year.(3) Eastern Washington University shall not use funds appropriated in this section to support intercollegiate athletics programs.(4) $12,720,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and (($13,038,000))$13,114,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the implementation of the college affordability program as set forth in RCW 28B.15.066.(5) Within amounts appropriated in this section, the university is encouraged to increase the number of tenure-track positions created and hired.(6) $2,274,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for institution operating costs, including compensation and central services, in recognition that these costs exceed estimated increases in undergraduate operating fee revenue as a result of RCW 28B.15.067.(7) $2,636,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely to maintain a computer engineering degree program in the college of science, technology, engineering, and math.(8) $45,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $45,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for one full-time mental health counselor licensed under chapter 18.225 RCW who has experience and training specifically related to working with active members of the military or military veterans.(9) $300,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely to establish a center for inclusive excellence for faculty and staff.(10) $536,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for a professional masters of science cyber operations degree option.(11) $2,144,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the operation of a bachelor of science in cybersecurity degree option through the computer science program.(12) $2,108,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the operation of a coordinated care network that will help to maximize the collaboration of various student support services to create wraparound care for students to address obstacles to degree completion. The amount provided in this subsection must be used to supplement, not supplant, other funding sources for the program.(13) $532,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $940,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for compensation support.(14) $4,598,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely to expand faculty and staff to create a cohort of 80 students in the bachelor of nursing program.(15) $476,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the continued implementation of RCW 49.60.525 (racial restrictions/review).(16) $110,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $110,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for a summer bridge program.(17) $1,020,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the establishment and operating support of a university mathematics, engineering, and science achievement program.(18) $200,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for planning student studios to assist cities and counties with planning projects. Assistance shall focus on students and supporting faculty to facilitate on-site learning with cities and counties.(19) $138,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute House Bill No. 1559 (postsecondary student needs).(20) $25,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $10,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute House Bill No. 1028 (crime victims and witnesses).(21) (($3,977,000))$4,536,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5048 (college in high school fees).(22) $18,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $18,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5238 (academic employee bargaining).(23) $127,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely to develop the postbaccalaureate dental therapy certificate in the college of health science and public health.(24) $144,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for emergency response and resources for critical incidents.(25) $535,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely to support college in high school program expansion resulting from passage of chapter 314, Laws of 2023 (2SSB 5048).(26) $95,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute House Bill No. 2112 (higher ed. opioid prevention). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2024, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.Sec. 1605. 2024 c 376 s 605 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR CENTRAL WASHINGTON UNIVERSITYGeneral FundâState Appropriation (FY 2024). . . .$68,904,000General FundâState Appropriation (FY 2025). . . .(($72,120,000))Â Â Â Â Â $72,206,000Central Washington University Capital ProjectsAccountâState Appropriation. . . .$76,000Education Legacy Trust AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$19,076,000Workforce Education Investment AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .(($15,814,000))Â Â Â Â Â $16,895,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($175,990,000))Â Â Â Â Â $177,157,000The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) The university must continue work with the education research and data center to demonstrate progress in engineering enrollments. By September 1st of each year, the university shall provide a report including but not limited to the cost per student, student completion rates, and the number of low-income students enrolled in each program, any process changes or best-practices implemented by the university, and how many students are enrolled in engineering programs above the prior academic year.(2) Central Washington University shall not use funds appropriated in this section to support intercollegiate athletics programs.(3) $14,337,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and (($14,696,000))$14,782,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the implementation of the college affordability program as set forth in RCW 28B.15.066.(4) Within amounts appropriated in this section, the university is encouraged to increase the number of tenure-track positions created and hired.(5) $2,236,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for institution operating costs, including compensation and central services, in recognition that these costs exceed estimated increases in undergraduate operating fee revenue as a result of RCW 28B.15.067.(6) $1,050,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely to increase the number of certified K-12 teachers.(7) $736,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely to maintain mental health counseling positions.(8) $240,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $240,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for two counselor positions to increase access to mental health counseling for traditionally underrepresented students.(9) $52,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $52,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for one full-time mental health outreach and service coordination position who has knowledge of issues relevant to veterans.(10) $240,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for expanding cybersecurity capacity by adding additional faculty resources in the department of computer science.(11) $586,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for a peer mentoring program. The amount provided in this subsection must be used to supplement, not supplant, other funding sources for the program.(12) $286,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the operation of an extended orientation program to help promote retention of underserved students. The amount provided in this subsection must be used to supplement, not supplant, other funding sources for the program.(13) $12,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $12,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the cost of the criminal justice training center's use of office and classroom space at the Lynnwood campus.(14) $592,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $1,091,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for compensation support.(15) $1,406,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for student success. Students will receive discipline specific tutoring programs, peer assisted learning sessions, and academic success coaching.(16) $967,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for grow your own teacher residency programs in high need areas of elementary, bilingual, special education, and English language learners.(17) $844,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for dual language expansion programs in Yakima and Des Moines.(18) $147,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute House Bill No. 1559 (postsecondary student needs).(19) $25,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 is provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute House Bill No. 1028 (crime victims and witnesses).(20) $57,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 is provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute House Bill No. 1390 (district energy systems).(21) (($5,709,000))$6,790,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5048 (college in high school fees).(22) $18,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $18,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5238 (academic employee bargaining).(23) $398,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for student basic needs. This funding will support two financial aid coaching specialists, support a coordinator for the food pantry, support a director and advocate to assist students who have experienced sexual violence, and help with prevention initiatives.(24) $1,209,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely to support college in the high school program expansion resulting from passage of chapter 314, Laws of 2023 (2SSB 5048).(25) Appropriations in this section are sufficient to implement the collective bargaining agreement between Central Washington University and the campus police officers and sergeants negotiated under chapter 41.80 RCW and as set forth in part IX of this act.(26) $22,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute House Bill No. 2112 (higher ed. opioid prevention). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2024, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.Sec. 1606. 2024 c 376 s 606 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE EVERGREEN STATE COLLEGEGeneral FundâState Appropriation (FY 2024). . . .$38,770,000General FundâState Appropriation (FY 2025). . . .(($39,723,000))Â Â Â Â Â $39,781,000The Evergreen State College Capital ProjectsAccountâState Appropriation. . . .$80,000Education Legacy Trust AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$5,450,000Workforce Education Investment AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$5,795,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($89,818,000))Â Â Â Â Â $89,876,000The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) $4,361,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and (($4,470,000))$4,496,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the implementation of the college affordability program as set forth in RCW 28B.15.066.(2) Funding provided in this section is sufficient for The Evergreen State College to continue operations of the Longhouse Center and the Northwest Indian applied research institute.(3) Within amounts appropriated in this section, the college is encouraged to increase the number of tenure-track positions created and hired.(4) $3,715,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $3,640,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the Washington state institute for public policy to initiate, sponsor, conduct, and publish research that is directly useful to policymakers and manage reviews and evaluations of technical and scientific topics as they relate to major long-term issues facing the state. Within the amounts provided in this subsection (4):(a) $1,665,000 of the amounts in fiscal year 2024 and $1,685,000 of the amounts in fiscal year 2025 are provided for administration and core operations.(b) $1,069,000 of the amounts in fiscal year 2024 and $709,000 of the amounts in fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for ongoing and continuing studies on the Washington state institute for public policy's work plan.(c) $142,000 of the amounts in fiscal year 2024 and $140,000 of the amounts in fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the Washington state institute for public policy to update its adult corrections inventory of evidence-based, research-based, and promising programs and expand the inventory to include new programs that were not included in the last published Washington state institute for public policy inventory in 2018. This update must focus on programs for incarcerated individuals in prison facilities to include family and relationships programs, learning and working programs, and therapeutic and support programs. The institute should prioritize the addition of programs currently offered by the Washington state department of corrections. Of this amount:(i) No later than June 30, 2024, the institute shall publish a preliminary report identifying the list of programs currently offered in Washington state department of corrections prison facilities and the list of new programs to be analyzed for inclusion on the updated adult corrections inventory. The preliminary report must include an indication of whether the Washington state department of corrections programs have ever been evaluated for their effect on recidivism; and(ii) No later than December 31, 2024, the institute shall publish a final report with the updated adult corrections inventory classifying programs as evidence-based, research-based, or promising programs. The report shall include a list of programs currently offered in Washington state department of corrections prison facilities and a determination of their likely effectiveness in reducing recidivism based on the results of the adult corrections inventory.(d)(i) $154,000 of the amount for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for the institute to examine the costs associated with conservation district elections under current law, and the projected costs and benefits for shifting conservation district election to be held on general election ballots under Title 29A RCW. The examination must include, to the extent that the data allows:(A) An analysis of the amount of money that each conservation district spends on holding elections for supervisors under current law, and a description of the funding sources that each conservation district utilizes to fund its elections;(B) Information about voter turnout in each conservation district supervisor election in at least the past six years and up to the past 20 years, if the conservation district has such data, as well as a calculation of the total cost per ballot cast that each conservation district spent in those elections;(C) A projection of the costs that would be expected to be incurred by each county and each conservation district for its supervisor elections if the district were to hold its supervisor elections on general election ballots under the processes and procedures in Title 29A RCW, including:(I) Switching all supervisor positions to elected positions; and(II) Changing term lengths to four years, with terms staggered such that elections are held every two years, to align with the elections for other local government officials;(D) A projection of the costs that would be expected to be incurred by each county and each conservation district for its supervisor elections if, in addition to the changes described in (d)(i)(C) of this subsection, the conservation districts were divided into zones such that each zone is represented by a single supervisor, rather than electing each supervisor at-large throughout the district; and(E) An overall description of potential nonmonetary costs and benefits associated with switching conservation district supervisor elections to the general election ballots under Title 29A RCW and incorporating the changes described in (d)(i) (C) and (D) of this subsection.(ii) A preliminary report which contains any available information to date must be completed by December 1, 2024. A final report must be completed by June 30, 2025, and submitted in accordance with RCW 43.01.036 to the standing committees of the house of representatives and the senate with jurisdiction over elections and conservation district issues.(e) $100,000 of the amounts for fiscal year 2024 and $100,000 of the amounts for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the institute to conduct a review of all assessments and charges imposed on individuals incarcerated in department of corrections facilities and their family members and its effect on the financial status of incarcerated individuals. The review must include, at a minimum:(i) An evaluation of all costs incurred by incarcerated individuals for items that include but are not limited to:(A) Food;(B) Commissary items;(C) Personal hygiene items;(D) Electronic devices and services, tablets, digital stamps, and downloadable media and services such as music, movies, and other programs;(E) Stationary, mail, and postage;(F) Communication devices such as telephones, local and nonlocal telephone services, and video chat services;(G) Clothing and shoes;(H) Copayments for medical, dental, and optometry visits, care, and medication;(I) Eyeglasses;(J) Gym, television services, and any other recreational activities;(K) Educational and vocational classes, programming, and related materials; and(L) Any and all items and services charged to incarcerated persons under RCW 72.09.450 and 72.09.470 including, but not limited to, a complete list of any other item that an individual was or could have been charged for while incarcerated;(ii) A complete itemized list of: (A) All items in (e)(i) of this subsection; (B) the cost of each item and service purchased by the department or negotiated with a vendor in (e)(i) of this subsection; (C) the resale or purchased price charged to incarcerated individuals and their family members for the same items in (e)(i) of this subsection; (D) the revenue or profit retained or reinvested by the department for each individual item in (e)(i) of this subsection; (E) the cost of items and services listed in (e)(i) of this subsection compared to comparable items and services that are not provided through correctional industries; and (F) an assessment of the prices charged for the items and services listed in (e)(i) of this subsection as compared to comparable items and services provided by other companies and vendors that do not service prisons;(iii) A complete list of all items including, but not limited to, clothing and personal hygiene items, that are distributed monthly free of charge: (A) To all incarcerated individuals irrespective of their financial status; and (B) solely to indigent inmates as defined in RCW 72.09.015 provided the individual remains in indigent status during his or her period of incarceration;(iv) The average annual debt incurred by an individual while incarcerated. This includes debt solely recorded and posted by the department for debt incurred between the individual's first day of confinement within the department of corrections through the individual's day of release from incarceration from prison;(v) The average debt owed by incarcerated individuals to the department for items and services under (e)(i) of this subsection upon release from confinement;(vi) The average amount paid by incarcerated individuals to the department for items and services under (e)(i) of this subsection during their period of confinement;(vii) A list of the: (A) Required deductions from wages and gratuities earned pursuant to RCW 72.09.100 through 72.09.111; (B) required deductions from the funds received, by the department on behalf of an incarcerated person from outside sources, in addition to an incarcerated individual's wages or gratuities pursuant to RCW 72.09.480; and (C) wages and gratuities earned by an incarcerated individual and any funds received, by the department on behalf of an incarcerated person, from outside sources for specific items listed in (e)(i) of this subsection that are exempt from statutory deductions;(viii) The average amount of funds remaining in an incarcerated individual's savings account at the time of his or her release from confinement; and(ix) A review and evaluation of the fines, fees, and commission generated from any of the items and services listed in (e)(i) of this subsection that are used in the department's budget.The institute must provide a final report to the governor and the appropriate committees of the legislature by June 30, 2025.(f)(i) $76,000 of the amount for fiscal year 2024 and $128,000 of the amount for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the institute to study the contracting practices for goods and services, and manufactured products, made or offered by correctional industries to state agencies and various political subdivisions within the state. A cost benefit analysis must be included in the report which must:(A) Determine the costs of all contracts utilizing the labor of incarcerated individuals providing services or the manufacture of goods for state entities and other political subdivisions;(B) Compare the cost savings to the state of Washington that is projected when those goods and services are procured from or produced by corrections industries and not private businesses engaged in a competitive bidding process with the state and its various political subdivisions;(C) Provide a detailed break out of total number of labor positions that are offered to incarcerated individuals, ranked from least skilled to most skilled and the rate per hour of the gratuities the individuals are given monthly for this labor, including the amount if the gratuity given to incarcerated individuals was the federal or state mandated minimum wage;(D) Provide a detailed listing of all commissary items purchased by and offered for sale to individuals incarcerated within the facilities operated by the department of corrections. This listing of individual items must also include the wholesale price from outside vendors that correction industries pays for each line item offered to incarcerated individuals, and the price charged to the incarcerated individual for those items; and(E) Provide a comprehensive list of all positions offered by corrections industries that provide substantive training and labor ready skills for individuals to assume positions in the workforce outside of incarceration; and to the extent the data allows, provide the number of individuals who have positions upon release that were obtained with skills obtained through work at correctional industries.(ii) The institute must submit a report to the appropriate committees of the legislature by June 30, 2025, in compliance with RCW 43.01.036.(g)(i) $260,000 of the amounts in fiscal year 2024 and $98,000 of the amounts in fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the Washington state institute for public policy to conduct a study of the Washington jail system and county juvenile justice facilities.(ii) The institute's report shall include, to the extent possible, consideration of the following:(A) A longitudinal study of how the county jail and county juvenile detention populations have changed over the last 12 years including, but not limited to, an analysis of demographics, physical and behavioral health issues, number of inmates, and types of convictions;(B) An analysis of county jail and county juvenile detention facility survey data provided by the Washington state association of counties as described in (g)(v) of this subsection; and(C) Examination of the availability of criminal justice training commission classes for corrections officers.(iii) The health care authority, department of social and health services, administrative office of the courts, criminal justice training commission, state auditor's office, office of financial management, and Washington state patrol must provide the institute with access to data or other resources if necessary to complete this work.(iv) The institute shall submit the report to the appropriate committees of the legislature and the governor by December 1, 2024.(v) As part of the study, the institute shall contract with the Washington state association of counties to conduct a survey of jail and juvenile detention facilities in Washington state. The survey shall include, but not be limited to, the following:(A) Age of the facilities;(B) Age of systems within the facilities;(C) Cost of remodeling facilities;(D) Cost of building new facilities;(E) General maintenance costs of the facilities;(F) Operational costs of the facilities;(G) Workforce, to include, but not be limited to, employee vacancies as a percentage of total employees;(H) Services, supports, and programming, to include, but not belimited to:(I) Costs of housing those with behavioral health needs;(II) Number of individuals with behavioral health needs;(III) Cost of competency restoration;(IV) Physical health services and related costs;(V) Number of individuals booked and housed on behalf of stateagencies;(VI) Percent of individuals waiting for a state hospital;(VII) Available nonincarcerative alternatives and diversion programs; and(VIII) Available release and reentry services;(I) Funding sources, to include, but not be limited to:(I) County tax structure and revenue raising ability; and(II) Jail and juvenile detention facility funding sources.(vi) The Washington state association of counties shall consult with the Washington state institute for public policy during the design and distribution of the survey. Responses to the survey shall be compiled and provided to the Washington state institute for public policy by December 31, 2023.(h)(i) $240,000 of the amounts in fiscal year 2024 and $240,000 of the amounts in fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the Washington state institute for public policy, in consultation with the Washington traumatic brain injury strategic partnership advisory council, to study the potential need for developing specialized long-term services and supports for adults with traumatic brain injuries.(ii) At a minimum, the study must include an examination of:(A) The demographics of adults with traumatic brain injuries in the state who are anticipated to be in need of long-term services and supports, including an examination of those who are likely to be eligible for medicaid long-term services and supports;(B) The industry standards of providing long-term care services and supports to individuals with traumatic brain injuries; and(C) The methods other states are utilizing to provide long-term services and supports to individuals with traumatic brain injuries, including identifying the rates paid for these services and a description of any specialized facilities established to deliver these services.(iii) A report of the findings of this study and any recommendations for increasing access to appropriate long-term services and supports for individuals with traumatic brain injuries shall be submitted to the governor and the appropriate committees of the legislature no later than June 30, 2025.(i) $163,000 of the amounts in fiscal year 2024 are provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5236 (hospital staffing standards).(j) $222,000 of the amounts in fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for implementation of chapter 29, Laws of 2022 (2SHB 1818) (reentry and rehabilitation).(k) $107,000 of the amounts in fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for the Washington state institute for public policy to examine programs in peer states related to breast cancer education and prevention prior to diagnosis and support and resources after diagnosis for native communities. The study must focus on programs that are operated by either the state, tribes solely, or tribes in coordination with the state. To identify peer states, the institute may consider factors such as the population of American Indians and Alaska natives, number of federally recognized tribes, and whether the state has expanded medicaid. The report shall include for each peer state the existence of any programs that meet the criteria described in this section, and summarize any research findings on these programs, if available. The institute must submit a report to the appropriate committees of the legislature by June 30, 2025, in compliance with RCW 43.01.036.(l) $57,000 of the amounts in fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5986 (out-of-network health costs). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2024, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.(m) Notwithstanding other provisions in this subsection, the board of directors for the Washington state institute for public policy may adjust due dates for projects included on the institute's 2023-25 work plan as necessary to efficiently manage workload.(5) $213,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $213,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for additional faculty to support Native American and indigenous programs.(6) $85,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $85,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely to the native pathways program for an assistant director.(7) $110,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $110,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for a tribal liaison position.(8) $39,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $39,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for one full-time mental health counselor licensed under chapter 18.225 RCW who has experience and training specifically related to working with active members of the military or military veterans.(9) $137,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $137,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for student mental health and wellness. The amount provided in this subsection must be used to supplement, not supplant, other funding sources for the program.(10) $196,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 is provided solely for additional laboratory, art, and media lab sections.(11) $600,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $600,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely to develop and expand current corrections education programs offered in department of corrections facilities. The college shall appoint a project implementation team, collaborate with stakeholders to plan student success programs and curriculum which lead to transferable credit, associate and bachelor's degrees, and other workforce credentials, and train faculty and staff on working with incarcerated populations.(12) $2,636,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for institution operating costs, including compensation and central services, in recognition that these costs exceed estimated increases in undergraduate operating fee revenue as a result of RCW 28B.15.067.(13) $670,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely to maintain enrollment capacity in psychology programs.(14) $600,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely to increase student success by maintaining support for a student precollege immersion program and the Evergreen first-year experience.(15) $988,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for student enrollment and retention support. Funding is provided for hiring a student advisor and underserved student specialist to provide student support and administrative support for the native pathways program.(16) $554,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the expansion of corrections education offerings to currently incarcerated students and the expansion of reentry services.(17) $124,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute House Bill No. 1559 (postsecondary student needs).(18) $26,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $26,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5238 (academic employee bargaining).(19) $6,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 is provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute House Bill No. 1028 (crime victims and witnesses).(20) $97,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute House Bill No. 2112 (higher ed. opioid prevention). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2024, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.(21) $223,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the Shelton promise pilot program.(22) $42,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5953 (incarcerated student grants). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2024, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.Sec. 1607. 2024 c 376 s 607 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR WESTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITYGeneral FundâState Appropriation (FY 2024). . . .$99,066,000General FundâState Appropriation (FY 2025). . . .(($104,923,000))Â Â Â Â Â $105,042,000Western Washington University Capital ProjectsAccountâState Appropriation. . . .(($1,424,000))Â Â Â Â Â $1,607,000Education Legacy Trust AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$13,831,000Workforce Education Investment AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .(($22,264,000))Â Â Â Â Â $22,282,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($241,508,000))Â Â Â Â Â $241,828,000The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) The university must continue work with the education research and data center to demonstrate progress in computer science and engineering enrollments. By September 1st of each year, the university shall provide a report including but not limited to the cost per student, student completion rates, and the number of low-income students enrolled in each program, any process changes or best-practices implemented by the university, and how many students are enrolled in computer science and engineering programs above the prior academic year.(2) Western Washington University shall not use funds appropriated in this section to support intercollegiate athletics programs.(3) $19,789,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and (($20,283,000))$20,402,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the implementation of the college affordability program as set forth in RCW 28B.15.066.(4) $700,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $700,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the creation and implementation of an early childhood education degree program at the western on the peninsulas campus. The university must collaborate with Olympic college. At full implementation, the university is expected to grant approximately 75 bachelor's degrees in early childhood education per year at the western on the peninsulas campus.(5) $1,306,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $1,306,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the university to develop a new program in marine, coastal, and watershed sciences.(6) $886,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $886,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the university to reduce tuition rates for four-year degree programs offered in partnership with Olympic collegeâBremerton, Olympic collegeâPoulsbo, and Peninsula collegeâPort Angeles that are currently above state-funded resident undergraduate tuition rates.(7) $150,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $150,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely to recruit and retain high quality and diverse graduate students.(8) $548,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $548,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for critical support services to ensure traditionally underrepresented students receive the same opportunities for academic success as their peers.(9) $48,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $48,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for one full-time mental health counselor licensed under chapter 18.225 RCW who has experience and training specifically related to working with active members of the military or military veterans.(10) $530,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $530,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the operation of two bilingual educator programs in the south King county region, including a bilingual elementary education degree program and a secondary education degree program. At full implementation, each cohort shall support up to 25 students per year.(11) $361,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $361,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for a master of science program in nursing.(12) $433,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $433,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the registered nurse to bachelors in nursing program.(13) Within amounts appropriated in this section, the university is encouraged to increase the number of tenure-track positions created and hired.(14) $2,256,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for institution operating costs, including compensation and central services, in recognition that these costs exceed estimated increases in undergraduate operating fee revenue as a result of RCW 28B.15.067.(15) $3,426,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely to maintain access to science, technology, engineering, and mathematics degrees.(16) $908,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely to establish an academic curriculum in ethnic studies.(17) $400,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for upgrading cyber range equipment and software.(18) $2,520,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for student support services that include resources for outreach and financial aid support, retention initiatives including targeted support for underserved student populations, mental health support, and initiatives aimed at addressing learning disruption due to the global pandemic. The amount provided in this subsection must be used to supplement, not supplant, other funding sources for student support services.(19) $200,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for planning student studios to assist cities and counties with planning projects. Assistance shall focus on students and supporting faculty to facilitate on-site learning with cities and counties.(20) $500,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the student civic leaders initiative.(21) $1,610,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $2,875,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for compensation support.(22) $3,186,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the western on the peninsulas expansion. This includes new two plus two degrees programs such as industrial engineering, data science, and sociology.(23) $1,577,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for expanded remedial math and additional English 101 courses, as well first year seminars, and disability accommodation counselors. Of the amounts provided in this subsection for first year seminars, $125,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $125,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided for the university to develop a student orientation program for students receiving the Washington college grant, focusing on first-generation and traditionally underrepresented students. The program may include evidence-based student success metrics, peer support, and mentorship following orientation. The program proposal must be submitted to the legislature by December 1, 2023 for implementation in the 2024-2025 academic year.(24) $100,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for mental health first aid training for faculty.(25) $150,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the small business development center to increase technical assistance to black, indigenous, and other people of color small business owners in Whatcom county.(26) $694,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation is provided to establish a master of social work program at western on the peninsulas.(27) $2,478,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for expansion of bilingual educators education.(28) $1,000,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation is provided for additional student support and outreach at western on the peninsulas.(29) $580,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely to convert the human services program at western on the peninsulas from self-sustaining to state-supported to reduce tuition rates for students in the program.(30) $138,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute House Bill No. 1559 (postsecondary student needs).(31) $23,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 is provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute House Bill No. 1028 (crime victims and witnesses).(32) $10,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 is provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5238 (academic employee bargaining).(33) $1,306,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely to establish and administer a teacher residency program focused on special education instruction beginning in the 2024-25 school year. Amounts provided in this subsection are sufficient to support one cohort of 17 residents per school year, and must be prioritized to communities that are anticipated to be most positively impacted by teacher residents who fill teacher vacancies upon completing the teacher residency program and who remain in the communities in which they are mentored. The teacher residency program must meet the following requirements:(a) Residents receive compensation equivalent to first year paraeducators, as defined in RCW 28A.413.010;(b) Each resident is assigned a preservice mentor;(c) Preservice mentors receive a stipend of $2,500 per year;(d) Residents receive at least 900 hours of preservice clinical practice over the course of the school year;(e) At least half of the residency hours specified in (d) of this subsection are in a coteaching setting with the resident's preservice mentor and the other half of the residency hours are in a coteaching setting with another teacher;(f) Residents may not be assigned the lead or primary responsibility for student learning;(g) Coursework taught during the residency is codesigned by the teacher preparation program and the school district, state-tribal education compact school, or consortium, tightly integrated with residents' preservice clinical practice, and focused on developing culturally responsive teachers; and(h) The program must prepare residents to meet or exceed the knowledge, skills, performance, and competency standards described in RCW 28A.410.270(1).(34) $445,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely to continue the expansion of the undergraduate electrical and computer engineering program.(35) $400,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for academic access and outreach.(36) $300,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for the university to contract with a nonprofit organization in Kitsap county that provides cyber security curriculum to postsecondary institutions for cyber security education in partnership with the Washington state cyber range in Poulsbo.(37) $200,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for the university to contract with a nonprofit organization in Whatcom county that provides economic and financial education to conduct foundational research on the efficacy of financial education course formats.(38) $100,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for the institute for the study of the Holocaust, genocide, and crimes against humanity to collaborate with the office of the superintendent of public instruction on curriculum development and teacher training.(39) $122,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute House Bill No. 2112 (higher ed. opioid prevention). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2024, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.(40) $18,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of chapter 314, Laws of 2023 (college in high school fees).Sec. 1608. 2024 c 376 s 608 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE STUDENT ACHIEVEMENT COUNCILâPOLICY COORDINATION AND ADMINISTRATIONGeneral FundâState Appropriation (FY 2024). . . .$9,891,000General FundâState Appropriation (FY 2025). . . .$10,294,000General FundâFederal Appropriation. . . .$20,998,000General FundâPrivate/Local Appropriation. . . .$75,000Washington Student Loan AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$80,000,000Workforce Education Investment AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$16,561,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($137,744,000))Â Â Â Â Â $137,819,000The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) $126,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $126,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the consumer protection unit.(2) The student achievement council must ensure that all institutions of higher education as defined in RCW 28B.92.030 and eligible for state financial aid programs under chapters 28B.92 and 28B.118 RCW provide the data needed to analyze and evaluate the effectiveness of state financial aid programs. This data must be promptly transmitted to the education data center so that it is available and easily accessible.(3) Community-based organizations that receive state funding under subsection (11) of this section and section 601(35) of this act are not eligible for Washington career and college pathways innovation challenge program grant funding for the same purpose.(4) $575,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $575,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided to increase the number of high school seniors and college bound scholars that complete the free application for federal student aid and the Washington application for state financial aid through digital engagement tools, expanded training, and increased events for high school students.(5) $850,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $850,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for administrative support services to carry out duties and responsibilities necessary for recipients of the Washington college grant who are enrolled in a state registered apprenticeship program.(6)(a) $80,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 is provided solely for a pilot program to help students, including those enrolled in state registered apprenticeship programs, connect with health care coverage. The student achievement council, in cooperation with the council of presidents, must provide resources for up to two four-year colleges or universities, one on the east side and one on the west side of the Cascade mountains, to hire or train an employee to:(i) Provide information to students and college and university staff about available health insurance options;(ii) Develop culturally relevant materials and conduct outreach for historically marginalized and underserved student populations to assist these populations in their knowledge of access to low cost or free health insurance plans;(iii) Provide ongoing technical assistance to students about health insurance options or the health insurance application process; and(iv) Provide technical assistance to students as a health benefit exchange certified assister, to help students understand, shop, apply, and enroll in health insurance through Washington health planfinder.(b) Participation in the exchange assister program is contingent on fulfilling applicable contracting, security, and other program requirements.(c) The council, in collaboration with the council of presidents and the health benefit exchange, must submit a report by June 30, 2024, to the appropriate committees of the legislature, pursuant to RCW 43.01.036, on information about barriers students, including those enrolled in state registered apprenticeship programs, encountered accessing health insurance coverage; and to provide recommendations on how to improve student and staff access to health coverage based on data gathered from the pilot program.(7) $1,208,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $1,208,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the Washington award for vocational excellence. Of the amount provided in this subsection, $70,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $70,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 may be used for administration and that is the maximum amount that may be expended for this purpose.(8) $2,000,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the career launch grant pool for the public four-year institutions.(9) $179,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $179,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the complete Washington program.(10) $10,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for the council to submit a progress report on the new or expanded cybersecurity and nursing academic programs that receive funding in sections 601 through 607 of this act, including the number of students enrolled. The council must coordinate with the institutions of higher education and the state board for community and technical colleges as provided in section 603(3), chapter 475, Laws of 2023 and section 601 (31) and (37) of this act. The progress report must be submitted to the appropriate committees of the legislature, pursuant to RCW 43.01.036, by December 1, 2024.(11) $5,778,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the Washington student achievement council to contract with a statewide nonprofit organization located in King county to expand college services to support underserved students and improve college retention and completion rates.(12) $46,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $46,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for the state of Washington's annual dues to the education commission of the state.(13) $150,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for an implementation review of the passport to careers program. The review must include short and long-term recommendations to improve the reach and effectiveness of the passport program. The review must include consultation with organizations serving foster youth, the state board of community and technical colleges, public four-year institutions, and other organizations involved in the passport to college and passport to apprenticeship programs. Amounts provided in this subsection may be used to provide stipends for youth participating in the review who are receiving funds from passport programs or are eligible to receive funds from passport programs. The review must be submitted to the appropriate committees of the legislature by June 30, 2024.(14) $1,485,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation and $80,000,000 of the Washington student loan accountâstate appropriation are provided solely for implementation of Engrossed House Bill No. 1823 (WA student loan program).(15) $16,000,000 of the general fundâfederal appropriation is provided solely for the good jobs challenge grant expenditure authority.(16) $200,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $230,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for contraception vending machines for students and staff stocked with emergency contraceptive medication and other forms of contraception, including condoms, and naloxone opioid overdose reversal medication administered by nasal inhalation and fentanyl test strips at discreet and geographically accessible locations, such as gender-neutral restrooms and student union buildings, and locations that are accessible on weekends and after 5:00 p.m. The council must distribute $10,000 to each public four-year institution and community and technical college who apply on a first-come, first-served basis in fiscal year 2024 and prioritize new applications in fiscal year 2025. An additional $10,000 may be provided to institutions with more than 20,000 full-time equivalent students. The institutions who receive funding shall enter into agreements with the department of health to receive naloxone and fentanyl test strips to stock the vending machines and provide cost-free access to naloxone and fentanyl test strips to students. A report on which institutions received funding shall be submitted to the legislature, pursuant to RCW 43.01.036, by June 30, 2025.(17) $1,150,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute House Bill No. 1559 (postsecondary student needs).(18) $200,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the council to provide grants to law schools in the state who offer a law clinic focusing on crime victim support.(19)(a) $100,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely to contract with a nonprofit organization located in Tacoma that focuses on coordinated systems of support for postsecondary success to conduct a comprehensive study on the feasibility and potential impacts on postsecondary enrollment of a policy of universal free application for federal financial aid (FAFSA) completion. For purposes of this subsection, universal FAFSA completion means making completion of the financial aid form a requirement for high school graduation and requiring schools to support students through the process. The study will include, but is not limited to, the following:(i) A landscape scan of existing state and local level universal FAFSA completion policies, both in Washington and nationally;(ii) Input from key stakeholder groups, including students, parents, state agency staff, K-12 district staff and leadership, and student serving organizations; and(iii) Recommendations for possible policy change at the state level.(b) A report of findings and recommendations must be submitted to the appropriate committees of the legislature pursuant to RCW 43.01.036 by November 30, 2023.(20) $648,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for distribution to four-year institutions of higher education participating in the students experiencing homelessness program without reduction by the Washington student achievement council, pursuant to Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5702 (student homelessness pilot).(21) $46,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the administration of the students experiencing homelessness program pursuant to Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5702 (student homelessness pilot).(22) $400,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5687 (wrestling grant program).(23) $356,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the Washington student achievement council to staff the workforce education investment accountability and oversight board as provided in Engrossed Senate Bill No. 5534 (workforce investment board).(24) $191,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for the agency to hire a full-time equivalent position to help with increased contracting demand.(25) $250,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for a study on establishment and implementation of a scholarship fund as described in RCW 28B.95.040. The study shall include strategy options for disbursement, summary of how tuition units would be allocated for scholarships, and coordination with existing college savings plans. The office shall seek written advice from the internal revenue service on the impact of the provisions in Substitute House Bill No. 2309 on the status of Washington's qualified tuition plan under 529 of the internal revenue code, including potential scalability of the program and its impact on any determination. The report shall include recommendations for implementing the scholarship and be submitted to the appropriate committees of the legislature, pursuant to RCW 43.01.036, by June 30, 2025.(26) $330,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5953 (incarcerated student grants). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2024, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.(27) $75,000 of the general fundâprivate/local appropriation is provided solely for the Strada education foundation operating support grant expenditure authority.Sec. 1609. 2024 c 376 s 609 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE STUDENT ACHIEVEMENT COUNCILâOFFICE OF STUDENT FINANCIAL ASSISTANCEGeneral FundâState Appropriation (FY 2024). . . .$302,031,000General FundâState Appropriation (FY 2025). . . .$301,988,000General FundâFederal Appropriation. . . .$12,264,000General FundâPrivate/Local Appropriation. . . .$300,000Education Legacy Trust AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$85,488,000Washington Opportunity Pathways AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .(($76,603,000))Â Â Â Â Â $78,695,000Aerospace Training Student Loan AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$220,000Workforce Education Investment AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .(($323,533,000))Â Â Â Â Â $383,514,000Health Professionals Loan Repayment and ScholarshipProgram AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$11,720,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($1,114,147,000))Â Â Â Â Â $1,176,220,000The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) $7,834,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $7,835,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for student financial aid payments under the state work study program, including up to four percent administrative allowance for the state work study program.(2) $276,416,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $276,416,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025, (($258,584,000))$318,565,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation, $69,639,000 of the education legacy trust fundâstate appropriation, and $67,654,000 of the Washington opportunity pathways accountâstate appropriation are provided solely for the Washington college grant program as provided in RCW 28B.92.200.(3) Changes made to the state work study program in the 2009-2011 and 2011-2013 fiscal biennia are continued in the 2023-2025 fiscal biennium including maintaining the increased required employer share of wages; adjusted employer match rates; discontinuation of nonresident student eligibility for the program; and revising distribution methods to institutions by taking into consideration other factors such as off-campus job development, historical utilization trends, and student need.(4) $1,165,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $1,165,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025, $15,849,000 of the education legacy trust accountâstate appropriation, and (($8,949,000))$11,041,000 of the Washington opportunity pathways accountâstate appropriation are provided solely for the college bound scholarship program and may support scholarships for summer session. The office of student financial assistance and the institutions of higher education shall not consider awards made by the opportunity scholarship program to be state-funded for the purpose of determining the value of an award amount under RCW 28B.118.010.(5) $6,999,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024, $6,999,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025, and $1,000,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation are provided solely for the passport to college program. The maximum scholarship award is up to $5,000. The council shall contract with a nonprofit organization to provide support services to increase student completion in their postsecondary program and shall, under this contract, provide a minimum of $500,000 in fiscal years 2024 and 2025 for this purpose.(6) $55,254,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for an annual bridge grant of $500 to eligible students. A student is eligible for a grant if the student receives a maximum college grant award and does not receive the college bound scholarship program under chapter 28B.118 RCW. Bridge grant funding provides supplementary financial support to low-income students to cover higher education expenses.(7) $500,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the behavioral health apprenticeship stipend pilot program, with stipends of $3,000 available to students. The pilot program is intended to provide a stipend to assist students in high-demand programs for costs associated with completing a program, including child care, housing, transportation, and food.(8) $1,425,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the national guard grant program. Of the amount provided in this subsection, $425,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely to increase national guard grant award amounts.(9) $1,000,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for educator conditional scholarship and loan repayment programs established in chapter 28B.102 RCW. Dual language educators must receive priority.(10) $10,000,000 of the health professionals loan repayment and scholarship program accountâstate appropriation is provided solely to increase loans within the Washington health corps.(11) $1,156,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of House Bill No. 1232 (college bound scholarship).(12) $239,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the Washington student achievement council to remove barriers to accessing state financial aid by informing people of their income-eligibility for the Washington college grant via the supplemental nutrition assistance program as provided in Second Substitute House Bill No. 2214 (college grant/public assist). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2024, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.(13) $500,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the Washington award for vocational excellence. This funding will support increasing the scholarship award for students.(14) $400,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for a financial aid texting program.(15) $500,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the development and implementation of a mentoring scholarship. An eligible student means a student who participated in a mentoring program as a 12th grade student in Spokane, Garfield, or Columbia counties; filed a free application for federal student aid (FAFSA) or Washington application for state financial aid; and has family income up to 150 percent of the state median family income. An eligible student may receive a maximum award of $5,000. The award may only be used at institutions of higher education in Spokane, Garfield, Whitman, or Columbia counties. An award that includes state funds must be matched on an equal dollar basis with private funds. A state match for private contributions made in fiscal year 2025 may not exceed $500,000.(16) $200,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for implementation of Substitute House Bill No. 2025 (state work-study program). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2024, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.(17) $150,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of House Bill No. 1946 (behav. health scholarship). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2024, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.(18) $100,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Substitute House Bill No. 2441 (college in the HS fees). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2024, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.(19) $1,200,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Substitute House Bill No. 2019 (Native American apprentices). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2024, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.(20) $1,500,000 of the workforce education investment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Senate Bill No. 5904 (financial aid terms). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2024, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.Sec. 1610. 2024 c 376 s 612 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE WASHINGTON CENTER FOR DEAF AND HARD OF HEARING YOUTHGeneral FundâState Appropriation (FY 2024). . . .$18,505,000General FundâState Appropriation (FY 2025). . . .(($18,774,000))Â Â Â Â Â $19,124,000General FundâPrivate/Local Appropriation. . . .$4,052,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($41,331,000))Â Â Â Â Â $41,681,000The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) Funding provided in this section is sufficient for the center to offer students ages three through 21 enrolled at the center the opportunity to participate in a minimum of 1,080 hours of instruction and the opportunity to earn 24 high school credits.(2) $225,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $225,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for a mentoring program for persons employed as educational interpreters in public schools.(3) $240,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for additional student-based safety training as well as diversity, equity, and inclusion training for staff.Sec. 1611. 2024 c 376 s 613 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE ARTS COMMISSIONGeneral FundâState Appropriation (FY 2024). . . .$6,329,000General FundâState Appropriation (FY 2025). . . .(($7,595,000))Â Â Â Â Â $6,887,000General FundâFederal Appropriation. . . .$2,830,000General FundâPrivate/Local Appropriation. . . .(($184,000))Â Â Â Â Â $224,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($16,938,000))Â Â Â Â Â $16,270,000The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) $79,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $79,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the creative districts program.(2) $868,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $867,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the establishment of a tribal cultural affairs program. Of the amounts provided in this subsection, $500,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $500,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for grants to support tribal cultural, arts, and creative programs.(3) $151,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $137,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the commission to hire a temporary collections technician to maintain and repair public art in the state art collection.(4) $250,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and $250,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for the commission to implement a pilot program for in-person and online arts programming, targeting adults and families impacted by housing instability, mental health challenges, and trauma.(5) $199,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2024 and (($944,000))$236,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 are provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute House Bill No. 1639 (Billy Frank Jr. statue).(6) $150,000 of the general fundâstate appropriation for fiscal year 2025 is provided solely for an outdoor public art project in downtown Everett on the faÃ§ade of the Schack art center. The project shall feature stainless steel images of Sasquatch and Pacific Northwest elements, honoring the rich cultural heritage of the region and the narrative history of the Coast Salish Tribes.(End of part)PART XVIISPECIAL APPROPRIATIONSSec. 1701. 2024 c 376 s 702 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE STATE TREASURERâBOND RETIREMENT AND INTEREST, AND ONGOING BOND REGISTRATION AND TRANSFER CHARGES: FOR DEBT SUBJECT TO THE DEBT LIMITGeneral FundâState Appropriation (FY 2024). . . .$1,401,902,000General FundâState Appropriation (FY 2025). . . .(($1,471,521,000))Â Â Â Â Â $1,466,469,000State Building Construction AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .(($20,863,000))Â Â Â Â Â $7,000,000Columbia River Basin Water Supply DevelopmentAccountâState Appropriation. . . .$3,000Watershed Restoration and Enhancement Bond AccountâState Appropriation. . . .(($64,000))Â Â Â Â Â $36,000State Taxable Building Construction AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .(($876,000))Â Â Â Â Â $120,000Debt-Limit Reimbursable Bond Retirement AccountâState Appropriation. . . .$119,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($2,895,348,000))Â Â Â Â Â $2,875,649,000The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The general fund appropriations are for expenditure into the debt-limit general fund bond retirement account.Sec. 1702. 2024 c 376 s 703 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE STATE TREASURERâBOND RETIREMENT AND INTEREST, AND ONGOING BOND REGISTRATION AND TRANSFER CHARGES: FOR GENERAL OBLIGATION DEBT TO BE REIMBURSED AS PRESCRIBED BY STATUTENondebt-Limit Reimbursable Bond Retirement AccountâState Appropriation. . . .(($51,761,000))Â Â Â Â Â $51,777,000School Construction and Skill Centers BuildingAccountâState Appropriation. . . .(($4,000))Â Â Â Â Â $2,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($51,765,000))Â Â Â Â Â $51,779,000The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The general fund appropriation is for expenditure into the nondebt limit general fund bond retirement account.Sec. 1703. 2024 c 376 s 704 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE STATE TREASURERâBOND RETIREMENT AND INTEREST, AND ONGOING BOND REGISTRATION AND TRANSFER CHARGES: FOR BOND SALE EXPENSESGeneral FundâState Appropriation (FY 2024). . . .$1,400,000General FundâState Appropriation (FY 2025). . . .$1,400,000State Building Construction AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .(($3,921,000))Â Â Â Â Â $1,500,000Watershed Restoration and Enhancement Bond AccountâState Appropriation. . . .(($24,000))Â Â Â Â Â $14,000State Taxable Building Construction AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .(($176,000))Â Â Â Â Â $56,000Columbia River Basin Water Supply DevelopmentAccountâState Appropriation. . . .$1,000School Construction and Skill Centers BuildingAccountâState Appropriation. . . .$1,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($6,923,000))Â Â Â Â Â $4,372,000Sec. 1704. 2024 c 376 s 706 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENTâSTATE HEALTH CARE AFFORDABILITY ACCOUNTGeneral FundâState Appropriation (FY 2024). . . .$55,000,000General FundâState Appropriation (FY 2025). . . .(($45,000,000))Â Â Â Â Â $85,000,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($100,000,000))Â Â Â Â Â $140,000,000The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) The appropriations are provided solely for expenditure into the state health care affordability account created in RCW 43.71.130.(2) It is the intent of the legislature to continue the policy of expending $5,000,000 into the account each fiscal year in future biennia for the purpose of funding premium assistance for customers ineligible for federal premium tax credits who meet the eligibility criteria established in section 214(4)(a) of this act. Future expenditures into the account are contingent upon approval of the waiver described in RCW 43.71.120.Sec. 1705. 2024 c 376 s 707 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR SUNDRY CLAIMSThe following sums, or so much thereof as may be necessary, are appropriated from the general fund for fiscal year 2024 or fiscal year 2025, unless otherwise indicated, for relief of various individuals, firms, and corporations for sundry claims.(1) These appropriations are to be disbursed on vouchers approved by the director of the department of enterprise services, except as otherwise provided, for reimbursement of criminal defendants acquitted on the basis of self-defense, pursuant to RCW 9A.16.110, as follows:(((1)))(a) Clifford T. Snow, claim number 9991014081. . . .$13,659(((2)))(b) Shanna S. Parker, claim number 9991013694. . . .$14,913(((3)))(c) Leah M. Eggleson, claim number 9991013115. . . .$20,852(((4)))(d) Shannon E. Garner, claim number 9991013103. . . .$15,325(((5)))(e) Stephanie S. Westby, claim number 9991012517. . . .$199,459(((6)))(f) Clyde E. McCoy, claim number 9991014232. . . .$139(((7)))(g) Kevin R. Ash, claim number 9991014512. . . .$14,810(((8)))(h) Kenneth M. Salazar, claim number 9991014683. . . .$231,920(((9)))(i) Victor O. Alejandre-Mejia, claim number9991014791. . . .$213,298(((10)))(j) James K. Warren, claim number 9991014924. . . .$20,844(((11)))(k) Marcus Buchanan, claim number 9991015324. . . .$71,102(((12)))(l) Lawrence Connor Norton, claim number9991015445. . . .$110,000(((13)))(m) Abdifatah Abshir, claim number 9991015447. . . .$55,000(n) Dustin G. Haynes, claim number 9991019217. . . .$27,610(o) Shawn W. Rounsville, claim number 9991019165. . . .$53,336(p) Irving Duffy, claim number 9991019023. . . .$6,000(q) Nseka R. Bimwela, claim number 9991018991. . . .$680(r) Aprillia M. Davis, claim number 9991018371. . . .$1,000(s) Troy L. Wells, claim number 9991017443. . . .$29,273(t) Tuwana D. Armstead, claim number 9991016087. . . .$7,756(u) Eddie Sulcer, claim number 9991019574. . . .$361,725(v) Sergio Villagomez, claim number 9991019809. . . .$11,153(w) Joseph Ledbetter, claim number 9991020101. . . .$36,635(x) Lamar Hopkins, claim number 9991020169. . . .$6,702(y) Jeffrey Hickman, claim number 9991020647. . . .$6,542(z) Joseph Van Housen, claim number 9991020723. . . .$10,403(aa) Matthew Good, claim number 9991020930. . . .$247,582(bb) Bruce Johnson, claim number 9991021411. . . .$10,828(2) This appropriation is to be disbursed on a voucher approved by the director of the department of enterprise services, except as otherwise provided, for payment of compensation for wrongful convictions pursuant to RCW 4.100.060, as follows:Ezequiel Apolo-Albino, claim number 9991021025. . . .$450,344Sec. 1706. 2024 c 376 s 713 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE WASHINGTON STUDENT ACHIEVEMENT COUNCILâOPPORTUNITY SCHOLARSHIP MATCH TRANSFER ACCOUNTWorkforce Education Investment AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .(($14,856,000))Â Â Â Â Â $14,635,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($14,856,000))Â Â Â Â Â $14,635,000The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriations are provided solely for expenditure into the opportunity scholarship match transfer account created in RCW 28B.145.050.Sec. 1707. 2024 c 376 s 717 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENTâCORONAVIRUS STATE FISCAL RECOVERYCoronavirus State Fiscal Recovery FundâFederalAppropriation. . . .$250,000,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$250,000,000The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The entire coronavirus state fiscal recovery fundâfederal appropriation is provided solely to the office of financial management for allocation to state agencies for costs eligible to be paid from the coronavirus state fiscal recovery fund and where funding is provided elsewhere in this act or the capital omnibus appropriations act for those costs using a funding source other than the coronavirus state fiscal recovery fund. For any agency receiving an allocation under this section, the office must place an equal amount of the agency's state or other source appropriation authority in unallotted reserve status, and those amounts may not be expended. In determining the use of amounts appropriated in this section, the office of financial management shall prioritize the preservation of state general fund moneys. The office must report on the use of the amounts appropriated in this section to the fiscal committees of the legislature when all coronavirus state fiscal recovery fund moneys are expended ((or June 30, 2025, whichever is earlier)).NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1708. A new section is added to 2024 c 376 (uncodified) to read as follows: FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENTâCOMMUNITY PRESERVATION AND DEVELOPMENT AUTHORITY ACCOUNTâOPERATING SUBACCOUNTGeneral FundâState Appropriation (FY 2025). . . .$2,248,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .$2,248,000The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriation is provided solely for expenditure into the operating subaccount of the community preservation and development authority account created in RCW 43.167.040.Sec. 1709. 2023 c 475 s 712 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENTâFOUNDATIONAL PUBLIC HEALTH SERVICESGeneral FundâState Appropriation (FY 2024). . . .$122,023,000General FundâState Appropriation (FY 2025). . . .(($151,091,000))Â Â Â Â Â $146,091,000Foundational Public Health Services AccountâStateAppropriation. . . .$28,050,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($301,164,000))Â Â Â Â Â $296,164,000The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriations are provided solely for distribution as provided in RCW 43.70.515.Sec. 1710. 2023 c 475 s 738 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENTâHOME VISITING SERVICES ACCOUNTGeneral FundâState Appropriation (FY 2024). . . .$12,247,000General FundâState Appropriation (FY 2025). . . .(($14,347,000))Â Â Â Â Â $13,097,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($26,594,000))Â Â Â Â Â $25,344,000The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriations are provided solely for expenditure into the home visiting services account created in RCW 43.216.130 for the home visiting program.(End of part)PART XVIIIOTHER TRANSFERS AND APPROPRIATIONSSec. 1801. 2024 c 376 s 801 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE STATE TREASURERâSTATE REVENUES FOR DISTRIBUTIONGeneral Fund Appropriation for fire insurancepremium distributions. . . .(($14,606,000))Â Â Â Â Â $15,046,000General Fund Appropriation for prosecuting attorneydistributions. . . .$8,690,000General Fund Appropriation for boating safety andeducation distributions. . . .(($4,272,000))Â Â Â Â Â $3,743,000General Fund Appropriation for public utilitydistrict excise tax distributions. . . .(($71,424,000))Â Â Â Â Â $68,868,000Death Investigations Account Appropriation fordistribution to counties for publicly fundedautopsies. . . .(($6,000,000))Â Â Â Â Â $6,210,000Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account Appropriation forharbor improvement revenue distributions. . . .(($140,000))Â Â Â Â Â $152,000Timber Tax Distribution Account Appropriation fordistribution to "timber" counties. . . .$92,948,000County Criminal Justice Assistance Appropriation. . . .(($129,925,000))Â Â Â Â Â $130,355,000Municipal Criminal Justice Assistance Appropriation. . . .(($51,744,000))Â Â Â Â Â $51,879,000City-County Assistance Appropriation. . . .(($34,604,000))Â Â Â Â Â $35,773,000Liquor Excise Tax Account Appropriation for liquorexcise tax distribution. . . .(($89,385,000))Â Â Â Â Â $84,711,000Columbia River Water Delivery Account Appropriationfor the Confederated Tribes of the ColvilleReservation. . . .$9,587,000Columbia River Water Delivery Account Appropriationfor the Spokane Tribe of Indians. . . .$6,919,000Liquor Revolving Account Appropriation for liquorprofits distribution. . . .$98,876,000General Fund Appropriation for other taxdistributions. . . .$104,000Dedicated Cannabis Account Appropriation forCannabis Excise Tax distributions pursuant toEngrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No.5796 (cannabis revenue). This includes anincrease of $1,178,000 which is an adjustmentfor distributions made in fiscal year 2022. . . .(($47,216,000))Â Â Â Â Â $43,707,000General Fund Appropriation for Habitat ConservationProgram distributions. . . .(($5,754,000))Â Â Â Â Â $4,675,000General Fund Appropriation for payment in lieu oftaxes to counties under Department of Fish andWildlife Program. . . .(($4,496,000))Â Â Â Â Â $4,134,000Puget Sound Taxpayer Accountability AccountAppropriation for distribution to counties inamounts not to exceed actual deposits into theaccount and attributable to those counties'share pursuant to RCW 43.79.520.. . . .(($28,630,000))Â Â Â Â Â $27,149,000Manufacturing and Warehousing Job Centers AccountAppropriation for distribution to local taxingjurisdictions to mitigate the unintendedrevenue redistributions effect of sourcing lawchanges pursuant to chapter 83, Laws of 2021(warehousing & manufacturing jobs).. . . .$7,780,000State Crime Victim and Witness Assistance AccountAppropriation for distribution to counties.. . . .$8,000,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($721,100,000))Â Â Â Â Â $709,306,000The total expenditures from the state treasury under the appropriations in this section shall not exceed the funds available under statutory distributions for the stated purposes.Sec. 1802. 2024 c 376 s 802 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE STATE TREASURERâFOR THE COUNTY CRIMINAL JUSTICE ASSISTANCE ACCOUNTImpaired Driving Safety Appropriation. . . .(($1,615,000))Â Â Â Â Â $1,596,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($1,615,000))Â Â Â Â Â $1,596,000The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The amount appropriated in this section shall be distributed quarterly during the 2023-2025 fiscal biennium in accordance with RCW 82.14.310. This funding is provided to counties for the costs of implementing criminal justice legislation including, but not limited to: Chapter 206, Laws of 1998 (drunk driving penalties); chapter 207, Laws of 1998 (DUI penalties); chapter 208, Laws of 1998 (deferred prosecution); chapter 209, Laws of 1998 (DUI/license suspension); chapter 210, Laws of 1998 (ignition interlock violations); chapter 211, Laws of 1998 (DUI penalties); chapter 212, Laws of 1998 (DUI penalties); chapter 213, Laws of 1998 (intoxication levels lowered); chapter 214, Laws of 1998 (DUI penalties); and chapter 215, Laws of 1998 (DUI provisions).Sec. 1803. 2024 c 376 s 803 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE STATE TREASURERâMUNICIPAL CRIMINAL JUSTICE ASSISTANCE ACCOUNTImpaired Driving Safety Appropriation. . . .(($1,077,000))Â Â Â Â Â $1,064,000TOTAL APPROPRIATION. . . .(($1,077,000))Â Â Â Â Â $1,064,000The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The amount appropriated in this section shall be distributed quarterly during the 2023-2025 fiscal biennium to all cities ratably based on population as last determined by the office of financial management. The distributions to any city that substantially decriminalizes or repeals its criminal code after July 1, 1990, and that does not reimburse the county for costs associated with criminal cases under RCW 3.50.800 or 3.50.805(2), shall be made to the county in which the city is located. This funding is provided to cities for the costs of implementing criminal justice legislation including, but not limited to: Chapter 206, Laws of 1998 (drunk driving penalties); chapter 207, Laws of 1998 (DUI penalties); chapter 208, Laws of 1998 (deferred prosecution); chapter 209, Laws of 1998 (DUI/license suspension); chapter 210, Laws of 1998 (ignition interlock violations); chapter 211, Laws of 1998 (DUI penalties); chapter 212, Laws of 1998 (DUI penalties); chapter 213, Laws of 1998 (intoxication levels lowered); chapter 214, Laws of 1998 (DUI penalties); and chapter 215, Laws of 1998 (DUI provisions).Sec. 1804. 2024 c 376 s 804 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE STATE TREASURERâTRANSFERSDedicated Cannabis Account: For transfer to thebasic health plan trust account, the lesser ofthe amount determined pursuant to RCW 69.50.540or this amount for fiscal year 2024,$250,000,000 and this amountfor fiscal year 2025,$250,000,000. . . .$500,000,000Dedicated Cannabis Account: For transfer to thestate general fund, the lesser of the amountdetermined pursuant to RCW 69.50.540 or thisamount for fiscal year 2024,$155,000,000 and this amount for fiscal year2025, $155,000,000. . . .$310,000,000Tobacco Settlement Account: For transfer to thestate general fund, in an amount not to exceedthe actual amount of the annual base payment tothe tobacco settlement account for fiscal year2024. . . .$92,000,000Tobacco Settlement Account: For transfer to thestate general fund, in an amount not to exceedthe actual amount of the annual base payment tothe tobacco settlement account for fiscal year2025 and additional payments for fiscal year2025 resulting from the diligent enforcementsettlement. . . .(($92,000,000))Â Â Â Â Â $375,000,000State Treasurer's Service Account: For transfer tothe state general fund, $15,000,000 for fiscalyear 2024 and $15,000,000 for fiscal year 2025.It is the intent of the legislature to continuethis policy in the subsequent fiscal biennium.. . . .$30,000,000General Fund: For transfer to the fair fund underRCW 15.76.115, $3,500,000 for fiscal year 2024and $3,500,000 for fiscal year 2025. . . .$7,000,000Financial Services Regulation Account: For transferto the state general fund, $3,500,000 forfiscal year 2024 and $3,500,000 for fiscal year2025. It is the intent of the legislature tocontinue this policy in the subsequent fiscalbiennium.. . . .$7,000,000General Fund: For transfer to the wildfire response,forest restoration, and community resilienceaccount, solely for the implementation ofchapter 298, Laws of 2021 (2SHB 1168)(long-term forest health),$52,224,000 for fiscal year 2024 and$56,725,000 for fiscal year2025. . . .$108,949,000Washington Rescue Plan Transition Account: Fortransfer to the state general fund,$1,302,000,000 for fiscal year 2024 and$798,000,000 for fiscal year 2025. . . .$2,100,000,000Business License Account: For transfer to the stategeneral fund, (($7,200,000))$7,400,000 forfiscal year 2025. . . .(($7,200,000))Â Â Â Â Â $7,400,000General Fund: For transfer to the manufacturing andwarehousing job centers account pursuant to RCW82.14.545 for distribution in section 801 ofthis act, $4,320,000 for fiscal year 2024 and$3,460,000 for fiscal year 2025. . . .$7,780,000Long-Term Services and Supports Trust Account: Fortransfer to the state general fund as fullrepayment of the long-term services programstart-up costs and interest, in an amount notto exceed the actual amount of the totalremaining principal and interest of the loan,for fiscal year 2024. . . .$66,000,000General Fund: For transfer to the forest resiliencyaccount trust fund, $4,000,000 for fiscal year2024. . . .$4,000,000Water Pollution Control Revolving AdministrationAccount: For transfer to the water pollutioncontrol revolving account, $6,000,000 forfiscal year 2024. . . .$6,000,000General Fund: For transfer to the salmon recoveryaccount, $3,000,000 for fiscal year 2024. . . .$3,000,000Washington Student Loan Account: For transfer to thestate general fund, $40,000,000 for fiscal year2024 and $10,000,000 for fiscal year 2025. . . .$50,000,000Model Toxics Control Operating Account: For transferto the state general fund, $50,000,000 forfiscal year 2025. . . .$50,000,000General Fund: For transfer to the home securityfund, $44,500,000 for fiscal year 2024 and$4,500,000 for fiscal year 2025. . . .$49,000,000General Fund: For transfer to the state droughtpreparedness account, $2,000,000 for fiscalyear 2024. . . .$2,000,000General Fund: For transfer to the disaster responseaccount, $12,500,000 for fiscal year 2024and (($10,000,000))$57,000,000 for fiscal year2025. . . .(($22,500,000))Â Â Â Â Â $69,500,000From auction proceeds received under RCW70A.65.100(7)(b): For transfer to the airquality and health disparities improvementaccount, $2,500,000 for fiscal year 2024. . . .$2,500,000From auction proceeds received under RCW70A.65.100(7)(c): For transfer to the airquality and health disparities improvementaccount, $2,500,000 for fiscal year 2025. . . .$2,500,000Climate Investment Account: For transfer to thecarbon emissions reduction account,(($200,000,000))$5,847,000 for fiscal year2025 no later than October 15, 2024. It is theintent of the legislature to make an additionaltransfer of $194,153,000 planned in fiscal year2027 to ensure a total of $200,000,000 istransferred. . . .(($200,000,000))Â Â Â Â Â $5,847,000((Climate Investment Account: For transfer to theclimate commitment account,$170,000,000 for fiscal year 2025. . . .$170,000,000Climate Investment Account: For transfer to thenatural climate solutions account, $70,000,000for fiscal year 2025. . . .$70,000,000))Climate Investment Account: For transfer to thecarbon emissions reduction account,(($324,000,000))$162,000,000 on or afterJanuary 1, 2025. It is the intent of thelegislature to make an additional transfer of$162,000,000 planned in fiscal year 2027 toensure a total of $324,000,000 is transferred. . . .(($324,000,000))Â Â Â Â Â $162,000,000General Fund: For transfer to the deathinvestigations account, $3,000,000 for fiscalyear 2024 and $55,000 for fiscal year 2025. . . .(($3,000,000))Â Â Â Â Â $3,055,000General Fund: For transfer to the local governmentarchives account, $1,900,000 for fiscal year2025. . . .$1,900,000Joint Legislative Systems Committee Subaccount ofthe Savings Incentive Account: For transferto the general fund, $819,000 for fiscal year2024. . . .$819,000General Fund: For transfer to the motor vehicleaccountâstate, $14,000,000 for fiscal year2024. . . .$14,000,000General Fund: For transfer to the stadium worldcup capital account, $10,000,000 for fiscalyear 2024. . . .$10,000,000Military Department Active State Service Account:For transfer to the state general fund,$149,000 for fiscal year 2025. . . .$149,000Military Department Capital Account: For transferto the state general fund, $350,000 forfiscal year 2025. . . .$350,000Military Department Rent and Lease Account: Fortransfer to the state general fund,$1,000,000 for fiscal year 2025. . . .$1,000,000Industrial Insurance Premium Refund Account:For transfer to the state general fund,$4,121,000 for fiscal year 2025. . . .$4,121,000Washington Auto Theft Prevention AuthorityAccount: For transfer to the state generalfund, $800,000 for fiscal year 2025. . . .$800,000Secretary of State's Revolving Account: Fortransfer to the state general fund,$15,000,000 for fiscal year 2025. . . .$15,000,000Natural Climate Solutions Account: For transfer tothe natural resource real propertyreplacement account for repayment of the loanmade in section 3245, chapter 19, Laws of2013, pertaining to the purchase of theTeanaway property and community forest,$10,000,000 for fiscal year 2025. . . .$10,000,000Electric Vehicle Incentive Account: For transferto the state general fund, $67,697,000 forfiscal year 2025. . . .$67,697,000Port District Equity Fund: For transfer to thestate general fund, $1,000,000 for fiscalyear 2025. . . .$1,000,000Public Service Revolving Account: For transferto the state general fund, $250,000 forfiscal year 2025. . . .$250,000(End of part)PART XIXMISCELLANEOUSSec. 1901. 2023 sp.s. c 1 s 35 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:The appropriations in this section are provided to the office of public defense and are subject to the following conditions and limitations:The following sums, or so much thereof as may be necessary, are each appropriated: $3,000,000 from the state general fund for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2024; and (($6,000,000))$5,000,000 from the state general fund for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2025. The amounts in this section are provided solely for the purpose of RCW 2.70.200.Sec. 1902. 2024 c 328 s 204 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:(1) The department of children, youth, and families shall provide funding and support for two pilot programs to implement an evidence-based, comprehensive, intensive, in-home parenting services support model to serve children and families from birth to age 18 who are involved in child welfare, children's mental health, or juvenile justice systems.(2) The pilot programs established in this section are intended to prevent or limit out-of-home placement through trauma-informed support to the child, caregivers, and families with three in-person, in-home sessions per week and provide on-call crisis support 24 hours a day, seven days a week.(3) One pilot program established in this section will serve families west of the crest of the Cascade mountain range and one pilot program established in this section will serve families east of the crest of the Cascade mountain range. Each pilot program will build upon existing programs to avoid duplication of existing services available to children and families at risk of entering the child welfare system.(4) This section expires ((July 1, 2026))June 30, 2025.Sec. 1903. RCW 34.12.130 and 1982 c 189 s 9 are each amended to read as follows:The administrative hearings revolving fund is hereby created in the state treasury for the purpose of centralized funding, accounting, and distribution of the actual costs of the services provided to agencies of the state government by the office of administrative hearings. During the 2023-2025 fiscal biennium, the legislature may direct the state treasurer to transfer money in the administrative hearings revolving fund to the state general fund.Sec. 1904. RCW 38.40.200 and 2005 c 252 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:The military department capital account is created in the state treasury. All receipts from the sale of state-owned military department property must be deposited into the account. Money in the account may be spent only after appropriation. Expenditures from the account may be used only for military department capital projects. During the 2023-2025 fiscal biennium, the legislature may direct the state treasurer to transfer money in the military department capital account to the state general fund.Sec. 1905. RCW 38.40.210 and 2005 c 252 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:The military department rental and lease account is created in the state treasury. All receipts from the rental or lease of state-owned military department property must be deposited into the account. Money in the account may be spent only after appropriation. Expenditures from the account may be used only for operating and maintenance costs of military property. During the 2023-2025 fiscal biennium, the legislature may direct the state treasurer to transfer money in the military department rental and lease account to the state general fund.Sec. 1906. RCW 38.40.220 and 2008 c 44 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:The military department active state service account is created in the state treasury. Moneys may be placed in the account from legislative appropriations and transfers, federal appropriations, or any other lawful source. Moneys in the account may be spent only after appropriation. Expenditures from the account may be used only for claims and expenses for the organized militia called into active state service to perform duties under RCW 38.08.040 that are not paid under RCW 38.24.010 from nonappropriated funds, including but not limited to claims and expenses arising from anticipated planning, training, exercises, and other administrative duties that are not of an emergency nature. During the 2023-2025 fiscal biennium, the legislature may direct the state treasurer to transfer money in the military department active state service account to the state general fund.Sec. 1907. RCW 43.07.130 and 2015 c 176 s 8102 are each amended to read as follows:There is created within the state treasury a revolving fund, to be known as the "secretary of state's revolving fund," which must be used by the office of the secretary of state to defray the costs of providing registration and information services authorized by law by the office of the secretary of state, and any other cost of carrying out the functions of the secretary of state under Title 11, 18, 19, 23, 23B, 24, 25, 26, 30A, 30B, 42, 43, or 64 RCW.The secretary of state is authorized to charge a fee for publications in an amount which will compensate for the costs of printing, reprinting, and distributing such printed matter. Fees recovered by the secretary of state under RCW 43.07.120(2), 19.09.305, 19.09.315, 19.09.440, 23.95.260(1) (a)(ii) and (iii) and (d), or 46.64.040, and such other moneys as are expressly designated for deposit in the secretary of state's revolving fund must be placed in the secretary of state's revolving fund.During the ((2005-2007))2023-2025 fiscal biennium, the legislature may direct the treasurer to transfer money from the secretary of state's revolving fund to the state general fund ((such amounts as reflect the excess fund balance of the fund)).Sec. 1908. RCW 43.330.365 and 2023 c 435 s 8 are each amended to read as follows:The electric vehicle incentive account is created in the state treasury. Revenues to the account shall consist of appropriations and transfers by the legislature and all other moneys directed for deposit into the account. Moneys in the account may only be spent after appropriation. Expenditures from the account may be used for programs and incentives that promote the purchase or conversion to alternative fuel vehicles to further state climate goals under RCW 70A.45.020 and environmental justice goals under 70A.02 RCW, including but not limited to:(1) Income-qualified grant programs to retire vehicles and replace them with alternative fuel vehicles;(2) Programs to provide grants for the installation of electric vehicle infrastructure to support electric vehicle adoption; and(3) Programs to conduct research and public outreach regarding adoption of alternative fuel vehicles.During the 2023-2025 fiscal biennium, the legislature may direct the state treasurer to transfer money in the electric vehicle incentive account to the state general fund.Sec. 1909. RCW 46.66.080 and 2023 c 388 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:(1) The Washington auto theft prevention authority account is created in the state treasury, subject to appropriation. Revenues consist of deposits to the account under RCW 48.14.020(1)(b) and all receipts from gifts, grants, bequests, devises, or other funds from public and private sources to support the activities of the auto theft prevention authority must be deposited into the account. Expenditures from the account may be used only for activities relating to motor vehicle theft, including education, prevention, law enforcement, investigation, prosecution, and confinement.(2) The authority shall allocate moneys appropriated from the account to public agencies for the purpose of establishing, maintaining, and supporting programs that are designed to prevent motor vehicle theft, including:(a) Financial support to prosecution agencies to increase the effectiveness of motor vehicle theft prosecution;(b) Financial support to a unit of local government or a team consisting of units of local governments to increase the effectiveness of motor vehicle theft enforcement;(c) Financial support for the procurement of equipment and technologies for use by law enforcement agencies for the purpose of enforcing motor vehicle theft laws; and(d) Financial support for programs that are designed to educate and assist the public in the prevention of motor vehicle theft.(3) The costs of administration shall not exceed 10 percent of the moneys in the account in any one year so that the greatest possible portion of the moneys available to the authority is expended on combating motor vehicle theft.(4) Prior to awarding any moneys from the Washington auto theft prevention authority account for motor vehicle theft enforcement, the auto theft prevention authority must verify that the financial award includes sufficient funding to cover proposed activities.(5) Moneys expended from the Washington auto theft prevention authority account under subsection (2) of this section shall be used to supplement, not supplant, other moneys that are available for motor vehicle theft prevention.(6) Grants provided under subsection (2) of this section constitute reimbursement for purposes of RCW 43.135.060(1).(7) During the 2023-2025 fiscal biennium, the legislature may direct the state treasurer to transfer money in the Washington auto theft prevention authority account to the state general fund.Sec. 1910. RCW 51.44.170 and 2011 c 5 s 917 are each amended to read as follows:The industrial insurance premium refund account is created in the custody of the state treasurer. All industrial insurance refunds earned by state agencies or institutions of higher education under the state fund retrospective rating program shall be deposited into the account. The account is subject to the allotment procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required for expenditures from the account. Only the executive head of the agency or institution of higher education, or designee, may authorize expenditures from the account. No agency or institution of higher education may make an expenditure from the account for an amount greater than the refund earned by the agency. If the agency or institution of higher education has staff dedicated to workers' compensation claims management, expenditures from the account must be used to pay for that staff, but additional expenditure from the account may be used for any program within an agency or institution of higher education that promotes or provides incentives for employee workplace safety and health and early, appropriate return-to-work for injured employees. During the 2009-2011 fiscal biennium, the legislature may transfer from the industrial insurance premium refund account to the state general fund such amounts as reflect the excess fund balance of the account. During the 2023-2025 fiscal biennium, the legislature may direct the state treasurer to transfer money in the industrial insurance premium refund account to the state general fund.Sec. 1911. RCW 53.20.090 and 2024 c 194 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:(1) The port district equity fund is created in the custody of the state treasurer. Moneys to the account may consist of appropriations by the legislature, contributions from county and local governments and port districts, and private contributions. Expenditures from the account may only be used to make grants to port districts under RCW 43.330.610. Only the director of the department of commerce or the director's designee may authorize expenditures from the account. The account is subject to the allotment procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW, but an appropriation is not required for expenditures.(2) The department of commerce shall provide management services for the port district equity fund. The department shall establish procedures for fund management. The department shall develop the grant criteria, monitor the grant program, and select grant recipients.(3) The department of commerce shall prepare and publish an annual report on its website detailing grants made under this section, the uses to which the grants have been put, and the benefits that have been realized.(4) During the 2023-2025 fiscal biennium, the legislature may direct the state treasurer to transfer money in the port district equity fund to the state general fund.Sec. 1912. RCW 72.09.780 and 2023 c 195 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:(1) The department is authorized to acquire, receive, possess, sell, resell, deliver, dispense, distribute, and engage in any activity constituting the practice of pharmacy or wholesale distribution with respect to abortion medications.(2) The department may exercise the authority granted in this section for the benefit of any person, whether or not the person is in the custody or under the supervision of the department.(3) The department shall exercise the authority granted in this section in accordance with any applicable law including, but not limited to, any applicable licensing requirements, except that the department is exempt from obtaining a wholesaler's license for any actions taken pursuant to chapter 195, Laws of 2023 as provided in RCW 18.64.046.(4)(a) The department shall establish and operate a program to deliver, dispense, and distribute abortion medications described in this section. In circumstances in which the department is selling, delivering, or distributing abortion medications to a health care provider or health care entity, it may only sell, distribute, or deliver abortion medications to health care providers and health care entities that will only use the medications for the purposes of providing abortion care or medical management of early pregnancy loss.(b) ((Any))Except as provided in (c) of this subsection, any abortion medications sold, resold, delivered, dispensed, or distributed whether individually or wholesale shall be conducted at cost not to exceed list price, plus a fee of $5 per dose to offset the cost of secure storage and delivery of medication. Revenues generated pursuant to chapter 195, Laws of 2023 shall be deposited to the general fund.(c) During the 2025 fiscal year, any abortion medications sold, resold, delivered, dispensed, or distributed whether individually or wholesale shall be conducted at cost not to exceed list price.(5) Nothing in this section shall diminish any existing authority of the department.(6) For the purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:(a) "Abortion medications" means substances used in the course of medical treatment intended to induce the termination of a pregnancy including, but not limited to, mifepristone.(b) "Deliver" has the same meaning as in RCW 18.64.011.(c) "Dispense" has the same meaning as in RCW 18.64.011.(d) "Distribute" has the same meaning as in RCW 18.64.011.(e) "Health care entity" means a hospital, clinic, pharmacy, office, or similar setting where a health care provider provides health care to patients.(f) "Health care provider" has the same meaning as in RCW 70.02.010.(g) "Person" has the same meaning as in RCW 18.64.011.(h) "Practice of pharmacy" has the same meaning as in RCW 18.64.011.(i) "Wholesale distribution" has the same meaning as in WAC 246-945-001.Sec. 1913. RCW 80.01.080 and 2017 3rd sp.s. c 25 s 11 are each amended to read as follows:There is created in the state treasury a public service revolving fund. Regulatory fees payable by all types of public service companies shall be deposited to the credit of the public service revolving fund. Except for expenses payable out of the pipeline safety account, all expense of operation of the Washington utilities and transportation commission shall be payable out of the public service revolving fund. During the 2023-2025 fiscal biennium, the legislature may direct the state treasurer to transfer money in the public service revolving fund to the state general fund.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1914. If any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other persons or circumstances is not affected.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1915. Except for section 940 of this act, this act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect immediately.--- END ---